Vol. 261 Thursday,   
No. 4 21 st September, 2023 
 30 Bhadra, 1945 (Saka) 
 
 
 
PARLIAMENTARY DEBATES 
 
RAJYA SABHA 
OFFICIAL REPORT (FLOOR VERSION) 
 
CONTENTS 
 
Birthday Greetings (page 1)  
 
Message from Lok Sabha - Reported 
The Constitution (One Hundred and Twenty-Eighth Amendment) Bill, 2023- 
Laid on the Table (page 1) 
 
Announcement by the Chair (pages 1 - 2 and page 5) 
 
Papers Laid on the Table (pages 2 - 3) 
 
Report of the Department-related Parliame ntary Standing Committee on Education, 
Women, Children, Youth and Sports - Presented (page 3) 
 
Report of the Department-related Parliame ntary Standing Committee on Health and 
Family Welfare- Presented (page 4) 
 
[P.T.O 
 
 
©  
RAJYA SABHA SECRETARIAT 
NEW DELHI 


Report of the Department-related Parliamentary Standing Committee on Home Affairs 
 - Presented  (page 4) 
 
Reports of The Department-Related Parliamentary Standing Committee on Transport, 
Tourism and Culture - Presented (page 4) 
 
Statement by Minister Correcting Answer to Question - Laid on the Table (page 5 ) 
 
Government Bill - Passed 
The Constitution (One Hundred and Tw enty-Eighth Amendment) Bill, 2023 
(pages 5 - 114 and pages 115 - 275) 
 
Statutory Resolutions - Adopted  
Levying of Export Duty on exports of Onions and exports of Parboiled Rice  
(pages 114 - 115) 
 
National Song (page 275) 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Website : http://rajyasabha.nic.in
  
      http://parliamentofindia.nic.in  
E-mail   : rsedit-e@sansad.nic.in 

RAJYA SABHA 
Thursday, the 21st September, 2023/30 Bhadra, 1945 (Saka) 
The House met at eleven of the clock, 
MR. CHAIRMAN in the Chair.  
BIRTHDAY GREETINGS 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Members, I take this opportunity to exten d birthday greetings 
to hon. Member of Parliament, Shri Vivek Tankha. Senior Advocate, former Additional 
Solicitor General of India and Advocate General of Madhya Pradesh, Shri Tankha, is a 
Member of this august House now in his s econd term since June, 2016. Shri Tankha 
is a social activist with deep empathy for the cause of challenged children.  As the 
Chairman of Justice Tankha Memorial Inst itute of Special Children, he has been 
commendably running schools for the uplif tment of differentl y-abled children in 
Central India. He is married to Shrimati Aa rti Tankha, with whom he shares love for 
classical Indian music and ghazals. The couple is blessed with son, Varun and 
daughter, Vasundhara.   
Hon. Members, on my own and your  behalf, I wish him a long, healthy 
and happy life, extend greetings to his family and friends. 
MESSAGE FROM LOK SABHA 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Message from Lok Sabha; Secret ary-General. 
The Constitution (One Hundred and Twenty-Eighth Amendment) Bill, 2023  
SECRETARY-GENERAL: Sir, with your kind permission, I rise to report that the Lok 
Sabha at
 its sitting held on 20 th September, 2023, passed the Constitution (One 
Hundred and Twenty-Eighth Amendment) Bill, 2023. 
Sir, I lay a copy of the Bill on the Table.  
ANNOUNCEMENT BY THE CHAIR 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Members, I have to inform that considering  historic 
importance of the proceedings today, in addition to the existing panel of Vice-

Chairpersons, I am seeking assistance of  the following hon. Members as Vice-
Chairpersons for the day, namely, Shrimati P.T. Usha; Shrimati S. Phangnon Konyak; 
Shrimati Jaya Bachchan; Sushri Saroj Pand ey; Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao Patil; Dr. 
Fauzia Khan; Sushri Dola Sen; Sushri Indu Bala Goswami; Dr. Kanimozhi NVN Somu; 
Sushri Kavita Patidar; Shrimati Mahua Ma ji; Dr. Kalpana Saini and Shrimati Sulata 
Deo. They all will have occasion, along with  the Panel, to be on the Chair for some 
time and emanate a message to the larger  world that they were in commanding 
position at a time when in this historic   theatre, epochal change was taking place.  
 
 
PAPERS LAID ON THE TABLE 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Papers to be Laid on the Table.  
 
I. Notifications of the Election Commission of India 
II. Notification of the Ministry of Law and Justice  
 
THE MINISTER OF STATE OF THE MINISTRY OF LAW AND JUSTICE; (SHRI 
ARJUN RAM MEGHWAL): Sir, I lay on the Table— 
I.    A copy each (in English and Hindi) of  the following Notifications of the Election 
Commission of India, under  sub-section (6) of Section 8A of the Representation of 
the People Act, 1950:— 
 
(1) O.N. 19 (E), dated the 20
th June, 2023, publishing the proposals for the 
delimitation of Parliamentary and Assembly Constituencies in the State of 
Assam. 
(2) O.N. 33 (E), dated the 11
th August, 2023, amending Schedule-I & II and 
Schedule V (with regard to the State of Assam) to the Delimitation of 
Parliamentary and Assembly Constituencies Order 2008. 
                                                  [Placed in Library. For (1) and (2) See No. L.T. 10066/17/23] 
 
II. (i)  A copy (in English and Hindi) of the Mi nistry of Law and Justice (Legislative 
Department) Notification No. S.O. 3661 (E), dated the 16 th August, 2023, 
publishing the order of the President issu ed in pursuance of second proviso to 
Article 82 and the second proviso to clause (3) of Article 170 of the Constitution of 
India, specifying the 16 th August, 2023 as the date on which the Election 
Commission of India Orders, mentioned at I above, shall take effect.  
                                                                                          [Placed in Library. See No. L.T. 10066/17/23]  
2
[RAJYA SABHA]

(ii)   A copy (in English and Hindi) of the Mi nistry of Law and Justice (Legislative 
Department) Notification No. S.O. 3778 (E), dated the 23 rd August, 2023, 
publishing the Conduct of Elections (Ame ndment) Rules, 2023, under sub-section 
(3) of Section 169 of the Representation of the People Act, 1951. 
[Placed in Library. See No. L.T. 10067/17/23] 
 
I. Heritage Bye-laws of the Ministry of Culture 
II. Report and Accounts (2021-22) of the Tibet House, New Delhi and related papers 
 
THE MINISTER OF STATE IN THE MINISTRY OF CULTURE (SHRIMATI 
MEENAKASHI LEKHI): Sir, I lay on the Table- 
 
I.   A copy (in English and Hindi) of the Heritage Bye-laws of the Ministry of Culture, 
publishing the National Mo numents Authority Heritage Bye-laws, 2023 of Centrally 
Protected Monument - Memorial Pillar Marking the site of the pre-mutiny Residency 
in the old Mariaon Cantonment, Lucknow, under sub-section (6) of Section 20E of 
the Ancient Monuments and Archaeological Sites and Remains Act, 1958. 
                                                                                          [Placed in Library. See No. L.T. 10071/17/23] 
 
II.    A copy each (in English and Hindi) of the following papers:- 
 
(a) 
Annual Report and Accounts of the Tibet House, New Delhi, for the year 2021-
22, together with  the Auditor's Report on the Accounts. 
(b) Review by Government on th e working of the above Centre. 
(c) Statement giving reasons for the delay in laying the papers mentioned at (a) 
above.   
                                                                               [Placed in Library. See No. L.T. 10070/17/23]   
 
 
REPORT OF THE DEPARTMENT-RELATED PARLIAMENTARY STANDING 
COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, WOMEN, CHILDREN, YOUTH AND SPORTS 
 
Ǜी िववेक ठाकु र ( िबहार): महोदय, मȅ िशक्षा, मिहला, बाल, युवा और खेल संबंधी Îथायी 
सिमित क े " उच्चतर िशक्षा मȂ राÍटर्ीय िशक्षा नीित, 2020 का  कायार्न्वयन" िवषय पर 356वȂ 
Ģितवेदन की एक Ģित (अंगर्ेज़ी तथा िहन्दी मȂ) सभा पटल पर रखता हूं। 
 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
3

REPORT OF THE DEPARTMENT-RELATED PARLIAMENTARY STANDING  
COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND FAMILY WELFARE 
 
SHRI BHUBANESWAR KALITA (Assam): Sir, I present a copy of the 149th Report (in 
English and Hindi) on “Implementation of Pradhan Mantri TB Mukt Bharat Abhiyan ” 
of the Department-related Parliamentary Standing Committee on Health and Family 
Welfare. 
 
 
REPORT OF THE DEPARTMENT-RELATED PARLIAMENTARY  
STANDING COMMITTEE ON HOME AFFAIRS 
        
SHRI NEERAJ SHEKHAR (Uttar Pradesh): Sir, I present the 245th Report (in English 
and Hindi) of the Department-related Pa rliamentary Standing Committee on Home 
Affairs on 'Prison – Conditions, Infrastructure and Reforms'. 
 
 
REPORTS OF THE DEPARTMENT-RELATED  PARLIAMENTARY STANDING 
COMMITTEE ON TRANSPORT, TOURISM AND CULTURE 
 
DR. C. M. RAMESH (Andhra Pradesh):  Sir, I present the following Reports (Hindi 
and English versions) of the Standing  Committee on Transport, Tourism and 
Culture:- 
 
(i) Three Hundred Fifty Fifth Report on the Action Taken by the Government on 
the recommendations/ observations of the Committee contained in its Three 
Hundred Thirty Ninth Repo rt on Demand for Grants  (2023-24) of Ministry of 
Civil Aviation; 
(ii)    Three Hundred Fifty Sixth Report on the Action Taken by the Government on 
the recommendations/ observations of the Committee contained in its Three 
Hundred Fortieth Report on Demand for Grants (2023-24) of Ministry of 
Culture;  
(iii)  Three Hundred Fifty Seventh Report  on the subject ‘Dev elopment of Niche 
Tourism (including Spiritual Tourism),  Theme-based Tourist Circuits and 
Potential Tourist Spots’; 
(iv)   Three Hundred Fifty Eighth Report on ‘Development and Expansion of Existing 
and New National Inland Waterways’; and 
(v)    Three Hundred Fifty Ninth Report on  ‘Functioning of Arch aeological  Survey of 
India’. 
4
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
STATEMENT BY MINISTER CORRECTING ANSWER TO QUESTION 
 
िशक्षा मंतर्ालय मȂ राज्य मंतर्ी ( डा. सुभाष सरकार): महोदय, मȅ 'इलाहाबाद िवÌविवǏालय क े 
वतर्मान क ुलपित की िनयुिƪ' क े संबंध मȂ 29 माच र्, 2023 को राज्य सभा मȂ अतारांिकत ĢÌन सं. 
3205 क े िदए गए उǄर क े संशोधनाथर् एक िववरण (अंगर्ेज़ी तथा िहन्दी मȂ) सभा पटल पर रखता 
ह
ूं। 
 
 
ANNOUNCEMENT BY THE CHAIR - Contd. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Members, a copy of  the Constitution (One Hundred and 
Twenty-Eighth Amendment) Bill, 2023, as passed by Lok Sabha, has now been laid 
on the Table of Rajya Sabha. I have admitt ed the notice received from the Minister of 
Law and Justice for consideration and passin g of the Bill in Rajya Sabha today, by 
waiving off the requirement of two days no tice period under Rule 123 of Rules of 
Procedure and Conduct of Business in the Council of States, Rajya Sabha. 
Accordingly, a Supplementary List of Busi ness has been issued for today for taking 
up this Bill for consideration and passing. A copy of the Bill has been circulated to 
Members electronically through Members' portal yesterday night itself so as to enable 
them to peruse the Bill.  In view of the sh ort time period available to Members, I have 
decided that those Members who desire to give notices of Amendments to the said 
Bill may do so now till 2 p.m. so as to enab le the Secretariat to process and circulate 
the list of Amendments. Noti ces received after 2 p.m.  will, however, not be 
processed. As recommended by the Business Advisory Committee in its meeting held 
yesterday, lunch hour will be dismissed du ring the discussion on the Constitution 
(One Hundred and Twenty-Eighth Amendmen t) Bill, 2023. Now, Shri Arjun Ram 
Meghwal to move a Motion for Consideratio n of the Constitution (One Hundred and 
Twenty-Eighth Amendment) Bill, 2023. 
 
 
GOVERNMENT BILL 
 
The Constitution (One Hundred and Twenty-Eighth Amendment) Bill, 2023 
 
िविध और न्याय मंतर्ालय क े राज्य मंतर्ी; संसदीय कायर् मंतर्ालय मȂ राज्य मंतर्ी; तथा संÎकृ ित  
 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
5

मंतर्ालय मȂ राज्य मंतर्ी (Ǜी अजुर्न राम मेघवाल) : चेयरमैन सर, मȅ  ĢÎताव करता हूं: 
 
“िक भारत क े संिवधान का और संशोधन करने वाले िवधेयक पर, लोक सभा ǎारा पािरत रूप  
मȂ िवचार िकया जाए।” 
 
सर, आपकी अनुमित हो तो मȅ इस संबंध मȂ क ु छ बोलना चाहता हूं। 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN:  Yes, please. 
 
Ǜी अजुर्न राम मेघवाल: थȅक यू। सर, यह कांिÎटǷूशन अमȂडमȂट िबल है और बहुत महत्वपूणर् 
िबल है। यह मिहला सशिƪकरण की िदशा मȂ एक बढ़ता हुआ कदम है। यह दुिनया को भी िदशा 
िदखाने वाला कदम है, अमृत काल की बेला मȂ भारत को िवकिसत भारत बनाने की िदशा मȂ एक 
महत्वपूणर् कद
म है। मȅ इस अवसर पर इस िबल क े बारे मȂ बोलने से पहले बताना चाहता हूं िक बाबा 
साहेब भीमराव अ
ंबेडकर जी ने 25 नवंबर, 1949 को संिवधान सभा मȂ भाषण देते हुए कहा था िक 
26 जनवरी, 1950 को हमȂ राजनीितक समानता िमल जाएगी, लेिकन सामािजक और आिर्थक क्षेतर् 
मȂ असमानता रहेगी, इसको कौन दूर करेगा, यह आने वाली सरकारȗ का कतर्Ëय होगा। मȅ आपको 
यहां पर बताना चाहता ह
ूं िक जब से नरेन्दर् मोदी जी की सरकार बनी है, तब से लेकर जो आिर्थक 
और सामािजक क्षेतर् मȂ असमानता थी, उसको दूर करने का Ģयास िकया गया है और उसमȂ 
मिहला सशिƪकरण भी सिÇमिलत है। सर, ज
ैसे जन-धन अकाउंट है, इस अकाउंट की धारक 
मिहला बनी, जैसे पीएम आवास है, उसमȂ मािलकाना हक मिहला को िमला, जैसे शौचालय है - 
उसको हमने इज्ज़त घर का नाम
 िदया है। सर, संिवधान की ĢÎतावना मȂ यह भी उÊलेख है िक 
हम राजनीितक, सामािजक और आिर्थक न्याय क े साथ-साथ ĢितÍठा और अवसर की समानता 
भी दȂगे, तो यह जो शौचालय वाला िवषय है, यह कोई छोटा िवषय नहीं है। यह संिवधान की 
ĢÎतावना मȂ िलखा ह
ुआ है - ĢितÍठा और अवसर, इसिलए यह मिहलाओं को आगे बढ़ाने वाला 
िवषय है। जैसे उज्ज्वला योजना है, िकसी क े घर मȂ गैस थी, िकसी क े घर मȂ गैस नहीं थी,  यह  
असमानता थी, उसको दूर िकया गया। नल से जल  पर कहूं तो िकसी क े घर म
Ȃ नल से जल है 
और कोई मिहला दूर से पानी ला रही है। मȅ राजÎथान से आता हूं, आपको भी पता है िक मेरा 
रेिगÎतानी क्षेतर् है। मȅने मिहलाओं को दूर से पानी लाते हुए द
ेखा है और मȅ भी दूर से पानी लाता था, 
जब घर मȂ नल नहीं था। हमने देखा है िक मिहलाओं की क्या िÎथित है। यह असमानता अगर 
फीÊड मȂ िकसी ने देखी है, तो हमारे Ģधान मंतर्ी Ǜी नरेन्दर् मोदी जी ने देखी है और उन्हȗने इस 
असमानता को दूर िकया है, नल से जल उपलÅध करवाया है। एक “Ģधानमंतर्ी म ुदर्ा योजना” है, 
इस मुदर्ा योजना मȂ लगभग 68 Ģितशत मिहलाएं बेिनिफशयरी हȅ। एक “Îटȅड-अप इंिडया योजना” 
है। सर, बȅक तो पहले भी थे, मगर  Ģधान मंतर्ी ने बȅकȗ को िनदȃश िदए - कोई भी Ĥांच होगी, उस 
Ĥांच मȂ आपको दस  लाख स
े एक करोड़ क े दो अकाउंट खोलने पड़Ȃगे। सर, यह “Îटȅड-अप 
योजना” है।   
महोदय, हमारे जो बच्चे हȅ, वे अंडरवेट नहीं हȗ, कमजोर नहीं हȗ, िजस गभर्वती मिहला क े 
पेट मȂ बच्चा हो,  उसको न्यूटर्ीिशयस फ ू ड िमले, इसके  िलए उस मिहला क े खाते मȂ 5,000 रुपए  
जाएंगे। महोदय, इसके  िलए  ‘Ģधान मंतर्ी मातृ वंदना Îकीम’ आई। इसके  अलावा ‘सुकन्या समृिǉ 
6
[RAJYA SABHA]

Îकीम’ आई, ‘िमशन पोषण’ आया, ‘ िमशन शिƪ’ आया, ‘Ģधान मंतर्ी सुरिक्षत मातृत्व अिभयान’ 
आया, आÇडर् फोसȃज़ मȂ मिहलाओं का परमानȂट कमीशन आया, सेÊफ हेÊप गर्ुप क े माध्यम से 
मिहलाओं क े आिर्थक उत्थान का िवषय आया, जेम पोटर्ल पर लगभग डेढ़ लाख िवमेन वȂडर 
पंजीकृ त हȅ। वषर् 2021 क े टोक्यो ओलिÇपक मȂ खेल मȂ 49 Ģितशत मिहला एथलीट्स की भागीदारी 
रही। ये सब काम ऐसे हȅ, जो यह बताते हȅ िक जब 2019 का इलेक्शन आया, तो मिहलाओं ने बढ़-
चढ़कर लोकतंतर् क े पवर् मȂ भागीदारी की और 2019 क े जनरल इलेक्शन मȂ जन-Ģितिनिध चुनने मȂ 
मिहला वोटरȗ की भागीदारी
 पुरुषȗ की तुलना मȂ अिधक रही। जहां पुरुषȗ का मत Ģितशत 67.2 
परसȂट रहा, वहीं मिहलाओं का मत Ģितशत 67.18 परसȂट रहा। ऐसा किरÌमा हमारे नरेन्दर् मोदी 
जी क े कालखंड मȂ ह
ुआ है।  आज जो मȅ संिवधान (संशोधन) िबल लेकर आया हूं, उसके  माध्यम से 
हम Article 330 मȂ एक अमȂडमȂट करȂगे। यह इसमȂ जोड़ा गया है। अगर इसके  िलए सदन अनुमित 
देगा, तो यह जुड़ेगा। Article 332 मȂ एक section insert होगा, Article 334 मȂ एक
 section insert 
होगा। कर्मशः 33A, Article 33(2A), Article 33(4A) संिवधान मȂ new Articles हȗगे, िजनके  
माध्यम से लोक सभा और देश की सभी िवधान सभाओं मȂ एक ितहाई सीटȂ नारी शिƪ क े िलए 
आरिक्षत की जाएंगी। यह बहुत बड़ा कदम है।  
सर, यह िरजवȃशन हॉिरजॉन्टल भी है और विर्टकल भी है।  इसमȂ एससी/एसटी की 
मिहलाओं को भी िरजवȃशन ह
ै, इसिलए सȂसस आवÌयक है और िडिलिमटेशन आवÌयक है।  
संिवधान क े आिर्टकल 82 मȂ पहले से ही Ģावधान है, िडिलिमटेशन की ËयवÎथा दी गई है और वह 
2026 तक ģीज़ है।  जैसे ही यह िबल पास होगा, सȂसस होगा, िडिलिमटेशन होगा।  वह एक 
कॉिन्ÎटǷूशनल Ģिकर्या है।  इसिलए कौन सी सीट मिहलाओं को जाएगी, यह िडिलिमटेशन 
आयोग तय करेगा, यह मȅ आपके  माध्यम से कहना चाहता हूँ
।  यह कमीशन सभी ÎटेकहोÊडसर् से 
भी क ंसÊटेशन करेगा।  इस ËयवÎथा मȂ न्यायोिचत आरक्षण और पारदिर्शतापूणर् Ģणाली क े िलए 
िडिलिमटेशन का िवषय आता है।   
 सभापित महोदय, इस िबल क े ÎटेटमȂट ऑफ ऑÅजेक्ट्स एंड रीजंस मȂ ÎपÍट रूप  से 
िलखा है िक आजादी क े 75 वष र् पूणर् होने क े बाद भारत जब -- सर, यह एसओआर मȂ है -- 
आजादी क े 75 वषर् पूणर् होने पर भारत जब 2047 तक अमृत काल की िवकिसत भारत की यातर्ा 
ĢारÇभ कर रहा है, तो उसमȂ नारी शिƪ क े योगदान की एक महत्वपूणर् भ
ूिमका रहने वाली है।  इस 
िबल क े माध्यम से हम माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी क े ध्येय वाक्य, " सबका साथ, सबका िवकास, 
सबका िवÌवास, सबका Ģयास" क े मंतर् को साकार रूप  Ģदान कर रहे हȅ।   
 सभापित महोदय, मोदी सरकार क े नेतृत्व मȂ नारी शिƪ क े िवक
ास क े िलए, मिहला 
सशिƪकरण क े िलए िजन योजनाओं का उÊलेख मȅने पहले िकया, उसी Ǜृंखला मȂ आज का यह 
िबल है।  Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने एक और बात कही है िक हम िवमेन डेवलपमȂट से िवमेन-लेड 
डेवलपमȂट की ओर तेजी से बढ़ रहे हȅ, जो हमारे जी20 का भी एजȂडा था।  महोदय, हमारे 
संिवधान की ĢÎतावना मȂ भी, जैसा मȅने पहले िज़कर् िकया, राजनीित
क, सामािजक और आिर्थक 
न्याय की बात कही गई है, साथ मȂ सभी क े िलए ĢितÍठा और अवसर की समानता की बात कही 
गई है।  आज मोदी सरकार मिहलाओं को आिर्थक रूप  से भी सशƪ बना रही है तथा िशक्षा और 
ÎवाÎथ्य
 क े क्षेतर् मȂ भी समानता Îथािपत कर रही है।  इन सब Ǜृंखलाओं क े माध्यम से यह Ǜृंखला, 
आज मȅ जो िबल लेकर आया हूँ, यह उससे जुड़ा हुआ ही एक कदम है।   
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
7

 मȅ एक किवता क े माध्यम से अभी अपनी बात को, -- इस  पर आगे चचार् होने वाली है -- 
उसको समाÃत करना चाहूँगा: 
"सपने सब साकार करȂगे, 
नारी को अिधकार िमलȂगे, 
मातृ शिƪ नेतृत्व करेगी, 
जन-गण-मन की शान बढ़ेगी।" 
 बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। 
The question was proposed. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I will now call upon the Me mbers whose names have been received 
for participation in the discussion. Shrimati Ranjeet Ranjan; you have ten minutes.  
 
Ǜीमती रं जीत रं जन (छǄीसगढ़): धन्यवाद, सर।  एक मिहला होने क े नाते मȅ आशा करू ँगी िक 
आप मुझे पाँच िमनट अपनी तरफ से दȂगे और मȅ सǄा पक्ष से भी कहूँगी िक आज मिहलाओं का 
िदन है, इसिलए मȅ होम िमिनÎटर साहब से भी िरक्वेÎट करती हूँ िक आप मुझे पाँच िमनट अपनी 
तरफ से दीिजएगा, अपनी पाटीर् से दीिजएगा। 
 
[उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती पी.टी. उषा) पीठासीन हुईं। ]  
 
 सबसे पहले मȅ मिहला िरज़वȃशन िबल का Îवागत करती हूँ। मȅ भी मिहला हूँ और हम लोग 
चाहते हȅ िक मिहलाओं की जो भागीदारी है, वह सदन मȂ बढ़े, राजनीितक पिरवेश मȂ बढ़े, लोगȗ क े 
Ģितिनिधत्व करने मȂ बढ़े।  मȅ एक आपिǄ दज़र् कराना चाहती हूँ।  आपने मिहला आरक्षण क े इस 
िबल का नाम िदया
 है - नारी शिƪ वंदन िवधेयक। यह नारी शिƪ िवधेयक है, लेिकन आपने 
इसका नाम दे िदया - नारी शिƪ वंदन िवधेयक।  मुझे लगता है िक यह एक संवैधािनक अिधकार 
है, यह कोई दैिवक वरदान नहीं है, यह कोई Ģधान मंतर्ी साहब का या आपका मिहलाओं को िदया 
हुआ दया का पातर् नहीं है।  यह हमारा एक संवैधािनक अिधक
ार है।  आपने इसका नाम दैिवक, 
दया और पूजा से जोड़ कर मुझे लगता है िक जो आंदोलन का इितहास था, उसको भी खत्म करने 
की कोिशश की है। यह मȅ एक
 मिहला होने क े नाते बोल रही हूँ।  आपकी सरकार मȂ मिहलाओं की 
वंदना िकतनी होती है, यह हम सबको मालूम है। हम मिहलाओं की वंदना, सǄा पक्ष मȂ हȗ या 
िवपक्ष मȂ हȗ, िजतनी भी पुरुष मानिसकता है - इितहास गवाह है िक जब-जब आपको शिƪ की 
जरूरत होती है, जब-जब आपको सǄा पाने की जरूर
त होती है, जब-जब आप िवजय की आशा 
रखते हȅ, तब-तब आप एक मिहला को देवी बना कर उसकी पूजा करने लगते हȅ, वंदना करने 
लगते हȅ, ल
ेिकन अंदर एक पुरुष की जीत और उसकी वंदना होती है। आपकी वंदना हमने जंतर-
म
ंतर पर बैठी उन मिहलाओं क े रूप  मȂ देखी; आपकी वंदना, आपका मिहलाओं का सÇमान जब 
मिणपुर मȂ हमारी मिहलाएँ िनवर्Îतर् हो रही थीं, हमने तब देखा; आपकी वंदना, आपकी पूजा और 
सÇमान तब देखा, जब एक रेिपÎट को बचाने क े िलए सǄा पक्ष वालȗ को यह मालूम चलता है िक 
वोट की राजनीित म
Ȃ जरूरत है, तो मȅ िरक्वेÎट करती हूँ िक हमȂ अिधकार चािहए, दया का पातर् 
मिहला न कभी थी, न होगी। यह हमारी करुणा  है, हमारी ममता है िक हम अपने आपको आपके  
सामने दया का पातर् बनने देते हȅ, क्यȗिक हममȂ इतनी करुणा  है।   
8
[RAJYA SABHA]

 हम आज इस नए सदन मȂ बैठे हुए हȅ। मȅ Ģशंसा करती हूँ, बहुत अच्छा है, लैिवश है, 
लेिकन मȅ एक बात जरूर  कहूँगी िक जो पुराना सदन है, वह घड़े का पानी है और यह जो नया 
सदन है, यह रेिģजरेटर का पानी है। घड़े क े पानी की जो महक होती है, वह पूरी िंजदगी, सालȗ-
साल तक हम भूल नहीं पाते हȅ -  बस इतना फकर् है। यह आपको भी सोचना पड़ेगा िक आिखर यह 
फकर् इस प
ुरानी िबिंÊडग और नई िबिंÊडग मȂ क्यȗ है! मȅ जरूर  बोलूँगी, क्यȗिक आप मिहलाओं क े 
अिधकार की बात कर रहे हȅ। कल मȅ टीवी क े सामने बैठ कर मेघवाल साहब को लोक सभा मȂ स
ुन 
रही थी।  आप बड़ी-बड़ी वंदना और नारी शिƪ की बात कर रहे थे, लेिकन उपसभाध्यक्ष जी, 
आपकी नारी शिƪ क
े  िलए इतनी बड़ी Ģेरणा है िक जब इस नई िबिंÊडग का उǇाटन हुआ, तो 
हमारी मिहला राÍटर्पित, आदरणीया दर्ौपदी मुमूर् जी को उǇाटन तक मȂ नहीं बुलाया गया।  यह है 
आपकी नारी व
ंदना!   
 13 साल से हमारे आरक्षण, हमारे अिधकार, हमारे सÇमान से हम वंिचत हȅ। मुझे आपके  इस 
िबल मȂ * नजर आता है। 13 साल पहले राज्य सभा मȂ हम लोगȗ ने इसे पािरत िकया था और आज 
आप इसको लेकर आए हȅ, ...(Ëयवधान)... आज आप इसको लेकर आए हȅ, ...(Ëयवधान)... Ãलीज़, 
सुिनए न! ...(Ëयवधान)... आज आप इसको लेकर आए हȅ साढ़े नौ साल क े बाद!  2014 मȂ आप 
सǄा मȂ आए।  यह आपके  मैिनफे Îटो मȂ था िक मिहला आरक्षण देना ह
ै। आपको इसमȂ साढ़े नौ साल 
क्यȗ लग गए?  आपसे मेरा पहला सवाल यही है। दूसरा सवाल, मिहला आरक्षण क े िलए आपको 
Îपेशल सतर् बुलाने की जरू
रत क्यȗ पड़ गई? आपको Ģचार करना था, आपको जो लाइमलाइट 
लेने की आदत हमेशा से रही है, इसमȂ भी आपने मिहलाओं को यूज़ िकया है। तीसरा सवाल, 
आपने जो जाित जनगणना और पिरसीमन का पȂच लगाया है, वह क्यȗ लगाया है, मȅ आपसे पूछती 
हूँ? आप कल इसका जवाब दे रहे थे िक अगर हम यह नहीं कहते, तो आप पीआईएल लेकर 
सुĢीम कोटर् जाते। अरे!  आप तो वे लोग हȅ, िजन्हȗने नोटबंदी लगाने से पहले िकसी से चचार्  भी 
नहीं की और 155 लोग लाइनȗ मȂ मर गए, तो अभी ऐसी कौन सी बाधा है? आप वे लोग हȅ, िजन्हȗने 
िकसान का काला कानून लाने से पहले िकसी से नहीं पूछा, 750 िकसान शहीद हो गए, लेिकन 
वह आपकी बाधा नहीं बनी! वे एक साल तक लगातार  सड़कȗ पर ब
ैठे रहे। मȅ आपसे सवाल करती 
हूँ िक िफर मिहलाओं क े िरज़वȃशन क े अिधकार मȂ यह पिरसीमन की या जनगणना की और सीट 
क े रोटेशन की आपने जो बाधा लगाई है, क्या यह 2024 का  चुनावी एजȂडा है, िजस पर आपको 
िसफर् और िसफर् झुनझुना िदखाना है? 
मȅ आपको आपकी नीयत और अपनी कांगर्ेस की नीयत क े बारे मȂ एक उदाहरण देना 
चाहती हूं। आप मिहमामंडन कर रहे हȅ िक आप मिहला िरज़वȃशन िबल लेकर आए हȅ, लेिकन मȅ 
आपको एक उदाहरण देती हूं िक 9 माचर्, 2010 मȂ यूपीए-2 क े समय मȂ राज्य सभा मȂ यह िबल 
पािरत हुआ था, यानी सǄा मȂ आने क े एक साल क े बाद। उस समय हमारी मंशा आगे आने वाली 
लोक सभा मȂ इसका Ģचार करना नहीं थी, क्यȗिक उसके  चार
 साल क े बाद,  2011, 2012 और 
2013 क े बाद 2014 मȂ चुनाव थे। हम लोग िसफर् और िसफर् मिहलाओं का सशिƪकरण करना 
चाहते थे। राजीव गांधी जी ने कहा था, मȅ उनके  एक इंटरËयू क े  क ु छ शÅदȗ को आज याद करना 
चाहती हूं िक मिहलाओं क े मामले मȂ जो िहन्दुÎतानी पुरुष है, वह डबल Îटȅडडर् का है। एक तरफ 
                                                            
* Expunged as ordered by the Chair. 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
9

तो वह ऊ ँ चे िंसहासन पर मिहला को बैठाता है, लेिकन दूसरी तरफ जब उसको सÇमान और 
समानता का अिधकार देने की बारी आती है, तो वह अपना पÊला खींच लेता है, जैसा िक आपने 
हमारी राÍटर्पित जी क े साथ िकया, वह भी टर्ाइबल राÍटर्पित जी क े साथ।  
 मȅ आपसे िसफर् इतना ही पूछना चाहती हूं िक आप जातीय जनगणना पिरसीमन रोटेशन 
को दरिकनार करके  मिहला
ओं को आरक्षण क्यȗ नहीं देना चाहते हȅ? इसका मतलब तो यह हुआ 
िक आप पुरुषȗ क े िहÎसे मȂ से मिहलाओं को िहÎसा नहीं देना चाहते हȅ। आप पिरसीमन करȂगे, सीटȂ 
बढ़ाएंगे, उसके  बाद आप मिहलाओं को अलग से िहÎसा द
Ȃगे। आिखर क्यȗ नहीं आप आज क े 
िहÎसे मȂ से मिहलाओं को िहÎसा देना चाहते? मȅ आपसे इतना ही कहूंगी िक हमारा जो मिहलाओं 
को मजबूत करने का िबल था, जो यूपीए-2 क े समय मȂ राज्य सभा मȂ पास हुआ था, हम चाहते ह
ȅ 
िक आपने जो इस िवधेयक का नाम - 'नारी शिƪ वंदन िवधेयक' िदया है, इसको आप 'समानता 
का अिधकार' नाम देते -  हमȂ वंदना और पूजा नहीं करवानी है।  
इसके  साथ ही मȅ आपसे एक बात यह भी जरूर  कहूंगी िक हम चाहते हȅ िक यह िबल पास 
हो, लेिकन एससी/एसटी की मिहलाओं क े साथ-साथ ओबीसी की मिहलाओं को भी अिधकार 
िमले, क्यȗिक
 हमारी और आपकी जैसी मिहलाएं, जो संघषर् करके  आई हȅ, वे तो कल भी आ 
जाएंगी।  
महोदय, हमȂ भी संघषर् करना पड़ता है, लेिकन इस राजनीित क े फीÊड मȂ, राजनीित क े 
मैदान मȂ एक अके ली मिहला अगर समाज क े िलए अच्छा भी करत
ी है - हालांिक इस राजनीित क े 
दलदल मȂ उसका अके ले क ूदना, संघषर् करना आज भी बहुत जिटल है - अगर मिहला मजबूत है, 
आपके  साथ क ं धे से क ंधा िमला कर चलना चाहती है ....(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती पी.टी. उषा):
  आपका समय समाÃत हो रहा है। 
 
Ǜीमती रंजीत रंजन: अगर मिहला अपनी राय रखना चाहती है, तो जो पुरुष मानिसकता है, यह 
उसको गवारा नहीं है। हम चाहते हȅ, मȅ अपने पक्ष की मिहलाओं से भी कहूंगी, जब मिणपुर की 
घटना घटी या जब कोई र
ेप की घटना घटती है या जब हमारी पहलवान बिच्चयां धरने पर बैठती 
हȅ....(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती पी.टी. उषा):  आपका समय समाÃत हो रहा है। 
 
Ǜीमती रंजीत रंज
न: आपने उन मिहलाओं को क ैसी समानता का अिधकार िदया है? आपने 
अपनी मिहला मंितर्यȗ को ऐसा समानता का अिधकार िदया है िक उनको कह िदया जाता है िक 
आपका एक भी शÅद मिहलाओं क े शोषण क े िखलाफ नहीं िनकलना चािहए। हमȂ आपकी ऐसी 
समानता और ऐसी दैवीय शिƪ नहीं चािहए, हमȂ अपना अिधकार चािहए। इसके  साथ ही मȅ एक 
किवता का एक अंश
 पढ़ कर अपनी बात को खत्म करना चाहूंगी। नारी क े ऊपर एक किवता है,  
 
"उतारो मुझे िजस क्षेतर् मȂ, सवर्ǛेǞ कर िदखाऊँ गी, 
औरȗ से अलग हूं िदखने मȂ, क ु छ अलग
 करके  ही जाऊँ गी, 
10
[RAJYA SABHA]

चाह नहीं है एक अलग नाम की, इसी को महान बनाऊँ गी, 
नारी हूं मȅ इस युग की, नारी की अलग पहचान बनाऊँ गी। 
 
जो सिदयȗ से देखा तुमने, िलपटी साड़ी मȂ कोमल तन को, 
घर-घर मȂ रहती थी, पर जान न सके  थे उसके  मन को, 
झुकी हुई सी नज़रȂ थीं, वाणी मध्यम मधुर-सी थी, 
िफर भी तानȗ की आवाज़ Ģबल थी, िहÇमत न थी उफ़ करने की, 
अब बदल गई है ये पहचान, नारी की न साड़ी पिरभाषा, 
वाणी अभी भी मध्यम मधुर-सी, पर क
ु छ कर गुजरने की है Ģबल सी आशा। 
चाहे जो भी मȅ बन जाऊँ , गवर् से नारी ही कहलाऊँ गी।" 
 
मुझे गवर् है िक आज सभापित जी की चेयर पर हमारी ओलंिपयन पी.टी. उषा जी बैठी ह
ȅ। 
मेरे बचपन का सपना था, जब भी मȅ पूजा करने जाती थी, तो गॉड से िवश करती थी िक म
ुझे 
पी.टी. उषा जी की तरह गोÊड मैडल लेना है। मुझे राजनीितक Ëयिƪ नहीं बनना था। मȅ अंत मȂ 
एक ही बात कह कर अपनी बात खत्म करूं गी िक मिहलाओं क े समानता क े अिधकार क े िलए चाहे 
राज्य सभा हो या लोक सभा हो, हम सब मिहलाओं को एकजुट होकर अपने सÇमान और 
अिधकार क
े  िलए एक होना पड़ेगा।...(समय की घंटी)... आज मिहलाओं क े िलए यह एक  
ऐितहािसक िदन है, इसिलए मȅ इस िबल का समथर्न करती हूं। इसके  साथ ही मȅ यह चाहती हूं िक 
यह आपके  झोले या िपटारे मȂ नहीं चला जाए, आपने मिहलाओं को 2029 का यह जो झुंझुना 
पकड़ाया है, अगर सही मायने मȂ आप मिहलाओं को हक देना चाहते हȅ, तो इसका क ु छ तोड़ 
िनकािलए और पिरसीमन एवं जनगण
ना से पहले, मिहलाओं का हक उनके  सामने रिखए। आपका 
बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। 
 
Ǜी जगत Ģकाश नƿा (िहमाचल Ģदेश): माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, आज मȅ 'संिवधान (एक 
सौ अƻाईसवां स
ंशोधन) िवधेयक, 2023' क े समथर्न मȂ अपना वƪËय रखने वाला हूं। हम सब 
जानते हȅ िक इस नये संसद भवन की शुरुआत  गणेश उत्सव क े िदन से ĢारÇभ हुई और कल लोक 
सभा मȂ यह 'नारी शिƪ वंदन िवधेयक' िनिर्वघ्न पास ह
ुआ। मुझे आशा ही नहीं पूणर् िवÌवास है िक 
आज यहां राज्य सभा मȂ भी यह 'संिवधान (एक सौ अƻाईसवां संशोधन) िवधेयक, 2023' िकसी 
भी बाधा क े बगैर, िकसी भी िवघ्न क े बगैर सवर्सÇमित से पास होगा और इसमȂ सबकी सहमित 
िमलेगी।  
मȅ हमारे Ģधान मंतर्ी मोदी जी को धन्यवाद द
ेना चाहता हूं, िजन्हȗने ' नारी शिƪ वंदन 
िवधेयक' लाकर, मिहला िरज़वȃशन का जो िवषय बहुत लÇबे अंतराल से चल रहा था, उसको एक 
िनणार्यक मोड़ पर लाने का Ģयास िकया है। जहां मȅ उनको इसके  िलए धन्यवाद देता हूं, वहीं नारी 
क े सशिƪकरण क े िलए, एÇपॉवरमȂट क े िलए, िपछले नौ साल मȂ उन्हȗने जो कायर् िकए हȅ, उनके  
िलए भी धन्यवाद देता
 हूं। उन्हȗने भारत की नारी की दशा को सुधारने और उसकी दशा एवं िदशा 
समाज मȂ मजबूती से आगे बढ़े, इसके  िलए बहुत ही कारगर कदम उठाए हȅ। उनके  उन्हीं कदमȗ मȂ 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
11

से यह भी एक बहुत महत्वपूणर् कदम है, िजससे नारी का सशिƪकरण होगा और नारी की ताकत 
बढ़ेगी।  
 
(सभापित महोदय पीठासीन हुए।) 
 
शÅदȗ क े बारे मȂ कई लोगȗ का अपना-अपना वƪËय हो सकता है, लेिकन ' नारी शिƪ 
वंदन िवधेयक' की शÅदावली ही अपने आप मȂ हमारी सरकार की, हमारे Ģधान मंतर्ी जी की और 
समाज मȂ मिहलाओं को द
ेखने क े हमारे दृिÍटकोण को ÎपÍट करती है और िदशा देती है।    
सभापित जी, मȅ यहाँ यह भी कहना चाहता हूँ िक हम सब लोगȗ क े मन मȂ क ु छ धारणाएँ बन 
गयी हȅ।  वह धारणा यह बनी है िक हम मिहलाओं क े िलए कोई कायर् कर रहे हȅ, तो जैसे क ु छ 
एहसान कर रहे हȅ। अगर हमने मिहलाओं क े सशिƪकरण क े िलए क ु छ िकया, तो जैसे हम क ु छ 
oblige कर रहे हȅ। मȅ यहाँ ÎपÍट करना चाहता हूँ िक भारत की संÎकृ ित मȂ मिहलाओं का बहुत बड़ा 
Îथान रहा है।  यह हमारा और आपका नहीं है, हमारे पूवर्जȗ ने, हमारी संÎकृ ित ने मिहलाओं को 
िजस तरीके  से समाज म
Ȃ ĢितÎथािपत िकया, वह यह बताता है िक हमेशा ही हमारी संÎकृ ित मȂ 
मिहलाओं का Îथान उज्ज्वल रहा है। इसिलए वे 'िपछड़ी' हȅ, वे 'असहाय' हȅ, वे 'अबला नारी' हȅ - 
यह शÅदावली हमारी नहीं रही है। हमने नारी को 'शिƪ' क े रूप  मȂ देखा, 'देवी' क े रूप  मȂ देखा 
और समाज को दृिÍट देने वाला देखा। इसीिलए Ģधान मंतर्ी जी जब कहते हȅ - 'women 
empowerment', तो वे हमेशा 'women-led development' की बात करते हȅ। उन्हȗने  जी20 मȂ 
भी दुिनया
 को बताया that it is not only women empowerment but women-led 
development. भारत की इस सोच को Ģितपािदत करते हुए दुिनया क े सामने रखने का काम 
हमारे Ģधान मंतर्ी मोदी जी ने जी20 क े माध्यम से भी िकया है। 
मȅ जब भारतीय संÎकृ ित की बात करता हूँ, तो भारतीय संÎकृ ित मȂ अगर हम नारी  का 
Îथान देखȂ, तो आिर्थक ÎवायǄता मȂ हमेशा उसका Îथान रहा है।  उसके  सामािजक जीवन मȂ 
आिर्थक ÎवायǄता रही है। आध्यात्म से लेकर अध्यापन तक नारी का िवशेष योगदान रहा है। अगर 
हम हड़Ãपा काल की भी बात करȂ, तो जो कांÎय की मूिर्त 'dancing girl' है, वह यह बताती है िक 
हमारे समाज मȂ मिहलाओं को िकतनी Îवच्छंदता थी और िकतना independence था -  यह भी 
वह दशार्ती है। यह दीगर बात ह
ै िक जब हम गुलामी क े काल  से गुजरे, medieval period से 
गुजरे, तो उस समय पदार् िसÎटम से लेकर, मिहलाओं का क ु छ जो उत्थान का Îथान था, उसमȂ 
कमी आयी, लेिकन भारतीय संÎकृ ित मȂ उसे हमेशा 'ऊजार्' का Îथान िदया गया, 'देवी' का Îथान 
िदया गया, ' शिƪ' क े रूप  मȂ देखा गया। हमारे यहाँ शÅदावली भी वैसी है - ' गौरी-शंकर', 
'िगिरजा-शंकर', 'भवानी-शंकर', 'सीता-राम', 'राधे-Ìयाम।' अब हमȂ दुिनया समझाए - ladies 
first  - यह हमारे साथ एक तरीके  से मजाक नहीं है, तो और क्या है?  इसिलए  हमारी संÎकृ ित 
को समझने की आवÌयकता है।   
वैिदक काल मȂ भी हमारे यहाँ िवदुिषयȗ की कोई कमी नहीं थी। वैिदक काल मȂ भी अगर 
देखȂ, तो
 जब आिद शंकराचायर् जी क े साथ मंडन िमǛ जी का शाÎतर्ाथर् हुआ, तो आप जानते हȅ िक 
उसमȂ न्यायाधीश
 कौन था? उसमȂ न्यायाधीश मंडन िमǛ जी की पत्नी उभय भारती थी, यह भी 
हमȂ ध्यान मȂ रखना चािहए। उसी तरीके  से यजुवȃद काल मȂ मिहलाओं को बराबर का Îथान िदया 
12
[RAJYA SABHA]

गया और कहा गया िक राजा अगर न्यायĢेमी है, तो रानी भी न्यायĢेमी होनी चािहए -  इतनी दूर 
की सोच रखी गयी थी, यह भी हमȂ ध्यान मȂ रखना चािहए। उसी तरीके  से चौथी सȂचुरी मȂ Ģभावती 
गुÃत, िजन्हȗने इंिडयन िहÎटर्ी मȂ Ģथम राज्य िकया ,  वह बताता है िक मिहलाओं का िकतना 
गौरवमय इितहास रहा है।  रानी जीजाबाई, जो मराठा रानी क े रूप  मȂ जानी गईं, उनका जो 
गाइडȂस था, उनका जो डायरेक्शन था, उसने छतर्पित िशवाजी को िहन्दवी Îवराज बनाने क े िलए 
Ģेिरत िकया, यह भी हमȂ ध्यान मȂ रखना चािहए।  अिहÊयाबाई होÊकर जी को हम सब लोग जान ते 
हȅ, आध्यात्म की दुिनया मȂ उनका नाम है।  उसके  साथ-साथ िजस तरीके  से उन्हȗने मिन्दरȗ का 
नविनमार्ण करवाया, वह बताता है िक मिहलाओं का हमारे सामािजक और आध्याित्मक जीवन मȂ 
िकस तरीके  का Îथान रहा ह
ै। 1857 की हमारी कर्ांित और उसमȂ रानी लÑमीबाई की भूिमका को 
हम नहीं भूल सकते, उनका नेतृत्व हम नहीं भूल सकते हȅ।  यहाँ हमारे संिवधान सदन मȂ िकǄूर 
की रानी चेन्नÇमा जी की जो मूिर्त है, संिवधान सदन मȂ सुशोिभत होकर वह भी भारत  की गाथा 
और मिहलाओं की गाथा बताती है।  पुतर्गीज़ क े िखलाफ कणार्टक की महारानी अÅबक्का ने अगर 
लड़ाई लड़ी, तो वह भी अपने आप मȂ एक गाथा बताती है िक मिहलाओं ने िकस तरीके  से हमारे 
िवकास क े िलए काम िकया ह
ै।   
मȅ यह भी बोलना चाहूँगा िक मॉडनर् टाइÇस मȂ भी, आज क े युग मȂ भी अगर हम देखȂ, तो 
21वीं शताÅदी जो है, वह मिहलाओं की शताÅदी है। िफर चाहे ज्ञान हो, िवज्ञान हो, िमिलटर्ी 
एजुक ेशन हो, स
ैन्य सुरक्षा हो या अथर् जगत हो, हमȂ खुशी है िक आज हमारे भारत की मिहलाएँ 
अपने आपको लीिंडग रोल मȂ लेकर आयी हȅ। उन्हȗने अपने आपको ĢितÎथािपत िकया ह ै और वे 
Îवयं को सÇमािनत Îथान पर लेकर आई हȅ। It is not only their presence but their position. 
वह सÇमािनत Îथान जो उनको िमला है, जो उन्हȗने हािसल िकया है, वह यह बताता है िक 
भारतीय नािरयȗ ने िकस तरीके  से अपना योगदान िदया है।   
आज सॉÄटवेयर की दुिनया मȂ 21 परसȂट हमारी मिहलाएँ ऐसी हȅ, जो लीिंडग रोल मȂ हȅ।  
अगर आज हम इसरो की बात करȂ, िजसके  बारे मȂ कल-परसȗ जयराम रमेश
 जी चचार् कर रहे थे, 
उसमȂ अगर हम साइंिटÎट्स देखȂ, तो िफर चाहे वह मासर् िमशन हो, चंदर्यान हो या आिदत्य एल-1 
हो, इन सबमȂ मिहला साइंिटÎट्स का बहुत बड़ा योगदान ह
ै, इसको भी हमȂ ध्यान मȂ रखना 
चािहए। अगर हम कहȂ, इस आज़ाद भारत मȂ 16 मिहलाएँ मुख्य मंतर्ी बन चुकी हȅ, इसको भी हमȂ 
ध्यान मȂ रख
ना चािहए।   
बहुत से ऐसे देश हȅ, जहाँ मिहलाओं ने वोिंटग राइट्स पाने क े िलए एक लÇबा संघषर् 
िकया, िसफर् franchise पाने क े िलए बहुत लÇबा संघषर् िकया। िकसी ने आधी शताÅदी तक संघषर् 
िकया, िकसी ने पूणर् शताÅदी तक संघषर् िकया
, लेिकन यह हमारा सौभाग्य था िक first General 
Election मȂ मिहलाओं को बराबर का Îथान िदया गया, यह हमारी सोच दशार्ता है। इसमȂ सबका 
योगदान है।  1931 मȂ सरोिजनी नायडु जी ने िĤिटश Ģाइम िमिनÎटर को एक िचƻी िलखी थी और 
उसमȂ कहा था िक हमȂ franchise िमलना चािहए। उसमȂ उन्हȗने एक
 वाक्य िलखा था -  ‘We 
don’t want to be nominated but we want to be elected.’ इस तरीके  से अगर हम देखȂ तो 
हर दृिÍट से मिहलाओं का एक िवशेष योगदान रहा है। हमारा यह भी सौभाग्य है िक बहुत से देशȗ 
से पहले हमारे देश को मिहला Ģधान मंतर्ी भी बहुत पहले िमल गयीं थीं। इसिलए इनके  Ģित हमारा 
नज़िरया
 ' अबला', ' बेचारी नारी' - ऐसा कभी नहीं रहा,  हम ेशा हम लोगȗ ने एक िवशेष Îथान 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
13

देकर उनको आगे बढ़ाने का काम िकया। हमारी कांÎटीǷुएँट असेÇबली मȂ भी 15 मिहलाएँ थीं, 
िजनका िवशेष योगदान संिवधान क े िनमार्ण मȂ रहा। आज यहाँ पर हमारी 102 मिहला एमपीज़ हȅ। 
अपने सशिƪकरण क े कारण they are elected, वे इलेक्ट होकर आयी हȅ। यह भी हमȂ बताता है 
िक मिहलाओं ने िकस तरीके  से अपना योगदान िदया है। चाहे वह पॉिलिटक्स हो, Îपोट्सर् हो, 
इकोनॉमी हो, एिवएशन हो या एंटरĢेन्योरिशप हो, सबमȂ नािरयȗ ने अपना योगदान िदया है। 
इसिलए जब हम 'नारी शिƪ वंदन िवधेयक' को लाकर उनका सशिƪकरण कर रहे ह
ȅ, तो यह 
हम उनके  ऊपर एहसान नहीं कर रहे हȅ, बिÊक यह उनका सÇमान है, यह उनका सशिƪकरण 
है, यह उनकी सहभािगता को बढ़ाने का कायर् है, इस बात को हमȂ ध्यान मȂ रखना चािहए। 
मȅ यहाँ यह भी कहना चाहता ह
ूँ िक हम क ु छ धारणाए ँ बदल दȂ। मȅ यह अपने आधार पर नहीं 
कह रहा हूँ, बिÊक िरसचर् क े आधार पर कह रहा हूँ। िरसचर् ने यह बताया है िक मिहलाओं की 
sensitivity ज्यादा है। िरसचर् ने यह भी बताया है िक मिहलाओं की sensitivity वाले िवषयȗ पर 
decision making capacity ज्यादा तेज, ज्यादा फाÎट है। मुझे याद है िक मȅ 1993 मȂ पहली बार 
िवधायक बन कर बीजेपी गर्ुप का नेता बना था, उस समय पंचायतȗ मȂ िवमेन का िरज़वȃशन हुआ था 
और जब हम समाज म
Ȃ घूमते थे, तो पुरुष Ģधान समाज तरह-तरह की बातȂ करता था, जैसे ये 
क ु छ नहीं कर सकȂगी, पता नहीं सरकार ने क्या सोच िलया है, ऐसे थोड़े ही काम चलता है, ये क्या 
जानȂ - हमȂ इस तरह की बातȂ सुनने को िमली थीं। मȅ इसका फÎटर् हȅड िवटनेस हूँ। लेिकन 
मिहलाओं को पंचायत मȂ बराबर का Îथान िमला।  
म
ȅ आपको यह बताना चाहता हूँ िक अब िरसचर् यह बताती है िक women are more 
accessible than men as a public representative. अब िरसचर् यह बताती है िक मिहला
ओं ने 
collectively नशे क े िखलाफ आवाज़ उठाई है। अब िरसचर् यह बताती है िक the corruption level 
are less where there are women representatives. हमȂ यह बात भी समझनी चािहए। मȅ पुरुषȗ 
क े िखलाफ नहीं बोल रहा हूँ, इसको अन्यथा मत लीिजएगा। अभी यूनाइटेड नेशंस की एक  िरसचर् 
आई है और उसमȂ यह कहा गया है िक water scarcity मȂ काम करने मȂ और water scarcity को 
दूर करने मȂ मिहलाओं क े नेतृत्व मȂ 62 परस Ȃट ज्यादा काम हुआ है। आप तो जानते ही हȅ िक 
मिहलाएँ घर चलाती हȅ, इसिलए बजट का िजतना ज्ञान उनको होता है और िजतनी
 sensitivity 
उनको होती है, वह हम सबको मालूम है। इसे हम सबने अपने घरȗ मȂ भी देखा है, इसिलए हमȂ 
उनकी capacity, decision making, financial sense को appreciate करना चािहए और इन 
बातȗ को भी ध्यान मȂ रखना चािहए।  
 मȅ यहाँ यह भी कहना चाहूँगा िक हम लोगȗ न
े National Perspective Plan क े तहत काम 
शुरू  िकया, उसमȂ आज लगभग 14 लाख से ज्यादा मिहलाओं का पंचायती लेवल पर, on 
different levels, representation है। यह एक continuous process और गर्ोथ को आगे बढ़ाने 
का काम िकया गया है।...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी जयराम
 रमेश (कनार्टक): यह क ै से हुआ? 
 
Ǜी जगत Ģकाश नƿा: यह सब लोगȗ क े योगदान से हुआ।...(Ëयवधान)... इस तरह से इसकी एक 
लंबी जनीर् है।...(Ëयवधान)... उसमȂ से इस कायर् को आगे बढ़ाने का काम िकया गया। 
14
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
Ǜी सभापित: माननीय नƿा जी, मȅ एक बात बताता हूँ। जब हम चारȗ तरफ देखते हȅ - जब नई-नई 
पंचायत ËयवÎथा आई थी, तब मȅ गाँव मȂ जाता था और पूछता था िक आप कौन हȅ, जो मीिंटग मȂ 
आते थे? वे कहते थे िक मȅ सरपंचपित, मȅ Ģधानपित, मȅ िजला Ģमुखपि त हूँ - यह कÊचर चालू 
हुआ था। वह कÊचर अब खत्म हो गया है and that you can see all around.   
 
Ǜी जगत Ģकाश नƿा: सर, मȅ यहाँ यह भी कहना चाहता हूँ िक क ु छ इस तरह की चचार् भी हुई िक 
इस िबल को अभी से लागू कर िदया जाए। इस तरह की चचार् भी हुई िक इसमȂ देरी क्यȗ? मȅ यहाँ 
ÎपÍट करना चाहता हूँ िक क ु छ संवैधािनक ËयवÎथाएँ होती हȅ और क ु छ संवैधािनक तरीके  से कायर् 
करने का तरीका होता ह
ै। आिखर हमȂ मिहलाओं को िरज़वȃशन देना है, पर िकस सीट पर 
िरज़वȃशन िमले, िकस सीट पर न िमले - इसका फ ैसला कौन करेगा? इसका फ ैसला सरकार नहीं 
कर सकती है। यह फ ैसला quasi-judicial body करती ह ै। उसको nominate करना पड़ता 
है।...(Ëयवधान)... अब अगर मȅ सरकार मȂ हूँ और वायनाड को िरज़वर् कर दूं तो?...(Ëयवधान)... 
अगर मȅ अमेठी को िरज़वर् कर दूं तो? ...(Ëयवधान)... अगर मȅ रायबरेली को िरज़वर् कर दूं तो? 
...(Ëयवधान)... अगर मȅ कलब
ुगीर् को िरज़वर् कर दूं तो? ...(Ëयवधान)... इसके  िलए दो चीज़Ȃ 
आवÌयक हȅ।...(Ëयवधान)... पहला यह है िक census हो, जनसंख्या हमारे सामने आए और िफर 
उसके  साथ-साथ quasi-judicial body क े माध्यम से public hearing हो, सीट्स िनकाली जाएँ, 
नंबर िनकाला जाए। यह सब िनकालने क े बाद उसको आगे बढ़ाया जाए। ...(Ëयव धान)... मȅ यहाँ 
यह भी कहना चाहूँगा िक क ु छ लोग कह रहे हȅ िक आप सीट बढ़ा दीिजए। अगर सीटȂ बढ़Ȃगी, तो 
उसका 33 Ģितशत भी तो बढ़ कर आएगा! इतना तो simple mathematics समझना चािहए! बढ़ी 
ह
ुई सीटȗ का भी 33 परस Ȃट होगा। आपको उसमȂ भी Îथान िमलेगा, इसिलए यह िनयम-कानून से 
होगा। हम यह मानते हȅ िक अगर आप आज िबल पास करते हȅ, तो 2029 मȂ मिहलाओं क े िलए 
आरिक्षत सीटȗ से हमारी मिहलाएँ एमपी बन कर आ जाएँगी - यह बात पक्की ह ै। लेिकन अगर 
आप आज इसको पास नहीं करते हȅ, तो 2029 मȂ भी नहीं आना तय है - इसको भी हमȂ समझ लेना 
चािहए। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
िवपक्ष क े नेता (Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे) : सर, मȅ क ु छ कहना चाहता ह
 ूँ। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I will come to you. 
 
SHRI JAGAT PRAKASH NADDA: If this is the way,  if this is the only way and if this is 
the shortest way, then, this is the way, िजस राÎते से हमȂ जाने की आवÌयकता है। आज 
भारतीय जनता पाटीर् की दृिÍट से मȅ आपके  सामने यह बात कहना चाहूँगा िक हमारे 
...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Leader of the Opposi tion wants to intervene for a minute. 
खरगे जी, क ृपया आप बोलȂ।  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
15

Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे : सर, इसका अमȂडमȂट करने मȂ कोई िदक्कत नहीं है। आपको यह अभी 
करना चािहए, लेिकन आप इसको 2031 मȂ करने की बात कर रहे हȅ। इसका मकसद क्या है? 
इसका मकसद यह है िक यह िबल ऐसे ही चले।...(Ëयवधान)... आप ही ने कहा िक 2029 क े  बाद 
यह सब होगा।...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी जगत Ģकाश नƿा: मȅने '2029 को' कहा। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: सर, जब पंचायत मȂ िरज़वȃशन है, िजला पंचायत मȂ िरज़वȃशन है, तो यहाँ 
िवमȂस िरज़वȃशन क्यȗ नहीं होता है? ...(Ëयवधान)... आप इसको आज कीिजए। ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ 
कबीर का एक दोहा सुनाता हूँ :  
"काल करे सो आज कर, आज करे सो अब। 
पल मȂ परलय होएगी, बहुिर करेगा कब।।" 
 
इसिलए आप इसको आज से कीिजए, we are ready. कोई illegal नहीं होता, judiciary
 
नहीं होता, क ु छ नहीं है। ...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
Ǜी जगत Ģकाश नƿा : सभापित जी, मȅ यहाँ ...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Members, please. ...(Interruptions)...  Please sit down. We 
are the Upper House. We are the House of Elders. If there is a reflection that there is a 
legal working mechanism, a constitutional process, then, rather than playing the 
other way around, we have to look into the real legality of it, and he is focusing on the 
legality of it.  Please go ahead, Shri Nadda.  
 
Ǜी जगत Ģकाश नƿा:  सभापित जी, मȅ यहाँ एक बात ÎपÍट करना चाहता हूँ िक भारतीय जनता 
पाटीर् का कोई इंटȂशन अपने आपको Îकोर करने का नहीं है, कोई  political advantage लेने का 
नहीं है, बिÊक हमारा उǈेÌय मिहलाओं का सही मायने मȂ सशिƪकरण करने का है। अगर हमȂ 
political advantage लेना होता, तो हम यह कह द
ेते िक हम इसको अभी से कर लȂगे। जो काम 
अभी नहीं हो सकता - मȅने कहा िक this is the only way, this is the shortest and this is the 
correct way.  We have to understand that. ...(Interruptions)... आप लोग यह जो 'नो-
नो' कर रहे हȅ, इसीिलए आपको उधर बैठा िदया गया, क्यȗिक आपको शासन करना नहीं आया। 
...(Ëयवधान)...                    
  
12.00 P.M. 
 
अगर शासन करना आता, तो आपको यह भी मालूम होता िक िनयम-कानून भी कोई चीज़ है। 
...(Ëयवधान)... I am not going to yield. ...(Interruptions)... I am not going to yield. 
...(Interruptions)... No, Sir. ...(Interruptions)...मȅ यह बोल रहा था। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
16
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Khargeji, please.  No.  He is not yielding. ...(Interruptions)... He is 
not yielding. ...(Interruptions)...  I gave you time when he had yielded. 
...(Interruptions)... He is not yielding. Please continue. ...(Interruptions)... No. 
Nothing will go on record, except what Shri Nadda says. ...(Interruptions)... No.  He 
is not yielding ...(Interruptions)... 
 
Ǜी जगत Ģकाश नƿा: वेणुगोपाल जी, आप बैठ जाइए। 
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: 
 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: No. He is not yielding. ...(Interruptions)... Khargeji, please. 
...(Interruptions)... 
 
Ǜी जगत Ģकाश नƿा: मȅ िफर कहता हूँ िक सरकारȂ िनयम-कानून से चलती हȅ और िनयम-कानून 
की क ु छ िलिमटेशंस होती हȅ।  
मोदी जी काम करते हȅ, वे पक्का काम करते हȅ, कच्चा काम नहीं करते हȅ, इसीिलए पक्के  
तरीके  से मिहलाओं का सशिƪकरण िकया जा रहा है। ...(Ëयवधान)... भारतीय
 जनता पाटीर् क े 
अध्यक्ष क े रूप  मȂ मȅ यहाँ यह भी ÎपÍट करना चाहता हूँ िक भारतीय जनता पाटीर् मिहलाओं को 
Îथान देने मȂ हमेशा अगर्सर रही है। आज लोक सभा मȂ हमारी 42 एमपी ह ȅ, राज्य सभा मȂ 14 एमपी 
हȅ, हमारी दस मिहलाएं सȂटर्ल िमिनÎटर हȅ। इसके  साथ ही, हम पहली पाटीर् और अके ली पाटीर् हȅ, 
जो संवैधािनक तौर पर, मिहलाओं को हर सिमित मȂ 33 Ģितशत आरक्षण देती है, every 
Committee, right from the national committee to th
e booth committee.  In every 
committee, there is 33 per cent representation for women. हम सबको मालूम है िक मोदी 
जी क े नेतृत्व मȂ फÎटर् फॉरेन िमिनÎटर, मैडम सुषमा Îवराज जी, फÎटर् फाइनȂस िमिनÎटर, 
िनमर्ला सीतारमण जी, फÎटर् िडफȂ स िमिनÎटर, हमारी िनमर्ला सीतारमण जी और फÎटर् िवमेन 
मेÇबर इन िद क ैिबनेट किमटी ऑन िसक्युिरटी बनीं, यानी हम लोगȗ ने, Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने िकस 
तरीके  से मिहलाओं का सशिƪकरण िकया है - यह बात हमारे सामने आती ह
ै। ...(Ëयवधान)... यह 
तो मȅने आपको पहले ही बोल िदया है। ...(Ëयवधान)... सभापित  महोदय, मȅ यहाँ यह भी कहना 
चाहूँगा िक... ...(Ëयवधान)... क ु छ लोग आत्मÎतुित मȂ इतने ज्यादा रहते हȅ िक अपने बारे मȂ 
छोड़कर क ु छ और सुनना ही नहीं चाहते हȅ। ...(Ëयवधान)... ये क्या बोलȂगे, मȅने तो खुद बोला है िक 
this country has seen the first lady Prime Minister before many countries had. यह हमने 
कहा ह
ै। ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ यहाँ यह भी कहना चाहूँगा िक जो कायर्कर्म चलाए गए, चाहे 'Îवच्छ 
भारत अिभयान' हो या 'बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ' हो, मȅ आपको इनके  बारे मȂ भी ÎपÍट रूप  से 
                                                            
 Not recorded. 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
17

बताना चाहता हूँ िक जब Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने पहली बार Ģधान मंतर्ी बनकर लाल िकले की Ģाचीर 
से, from the Ramparts of Red Fort, यह कहा िक हम Îवच्छता अिभयान... ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी दीपेन्दर् िंसह हुƿा (हिरयाणा): सर, बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ... ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी जगत Ģकाश नƿा: दीपेन्दर् जी, बैठ जाइए। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: No disturbance.  Please, sit down. ...(Interruptions)... This is not 
the way to conduct in the House. ...(Interruptions)... You are a senior Member. 
...(Interruptions)... Don’t go in that direction. ...(Interruptions)... Have some 
positivity. ...(Interruptions)... Please sit down. ...(Interruptions)... Sorry. Don’t 
force my hands. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
Ǜी जगत Ģकाश नƿा: सर, 'बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ' और 'Îवच्छता अिभयान', िजनके  बारे मȂ 
जब लाल िकले की Ģाचीर से Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने कहा, from the Ramparts of Red Fort, तब उस 
समय राजनैितक लोगȗ ने कहा था िक यह बड़ा गैर-राजनैितक ह
ै िक Ģधान मंतर्ी जी लाल िकले 
से Îवच्छता की बात कर रहे हȅ। क ु छ लोगȗ ने मजाक उड़ाया था, क ु छ लोगȗ ने हँसी उड़ाई थी। 
बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ की बात करते हुए Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने कहा था िक हम लड़कȗ की िंचता तो 
करते हȅ, लेिकन लड़िकयȗ की िंचता नहीं करते ह
ȅ। हमȂ उनके  बारे मȂ भी िंचता करनी चािहए। इस 
पर भी बहुत कटाक्ष हुए थे, लेिकन आज मुझे आपको यह बताते हुए खुशी हो रही है िक हम सेक्स 
रेÌयो एट बथर् लेवल मȂ 19 Ãवाइंट्स आगे बढ़कर आ गए ह
ȅ। इसी तरीके  से, gross enrollment in 
higher education has increased by 18 per cent.  For the first time, sex ratio of the total 
population is: Out of 1000 ma les, we have 1020 females. फीमेल का सेक्स र
ेÌयो बढ़ गया 
है। इससे आज हम सबके  ध्यान मȂ 'बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ' आता है िक हमȂ इसका क्या फायदा 
िमला है। इसके  साथ ही, 11-11.50 करोड़ इज्ज़त घर बनाए गए। मȅ यहाँ बोलना चाहता हूँ िक आप 
लोगȗ ने 50 साल से ज्यादा राज िकया है। जब हम लोग भी न
ेशनल हाईवेज़ पर जाया करते थे, 
तब हम अपने दैिनक िनत्य कमर् क े िलए मिहलाओं क े झुंडȗ को हाईवेज़ से गुजरते हुए देखते थे। 
हम देखते थे िक वे सूयार्Îत और सूयȘदय का इंतजार करती थीं, क्यȗिक उन्हȂ अपना दैिनक िनत्य 
कमर् इससे पहले करना होता
 था। क्या िÎथित थी और संख्या क्या थी - 12 करोड़! कभी सोचा नहीं 
था, कभी समझा नहीं था िक यह क ैसी समÎया है। और समझते भी क ै से! जो िसÊवर Îपून क े साथ 
पैदा होते हȅ, वे गरीब का ददर् क्या जानȂग
े। यिद इसे कोई समझते हȅ, तो Ģधान मंतर्ी, Ǜी नरेन्दर् 
मोदी जी ही समझते हȅ िक गरीब का ददर् क्या होता है और गरीब बहन की तकलीफ क्या होती है। 
आज 12 करोड़ बहनȗ को इज्ज़त घर िदए गए हȅ। जब हम 12 करोड़ बहनȂ बोलते हȅ, तो इसमȂ 12 
करोड़ बच्चे भी साथ म
Ȃ जुड़ जाते हȅ, 12 करोड़ फ ैिमलीज़ भी साथ मȂ ज ुड़ जाती हȅ। उनके  साथ 
िकस तरीके  का बतार्व होता था, उसके  क्या-क्या बैड इफे क्ट्स होते थे - यह हम सबको मालूम है। 
उन्हȂ इज्जत देने का काम Ģधान मंतर्ी, नरेन्दर् मोदी जी ने िकया है। इसे यूनाइटेड न ेशंस ने भी 
recognize िकया और इसके  िलए Ģधान मंतर्ी जी को सÇमािनत िकया है, यह भी हमȂ ध्यान मȂ 
18
[RAJYA SABHA]

रखना चािहए। इसी तरीके  से, अगर हम ' Ģधानमंतर्ी आवास योजना' की बात करȂ, तो आपको 
जानकर खुशी होगी िक ' Ģधानमंतर्ी आवास योजना' मȂ 69 परस Ȃट ऑनरिशप, ज्वाइंटली या 
इंिडिवजुअल मिहलाओं क े पास है, मिहलाओं को िमली है।  
 सर, मȅ एलपीजी गैस कनेक्शन क े बारे मȂ बताना चाहता हूँ। मȅ िहमाचल क े एक गाँव से 
आता हूँ। मुझे मालूम नहीं िक आप लोगȗ ने गाँवȗ को िकतना द
ेखा होगा, लेिकन हमारी बहनȂ सुबह 
चार बजे उठती थीं, जंगलȗ मȂ जाती थीं, पेड़ȗ पर चढ़ती थीं, लकड़ी काटती थीं, लकड़ी का बोझा 
लेकर आती थीं और सवेरे उस लकड़ी को जलाती थीं। कच्ची लकड़ी को जलाना िकतना किठन 
काम है और उसमȂ से िकतना धुआं िनकलता ह
ै, इसका अंदाजा लगना चािहए। इस धुएं से आँखȗ 
से पानी आ जाता था, फ ेफड़े खराब हो जाते थे। हमारी बहनȂ इस तरीके  का जीवन जीत
ी थीं। सर, 
जब मȅ एलपीजी गैस कनेक्शन की बात करता हूँ, तो बताना चाहूँगा िक उसकी संख्या भी नौ 
करोड़ से ज्यादा ह
ै, यानी ऐसी 9.58 करोड़ बहनȂ हȅ, िजन्हȂ एलपीजी गैस का कनेक्शन िदया गया 
है, िजसके  माध्यम से आज वे पाँच िमनट क े अंदर पित देव को भी चाय िपलाती हȅ और घर को भी 
संभालती हȅ। इससे उनका सशिƪकरण हुआ है और यह पिरिÎथित आकर खड़ी हुई है।  
 अगर मȅ 'जल जीवन िमशन' क े बारे मȂ बात करू ँ, तो मुझे याद है िक पहाड़ी क्षेतर्ȗ मȂ बहनȂ 
पहाड़ȗ से दो-दो िकलोमीटर नीचे उतरकर पानी लेन े क े िलए जाती थीं। एक घैला पानी लाने मȂ 
दो-दो घंटे लगाती थीं। नीचे जाना, पानी लाना और िफर चढ़ाई करके  घर पहुंचना, यह पिरिÎथित 
हमने देखी है। आज 'जल जीवन िमशन' क े माध्यम से दस करोड़ घरȗ को और 68 परसȂट पानी क े 
कनेक्शन की कवरेज दी जा रही है।  
 ' Ģधानमंतर्ी मुदर्ा योजना' मȂ 70 
परसȂट लोन्स सȅक्शन हुए। िटर्पल तलाक एक सामािजक 
बुराई थी, िजसके  बारे मȂ मȅ बताना चाहता हूँ। जो आका ल ंबे समय तक राज करते रहे, उन्हȂ मालूम 
होना चािहए िक There is no triple ta laq in Bangladesh, Pakist an, Iran, Iraq, Syria, 
Indonesia, etc. ये सब मुिÎलम और मुिÎलम डोिमनेटेड देश रहे हȅ, लेिकन हमारे भारत मȂ िटर्पल 
तलाक चल रहा था। सुĢीम कोटर् ने कह रखा था, उसके  बावजूद भी यह क्यȗ चल रहा था - 
क्यȗिक हम माइनॉिरटी की पॉिलिटक्
स करते थे। अपीज़मȂट की पॉिलिटक्स करते थे, ये वोट बȅक 
की पॉिलिटक्स करते थे। यह Ģधान मंतर्ी मोदी जी की इच्छा शिƪ थी।  आज िटर्पल तलाक खत्म 
हो गया और मुिÎलम मिहलाओं को इज्जत से जी
ने का अिधकार अगर िकसी ने िदया, तो Ģधान 
मंतर्ी मोदी जी ने िदया। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 इसी तरीके  से,  धरती से भेजे गए चन्दर्यान को चन्दर्मा क े साउथ पोल पर लȅड करने वाले 
Îथान को भी Ģधान मंतर्ी मोदी जी ने 'िशव शिƪ' क े नाम
 से पहचान दी।  वहाँ भी मिहलाओं की 
शिƪ को जोड़ने और उसकी बात को कहा गया है।  मȅ यहाँ यह भी बोलना चाहूँगा िक इन सारे 
मिहला सशिƪकरण क े कायर्कर्मȗ क े माध्यम से देश को आगे बढ़ाने का काम िकया गया ह ै, इसी 
मȂ आज एक नई कड़ी जुड़ रही है और वह नारी शिƪ वंदन िवधेयक को पास करना है।  मȅ सभी से 
तो अपील करू ँगा ही, लेिकन इससे पहले आपके  सामने क ु छ और िवषय भी रखना चाहता ह ूँ।  
 मȅ आज सुबह से देख रहा हूँ िक एक चचार् यह चल रही है िक ओबीसी का ध्यान नहीं रखा 
गया, ओबीसी की िचन्ता नहीं की गई, ओबीसी क े बारे मȂ क ु छ सोचा नहीं गया। ठीक है, राजनीित 
म
Ȃ इस तरह क े वƪËय चलते हȅ। यह वƪËय चलते-चलते यहाँ तक पहुँच गया िक 70 सेकर् ेटरीज़ मȂ 
शायद 3 ही ओबीसी हȅ। अब मȅ इस बारे मȂ िसफर् ज्ञानवधर्न करना चाहता हूँ। नेहरू  जी क े टाइम की 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
19

काका कालेलकर की िरपोटर् कहाँ पड़ी हुई थी?  मं डल कमीशन इंिदरा गांधी जी क े टाइम पर, 
राजीव गांधी जी क े टाइम पर कहाँ पड़ा हुआ था?  उसका क्या हुआ, उसको क्या कर पाए? 1992 
मȂ सुĢीम कोटर् ने कहा िक आप सिर्वसेज मȂ ओबीसी को िरजवȃशन दीिजए और 1995-96 मȂ एससी, 
एसटी और ओबीसी क ै टेगरीज़ ऑल इंिडया सिर्वसेज मȂ जुड़ीं।  अब आप देिखए िक सेकर् ेटरी क े 
एÇपैनलमȂट का जो कट ऑफ ईयर है, वह 1992 है। जो सेकर् ेटरीज़ हȅ, वे 1992 बैच क े पहले क े 
लोग हȅ। ...(Ëयवधान)... अब मȅ आपसे पूछता ह
ूँ िक 2004 से 2014 तक िकतने सेकर् ेटरीज़ ओबीसी 
क े थे, वे ओबीसी क े सेकर् ेटरीज़ कहाँ थे, वे िकस कर्ाइटेिरया मȂ थे, जरा हमको इसका ज्ञानवधर्न 
कीिजए। मȅ बार-बार बोलता हूँ, लीडर को लीडर बनना पड़ेगा, Ƿूटर  से काम नहीं चलता है। 
...(Ëयवधान)... यह tutored statement से काम नहीं चलता है और वह Ƿ
ूटर भी कोई लीडर हो 
तो भी समझ मȂ आता है, आप एनजीओ को लेकर आ जाते हȅ, िजनको न अता, न पता, न सता! 
िजन्हȂ िकसी चीज़ की जानकारी नहीं, वे आपको समझाते हȅ और आप बोलते हȅ, "I was shocked 
and shattered.' 'Shattered and shocked!" अरे भाई, shock तो
 लगना ही था, जब पूरा 
पढ़ना ही नहीं, तो shock ही लगेगा और क्या होगा? यह पिरिÎथित आकर खड़ी होती है। 
...(Ëयवधान)... लेिकन मȅ यहाँ यह बताना चाहूँगा...(Ëयवधान)... इस देश
 को ...(Ëयवधान)...सर, 
पॉके ट मȂ हाथ रखकर बोला नहीं जाता है, यह पािर्लयामȂटरी एिटके ट नहीं है।...(Ëयवधान)...सर, 
ये आज़ाद भारत मȂ ओबीसी की बात करते हȅ।  भारत को पहला ओबीसी Ģधान मंतर्ी भारतीय 
जनता पाटीर्, एनडीए न
े िदया, यह भी हमȂ ध्यान मȂ रखना चािहए। ...(Ëयवधान)... ये ओबीसी की 
बात करते हȅ! ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ कांगर्ेस की बात कर रहा हूँ।  ...(Ëयवधान)... कांगर्ेस, कांगर्ेस। 
...(Ëयवधान).
..भइया, मȅ कांगर्ेस की बात कर रहा हूँ। ...( Ëयवधान)... कांगर्ेस।...(Ëयवधान)... दूसरा, 
आज 27 मं तर्ी ओबीसी क े हȅ। ...(Ëयवधान)...सर, मȅ कांगर्ेस की बात कर रहा हूँ, उनकी बात नहीं 
कर रहा हूँ।...(Ëयवधान)... द
ेवगौड़ा जी हमारे हȅ। ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ कांगर्ेस की बात कर रहा 
हूँ।...(Ëयवधान)... कांगर्ेस। ...(Ëयवधान)... I am not talking about Janata Dal.  
...(Interruptions)... I am talking about Congress; th e first OBC Prime Minister has 
been given by NDA, who is Narendra Modi ji. Never has Congress given... 
...(Interruptions)... बीजेपी क े 303 एमपीज़  मȂ से 85, यानी  29 परस Ȃट हमारे एमपीज़ ओबीसी 
क े हȅ, यह भी हमȂ ध्यान मȂ रखना चािहए। ...(Ëयवधान)... इसी तरीके  से, 1,358 एमएलएज़
 मȂ से 27 
Ģितशत ओबीसी क े हȅ। Out of 163, हमार े जो एमएलसीज़ हȅ, उनमȂ 40 परसȂट ओबीसी क े हȅ। 
जैसा मȅने कहा, 303 एमपीज़ मȂ से 85, यानी 29 per cent MPs are fr om OBC. Out of 1,358 
MLAs, we have 27 per cent OBC.  And I repeat that among the MLCs, 163 हमारे 
एमएलसीज़ हȅ, िजनमȂ से 40 परस Ȃट ओबीसी हȅ, यह भी हमȂ ध्यान मȂ रखना चािहए। मȅ िफर यह 
बोल रहा ह
ूँ िक मȅ कांगर्ेस की बात कर रहा हूँ।  कांगर्ेस क े िजतने एमपीज़ हȅ, उनसे ज्यादा तो 
हमारे ओबीसी क े एमपीज़ हȅ, यह भी हमȂ ध्यान मȂ रखना चािहए।  ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ यह िसफर् लोक 
सभा की बात कर रहा हूँ। अगर लोक सभा और राज्
य सभा िमला लȂ, तो आपसे हम कहीं ज्यादा 
आगे िनकल जाते हȅ, यह भी आपको ध्यान मȂ रखना चािहए। ...(Ëयवधान)... आप ओबीसी की बात 
करȂ, जो एक बार नहीं अनेकȗ बार ओबी
सी को गाली दȂ! एक बार नहीं, अनेकȗ बार बोलȂ, मȅ माफी 
नहीं मागूँगा! ...(Ëयवधान)... इस तरह की बातचीत! ...(Ëयवधान)... इसिलए मȅ यह कहना चाहता 
हूँ िक सब लोगȗ का साथ िमलना चािहए, सबकी सǊुिǉ आए, सब लोग िमलकर चलȂ, नारी 
20
[RAJYA SABHA]

सशिƪकरण मȂ अपने आपको जोड़कर चलȂ और इस काम मȂ अपना योगदान दȂ। हम ओबीसी 
समथर्क होते हुए भी समाज मȂ सबको साथ लेकर चलने की बात कहते हȅ।  इन्हीं शÅदȗ क े साथ, मȅ 
इसका समथर्न करता हूँ और सबसे समथर्न माँगता हूँ। 
 
Ǜी सभापित : सुǛी दोला सेन।   Madam, nine minutes.  
 
MS. DOLA SEN (West Bengal):
 Thank you, Ch airman Sir, for allowing me to speak 
on Women's Reservation Bill in my mother tongue, Bangla, and thanks to my Party, 
All India Trinamool Congress, and my resp ected leader, hon. Mamata Banerjee, for 
giving me a chance to be in the Council of States, Rajya Sabha, for the third term so 
that I get a chance to take part in policy-making debates over here.  
 
[MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN in the Chair.] 
 
"After governing for about 9.5 years, suddenly just on the eve of the 2024 Lok 
Sabha elections, the present ruling party ha s started to rush with this Constitution 
amendment. Yesterday, Lok Sabha sat late till about 10 pm. Rajya Sabha may also sit 
late today. "   बुरा मत मािनएगा, बंगला मȂ एक कहावत है-  "Vote baro balai" इलेक्शन का 
कÇपलशन है, भाई! *" Somehow, the Opposition unity and I.N.D.I.A. alliance have 
made the Treasury Benches worried. So these are back to back election stances. 
New Parliament House was inaugurated. " हमारी तो आदत ही हो गई थी िक Ģधान मंतर्ी 
जी संसद आते हȅ, लेिकन हाउस क े अंदर बहुत कम आते हȅ, हाउस क े अंदर और भी कम बोलते 
हȅ। वह दु:ख भी इस बार पहले दो िदनȗ मȂ उनको चार बार
  सुनने क े बाद चला गया। िवमȂस 
िरज़वȃशन को लेकर नारी शिƪ वंदन कहकर इसको पास कराना है। बहुत खूब! 
We would appreciate it. Be tter late than never. साढ़े नौ साल ही सही, थोड़ी 
िवलिÇबत सोच ही सही, we will certainly support the Wo men's Reservation Bill in this 
House with all our criticism. *"But one thing; the way in which from both the Houses 
of Parliament, it is being claimed that the sole credit for this goes to the Treasury 
Benches and Modiji, I am sorry to say, but this is not at all true, this is not just their 
credit. The process had starte d way back. In the year 1 992, the Bill to reserve one-
third seats for women in the Panchaya t and Municipalities was passed in the 
Parliament. Women's Reservation Bill to re serve seats in Lok Sabha and Assemblies 
was never passed before. But ef forts were there several ti mes. In 1996, Smt. Gita 
Mukherjee of CPI had presented this Bill in  Parliament. But it was not passed then. 
Thereafter, the Joint Parliamentary Committe e which was constituted for the purpose 
                                                            
 English translation of the original speech delivered in Bangla 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
21

was headed by Smt. Gita Mukherjee. Our leader, Mamata Banerjee was also a 
member of the Committee. She had raised this demand in the year 1998 and many 
times thereafter also. In 2010, though it was passed in Rajya Sabha, Lok Sabha could 
not pass it. The role of Sushma Swaraji ji is also worth mentioning with regard to this 
Bill." हम तहे-िदल से गीता दीदी, सुषमा जी और दीदी को नमन करना चाहते हȅ। "Secondly, 
though because of compulsion of election, it will be passed now, but it will not be 
implemented instantly. Unfortunately, the cen sus which is to be conducted every 10 
years and which is due since 2021, has not been conducted as yet by this 
government." मोदी है, तो मुमिकन है, इसीिलए तो सȂसस और उसके  साथ-साथ delimitation 
आिद सब वषर् 2026 क े बाद होगा। वषर् 2027, 2028 या 2029 भी  हो सकता है, और देर भी हो 
सकती है। यह नारी शिƪ वंदन पास करा कर और एक जुमला तो नहीं बन जाएगा? जैसे 
एनपीआर, एनआरसी, सीएए को ज़बरदÎती पास करा िदया गया, जबिक उनमȂ implementation 
करने का दम नहीं है। वह एक ज
ुमला बन गया है। िकसान िबल क े िलए सबको सÎपȂड करके  पास 
करा िदया, िफर वह वापस revoke हो गया, वह भी एक जुमला बन कर रह गया। लेबर कोड को 
पास करा कर अभी तक रूल  फॉमȃशन नहीं करने का जुमला बन गया। काला धन वाप
स होगा, यह 
एक जुमला बन गया। हर Ëयिƪ क े बȅक अकाउंट मȂ 15 लाख  रुपय े देने का जुमला, साल मȂ दो 
करोड़ नौकिरयां देने का जुमला - क्या इस िलÎट मȂ यह िवमȂस िरज़वȃशन भी जुड़ेगा? डर लगता 
है। *"We are afraid, very afraid . We believe that women are half the sky. But half the 
population is suffering like anything. Most of them are reeling below the poverty line. 
These women have not been able to enjoy the necessities of life. Thus, the 
economics of every household has reached it s nadir now, in the last 50 years. The 
ordinary w
omen are in deep crisis toda y. During demonetization, our harassed 
countrymen had to queue-up in front of the banks, about 150 people lost their lives in 
the process. However, each and every penny which had been safely deposited in the 
piggy banks of our mothers or grandmot hers, money which had been saved under 
the pillows, quilts and mattresses could not be exchanged. Thus, demonetization had 
hit the women folk most adversely. During Covid period, mostly the women had lost 
their jobs. They have been devastated. The women employees of BSNL, SAIL, BHEL 
and Railways bore the brunt of the new polici es of privatization, corporatization and 
disinvestment. The profitable PSUs have been sold out and women were impacted 
adversely due to that along with all the workmen. Therefore, only reservation is not 
enough. Women have to be brought in the forefront at every step. So, employment 
opportunities for women, social dignity and respect everywhere - all these are equally 
significant.  
Overall, in the name of women empo werment, only providing Ujjwala gas 
connections, 5kg food grains, toilets under  Swachh Bharat
 Mission and Janadhan or 
                                                            
 English translation of the original speech delivered in Bangla 
22
[RAJYA SABHA]

Mudra schemes and calling women as go ddesses is not sufficient. To empower 
women 24/7, I would request the Treasury Benches to please visit Bengal. We have 
our Didi there. Learn from her. That will be useful for the people of the country, 
particularly for the women. Emul ating Didi’s ‘Kanyasree’ scheme, “Beti Bachao Beti 
Padhao” was introduced. “Ayushman Bharat” was inspired by her ‘Swasthya Sathi’ 
scheme. “PM Kisan Nidhi ” was inspired by her ‘Krishak  Bondhu’. Similarly to learn 
how to worship women power, take lessons from her, please. 
She is the only woman Chief Minister of the country today and moreover, in 27 
years she became MP for 7 times, became Minister for 6 times, and now continuously 
for the 3 rd term, she is the Chief Minister of  Bengal. She came up from the lower 
rungs of the society after immense sufferin g; she was beaten but she did not die, 
didn’t give up. She struggled, she fo ught and passed BA. MA, LLB, not as a 
daughter or wife of any polit ician but on her own, due to her grit and talent. Now she 
is hailed as a social reformer after providing the basic necessities of life enshrined as 
fundamental right in the Constitution like f ood, clothing, shelter, education, health 
facilities and has touched the lives of millions of people. In our Bengal, not only 33% 
reservation in Panchayat and municipalities is there but we have 50% reservation for 
half of the population. In Lok Sabha and Assembly, the reservation is beyond 33%, 
it’s almost 40-45%." आप मेरा reference भी ले सकते हȅ, mainstream politics मȂ, male 
dominated sector Trade Union मȂ, दीदी ने मुझे िपछले 12 साल मȂ 10 बरस Îटेट Ģेिज़डȂट और 
2 साल से ज्यादा समय से ऑल इंिडया Ģेिज़डȂट बना रखा है। I am honoured. यह और िकसी 
पाटीर् मȂ नहीं है। 
"In our social sector, for women and also for others, whatever has 
been done has never been done anywhere in the world. Five most important 
foundations of women empowerment at the in ternational level are education, health, 
security, finance and emotion. Let me ci te an example. When a lady becomes 
pregnant, through ‘Matri Maa’ portal, her h ealth gets tracked and, in the process, 
approximately 1.25 crore women undergo re gular checkup, 7.5 lakh mothers are 
provided with all kinds of medical assistan ce. By encouraging birth of babies in the 
hospitals instead of homes, maternal mortalit y has been arrested to a great extent. In 
2011, the rate of institutional delivery was 68.10% which has been increased to 99%. 
Thus, maternal mortality rate has come down from 117 in 2011 to 109, much below the 
national average too of 113. In the ICDS centres, along with 70 lakh children, 13 lakh 
pregnant women and new mothers get cooked  nutritious food daily for 26 days every 
month. Under ‘Kanyasree’ scheme, from Oc tober 2013 in K-1 every year, Rs.1,000/- 
for 5 years, in K-2 Rs. 25,000/- as one-time grant at the age of 18 years, in K-3 at the 
university level, Rs.300 crores as scholarshi p for higher education have already been 
                                                            
 English translation of the original speech delivered in Bangla 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
23

spent. Under ‘Ruposree’ scheme, Rs. 25,0 00/- is given as one time grant for 
marriage of poor and middle-class girls and t ill this date, 15 lakh girls have already 
benefitted. 27 lakh widows get widow pens ion of Rs. 1,000/- per month. Out of 16 
lakh beneficiaries of old age pension, 15 la khs are women. Earlier, they used to get 
only Rs.300- 400. Now they are getting Rs.1000. Under ‘Lakhhir Bhandar’ scheme, 
from the age of 25 years till 60 years, mo nthly grant is given on account of which 
about Rs. 8000 crores have been spen t in the fiscal year 2022-23. Under 
‘SwasthyaSathi’ Programme, the name of th e senior most lady of the family is 
registered. She and her family members rece ive medical assistance to the tune of Rs. 
5 lakhs. There are 12 lakh se lf help groups which are self -reliant. 10,88,000 self help 
groups have received Rs. 88,848 crores so far. To maintain the law and order 
situation and particularly for the safety of women, 49 new women police stations have 
been set up. Under ‘Sayamsidhha’ Scheme , 40,000 self-help groups have been 
created who are ready to defe nd themselves. ‘Karmanjali’ hostels have been built for 
the working women at various places. That is why it is said that ‘what Bengal thinks 
today, India thinks tomorrow’, i.e., Bharat  thinks tomorrow. Not only Bengal. You 
should also learn from the schemes like free  public transport fo r ladies in Delhi, 
‘Grihalakshmi’ scheme of Karnataka, Skill Development programmes of Punjab." 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Dolaji, your time is over. Time is over. 
 
MS. DOLA SEN: 
"If you follow the initiatives of Didi  of Bengal and partner states of 
I.N.D.I.A alliance, the women of the country will be able  to forge ahead. Amrit Kaal is 
being talked about. In this context, let me  remind you that the women had played an 
unforgettable role in the freedom struggle of the country. Thus, not only founding 
fathers, but founding mothers also are no  less in numbers. Your predecessors may 
not have participated in the freedom move ment in large numbers. Even then, let me 
say that this women worship or women empowerment can be dedicated to the 
distinguished, unforgettable women leader s of the nation who had sacrificed 
everything for their motherland. Can’t we  do that? The government should think 
about it. "(Time-bell rings.) 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Thank you. 
 
MS. DOLA SEN: 
*"Let me flag another issue of great shame and misfortune. Manipur 
is the only state of the country where wome n reservation is already 50% for a long 
                                                            
 English translation of the original speech delivered in Bangla 
24
[RAJYA SABHA]

time. But in that empowered state, mother s and sisters are being disrespected. Their 
rights to life, civil liberties are being trampled upon. Six months have passed. When 
will the double engine government take ch arge and save Manipur and Manipuri's 
mothers in coming days? " 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: I would be calling the next speaker now. Please conclude. 
...(Interruptions)... Please conclude.  Your time is already over. 
 
MS. DOLA SEN: "I will conclude by supporting th is Bill and quoting Rabindranath 
Tagore, who had written for all of us and for women too;" 
 
 MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: I am calling the next speaker, Dr. Kanimozhi NVN Somu.  
Your time is up.  ...(Interruptions)...  Please be seated. ...(Interruptions)...  M s .  
Dola Sen, please conclude. Thank you. 
 
MS. DOLA SEN:  * "Shying away in hesitation is self-humiliation 
Never be cowed down by imaginary crisis. 
Free yourself from fear 
Unleash inner strength and be victorious.  
Thank you." 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Dr. Kanimozhi, you have ten minutes. 
 
DR. KANIMOZHI NVN SOMU (Tamil Nadu): Hon. Deputy Chairman, Sir, first of all, I 
would like to express our support to the Women's Reservation Bill, under the 
leadership of our Chief Minister, Thalapathi M.K. Stalin, yesterday, today and forever. 
But for our beloved leader, Dr. Kalaignar, I would not be st anding before this august 
gathering.  He is one of the greatest lead ers we had and had been a strong advocate 
of women empowerment. Thanthai Periyar, a visionary social reformer who fought for 
the rights of women a century back, has pr oclaimed that only a society that does 
away with slavery of women can grow, and that is real growth.  
He always said 
# which means, ' from the kitchen to the classrooms for 
women', which had been the Dravidian Moveme nt vision from early 1920s. From the 
time immemorial, Tamil Nadu has a glorious tradition of recognising the importance of 
empowering women. We had empowered wo men in the Sangam Age, even about 
                                                            
 English translation of the original speech delivered in Bangla 
# Honourable Member spoke in Tamil. 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
25

2000 years ago. The Tamil poetess Avvaiyar  and the two most celebrated Epics of 
Tamil literature Silapathikaram and Manimegh alai glorify the power of women during 
the Tamil Sangam period.  Kannagi and Manimeghalai, who are revered like the 
Goddesses and the poetess Avvaiyar are the testimonials for the greatness of 
womanhood in making the enlightened societ y.  'Women's reservation is a matter of 
right and not a favour to us', Tamil poet , Bharathiyar, proclaimed a hundred years 
back. He also hailed the braver y and character of women as # which means, " if we 
consider men and women equal consciously, then, that society flourishes." 
As you all believe the concept of Ardhanar ishvara, who gave half of his body to 
woman, according to that belief, without woma n power, there is no life. This is the 
concept of life.   
Our Indian Constitution has conferred an d guaranteed equality before the law, 
universal adult franchise and equal opport unity to man and woman as fundamental 
rights. I would like to take this august House way back to 1921 to remind that the right 
to vote for women was given by Justice Pa rty in Madras Presidency, followed by 
Tamil Nadu in 1927, as its first representation by a wo man, Dr. Muthulakshmi Reddy, 
who was empowered with education. In 1996, the UPA-I along with our Party, DMK, 
brought about the Women's Reservation Bill which could not be passed at that time, 
which nobody could forget. In 2010, the UPA-II, along with the DMK Party, passed 
the Women's Reservation Bill in Rajya Sabha. Now the current Government is 
presenting the same Bill after 9.5 years of its regime, when they could pass the 
controversial Bills like Farmers' Bill, the CAA Bill, the Bill relating to Kashmir, the EWS 
Bill for 10 per cent quota, etc.  Even th e last evening, the Central Government 
announced that NEET PGs could get their post-graduation seats secured in the 
country even if they get zero marks. If the Government had done their homework on 
the Women's Reservation Bill, it could have been done in a better way. Our Party, 
DMK, played a role in passing the resoluti on, which provides 50 per cent reservation 
for women representatives themselves in ur ban local bodies. Tamil Nadu is the first 
State to do so in India. Under the dynamic leadership of our successive Chief 
Ministers of Tamil Nadu right from Arigna r Anna, Tamil Nadu stands first in many 
initiatives meant for the welfare and deve lopment of women.  Muthamil Arignar Dr. 
Kalaignar passed a law to ensure that wome n have legal rights over their ancestral 
properties decades ago. Dr. Kalaignar is the one who increased the financial support 
to several women through welfare schemes decades ago. Today, we have all-women 
police stations, women commandoes that ha s clearly shown the world the ways to 
achieve the empowerment of women. The Government of Tamil Nadu, under the 
dynamic leadership of Dr. Kalaignar, has framed various policies, designed specific 
                                                            
# Honourable Member spoke in Tamil. 
26
[RAJYA SABHA]

interventions and implemented many progr ammes to empower women. Periyar E Ve 
Ra Nagammai Scheme - free coaching exclusively for women students, 
Entrepreneurship Awareness Programme, Ta mil Nadu Corporation for Development 
of Women, Establishment of Self-Help Groups for Sustainable Economic Growth, the 
Entrepreneurship Development Training Programme for Women, Skill Upgradation 
Training Programme, etc., are some of th e path-breaking schemes implemented in 
Tamil Nadu under the guidance of our beloved leader Dr. Kalaignar. The nation and its 
growth is in the hands of women and all- round efforts are being made by the DMK 
regime for their empowerment. The Dravidian Movement growth is all-inclusive and it 
includes both men and women. Nothing is planned excluding women in Tamil Nadu.  
Following the footsteps of trio of social ju stice and Dravidian Model, Thanthai Periyar, 
Perarignar Anna and Muthamil Arignar Dr. Kalaignar, in itiatives and schemes for 
women empowerment are being implemente d by the DMK Government. Continuing 
the legacy of the Dravidian Movement and the Dravidian Model of Governance, today, 
under the dynamic leadership of our hon. Chief Minister of Tamil Nadu, Thiru M.K. 
Stalin, we have improved upon women we lfare schemes that are being implemented 
in Tamil Nadu over the last five decades. Some of them are: Equal rights for women in 
family properties since 1989; increase in re servation for women in Government jobs to 
40 per cent; Dr. Muthulakshmi Maternity Benefit Scheme, which aims at ensuring 
maternal nutrition; schemes for education;  marriage assistance and remarriage; fare-
free travel for women in Government-run city buses. The Moovalur Ramamirtham 
Ammaiyar Higher Education Assurance Sc heme provides financial assistance 
Rs.1,000 to girls till they complete their recognised course. The Government of Tamil 
Nadu has launched the grand so cial welfare initiative fo r women, Kalaignar Magalir 
Urimai Thogai Thittam on September 15.  Through this scheme, monthly financial 
assistance of Rs.1,000 is provided to 1.06 crore eligible women in the State of Tamil 
Nadu.   
The plethora of welfare programmes has engineered the empowerment of 
women in Tamil Nadu. Under th e Dravidian model of social justice-led all inclusive 
growth, the Government is implementing mo re schemes for education, social justice 
and for women and their rights. Tamil Nadu is a role model State in the country and 
full credit goes to the Dravidian Movement  and the Dravidian Model Government by 
our extraordinary leaders. No State in Indi a can boast of such an  overall growth of 
women in all walks of life other than Tam il Nadu. Be it education, employment and 
empowerment, it is the key to our success.   And 'Yes', Tamil Nadu has done the 
homework in a right manner.   
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
27

The sad part of the design by this Government is that the women in this 
country will have to wait furt her a long way, at least, t ill 2029 to rise to their fullest 
potential to force their way into Parliament  and State Legislative Assemblies even if 
the Women's Reservation Bill is passed in our Parliament today. The provisions of 
Article 334 of the Constitution, relating to the reservation of seats for women in the 
House of the People and the Legislative Asse mbly of a State, shall come into effect 
after the exercise of delimitation is underta ken for this purpose, after the first census 
taken, onthe enactment of the Constitu tion (One Hundred and Twenty-Eighth 
Amendment) Bill, 2023, has been publishe d and shall cease to  have effect on 
expiration of a period of fifteen years fr om such commencement. I would like to say 
that the Government is conducting the ma rriage engagement now or the betrothal 
function, which we would rather call it, bu t we don't know when the marriage is. In 
Tamil, we have a proverb saying: # which means, the one that reached the hand did 
not reach the mouth. That is the present situation of women in India. So, I appeal the 
current Government to pass the Bill for 2024 parliamentary elections without fail, not 
keeping it pending for delimitation or the cen sus which has to be taken. Your sinister 
design would be understood by the people of  the country and they clearly know your 
intention is not to implement the reservat ion for women, but to create a confusion 
amongst the women in India. The nation wa nts to know: Can the Minister answer or 
pinpoint a date when the Women's Reservation Bill will be implemented after it 
becomes an Act? Thank you. 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Thank you, Dr. Ka nimozhi. You have concluded before 
time.  I hope others will follow you because there are more than 60 speakers. माननीय 
Ǜी संदीप क ुमार पाठक। 
 
Ǜी संदीप क ुमार पाठक (पंजाब): उपसभापित महोदय, मȅ अपनी पाटीर् की तरफ से िवमेन 
िरज़वȃशन िबल का समथर्न करता हूं। हमारा देश ऐसा देश है, जहां पर देिवयȗ को पूजा जाता है - 
जैसा िक नƿा जी न
े बड़े elaborate तरीके  से explain िकया। उन्हȗने कहा िक देवताओं से ऊपर 
देिवयȗ को रखा गया है। यह ऐसा देश है, जहां पर क ृÍण से पहले राधा का नाम आता है, राम से 
पहले सीता का नाम आता है और शंकर जी से पहले भवानी
 का नाम आता है। हम ऐसे देश से 
belong करते हȅ।   
सर, सामािजक ËयवÎथा क े कारण, बहुत सारी पिरिÎथितयȗ क े कारण राजनीित मȂ 
मिहलाओं को जो उिचत Îथान िमलना चािहए था, वह नहीं िमल पाया। इसिलए देश क े िलए, 
समाज क
े  िलए यह िबल बहुत महत्वपूणर् है। इस आइिडया को सबसे पहले 1987 मȂ राजीव गांधी 
                                                            
# Honourable Member spoke in Tamil. 
28
[RAJYA SABHA]

जी क े ǎारा लाया गया था।  1987 से लेकर आज तक इस आइिडया को िबल क े रूप  मȂ पिरविर्तत 
होने मȂ 35 साल लग गए।  हम बड़े उत्सािहत थे िक भारतीय जनता पाटीर् की सरकार इस िबल को 
लेकर आई है। जब इस िबल क े अंदर देखा, तो हमȂ यह पता चला िक यह िबल* देने वाला िबल है, 
मिहलाओं को *  बनाने वाला िबल है। यह िबल मिहलाओं को िरज़वȃशन नहीं दे रहा है, बिÊक यह 
मिहलाओं से िरज़वȃशन ले रहा है। मȅ बताता हूं िक ये क ै से करȂगे।...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Kindly check आपने * और * शÅदȗ का इÎतेमाल िकया, वे 
असंसदीय हȅ। आप बोलने मȂ संसदीय शÅदȗ का ही इÎतेमाल करȂ। 
 
SHRI SANDEEP KUMAR PATHAK: You may take the appropriate decision.   
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: यह देखना आपका काम है, मेरा नहीं है। आप संसदीय शÅदȗ का ही इÎतेमाल 
करȂ। 
 
Ǜी संदीप क ुमार पाठक : िजस तरीके  से बहुत सारे जुमले िदए गए, यह भी उन जुमलȗ मȂ से 
अगला जुमला है। जुमला िदया गया िक 18 करोड़ जॉÅस िमलȂगी, नहीं िमलीं और वह एक जुमला 
िनकला।  िकसानȗ को फसल का दोगुना भाव िमलेगा - यह भी जुमला िनकला। काला धन वापस 
आएगा, जुमला िनकला। महंगाई कम करȂगे, जुमला िनकला। उपसभापित महोदय, इस िबल पर 
भी िजस तरीके  से यह प
Ȃच अड़ाया गया है, इस संबंध मȂ मȅ िडटेल मȂ बताऊं गा िक क ै से पȂच अड़ाया 
गया है। यह पȂच िजस तरीके  से अड़ाया गया ह
ै, ऐसा लगता है िक यह भी मातर् एक जुमला सािबत 
होने वाला है। अमृत काल एक बहुत अच्छा नाम है। सुनकर अच्छा लगता है,  अमृत काल मȂ कौन 
नहीं रहना चाहेगा! अमृत काल एक संभावनाओं का समय हो सकता था, यह अपार संभावनाओं 
का समय हो सकता था। यंग नेशन है, एजुक ेशन है, सब क ु छ है, बहुत अच्छा कर सकते थे, 
ल
ेिकन संभावनाओं को िजस तरीके  से Îलोगन मȂ और जुमले मȂ बदल िदया गया है, यह इस द
ेश 
का दुभार्ग्य है और यह दुभार्ग्य है अमृत काल का, जो इस समय राइटली िडज़वर् करता है।   
 उपसभापित महोदय, िदÊली सरकार न
े मिहलाओं की सुरक्षा से संबंिधत कई काम िकए हȅ।  
उसने सीसीटीवी लगाए हȅ, जो िवÌव मȂ िकसी भी देश की नेशनल क ैिपटल मȂ िजतने सीसीटीवी 
लगे हȅ, उससे ज्यादा हȅ। आप देखȂगे िक बसȗ मȂ बस यातर्ा ģी की गई है, बसȗ मȂ माशर्ल लगाए गए 
हȅ।  जब-जब आपको ऑपचुर्िनटी िमलती है, जब-जब स
ंभावना िमलती है, आप उसका उपयोग 
क ै से करते हȅ, यह आपकी नीयत को िदखाता है और यह ÎपÍट करता है िक आपकी करनी और 
कथनी मȂ िकतना फकर् होता
 है। 1987 मȂ राजीव गांधी जी ने एक कमेटी बनाई और उसमȂ National 
Perspective Plan फॉमुर्लेट िकया गया। इस फॉमुर्लेशन मȂ िवमȂस िरज़वȃशन को सबसे पहले रखा 
गया।  उसके  बाद पी.वी. नरिसÇहा राव जी ǎारा 1992 मȂ 73वȂ और 74वȂ अमȂडमȂट लाकर पंचायत 
                                                            
* Expunged as ordered by the Chair.  
 
 
 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
29

और कॉपȘरेशन क े इलेक्शन्स मȂ 33 Ģितशत िरज़वȃशन लाया गया। आप उसका Ģत्यक्ष Ģमाण देख 
सकते हȅ िक लगभग 15 लाख से ज्यादा िवमेन आज पंचायत और िजले क े दूसरे क्षेतर्ȗ मȂ नेतृत्व कर 
रही हȅ। यह जनीर् 1987 से 2023 तक 35-36 साल का सफर कर चुकी है।   
 उपसभापित महोदय,  इस िबल क े तीन िहÎसे हȅ।  पहला - िरज़वȃशन, िजसमȂ 33 Ģितशत 
क े िरज़वȃशन की बात की जाती ह
ै और िजतना िरज़वȃशन एससी, एसटी समुदाय को िमला है, 
उसमȂ भी 33 परसȂट िरज़वȃशन की बात करता है। उपसभापित महोदय, उसके  बाद दूसरा िहÎसा 
महत्वपूणर् है और मȅ आपके  माध्यम से पूरे देश क े सामने यह रखना चाहता हूं। कमȂसमȂट - कब से 
शुरू  होगा, कब से लागू होगा - इसके  बारे मȂ यह कहा गया है िक पहले सȂसस होगा, िफर 
डीिलिमटेशन होगा और डीिलिमटेशन क े बाद यह लागू हो सकता ह
ै। अभी नƿा जी ने Îवयं कहा 
िक 2029 से पहले तो यह संभव ही नहीं है। यह संभव है - अगर बीच मȂ एक-दो अड़चनȂ आ जाएं, 
तो
 यह आगे भी िकतने साल जाएगा, यह भी िकसी को पता नहीं है। इसका मतलब यह है िक आज 
िजस िबल पर हम िडबेट कर रहे हȅ, आज िजस िबल को पास करने क े िलए सारे इकƻा हुए हȅ, 
उसके  भिवÍय का िकसी को कोई अ
ंदाजा नहीं है।   
तीसरा पक्ष इसमȂ रोटेशन का है। आप देखȂगे िक जब भी िरज़वȃशन की बात होती है, तो 
रोटेशन एक बहुत महत्वपूणर् मुǈा है और िबना रोटेशन को क्लैिरफाई िकए आप िबल क ै से ला 
सकते हȅ! आप एक
 बहुत बड़े िबल को सामने ला रहे हȅ। उसमȂ न तैयारी की गई है और न ही उसमȂ 
Ģॉपरलीर् रोटेशन को रखा गया है।  2008 मȂ या उससे पहले जो िबल आए थे, उनमȂ सही या गलत 
हो, यह अलग बात है, लेिकन उनमȂ रोटेशन्स को Îपेिसफाई तो िकया गया था! इस बार यह 
िलखा गया है िक डीिलिमटेशन क े बाद हर बार रोटेशन िकया जाएगा।  ऐसा लग रहा है िक इसमȂ 
काफी चुनौितयां और किमयां हȅ।    
उपसभापित महोदय, अगर इसको क्लोज़ लुक लेकर द
ेखते हȅ, तो सबसे पहला ĢÌन यह 
है िक िकस तरीके  से इस िबल को लाया गया, िकस सीकर्े सी क े साथ इस िबल को लाया गया। देश 
का यह इक
लौता िबल होना चािहए, िजसमȂ ज्यादा से ज्यादा लोग सहमत हȅ। इस िबल मȂ सीकर्े सी 
की क्या जरूरत  है, इसमȂ तो सारे लोग सहमत हȅ! िजस तरीके  से इस िबल को लाया गया है, यह 
सीकर्े सी वाली बड़ी िविचतर् पिरिÎथित ह
ै। क ु छ समय पहले खबरȗ और मीिडया मȂ अडाणी जी क े 
बारे मȂ काफी खबरȂ आईं और बहुत सारी खबरȂ आने क े बाद मीिडया को डायवटर् करने क े िलए यह 
Ãलान बनाया गया िक अब क्या िकया जाए। ...(Ëयवध
ान)... 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Please speak on the subject. Only that will go on record 
as per the rule...(Interruptions)... Ãलीज़, बैठ जाइए।  ...(Ëयवधान)... आप नहीं बोल सकते 
हȅ, आप बैठ जाइए।  ...(Ëयवधान)... Please speak only on the Bill. आपकी बात ही िरकॉडर् पर 
जाएगी।  आपका समय खत्म हो रहा है।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
SHRI SANDEEP KUMAR PATHAK: I will speak only on the Bill. I will not disappoint 
you or the nation. This is purely on the Bill.  
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: आप िवधेयक पर ही बोिलए। वही रूÊस क े तहत िरकॉडर् पर जाएगा।   
30
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
Ǜी संदीप क ुमार पाठक: िजस तरह अडाणी जी क े बारे मȂ खबरȂ आईं ...(Ëयवधान)...मीिडया को 
डायवटर् करने क े िलए वन नेशन वन इलेक्शन की बात आ गई। सारा मीिडया वन नेशन वन 
इलेक्शन की बात करने लगा। उसके  बाद यह बात आई िक िवशेष सतर् बुलाया जाए गा। पूरे 
मीिडया का िडबेट और िडÎकशन इस बात पर चला गया िक िवशेष सतर् बुलाया जाएगा, वन 
नेशन वन इलेक्शन होगा।  िफर 18 िसतÇबर को मीिडया मȂ खबर आती है िक िवमȂन िरज़वȃशन 
िबल को लाया जाएगा। इस संब ंध मȂ िकसी को कोई आइिडया नहीं है। यह क ैसी डेमोकर्े सी है, 
िजसमȂ बाकी क े िवपक्ष क े नेताओं को जानकारी होने से पहले मीिडया मȂ बात आती है और मीिडया 
क े ǎारा पता चलता है! िफर 19 िसतÇबर को सरकार कहती है िक िवमȂन िरज़वȃशन पर िबल आ 
रहा है - यह िविचतर् पिरिÎथित है।  
 उपसभापित महोदय, इससे अब तक दो चीज़Ȃ ÎपÍट हो गई हȅ। एक तो सरकार की तैयारी 
नहीं थी। यह ÎपÍट िदखता है िक िकसी भी चीज़ पर कोई भी एलैबोरेशन नहीं है। एक  तो तैयारी 
नहीं है और दूसरा नीयत नहीं है। यह िबल हड़बड़ी मȂ और िबना मन क े लाया गया है। अब इसे क ै से 
करȂ - िबल लाना है, मीिडया को डायवटर् करना है, तो क्या करȂ! इसका कर् ेिडट भी लेना है, पर 
करना नहीं है -  इनका यह आइिडया है। उपसभापित
 महोदय, अब मȅ आपके  सामने दूसरा पक्ष 
रखना चाहता हूं।  
 
[उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती एस. फान्गनॉग कोन्याक) पीठासीन हुईं।] 
 
 वह जनगणना और डीिलिमटेशन क े बारे मȂ है। इसमȂ यह पȂच फ ंसाया गया है िक िरज़वȃशन िमलने 
से पहले जनगणना होगी और जनगणना क
े  बाद डीिलिमटेशन होगा और डीिलिमटेशन क े बाद 
यह िकया जाएगा। मुझे यह समझ नहीं आता - अगर आप ऑÅजेिक्टवली भी देखȂ, तो जनगणना 
और डीिलिमटेशन से ऐसी
 कौन सी बात िनकलकर आएगी, िजसके  आधार पर िरज़वȃशन िकया 
जाएगा!  जनगणना या डीिलिमटेशन से तो क ु छ भी िनकलकर नहीं आएगा, िजस पर िरज़वȃशन 
आधािरत होना चािहए। ऐसा कौन सा पैरामीटर है, जो जनगणना से िन कलकर आएगा। अगर 
करने की मंशा है, तो आज हमारे पास 543 सांसद हȅ, उन पर क्यȗ हम सीधे 33 परसȂट लागू नहीं 
करते हȅ? यह सरकार की तरफ से तो आया ही है, मेरी पाटीर् और मुझे पूरा भरोसा है िक भारतीय 
जनता पाटीर्, कांगर्ेस और सारी पािर्टयां तैयार हȅ। यह एक ऐसा ऐितहािसक िबल हो सकता था, 
जो अǌुत होता, सभी इसका समथर्न करते और त
ुरंत, एक ही िदन मȂ, एक ही झटके  मȂ, अगले 
चुनाव मȂ पूरा िरज़वȃशन होत
ा। लेिकन चुनाव आ गया है और कर् ेिडट लेना है, पर िरज़वȃशन करना 
नहीं है। िपछली सरकारȂ भी िबल लाई थीं। आप िपछली सरकारȗ क े िबल उठाकर देख लीिजए। 
िपछली सरकारȗ क े िकसी भी िबल मȂ यह Ģावधान या  पȂच नहीं था। इस पȂच को इस बार लगाया 
गया है। इसके  बारे मȂ सभी माननीय लीडसर् ने बताया।  िकसी को तो एलैबोरेट करना चािहए। बाकी 
की बातȂ करने क े बजाय यह बताना चािहए िक क्या कारण था िक डीिलिमटेशन और सȂसस को 
इसमȂ इन्टर्ो
ǹ ूस िकया गया है, िकस कारण से इस पर बाध्य बनाया गया है। उस पर कोई बात 
नहीं कर रहा है।  हम जानना चाहते हȅ, देश जानना चाहता है।  हमȂ तुरंत यह िरज़वȃशन चािहए। 
इसको िडले क्यȗ िकया जा रहा ह
ै? मȅ उसका कारण बताता हूं। …(Ëयवधान)... भारतीय जनता 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
31

पाटीर् मȂ Îवयं क े अंदर इतने क ंटर्ािडक्शन्स हȅ िक िपछली बार जब यह िबल आया था, तब माननीय 
योगी आिदत्यनाथ जी ने कहा था िक िËहप की क्या जरूरत  है, हम कोई बंधुआ मजदूर नहीं हȅ। 
पाटीर् क े अंदर िडÎकस होना चािहए, जैसा आडवाणी जी क े यहां िडÎकस हुआ था। अगर पाटीर् 
नहीं मानती है, तो मȅ िरज़ाइन कर दूंगा - मȅ यह क्वोट करके  कह रहा हूं, यह आिदत्यनाथ जी का 
बयान है। यह पूरी मीिडया मȂ है। उसके  बाद लालमुिन चौबे जी, मृदुला िसन्हा जी, तेजÎवी सूयार् 
जी, अिमत मालवीय जी, आप िकसी को भी ले लीिजए, सब पिÅलक डोमेन है, सबने इसका िवरोध 
िकया
 था। अिमत मालवीय जी ने तो यह भी िलखा था, मȅ िट्वटर से क्वोट कर रहा हूं, "Soniaji 
holding the nation to ransom just to fulfil her agenda to see Women's Reservation Bill 
passed." That is true. That
 is precisely the case. सर, चूंिक िबल को पास करने की इच्छा 
मन क े अंदर नहीं है, लेिकन क्या करȂ, चुनाव आ रहा है और कर् ेिडट लेना है! चुनाव आ रहा है, 
कर् ेिडट लेना है, िबल पास करो, लेिकन उसको लागू मत करो! यह डीिलिमटेशन वाला पहला 
फॉमूर्ला नहीं है, यह पहले िकया जा चुका ह
ै। िदÊली मȂ एमसीडी क े चुनाव होने थे, िदÊली क े 
एमसीडी क े चुनाव मȂ इन्हȗने डीिलिमटेशन क े नाम पर चुनाव को रोक िदया। छ:-सात महीने 
डीिलिमटेशन िकया और अगड़म, बगड़म, ितगड़म सब िकया, लेिकन अ
ंत मȂ क्या हुआ - चुनाव 
हार गए।  ऊपर वाला यह सब देखता है। महोदया, ऐसे कोई षडयंतर् सफल नहीं होते, जो देश क े 
िखलाफ हȅ।  इसके  बाद मȅ एक महत्वपूणर् चीज़ आपके  सामने लाना चाहता हूं। मȅन
े सȂटर्ल हॉल मȂ 
Ģधान मंतर्ी जी की Îपीच सुनी। मेरे िलए गौरव की बात थी, मȅ एक नया पािर्लयामȂटेिरयन हूं। Ģधान 
मंतर्ी जी ने कहा िक इफ और बट नहीं होना चािहए, सीधे-सीधे काम होना चािहए। दो िदन क े बाद 
िबल लाया गया और इस िबल म
Ȃ सȂसस और डीिलिमटेशन - यह वही इफ और बट है िजसकी बात 
Ģधान मंतर्ी जी कर रहे थे। Ģधान मंतर्ी जी, आपको दो िदन भी नहीं लगे इफ और बट लगाने मȂ। 
Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने भाषण िदया, उसका क्या हुआ, आपकी कथनी और करनी मȂ इतना फकर् क्यȗ 
है? 
म
ेरा अगला महत्वपूणर् मुǈा नारी सÇमान का है। नारी सÇमान क े मुǈे पर कथनी और करनी 
मȂ फकर् नहीं होना चािहए। नƿा जी ने बहुत अच्छा भाषण िदया। 
 हमारे देश म
Ȃ मिहलाओं को देिवयȗ क े रूप  मȂ पूजा जाता है, यह हमारे धमर् की संÎकृ ित है। 
यह हमȂ िकसी पाटीर् ने नहीं दी है, हमȂ िकसी पाटीर् से सीखने की जरूरत  नहीं है िक हम द
ेिवयȗ की 
पूजा करते हȅ। आप बताइए िक आपकी सरकार ने ऐसे क्या काम िकए हȅ, िजनसे नािरयȗ का 
सÇमान बढ़ सके ! थोड़े िदन पहले हिरयाणा मȂ हमारी जो िवमेन रेसलसर् ह
ȅ, वे रोड पर बैठ कर 
ĢोटेÎट कर रही थीं, धरने पर बैठी थीं, सारा देश उनके  साथ खड़ा था, क्या Ģधान मंतर्ी जी क े 
पास उनको बोलने क े िलए एक भी शÅद नहीं था! * यही नहीं, मȅ हिरयाणा का एक और उदाहरण 
देता हूं।  
मȅ भारतीय जनता पाटीर् को contest  करता हूं िजससे पूरी बात िनकल कर आए। * ऐसी 
क्या पिरिÎथितयां हȅ! भारतीय जनता पाटीर् की सरकार तो बहुत मजबूत है, उसे इतनी brute 
majority िमली हुई है, अमृत काल चल रहा है। अमृत काल मȂ ऐसा क्या हो गया जो संदीप िंसह 
जैसे लोगȗ को, बृजभूषण िंसह जैसे लोगȗ को नहीं िनकाला जा रहा है? ऐसी क्या मजबूरी रही है, 
                                                            
* Expunged as ordered by the Chair.  
 
32
[RAJYA SABHA]

िजसके  कारण उनको नहीं िनकाला जा रहा है? क्या यह है नािरयȗ का सÇमान! बाकी का मȅ 
आपको क्या बताऊं ? आप कठु आ ले लीिजए, उन्नाव ले लीिजए, हाथरस ले लीिजए, हिरयाणा ले 
लीिजए, मिणपुर ले लीिजए, इसका अंत नहीं  है। इनकी कथनी और करनी मȂ बहुत फकर् है । मȅ तो 
इतना ही समझ पाया हूं िक जो नारी बचाओ का Îलोग
न है, वह पैक ेिंजग है। जब आप पैक ेिंजग 
खोलते हȅ, तो उसमȂ से Ĥजभूषण िंसह िनकलते हȅ। लेिकन इन सारी पिरिÎथितयȗ क े  बाद भी यह 
िबल बहुत महत्वपूणर् है। यह िबल देश क े िलए बहुत महत्वपूणर् है, इसिलए हम िबल को नहीं 
रोकȂ गे। यह िबल इसिलए महत्वपूणर् है, क्यȗिक जब पहली लोक सभा बनी, तब लगभग 5 Ģितशत 
मिहलाएं चुनकर आई थीं और अब लगभग 15 परसȂट हो गई हȅ। देश की पिरिÎथितयां ऐसी रहीं िक 
पहली लोक सभा से लेकर आज तक, 5 परसȂट  से 15 परसȂट तक आने मȂ ही इतने साल लग गए। 
मȅ उन सभी माताओं, बहनȗ और जो हमारी पािर्लयामȂटेिरयन साथी हȅ, इलेिक्टड िरĢेजȂटेिटËज़ हȅ, 
जो इतनी किठन पिरिÎथितयȗ मȂ च
ुनकर आई हȅ, उन सभी को हाथ जोड़कर Ģणाम करता हूं िक 
िवषम पिरिÎथितयȗ मȂ आपने अदÇय साहस िदखाया, आप ऐसी पिरिÎथितयȗ मȂ भी चुनकर आईं। मȅ 
आप सबको Ģणाम करता हूं।  
 आप देिखए, अगर हम Scandinavian countries को लेत
े हȅ, जैसे आप Îवीडन को 
लीिजए, नावȃ को लीिजए, वहां पर 45 Ģितशत क े आस-पास असेÇबलीज मȂ वूमेन िरĢेजȂटेशन है। 
आप इंग्लȅड मȂ देखȂगे, तो वहां पर 35 परस Ȃट िरĢेजȂटेशन है, आप अमेिरका मȂ देखȂगे, तो वहां पर 
29 परसȂट िरĢेजȂटेशन है। जापान ही ऐसा ऐक्सेÃशन है, जो इंिडया से नीचे है। उसके  यहां पर दस 
Ģितशत वूमेन िरĢेजȂटेशन है।  
 हमारे देश मȂ 33 Ģितशत िरज़वȃशन की बात पहली बार नहीं हो रही है। अगर हम देखȂ, तो 
पंचायती राज और कॉरपोरेशन मȂ िरज़वȃशन है। हमȂ इसे िरËयू करना चािहए िक इस को और क ै से 
अच्छी तरह से इिÇÃलमȂट कर सकते हȅ। अगर आप देखȂगे, तो 1996 मȂ जेपीसी कांिÎटǷूट हुई थी, 
2008 मȂ Îटȅिंडग कमेटी बनी थी। इस Îटȅिंडग कमेटी और जेपीसी मȂ दो-तीन बातȂ िनकलकर आई 
थीं, जो आज भी बहुत रेलेवȂट हȅ। सबसे पहली बात तो रोटेशन की है। हमȂ रोटेशन को बहुत ÎपÍट 
रूप  से समझना पड़ेगा, जैसा िक नƿा जी कह रहे थ
े िक अगर मȅ वायनाड सीट को वूमेन सीट कर 
दूं, तो क्या होगा? अब इंिडया पाटीर् अगर कहेगी िक बनारस की सीट को वूमेन क े िलए कर दȂ, तो 
क्या होगा? ऐसे तो क ु छ भी िकया जा सकता है। अगर रोटेशन को पॉिलिटकल ट ू ल बनाया गया, 
तब तो सब क ु छ खराब हो जाएगा। इसिलए  इसको अच्छी तरह से समझना पड़ेगा। रोटेशन की जो 
पॉिलसी है, उसको देश क े सामने deliberate करना पड़ेगा। 
 मȅ आज एक और फ ैक्ट आपके  सामने रखना चाहता  हूं। पंचायत क े माध्यम से जो 15 लाख 
से ज्यादा वूमेन चुनकर आईं, उनमȂ से लगभग 15 परसȂट ही री-इलेक्ट हुईं। इसका मतलब है िक 
85 per cent were first timers.  85 per cent वापस री-इलेक्ट होकर नहीं आईं। इसका मतलब 
है िक यह बड़ा टेÇपरेरी वन-शॉट वंडर जैसा होता गया है। यह िरपीट नहीं हो रहा ह
ै, िसफर् 15 
परसȂट लीडरिशप िरपीट हो रही है। इसका मतलब है िक इसको समझने की और deliberate 
करने की जरूरत  है िक ऐसा क्या करȂ िक वूमेन लीडरिशप को जब तक persistently और 
consistently आगे नहीं रखȂगे, तब तक लीडरिशप डेवलप होने की संभावना नहीं रहेगी और यह 
पॉिलिटकल पाटीर् की एक ट
ू ल बनकर रह जाएगी।  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
33

एक और बात proxy leadership की है। जैसा िक उपसभापित महोदय Îवंय कह रहे थे 
िक Ģधानपित की और सरपंचपित की बहुत बातȂ चलती हȅ। मȅ भी गांव से आता हूं।  
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI PHANGNON S. KONYAK): Hon. Member, 
you have one minute to conclude.  
 
SHRI SANDEEP KUMAR PATHAK: I am concluding, Madam. Ģधानपित की और 
सरपंचपित की बातȂ सामने िनकलकर आती हȅ। यह भी संभव है िक कई बार अगर आप वूमेन सीट 
िरज़वर् करते हो, तो
 बड़े-बड़े लीडसर् अपने िरÌतेदारȗ को वहां पर खड़ा कर देते हȅ। इसके  बारे मȂ 
सोचना पड़ेगा िक ऐसा क्या करȂ िक Ģॉक्सी लीडसर् तैयार न हȗ और सचमुच मȂ असली लीडसर् 
तैयार हȗ। 
 मध्य Ģदेश की एक ऐसी घटना थी – मध्य Ģदेश मȂ तो ये जो सरपंचपित और Ģधानपित 
हȅ, उन्हȗने अपनी पत्नी क े िबहाफ पर ऑिफिशयल तरीके  से ओथ ल
े ली। इन सारी चीज़ȗ को िरËयू 
करना पड़ेगा। अंत मȂ, म
ȅ देश को यह बताना चाहता हूं िक आज नÇबर है और सारी पॉिलिटकल 
पाटीर्ज़ तैयार हȅ, अगर आपकी नीयत है, तो इसे आज पािरत करते हȅ और इसी चुनाव से 
मिहलाओं को 33 Ģितशत िरज़वȃशन देते हȅ। अगर न
ीयत नहीं है, तो जुमला बेचना बंद करो। अमृत 
काल की संभावनाओं को जुमले मȂ मत बदलो। आपका बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद।  
 
THE VICE- CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI PHANGNON S. KONYAK): Thank you. Now, 
Shrimati Mamata Mohanta. 
 
SHRIMATI MAMATA MOHANTA (Odisha): 
"Thank you, Madam, for allowing me to 
express my views on the historic Women’s Reservation Bill. Equal rights have been 
given in all spheres of society except th e political one. Through this Women’s 
Reservation Bill, this would be made possible. On my be half and on behalf of my 
party, Biju Janata Dal, I fully support this Bill. 
Since times immemorial, Odisha has been giving rightful place and due respect 
to women. The great son of the soil and the then Chief Minister of Odisha, Shri Biju 
Patnaik had played a vital role, and had ta ken a unique step in upholding the respect 
of women. During that period, a tribal wo man organiser, Sumani Jhodia of Rayagada 
district was conferred with the power of an  SP. This authority was conferred on her 
for fighting against the menace  of bootlegging liquor. More over, Biju Babu also made 
her an advisor.  By providing 33% reservation in the Panchayati Raj elections in the 
year 1992, he gave due respect to women.  He knew that an empowered and self-
reliant woman contributes to the progress of  a country, state and village. After him, 
                                                            
 English translation of the original speech delivered in Odia. 
34
[RAJYA SABHA]

his able son and my leader, Hon. Chief Mi nister Shri Naveen Patnaik provided for 
50% reservation for women in the Panchayat and municipal elections in the year 
2012. In the 2019 general election, the Biju Janata Dal had provided  33% reservation 
and had given 7 tickets to women for the Lok Sabha elections. 41% of elected MPs in 
the Lok Sabha from Odisha are women. Sh rimati Pramila Biso yi, who has been a 
representative of  Mission Shakti, as well as  Ms Chandrani Murmu have had the 
opportunity of representing the state of Od isha as the senior most and the youngest 
MPs respectively. Starting from Odisha’s  Mayurbhanj district to Malkangiri and from 
Kalahandi district to Kendrapada, 50% of  women are represented in Panchayat, 
Block, Zilla Parishad and urban local bodies. Through Mission Shakti, around 70 Lakh 
women of Odisha are getting economically  empowered and self-reliant. The hon. 
Chief Minister has empowered the tribal women of Odisha in the socio-economic and 
political arena. In the field of women’s empowerment, he has set an example in our 
country. In the year 2018, a delegation from  Odisha requested central political parties 
and 22 regional parties to bring the Women’ s Reservation Bill. It had been a long-
standing demand of Biju Janta Dal. Without the empowerment of women, the 
development of the state, the nation and so ciety is not possible. The long-cherished 
demand of Biju Janata Dal is going to be fulfilled today. I herewith fully support this 
Bill. Thank You. Bande Utkala Janani." 
 
1.00 P.M. 
 
DR. K. KESHAVA RAO (Telangana): Mada m, I stand very firmly, lest it is 
misinterpreted or misquoted by our opponents in the State, for reservation to women. 
This has been our article of faith. We ha ve been fighting for it. We have been 
campaigning for it. Our leader, the Chief Minister, K.C.R., was in forefront in this 
movement since the day, we got our State. S o ,  t h a t  s h o u l d  b e  m y  f i r s t  a s s e r t i o n .  
Later, I will talk about developments and other things.   
Madam, the women's movement and mo vement for their reservation has a 
chequered history. In 1920s, in London, we  had movement for women franchise. In 
1917, Sarojini Naidu went to the Chelmsford Committee and asked for franchise.   
 
(MR. CHAIRMAN in the Chair.) 
 
So, we have gone through many things, and this particular movement for the 
reservation or the say for the voice of wome n people in the legislature is an old one 
and a very noble one.  Sir, let me star t my speech by quoting Dr. Ambedkar, who 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
35

said, "No country can go forward which leav es the women behind." These were his 
golden words in the Parliament. At the sa me time, the same Constituent Assembly 
had some reservations over giving reservatio n to women in the legislature. Therefore, 
I say, since you have brought such a historical  Bill, of which all of  us are privileged to 
be a part, I am tempted to quote the fa mous words of Victor Hugo who said, "No 
force on earth can stop an idea whose time has come." Having said that, I have my 
own dilemma. It is not called cynicism. My opponents may call it cynicism. But I have 
my own doubts whether the time had really come or not for the Bill; because the 
entire process that you are trying for hing es on few conditions, the conditions which 
we could have easily overcome. But yet, as the hon. Member, Mr. Nadda, said that 
we have to go through some kind of legal process and constitutional process. I think 
m o s t  o f  u s  s i t t i n g  h e r e  k n o w  t h e  s a m e  l e g a l  p r o c e s s .  W e  k n o w  t h e  l a w ;  w e  k n o w  
everything. Article in Constitution coul d be tackled without looking into other 
Constitution clauses and any other thing at all. You can do anything that you intend to 
do, when there is a consensus here, what is it that we are asking for? They have put 
two conditions. One is regarding the census, after the Bill is passed. I am trying to 
give you an alternative in th is case. You could have accepted the 2011 census as the 
benchmark. It is as simple as that. This  House could have accepted the 2011 census, 
as we have accepted 2001 census in ma ny cases. And immediately, that is, 
tomorrow, you could have appointed so me kind of a Delimitation Commission. 
Delimitation Commission is necessary, I agree. I totally agree with Nadda ji or what 
the Home Minister said in the other House yesterday. Delimitation Commission is 
necessary because we don’t want to do th ings on our own, which will perhaps be 
mistaken or deemed as discrimination. That is it. I agree that you can't take away 
Hyderabad from Owaisi and pu t somebody else. I totally understand. You need not 
give such examples. But please understand one thing. I say that once you accept 
2011 census as the benchmark, then you can go and tomorrow appoint... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Dr. Keshava, please say it through me.   
 
DR. K. KESHAVA RAO: I am trying to tell you because tomorrow I may be subject to 
their criticism, not yours. You would never criticize me.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Members, I have to speak to the House. Please speak while 
looking at the Chair. I will try to improve my face and facial expression. I will make it 
very pleasant. But please have it only through the Chair.   
 
36
[RAJYA SABHA]

DR. K. KESHAVA RAO: You would be giving us the impression that we are attractive 
enough.   
 So, Sir, the thing is, the moment we have this kind of a census fixed and 
delimitation done tomorrow, there will be no need for much time to be taken. You are 
saying that we will have to look into this, there is a legal problem and all that. Don’t tell 
us all that. That is only trying to avoid th ings. The Bill seeks reserving one-third of the 
seats for women in Lok Sabha and State Legi slatures. But, as I said, there are some 
conditions which could have been overcome . Again, there is a second point about 
census. I am not opposing census because of the legalities that you were talking 
about.  We say, census means there is a disadvantage to certain States, including 
Telangana, where population is usually less because we respect family planning. 
Now, once that happens, in the census, our figures will be lower than others and we 
stand to lose. This has to be answered. When you sit in the Cabinet meeting, please 
look into the problem because you are trying  to do this for the entire country. So, I 
want you to look into this also. Another set of words that you have used in the Bill is, 
'census effective after commencement of the Bill.' What I am asking you is to accept 
the 2011 census as benchmark. That will not be  there. The Bill makes it sure that the 
census is effective only after the co mmencement of the Bill is taken up. ( Time-bell 
rings.) It says that the first census after the B ill is passed. It has been done after 12 
years as far as the last experience is concerned. Even after such a census, 
Delimitation Commission will sit to decide  reservation of seats. We have the 
experience of Delhi where they took one year. We have the ex perience of the last 
delimitation also where they took two year s. Of course, this is a constitutional 
compulsion. I agree. There has to be De limitation Commission, as I have already 
said. Thus, publication of the Bill will take place first, then census, then Delimitation 
Commission, then people's opinion. When I work it out, I don’t want to give the 
details but it works out to be completed by 2030, not 2029. That means, you are 
missing the 2024 elections; you are missing the next 2029 elections, as far as this Bill 
is concerned. That is why I said why we should accept the 2011 census as the 
benchmark. Then comes this Delimitation Commission. ( Time-bell rings.) Is my time 
over, Sir?   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Your time is over. You just wind it up.   
 
DR. K. KESHAVA RAO: Sir, this Delimitation Commission has to be appointed, not by 
the Government. It is to be appointed by  the CEC, under the guidance of the CEC, 
but, for God sake, not under the proposed, politically-motivated CEC Bill. Let there 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
37

be a CEC which is honest, whic h is truthful, which we all of us accept in true sense. 
So, I had my doubts. Yesterda y, I had a half-an- hour discussion with the Leader of 
the House, Mr. Piyush Goyal.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Thank you.   
 
DR. K. KESHAVA RAO: I asked him whether th ey were really true to themselves on 
this Bill. He said, "Yes, we are truthful." That  is why I have said that I will join you. 
We are supporting it. But let us all be truthful.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Thank you, Dr. Keshava Rao.   
 
DR. K. KESHAVA RAO: Alright, Sir. I will leave the other issues to my other speaker 
who is speaking on the subject, because it has a big history. It has to be discussed. 
Whatever is the history, you have today brought it. So, we are thankful to you. We are 
supporting it. At the same time, please don’t deal it as a political  thing. There is a 
political competition here as to who should take the credit. Whoever takes the credit, 
let the women and this nation get this kind of a historical Bill. Thank you very much. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN:  Now, Shri H.D. Devegowda.   
 
SHRI H.D. DEVEGOWDA (Karnataka): Sir, I will send to the Secretary-General what 
I have written to the hon. Prime Minister on April 10, 2023. If you permit, I will read the 
entire letter. From the point of preserving  the time, I don’t know whether your good 
self is going to permit me to read. Otherwis e, I will place the enti re letter on the Table 
of the House. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Place it on the Table of the House. 
 
SHRI H.D. DEVEGOWDA: If you permit, Sir, I will place it on the Table of the House.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Yes. 
 
SHRI H.D. DEVEGOWDA: The Prime Minister  has endorsed the letter which I had 
written to the Prime Minister on April 10, 2023. I brought the Women's Reservation Bill 
when I was the Chief Minister of Karnataka. It was passed in the Karnataka Legislative 
Assembly and the same was introduced in the Parliament when I became the Prime 
38
[RAJYA SABHA]

Minister.  Former Cabinet Secretary, Mr. T.S.R. Subramanian, was there. He had 
written all the details. Sir, I don't want to  quote all the things. It contains all the 
material. If you permit, Sir, I will place it on the Table of the House. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Yes, it is permitted. This may be placed on the Table of the House. 
 
SHRI H.D. DEVEGOWDA: Thank you very much, Sir. I am grateful to you. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Well, hon. Members, the rele vance of this House is reflected when 
our former Prime Minister is present here. That, of course, indicates that the House of 
Elders has to show light to others.   
 Shri V. Vijayasai Reddy. Your Party's total time is 17 minutes and you have 
three speakers. How many minutes will you take?   
 
SHRI V. VIJAYASAI REDDY (Andhra Pradesh): Sir, one-third. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Okay! Five minutes. 
 
SHRI V. VIJAYASAI REDDY: Sir, just like the Women's Reservation Bill. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: As leader, leave six minutes each to other speakers. Your time 
starts now. 
 
SHRI V. VIJAYASAI REDDY: Sir, at th e outset, I would like to state that 
...(Interruptions)... Don't disturb me, Madam.  ...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: You said, 'Don't disturb.'  You are not liable to disturbance. All I 
plead is, don't create disturbance.   
 
SHRI V. VIJAYASAI REDDY: Sir, what to say and how to say is my prerogative, 
subject to the rules and regulations. 
 At the outset, I would like to state th at my Party, YSR Congress Party, under 
the leadership of Y.S. Jagan Mohan Re ddy garu, extends its unequivocal and 
unwavering support for the Women's Reservation Bill.   
 
[THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (MS. SAROJ PANDEY) in the Chair.] 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
39

 The hon. Minister of Law is present here . I request the hon. Minister of Law to 
extend the reservation for women even in  the Rajya Sabha and also in the State 
Legislative Councils. This can be done, because every two years, there will be 
retirements and vacancies in the Rajya Sabh a and also the State Legislative Councils. 
In a period of six years, this law can be complied with. In this regard, Article 80 and 
Article 171 of the Constitution may also be  amended to provide reservation for women 
in one-third seats in the Rajya Sabha and also the State Legislative Councils.   
 Hon. Law Minister, please take note of this. Now that you are providing 
reservation, that is, today on 21 st September 2023 and this month marks a 
monumental time for women's political empowe rment in India, I strongly suggest and 
request the hon. Minister of Law that the Government may declare September as 
Women's History Month. Just like the Intern ational Women's Day, this month can be 
declared as Women's History Month.   
 Coming to the performance of Andh ra Pradesh, the Constitution (73
rd and 74th 
Amendment) of 1992 mandate the reservation of one-third of the seats for women in 
panchayats and municipalities. In Andhra  Pradesh, under the leadership of our 
beloved Chief Minister Y.S. Jagan Moha n Reddy garu, the State has exceeded the 
limit. It is not just one-third; he has ev en exceeded the limit and then provided 
reservation for women.  I am divulging the details now. Out of 1,356 politically 
nominated persons, 688 politically nominate d persons in the local bodies are women 
which is 51 per cent. Out of 13, seven Zilla  Parishad Chairpersons are women, which 
is 54 per cent. Out of 26, 15 Vice-Chairper sons are women, which is 58 per cent. Out 
of 36, 18 Mayors and Deputy Mayors are women, which is 50 per cent. Out of 671, 
361 corporation ward members are women, which is 53.8 per cent. Out of 73, 45 
Municipality Chairpersons are women, which is 62 per cent. Out of 2,124 municipality 
ward members, 1,061 municipality ward me mbers are women, which is 50 per cent. 
Madam, 57 per cent of the sarpanches, 54  per cent of the MPTC members, 53 per 
cent of the Mandal Presidents and 53 per cent of ZPTC member s are women; 53 per 
cent of the ward and village volunteers and 51  per cent of the officers in ward and 
village secretariats are women.   
 Our Leader, Shri Y.S. Jagan Mohan Reddy garu, has alr eady crossed 33 per 
cent. In fact, nothing is less than 50 per cent. Therefore, our contention is that 
women's reservation could be even more than one-third.  It could be even 50 per 
cent. 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (सुǛी सरोज पाण्डेय): क ृपया कन्क्लूड किरए। 
 
40
[RAJYA SABHA]

SHRI V. VIJAYASAI REDDY: Madam, you need not remind me. At exactly one-third 
of the time, which is five minutes, I will end it. If you disturb me, I will lose the 
sequence.      
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( सुǛी सरोज पाण्डेय): समय समाÃत हो रहा है, इसिलए आपको ध्यान िदलाना 
पड़ता है।  
 
SHRI V. VIJAYASAI REDDY: Thank you very much, Madam. 
 
Ģो. मनोज क ुमार झा (िबहार): शुिकर्या, मैडम, और आपके  आसन पर होने क े िलए भी शु िकर्या। मȅ 
आपके  माध्यम से यही कहना चाहूंगा िक संसदीय लोकतंतर् क े इितहास मȂ कभी-कभी ही ऐसे क्षण 
आते हȅ, जब उǄर देना मुिÌकल हो जाता है, जब मीिडया क े लोग बाहर हमसे Ayes and Noes 
क े बारे म
Ȃ पूछते हȅ।  
माननीय उपसभाध्यक्षा महोदया, यह मसला Yes or No का नहीं है, यह मसला हमारे देश 
की तारीख़ से ज
ुड़ा हुआ है। यह मसला इस बात से जुड़ा हुआ है, जो Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने अभी बीते 
िदनȗ सȂटर्ल हॉल मȂ कही थी िक क ैन्वस बड़ा होगा, आकृ ित बड़ी होगी। महोदया, क ैन्वस तो बड़ा 
है, लेिकन आकृ ित छोटी गढ़ी जा रही ह
ै। इितहास इस बात को Îमरण करेगा, यह मȅ आपके  
माध्यम से कहना चाहता हूं।  
अब ' नारी शिƪ वंदन िवधेयक', मेरी तो समझ मȂ नहीं आया िक यह लेिजÎलेशन है या 
िकसी तरह क े धािर्मक गर्ंथ का शीषर्क है? जब देश मȂ बीजेपी की सरकार नहीं थी, मȅ तब से, 
बचपन से पढ़ता आया हूं,  
'यतर् नायर्Îतु पूज्यंते रमंते ततर् देवता' 
 
पता नहीं देवता रमण करते हȅ िक नहीं करते, लेिकन हमने इस Ìलोक क े बावजूद भारत
 मȂ 
मिहलाओं का मोलेÎटेशन देखा है, घरेलू िंहसा देखी है। सबसे ज्यादा रेप पिरवार नाम की संÎथा 
मȂ ही देखे हȅ, िजसके  आंकड़े खुद सरकार देती है। इन सबको देख कर मुझे लगता है िक हमारे 
देश
 का यह जो िवरोधाभासी चिरतर् है, इस िवरोधाभासी चिरतर् पर भी बात होनी चािहए।  
आज यहां पर काफी सारी मिहलाएं ह ȅ, इस दशर्कदीघार् मȂ मिहला पतर्कार भी बैठी हȅ, 
उनको भी मȅ यह कहना चाहता हूं िक हमारे क ु छ सरोकार हȅ। इस देश मȂ ऐसा नहीं चल सकता िक 
एक तरफ यह Ìलोक पढ़ा जाए और दूसरी तरफ हम उस ज़बान को छोड़ दȂ, जो स ंिवधान से 
आती है। मैडम, संिवधान राइट्स की बात करता है, अिधकारȗ की बात करता है। हमारी वोके Åलरी 
को क्या होता जा रहा है? अिधकार दया की Ǜेणी मȂ नहीं आएगा, लेिकन मȅ पूरा का पूरा जो 
टेक्सचर देखता हूं, उसमȂ दया की Ǜेणी म
Ȃ ही बात होती है। अिधकारȗ की बात कभी दया से नहीं 
होगी। 
 माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, as per the Delimitation Commission, 2008, हमारे 
पास 412 जनरल सीट्स हȅ, 84 एससीज़ की सीट्स हȅ और 47 एसटीज़ की सीट्स हȅ। अब हम इस 
िबल क े माध्यम से क्या कर रहे हȅ -  84 और 47 क े अन्दर वन-थडर् कर रहे हȅ। क्या यह अन्याय 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
41

नहीं है? इसे existing seats मȂ नहीं िकया जाए। यह जो 33 परसȂट आ रहा है, िजसका आंकड़ा 
अभी क े िहसाब से 136 सीट्स बैठता है, उनमȂ SC, ST और OBC की  ËयवÎथा हो। मȅ आपके  
माध्यम से कहना चाहता हूँ िक हर मिहला को बहुत मुिÌकल से आगे बढ़ना पड़ता है। यह आप भी 
जानती हȅ। खास कर िपछड़े वगș की मिहलाओं, अनुसूिचत जाित-जनजाित की मिहलाओं का 
deprivation और vulnerability बािकयȗ से ज्यादा होती ह
ै, उनका hand-holding करने क े िलए 
कोई नहीं होता है। अगर आप पहुँचीं, तो िबना hand-holding क े, लेिकन उन िपछड़ी जाितयȗ की 
मिहलाओं का क्या, िजनके  hand-holding क े िलए न तो हमारे धमर्गर्
ंथȗ मȂ कोई ËयवÎथा है और न 
आज की समकालीन बातचीत मȂ ही कोई ËयवÎथा है, हम rhetorically क ु छ भी कह दȂ - मेरा 
आपके  माध्यम से िसफर् यह कहना है। आज मȅ अपनी पाटीर् क े राÍटर्ीय अध्यक्ष लालू Ģसाद यादव 
जी का Îमरण कर रहा हूँ। हमारी भगवती देवी जी को कई लोग जानते हȗगे। वह एक पत्थर तोड़ने 
वाली मिहला थीं।  'हम न सहबो गाली भइया, हम न सहबो गाली।'  वे गया स
े िनकल कर संसद 
तक पहुँचीं। क्या उसके  बाद भगवती देवी आ पाईं, फ ूलन देवी आ पाईं? हम आपको दोष नहीं द
ेते 
हȅ। वे इसिलए नहीं आ पाईं, क्यȗिक हमारी ËयवÎथाएँ संवेदनशून्य हȅ। मȅ तो तमाम सािथयȗ से 
आगर्ह करू ँगा िक चाहे आप िकसी भी दल मȂ हȗ, आज आप एक बार उससे बाहर िनकल कर 
सोिचए। यह ऐितहािसक क्षण सचमुच ऐितहािसक होगा, अगर हमने आज इितहास को Ëयापक 
क ैनवस पर देखा, जो Ģधान मंतर्ी जी कहते हȅ। Ģधान म
ंतर्ी जी की कथनी और करनी मȂ फासला 
नहीं होना चािहए। यह फासला इसिलए नहीं होना चा
िहए, क्यȗिक बड़े दूर फासले पर अत्यन्त 
िपछड़ी जाितयȗ क े लोग खड़े हȅ। मैडम, अगर आपके  माध्यम से मेरी बात पहुँच रही हो, तो आज मȅ 
तमाम सािथयȗ से आगर्ह करू ँगा िक दलीय िËहप की िचन्ता
 मत किरए। दलीय िËहप समाज की 
ËयवÎथा पर भारी होना चािहए। इसिलए मȅने कहा, समथर्न या िवरोध की बात नहीं है, आज भी 
मौका है, इसको सेलेक्ट कमेटी मȂ भेज कर इसमȂ SC, ST और  OBCs को incorporate िकया 
जाए। अगर आज हम-आप ऐसा नहीं करȂगे, तो हम ऐितहािसक गुनाहगार हȗगे। मȅ यकीन क े साथ 
कहता हूँ िक बाहर लोग
 वॉच कर रहे हȅ। वे पूछȂगे िक तुमने क्या िकया? यह ËयवÎथा ऐसे नहीं 
बदली जाती है। तो म
ȅ आपके  माध्यम से यह आगर्ह करू ँगा िक आप जब अपने दायरȗ से अलग 
होकर OBCs की बात करते हȅ, तो यह rhetoric से आगे बढ़ना चािहए, हमारी िचन्ताओं मȂ आना 
चािहए।  यह नहीं होगा िक बाबा साहेब भीमराव अÇबेडकर को माला भी पहनाएँ और उनकी बात 
को आत्मसाÞ नहीं करȂ। यह जो फकर् हमारे Ëयवहार मȂ आ रहा है, इससे कई तरह क े िव
रोधाभासȗ 
का जन्म हो रहा है।   
मैडम चेयरपरसन, मȅ आपको कहता हूँ िक जब हम quota within quota की बात करते 
हȅ, उसमȂ एक term आता है, जो िक एक अमेिरकन civil rights activist ने 1989 मȂ िदया था - 
'inter-secti
onality.'  चूँिक मȅ िहन्दी मȂ बोल रहा हूँ, तो मȅने आज सुबह इसका अनुवाद बहुत 
ढ ूँढ़ा। उसके  अनुवादȗ मȂ से एक अनुवाद आया - 'Ģितच्छेदन।'  तो 'inter-sectionality' का मतलब 
यह होता
 है िक हर layer की एजȂसीज़ और उसके  अंदर की क्या िवधाएँ हȅ, उनके  आधार पर हमȂ 
अपने चिरतर् क े affirmative action programme को देखना होगा।  
  
[उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती रजनी अशोकराव पािटल)पीठासीन हुईं। ] 
 
42
[RAJYA SABHA]

खास कर क े जो वंिचत समाज की मिहलाएँ हȅ, मȅ उनके  बारे मȂ कहूँ, तो आपको एक बार  अपना 
नज़िरया साफ करना होगा। अगर सरकार चÌमा लगाती है - धूप का चÌमा नहीं - अगर सचमुच 
का चÌमा लगाती है, तो उसकी पावर बदिलए, उसको साफ किरए और यह तय किरए िक आज 
जब हम यहाँ से उठȂ, तो
 ओबीसी वगर् को एक किमटमȂट दȂ। मȅ यह बार-बार दोहरा रहा हूँ िक 33 
परसȂट को existing मȂ मत incorporate कीिजए। It should be separate. नयी  ËयवÎथा मȂ नया 
33 per cent without touching SCs and STs. अगर ऐसा करȂगे, तो यह कर्ांितकारी कदम 
होगा।  अकसर हम लोग
 अपने िĢिवलेजेज़ को नहीं देखते हȅ। मेरा सरनेम एक िĢिवलेज है, नीरज 
भाई का सरनेम एक िĢिवलेज है। हमारे सरनेÇस ने हमȂ िĢिवलेजज़ िदए हȅ। आप उन सरनेÇस को 
देिखए, िजनके  पास यह िĢिवलेज नहीं है। ...(Ëयवधान)... नह
ीं, ऐसे ही। ...(Ëयवधान)... बहुत 
अच्छा िकया। मैडम चेयरपरसन, मȅ यह कहना चाह रहा हूँ िक िĢिवलेज का जो Ëयाकरण है, वह 
खत्म ही नहीं हो रहा है। मȅने पहले भी सदन मȂ कहा था िक इस देश मȂ शायद there is nothing in 
the name but everything is there in the surname. उनका स
ंघषर्, उनका जीवन लगातार 
किठन होता जाता है। मȅ एक ऐितहािसक तथ्य बताता हूँ। 1931 मȂ बेगम शहनवाज़ और सरोिजनी 
नायडु ने संिवधान बनने से बहुत पूवर् equal representation की बात की थी। हम 33 परसȂट पर ही 
क्यȗ अटके  पड़े हȅ? मेरी तो समझ मȂ नहीं आ रहा है िक 33 क े साथ हमारा क्या िरÌता है, यह 50 
क्यȗ नहीं हो सकता, यह 55 क्यȗ नहीं हो सकता?  आपका पूरे का पूरा वगर्-चिरतर् बदल जाएगा।  
क्या आप नहीं चाहते हȅ िक भगवितया देवी यहाँ आये?  हमेशा एक खास सरनेम - मȅ तो बार-बार 
कह रहा हूँ िक अलग-अलग दलȗ म
Ȃ भी जो हȅ, अगर वे यहाँ तक अपने संघषर् से पहुँचे हȅ, तो आज 
यह आवÌयकता है िक उनको यह भरोसा िदलाया जाए िक ऐसी कोई चीज़ आगे नहीं होगी, यह 
सबके  िलए ख
ुलेगा। हमारी यह जो नयी पािर्लयामȂट है, यह रंगीन ज्यादा होगी।  इंदर्धनुष मȂ कई 
रंग होते हȅ, हम यह कौन सा िबल ला रहे हȅ, िजसमȂ black and white क े बाद shades of g
rey 
भी नहीं है! अगर हमारा उǈेÌय deepening of democracy है, तो हमȂ उस िदशा मȂ कदम बढ़ाने 
हȗगे।  मȅने पहले भी कहा था िक 2010 मȂ हमारा representation देिखए।  उसमȂ हमने SC, ST, 
OBCs and minorities की बात की थी।  हम यह इसिलए नहीं कर रहे हȅ।  हम चाहते हȅ िक वगर्-
चिरतर् बदले, संसद सचमुच मȂ Ģितिनिधत्व की संÎथा बने, िजसमȂ सबके  आकार हȗ, सबकी शक्लȂ 
हȗ।  ऐसा नहीं हो िक उस पर हमेशा एक वगर् क
े  Ģभुत्व की छाप रहे। 
मैडम च
ेयरपरसन, अब मȅ आपका अटȂशन चाहता हूँ।  मȅ जाितगत जनगणना की बात 
कहता हूँ।  इस देश मȂ कल शाम क े बाद, लोक सभा मȂ जो िबल पास हुआ, उससे ज्यादा इस बात 
की चचार् हो रही है िक OBCs क े साथ नाइंसाफी हुई है, इस बात की चचार् हो रही है िक जाितगत 
जनगणना को क्यȗ Åलॉक िकया जा रहा ह
ै?  मȅ यह कह रहा हूँ िक हमारे सीएम नीतीश जी और 
िडÃटी सीएम तेजÎवी जी ने जाितगत सवȃक्षण कराया।  28 अगÎत को - मेरे पास दोनȗ affidavits 
हȅ,  
पहला affidavit कौन लेकर गया - सरकार लेकर गयी।  सॉिलिसटर जनरल तुषार मेहता खड़े 
होते हȅ और यह कहते हȅ िक "State Government cannot do  any activity like census or 
activity akin to census",  ले िकन जब शाम तक uproar होता है, तो दूसरा affidavit आता है, 
जो कहता
 है िक गलती से वह पैरागर्ाफ लग गया था।  सरकारȂ ऐसी गलितयाँ नहीं करती हȅ।  यह 
मानस करवाता है, यह prejudice माइंड करवाता है।   
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
43

मैडम चेयरपरसन, मȅ अब ज्यादा समय नहीं लूँगा।  मȅने कई संशोधन िदए हȅ।  उन 
संशोधनȗ पर भी सरकार िवचार करे।  मȅ हाथ जोड़ कर कहता हूँ िक आपका क ु छ भी नहीं 
िबगड़ेगा,   आपको िवशाल ǭदय रखना चािहए।  आप ही क े एक बड़े नेता कह गये थे िक छोटे मन 
से कोई बड़ा नहीं होता,  क ैनवस पर बड़ी लकीर खींिचए।  मȅ आिखर मȂ एक बात कह कर अपनी 
बात खत्म करू ँगा िक "गले िमल कर गला दबाने की कोिशश न हो.." ...(समय की घंटी)... 
मैडम चेयरपरसन, एक
 िमनट। मȅ एक किवता लेकर आया था िक " गले िमल कर गला न 
दबाइए।" यह किवता पढ़कर मȅ अपनी बात खत्म करू ँगा और जय िहन्द बोल दूँगा।  यह किवता 
ओम Ģकाश बाÊमीिक जी की है।  इसमȂ जो Ģतीक है, वह िकसी जाित-िवशेष क े िलए नहीं ह ै, 
क्यȗिक हम सबके  अन्दर एक ठाकु र है, जो न्यायालयȗ मȂ बैठा हुआ है, िवÌविवǏालयȗ मȂ बैठा हुआ 
है, संसद की दहलीज को वह चेक करता है।   वह किवता क ु छ यूँ है िक : 
 
"चूÊहा िमƺी का, िमƺी तालाब की, तालाब ठाकु र का। 
भूख रोटी की, रोटी बाजरे की, बाजरा खेत का, खेत ठाकु र का। 
बैल ठाकु र का, हल ठाकु र का, हल की मूठ पर हथेली अपनी, 
फ़सल ठाकु र की। 
क
ु आँ ठाकु र का, पानी ठाकु र का, खेत-खिलहान ठाकु र क े, 
गली-मुहƥे ठाकु र क े, िफर अपना क्या?  गाँव? शहर? देश? " 
 
 मȅ िफर से क्लैिरफाई करता हूँ िक वह ठाकु र मȅ भी हूँ। ...(समय की घंटी)... वह ठाकु र 
संसद मȂ ह
ै, वह ठाकु र िवÌविवǏालयȗ मȂ है, वह ठाकु र िवधाियका को क ंटर्ोल करता है। इस 
ठाकु र को मारो, जो हमारे अन्दर है। जय िहन्द, मैडम।  
  
SHRI ELAMARAM KAREEM (Kerala) : Madam, I support this Bill. 
....(Interruptions)...  What is this? ....(Interruptions)...  Rupalaji, let me speak. 
....(Interruptions)... On behalf of CPI (M), I support this Bill. The hon. Prime
 
Minister said that he was the chosen on e for empowering and strengthening women. 
Nothing! This is a compulsion on the ruling party because they are afraid of the next 
Parliament election. Even after the propaganda * they lost Karnataka. They have lost 
Himachal Pradesh. After fifteen years of  continuous rule in Delhi Municipal 
Corporation, they lost. That situation compe lled the BJP to bring su ch a legislation in 
the Parliament. This is not for Nari Shak ti Vandan. In 2010, the UPA Government 
introduced the Bill in the Ra jya Sabha and it was passed. I remember, Shrimati Sonia 
Gandhi, my Party leader, Shrimati Brin da Karat and other women leaders were 
supporting and insisting on passing that Bill in  the Rajya Sabha. In an article, Shrimati 
Brinda Karat remembers that moment. She said and I quote:  "The unequivocal 
                                                            
* Expunged as ordered by the Chair.  
 
44
[RAJYA SABHA]

support of the then UPA Chairperson Soni a Gandhi for the Bill ensured that the 
various plans being hatched to once again sa botage the Bill were blocked."  The firm 
position taken by the Rajya Sabha Chairman, Shri Hamid Ansari, was a critical factor 
in the passage of the Bill. This happened because of the strong and united struggle 
by women's organizations since decades. But, unfortunately, that Bill was not passed 
in the Lok Sabha. In 2014 Parliament elections, the BJP promised that they shall bring 
the reservation bill but nothing was done for five years. In 2019, they repeated that 
promise.  Four years have lapsed. You are responsible for losing nine years of 
reservation for women. You have  to reply for that. Now, you are claiming Nari Shakti 
Vandan! Which 'nari'? Is it Manipur 'nari' ? Poor women folk we re paraded naked on 
the road, gang raped an d butchered mercilessly * What nari vandan? The wrestling 
stars were assaulted by the chairman of that committee. Victims of Unnao and Kathua 
were also ladies. What have you done? So, th is is not for Nari Shakti Vandan, this is 
for political achievement only. When is it to be implemented? When would the women 
get these rights? It is fa r away, after the Census. When will the Census happen? 
Based on the new Census, deli mitation is to happen. When  will it happen? It is not 
coming in next ten or fifteen years. They only want to win the next elections. All the 
election promises have gone to air. The en tire sections of the people, farmers, 
workers, youth, all are angry with this Government. Women are working in several 
sectors. What is their condition?  Particularly, agricultural workers, unorganized 
sector workers, scheme workers -- there are lakhs of scheme workers like MNREGA 
workers -- what wages are they getting?  Th ere is no social benefit for them. On the 
basis of privatization in public sector, in  railways and public sector undertakings, 
social justice has gone to air. Where is the reservation? Is there reservation in private 
sector? There is only reservation for SC, ST and OBC section which they are getting 
in the public sector undertakings only. Wh at are you doing there? All have gone to 
private hands. That is your policy.   
 
[THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR. FAUZIA KHAN) in the Chair.] 
 
So, you are speaking about Nari Shakti Vandan. This is not for Nari Shakti Vandan. In 
West Bengal, in 1983, 33 per cent reservat ion was given to women in local bodies. 
That was first time in the history of this nation. In Kerala, 50 per cent reservation is 
given to women in all panc hayats, block panchayats, district panchayats and 
corporations, everywhere. The actual num ber may be more than 50 per cent. In 
                                                            
* Expunged as ordered by the Chair.  
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
45

general seats also, so many women are contes ting. That is the history. What is the 
history of other States ruled by the BJP? Can you claim like that? We must bring the 
attention of this House to the BJP's policie s adopted during these nine years. Female 
labour force participation rate has gone up to 20-25 per cent In India.   
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR. FAUZIA KHAN): Kindly conclude.   
 
SHRI ELAMARAM KAREEM: India is far backward in comparison to other nations and 
backward nations also. In all aspects, ou r females are backward . They are silently 
witnessing that. They are silent spectators of all these events. They are not taking 
care of the welfare of the women and they are suppressed section. 'Sabka Saath 
Sabka Vikas' is the slogan.  Is there a single ma n from the largest minority section of 
the country in the Cabinet? Sabka Saath? Where is 'Sabka Saath Sabka Vikas'?  
....(Interruptions)...  That is the attitude of the BJP.  Nobody is there. There was one 
Mr. Naqvi. He was thrown out.  ....(Interruptions)...  That is your policy.  
....(Interruptions)... 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR. FAUZ IA KHAN): Kindly conclude. 
....(Interruptions)...   
 
SHRI ELAMARAM KAREEM: So, you please utter 'Sabka Saath Sabka Vikas'.    
 
THE VICE- CHAIRPERSON (DR. FAUZIA KHAN): Kindly conclude.   
 
SHRI ELAMARAM KAREEM: Okay, I conclude.   
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR. FAUZIA KHA N): Now, Shri Vaiko. You have four 
minutes.   
 
SHRI VAIKO (Tamil Nadu): Madam Vice Chairperso n, I rise to support this Bill. In the 
first decade of last century, women in England did not have voting rights. So, women 
fought against the Government to get voting rights. Emmeline Pankhurst was the 
chairperson of the women brigade. One da y she went to the London Head Post 
Office and said: "You have to send a parcel  to the Prime Minister's residence." They 
asked:  "What parcel?" She replied: "I am the parcel." They were perplexed and 
shocked. She further asked: "Is there any rule that a living person should not be sent 
as a parcel?"  Then what did they do? Th ey tied a badge along with her wrist and 
46
[RAJYA SABHA]

sent her to the Prime Minister's residence. The Prime Minister's secretariat was 
shocked. Prime Minister Mr. Asquith was very much shocked. He came and asked: 
"What for have you come to see me?" She said: "You have not given voting rights to 
the women." Then, finally, with these struggl es, they got the voting rights. Here, in 
Tamil Nadu, in 1921, when Justice Party formed the Government, they gave the voting 
rights. Then, in 1929, the greatest champion of social justice, Periyar E.V. 
Ramaswamy Naicker conducted the Self -Respect Movement Conference in 
Chengalpattu. He adopted a Resolution that  property rights should be given to 
women. After 60 years, when Dr. Kalaigna r Karunanidhi became the Chief Minister, 
he fulfilled the assurance given by the Champion Periyar and women were given 
property rights. We have had a brav e lady Kannagi who is known for her 
righteousness and bravery. The King of Ma durai committed injustice by killing her 
innocent husband Kovalan on the false charge  that he had stolen the ornament of 
Queen. But on knowing the tragedy, Kannagi curses the King and curses the Madurai 
city to fire. She is the global symbol of justice.   
Thillaiyadi Valliammai was a South African Tamil girl who worked with Mahatma 
Gandhi in her early years in South Africa fighting its apartheid regime, and observed 
fast.  When she was dying, Mahatma Gandhi  went to see her and she said,"If I am 
re-born, I will again join you to fight ag ainst the Whites." In  Tamil Nadu, Velu 
Natchiyar drew her sword against the powerful British Army and defeated them with 
the help of Tipu Sultan and Veerupakshi Gopal Naiyaker..... 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR.  FAUZIA KHAN): Vaiko ji, you will have to start 
concluding your speech, please.  
 
SHRI VAIKO: I will take only one minute. The Bill provides for the provision of 15 years 
initially but I should suggest that it shou ld be extended because it is too short a 
period.  Similarly, delimitation exercise for constituencies should be undertaken at the 
earliest so that these provisions can be implemented as soon as possible.  
 Madam, some hon. Members have demanded for reservation within 
reservation for women belonging to Dalit, OBC and Minorities. ( Time-bell rings. ) I 
would suggest that some provision should  be made for providing reservation to 
women belonging to these categories. 
 With these words, I whole-heartedly su pport this Constitution (Amendment) 
Bill. 
 
THE VICE- CHAIRPERSON (DR. FAUZIA KHAN): Now, Shri Ram Nath Thakur.   
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
47

Ǜी राम नाथ ठाकु र (िबहार): महोदया, मȅ अपनी बात समय पर खत्म करू ँगा। 
 
THE VICE- CHAIRPERSON (DR. FAUZIA KHAN): You have seven minutes to speak. 
 
Ǜी राम नाथ ठाकु र: महोदया, आज डा. राममनोहर लोिहया को याद करना बहुत जरूरी  हो गया 
है। 1967 मȂ डा. राममनोहर लोिहया ने भगवती देवी को संयुƪ सोशिलÎट पाटीर् क े उÇमीदवार क े 
रूप  मȂ एमएलए बनाने का काम िकया था और 1990 मȂ लालू Ģसाद जी ने उन्हȂ एमएलए और 1996 
मȂ एमपी बनाने का काम िकया था। म
ȅ डा. राममनोहर लोिहया क े Ģित Ǜǉांजिल अिर्पत करता हूँ 
िक मिहलाओं क े Ģित उनका इतना ददर् था। डा. लोिहया का नारा था " संसोपा ने बांधी गांठ, 
िपछड़Ȃ पावȂ सौ मȂ साठ"। अब मȅ 1977 पर आता हूँ। 1967 क े बाद 1977 मȂ जननायक कपूर्री ठाकु र 
जी ने काका कालेलकर िरपोटर् को लागू करने और वगीर्करण करने का काम िकया था। 8 परसȂट 
िपछड़े वगर् को, 12 परसȂट अत्यंत िपछड़े वगर् को और 33 परस Ȃट आरक्षण मिहलाओं को देने का 
काम िकया था।  
महोदया, हम लोग
 राज्य सभा मȂ कई बार यह बात उठा चुक े हȅ िक जातीय जनगणना 
होनी चािहए, लेिकन अभी तक नहीं हुई है। अभी भारतीय जनता पाटीर् क े राÍटर्ीय अध्यक्ष ने कहा 
िक हम इसे 2029 मȂ करȂगे। हम लोग बराबर यह माँग करते आ रहे हȅ, जनता दल (यू) की यह 
माँग है िक जातीय जनगणना होनी चािहए, लेिकन 2006 म
Ȃ िबहार क े मुख्य मंतर्ी, नीतीश क ुमार 
जी ने पंचायत क े मुिखया
 की 50 परस Ȃट सीट्स मिहलाओं को देने का काम िकया, िजला पिरषद 
क े उÇमीदवारȗ को देने का काम िकया। आज भारत मȂ िबहार अके ला ऐसा राज्य है, िजसमȂ हरेक 
िवभाग मȂ मिहलाओं को 35 परसȂट आरक्षण देने का काम िकया गया है। वहाँ क े प ुिलस िवभाग मȂ 
सबसे ज्यादा मिहलाएं ही भतीर् हुई हȅ। हम चाहते हȅ िक नीतीश क ुमार जी ने िबहार मȂ जो काम 
िकया है, भारत सरकार भी इसे उसी क े अनुरूप  लागू करे। यह क्यȗ नहीं करना चािहए? यह 
मजबूत पाटीर् है, बहुमत की पाटीर् है। 2016 म
Ȃ राितर् आठ बजे भारत क े Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने 
अनाउंसमȂट की िक 1,000 रूपय े क े नोट की बंदी हो जाएगी और 12 बज े क े बाद उसे कागज 
समझा जाएगा। उस समय उन्हȗने मिहलाओं क े िलए क्या िकया? आज तो
 वे गीत गा रहे हȅ, 
लेिकन उस समय क ु छ क्यȗ नहीं िकया गया? आप 2016 छोिड़ए, 2019 मȂ भी उन्हȂ जब अपार 
बहुमत िमला था, उस समय उन्हȗने मिहलाओं को आरक्षण क्यȗ नहीं िदया? महोदया, हम आपके  
माध्यम से सरकार से िनवेदन करना चाहते हȅ िक वे मजबूत ह
ȅ, अभी भी अपार बहुमत मȂ हȅ, वे रात 
मȂ बैठȂ और मिहलाओं को आरक्षण देने का काम करȂ। हम आपके  माध्यम से यह िनवेदन करना 
चाहते हȅ। नोटबंदी का काम िकया गया है। 2,000 का नोट भी बंद कर िदया गया है। 30 िसत ंबर 
उसका अंितम िदन है। इतने मजबूत रहते हुए भी वे इसे 2029 मȂ करȂगे। मुझे लगता है िक इसका 
मतलब है िक मिहलाओं क े Ģित उनकी नीयत साफ नहीं है, इसिलए हम सब िमलकर भारत 
सरकार से िनवेदन करȂ िक वे मिहलाओं को राÍटर्ीय Îतर पर आरक्षण देने का काम जÊद करे।  
 
"िदल क े बहलाने का सामान न समझा जाए 
मुझ को अब इतना भी आसान न समझा जाए 
मȅ भी दुिनया की तरह जीने का हक़ माँगती हूँ 
48
[RAJYA SABHA]

इस को गǈारी का एलान न समझा जाए" 
 
 इन्हीं चंद शÅदȗ क े साथ, हम पूरे राÍटर् की 140 करोड़ जनता की तरफ से, इस सदन की 
तरफ से यह िनवेदन करना चाहते हȅ और कहना चाहते हȅ िक: 
 
"मȅ नहीं कहता िक तू सवेरा कर दे 
दो काम मȂ एक काम तू मेरा कर दे 
रोशनी तेज कर दे िक मȅ क ु छ देख सकूँ  
नहीं तो घनघोर अंधेरा कर दे" 
 
 इन्हीं चंद शÅदȗ क े साथ, मȅ अपनी बात खत्म करता हूँ, जय िहन्द, जय भारत।  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( डा. फौिजया खान): आपने समय से पहले ही अपनी बात समाÃत कर दी।  Ǜी 
बीरेन्दर् Ģसाद बैÌय। 
†ﺍُپ ﺳﺑﻬﺎ ﺍﺩﻫﻳﮑﺵ) ڈﺍﮐﭨﺭ ﻓﻭﺯﻳہ ﺧﺎﻥ(: ﺍٓپ ﻧﮯ ﻭﻗﺕ ﺳﮯ ﭘﮩﻠﮯ ﮨﯽ ﺍﭘﻧﯽ ﺑﺎﺕ ﺧﺗﻡ ﮐﺭﺩی۔ ﺷﺭی ﺑﺭﻳﻧﺩﺭ ﭘﺭﺳﺎﺩ ﺑﻳﺷﻳہ۔ 
 
SHRI BIRENDRA PRASAD BAISHYA (Assam): Madam, I rise here to support the Bill.  
Our country is observing 75 years of Inde pendence. In our independent movement, 
women play a strong leadership and always, very strongly, women participated in our 
independent movement. Not only that, for better India and for independent India, 
many women lost their lives including a 14 year school girl from Assam, Kanaklata 
Barua, who hoisted our National Flag in Gohpur Police Station in Assam and she was 
killed by the British Police. By bringing this Bill in the 75th year of Independence, this is 
the true respect to our freedom fighters, especially, to women.   
Madam, the Bill is coming forward at the proper time. The Bill was first 
introduced in Parliament in the year 1996. I was the witness as at that time in 1996, I 
was the Member of the Lok Sabha. Again in  2010, the Bill was passed in Rajya Sabha 
but seriousness was not there to pass the B ill in Lok Sabha. Today, with confidence 
and with strong determination for the empo werment of women, this Bill is coming 
forth. I am sure that under th e leadership of Shri Narendra Modi, definitely, this Bill is 
going to be implemented this time.   
Madam, in 1996, I was a Member. In 201 0, I was a Member. But I have seen 
that when the Bill came in the House, the House was adjourned for want of quorum. It 
means that the Bill was not passed in Lo k Sabha intentionally. Today, with a new 
spirit, with the Amendments, this Bill has come. This Government always believed in 
                                                            
† Transliteration in Urdu  script. 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
49

'One Nation, One Constitution'. 'One Nation , One Constitution' is the dream of this 
Government and by withdrawing Articl e 370 from Jammu and Kashmir, it has 
implemented 'One Nation, One Constitution'. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR. FAUZIA KH AN): You have to start concluding, 
please.   Please conclude. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI BIRENDRA PRASAD BAISHYA: And till to day, with the amended version of this 
Bill, the Government has decided to give  reservation to the women in the Union 
Territory of Delhi also. This is a very welcome move because women from Delhi, 
women from Assam, women from Uttar Pradesh, everybody has equal right. And this 
Government, the Narendra Modi Government is going to implement it by amending 
the Constitution.  (Time-bell rings.)  I am sure, this Bill will be passed and everybody 
will support the Bill.  It will be passed wi thout vote and will be  implemented very 
strongly. I must compliment the Government for bringing this Bill on completion of 75 
years of our Independence.  With these words, I wholeheartedly support the Bill and 
conclude my speech. Thank you.  
 
 [THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI MAHUA MAJI) in the Chair.] 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI MAHU A MAJI): Now Ms. Saroj Pandey. You 
have 15 minutes. 
 
सुǛी सरोज पाण्डेय (छǄीसगढ़): महोदया, आज इस ऐितहािसक िदवस पर मुझे बोलने का 
अवसर िमला, इसके  िलए आपका धन्यवाद। मȅ अपने शीषर् नेतृत्व को धन्यवाद देती हूँ और Ģधान 
मंतर्ी जी को धन्यवाद देती हूँ िक उन्हȗने हमारे Îतर्ीत्व का, हमारे नारीत्व का, हमारे ममत्व का जो 
सÇमान िकया है और देश की आधी आबादी को इस मिहला आरक्षण िबल क
े  माध्यम से Îथान देने 
का Ģयास िकया है, इसके  िलए देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी जी का बहुत अिभनंदन है, बहुत साधुवाद है।    
इस िबल क े 'नारी शिƪ वंदन अिधिनयम' नाम पर बात हो रही थी। जब शुरुआत  मȂ सदन 
मȂ इस पर चचार् हुई तो मुझे बहुत अफसोस क े साथ कहना पड़ता ह
ै िक 'वंदन' शÅद पर आपिǄ 
हुई। यह क ैसी भारत की परंपरा है? भारत माता का तो हम हमेशा वंदन ही करते ह
ȅ, लेिकन कभी 
इंिडया का वंदन नहीं होता है।  भारत माता का वंदन होता है। जो लोग भारत माता का वंदन नहीं 
करते हȅ, वे वंदन शÅद की महǄा को नहीं समझȂगे।  हमारे यहां यह परंपरा रही है िक अगर हमने 
कभी पूवर् मȂ भी िकसी की आराधना की है तो उसमȂ हमने नारी को पूजा है। भारत मȂ अधर्नारीÌवर 
का Îवरूप Îवीकार िकया जाता ह
ै।  यह िबल क्यȗ आया, यह िबल क्यȗ नहीं पास हुआ, हमारी 
मंशा पर शक हो रहा है। मȅ पूछती हूँ िक भारत की आज़ादी क े इतने लंबे कालखंड क े बाद यह 
ĢÌन पहले क्यȗ नहीं खड़ा हुआ? आज का भारत महत्वाकांक्षी भारत ह
ै, आज का भारत साहिसक 
50
[RAJYA SABHA]

भारत है और इस साहिसक भारत मȂ मुझे लगता है िक इस 'अमृत काल' मȂ हमने एक नई शुरुआत  
की है।   
कल सदन मȂ चंदर्यान पर चचार् हो रही थी।  जब सदन मȂ चंदर्यान पर चचार् हो रही थी तो 
'िशव शिƪ' शÅद का उपयोग हमारे Ģधान  मंतर्ी जी ने िकया और आज एक सुखद संयोग है िक 
इस सुखद संयोग मȂ िशव शिƪ क े साथ, 15 िदन क े बाद वहां पर भी सूयȘदय हो रहा है। मुझे 
लगता है िक 'अमृत काल' मȂ िशव शिƪ का यह स ुखद संयोग, जब वहां पर सूयȘदय हो रहा है, 
भारत मȂ भी यह सूयȘदय इस मिहला शिƪ क े माध्यम से होगा, ऐसा मेरा िवÌवास है। यहां पर भी 
िशव और शिƪ का ही उपयोग है और म ेरा मानना है िक शिƪ क े जागरण क े िबना कोई काम पूरा 
नहीं होता। इसिलए आज मेरा यह Ģबल िवÌवास हुआ है िक शिƪ क े जागरण क े साथ इस 'अमृत 
काल' मȂ नारी शिƪ वंदन अिधिनयम पािरत होगा और इसके  साथ ही साथ भारत मȂ एक नया 
इितहास िलखा जाएगा।   
हमारी मंशा पर सवाल उठाने वालȗ स
े मȅ पूछना चाहती हूं और एक घटना याद िदलाना 
चाहती हूं। देश की जो सबसे मजबूत कमेटी है, उसमȂ देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी जी क े साथ-साथ Îवगीर्य 
Ǜीमती सुषमा Îवराज, Ǜीम
ती िनमर्ला सीतारमण, माननीय राजनाथ जी और अरुण  जेटली जी 
शािमल थे। सुषमा Îवराज जी क े पास िवदेश मंतर्ालय था, िनमर्ला सीतारमण जी क े पास रक्षा 
मंतर्ालय था, अरुण  जेटली जी क े पास िवǄ मंतर्ालय था और राजनाथ जी क े पास गृह मंतर्ालय 
था। उस समय लोग मजाक म
Ȃ कहते थे िक घर और िवǄ पुरुष संभाल रहे हȅ, रक्षा और िवदेश 
मिहलाएं संभाल रही हȅ। यह एक सुखद संयोग था। यह इस बात का Ģमाण है िक देश क े Ģधान 
मंतर्ी जी ने िकस Ģकार से हमारी Ģितभा का उपयोग िकया, हम पर िवÌवास िकया
 और इसिलए 
आज इस नारी शिƪ वंदन अिधिनयम को यहां पर लाया गया।    
िपछली बार यहां पर बहुत से िवषय आए िक यह पािरत क्यȗ नहीं हुआ। िपछली बार लोक 
सभा मȂ आया िक हम इसे 9 साल मȂ क्यȗ नहीं लाए?  मȅ कहना चाहती हूं िक 9 साल मȂ क्यȗ नहीं 
लाए,  इस  पर बात करने की बजाय, आज जो यह उत्सव का िदन है, उसमȂ हम सबको उत्सव 
मनाना चािहए। जब आज ख
ुशी का िदन है, तो िफर मंशा पर शक क्यȗ?  आप  सब यहां पर 
Ģबुǉजन बैठे हुए हȅ।  आप ǛेÍठजन हȅ, आप सभी को यह बात पता है। इस मंशा पर शक इसिलए 
नहीं िकया जाना चािहए, क्यȗिक हर जगह पर राजनीित हो, यह जरूरी
 नहीं है, लेिकन इस पर 
आप राजनीित कर रहे हȅ।  उसकी एक Ģिकर्या है और पूरी Ģिकर्या का पालन होना चािहए। जब 
उस Ģिकर्या क े साथ हम इस िबल को आगे लाएँगे, तभी मिहलाओं को आरक्षण िबल पर Ģावधान 
क े तहत अिधका
र िमल पाएगा।  यह पूवर् मȂ राज्य सभा मȂ पािरत हुआ, लेिकन राज्य सभा मȂ पािरत 
होते हुए उन्हȂ वह Îथान नहीं िमल पाया। यह लोक सभा मȂ पािरत नहीं हुआ, हर जगह की 
राजनीित भारत देश को बहुत पीछे ले जाती है। देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने बहुत अच्छी मंशा क े 
साथ, बहुत साफ मन क े साथ आज क े इस उत्सव को मनाने का पूरे देश की आधी आबादी को 
अवसर िदया है। मȅ कल से देख रही हूँ, यहाँ िजतनी भी ग
ैलरीज़ हȅ, चाहे वह लोक सभा की हȗ या 
राज्य सभा की हȗ, देश की आधी आबादी हमȂ यहाँ पर िदखाई देती  है।  यह हमȂ गौरव का अनुभव 
कराता है। मȅ इसिलए भी अपने Ģधान मंतर्ी जी को साधुवाद देती हूँ िक इन गैलरीज़ मȂ वे मिहलाएँ 
यह सुनने आई हȅ िक हमारे ǛेÍठजन क्या कहते हȅ, हमारे Ģबुǉजन क्या कहते हȅ?   
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
51

मȅ यहाँ पर बहुत सारी योजनाओं क े िवषय मȂ नहीं कहती हूँ, लेिकन देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी जी 
ने एक योजना ' बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ' लागू की। इस योजना को लागू करने क े पीछे बहुत 
मािर्मक उǈेÌय है, िजसे मȅ यहाँ पर कहना चाहती हूँ। मȅ उस घटनाकर्म को यहाँ कहना चाहती हूँ। 
िजन राज्यȗ मȂ बेटी का जन्म होना एक अिभशाप माना जाता था,  वहाँ अगर िबिटया प
ैदा हो गई 
तो उसे पैदा करने वाली जो माँ थी, वह भी तनाव मȂ रहती थी और घर-पिरवार क े लोग भी तना व 
मȂ रहते थे। जब िबिटया पैदा होती थी, तो उसको दूध क े एक बड़े से हौदे मȂ डाल िदया जाता था। 
वह िबिटया दूध क े उस बड़े से हौदे मȂ अंितम सांसȂ िगनती थी। वह िबिटया इस धरती पर आती 
जरूर  थी, लेिकन वह िवदा कर दी जाती थी। िंलगानुपात बार-बार बदल रह
ा था। बेटȗ की संख्या 
बढ़ती थी, बेिटयȗ की संख्या घट जाती थी।  जब बेिटयȗ की संख्या िगरने लगी, िंलगानुपात 
असंतुिलत होने लगा, तो देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने इसकी शुरुआत  की। उन्हȗने कहा िक अगर 
इसी Ģकार से होता रहा तो हम आने वाले समय मȂ कहां खड़े हȗगे? यह दूरदृिÍट इनसे पहले कभी 
िकसी ने नहीं िदखाई। उन्हȗने 'बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ' अिभयान की शुरुआत  की।   
 
2.00 P.M. 
 
आज ' बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ' अिभयान क
े  साथ मȅ आपको गवर् क े साथ इस बात को बताना 
चाहती हूं िक िवÌव क े आिर्थक मंच की वािर्षक लȅिगक अंतराल िरपोटर् वषर् 2023 मȂ Ģकािशत ह ुई 
है। इस बार भारत वैिÌवक लȅिगक सूचकांक मȂ 8 अंकȗ का सुधार करते हुए 146 देशȗ मȂ से 127वȂ 
Îथान पर पहुंच गया है। यह हमारा गौरव है। देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने िजस िंलगानुपात को 
संतुिलत करने का Ģयास िकया, यह उसका गौरव है। देश क
े  Ģधान मंतर्ी ने िजस दूरदृिÍट क े साथ 
इतनी छोटी सी बात, जो लोगȗ को िदखाई नहीं देती थी, उस बात पर इस अिभयान क े माध्यम से 
शुरुआत  की। बहुत सारी योजनाएं हुईं, बहुत सारी बातȂ हुईं। हमारे िलए ' Ģधानमंतर्ी आवास 
योजना' से लेकर तमाम चीज़Ȃ हुईं, लेिकन कभी-कभी मȅ सोचती हूं िक हम मिहलाएं तो हमेशा से 
वंिचत हȅ, तो िफर उन वंिचत, शोिषत और पीिड़त मिहलाओं क े साथ राजनीित क ैसी? हम तो
 रोज़ 
अपनी योग्यता का Ģमाण देते हȅ, आगे बढ़ने का Ģयास करते हȅ, लेिकन अगर देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी 
जी अवसर देते ह
ȅ, तो बार-बार उस पर राजनीित करके , ĢÌनिचÏन खड़ा करके  उनकी मंशा पर 
संिदग्ध िवषयȗ को खड़ा िकया जाता है और िजस Ģकार का यहां दृÌय उपिÎथत िकया जाता है, 
मुझे लगता है िक यह बेहद सोचनीय है। हमारे Ģधान मंतर्ी जी आज की नारी को देवी बनाना नहीं 
चाहते, आज की नारी को दासी भी नहीं बनाना चाहते, आज वे चाहते ह
ȅ िक हमȂ एक मानवी क े 
रूप  मȂ पहचान िमले, हम एक मानवी क े रूप  मȂ अपना Îथान बनाएं। इसिलए जब हम इसकी 
शुरुआत  करने जा रहे हȅ, तो आज इस आरक्षण िबल क े साथ ही एक नए उत्सव की शुरुआत  
होगी, देश मȂ मिहलाओं को अपना Îथान िमलेगा और मेरा मानना है िक जब हम अपने Îथान की 
बात करते ह
ȅ, तो इस अमृत काल मȂ, भले ही उसका समय थोड़ा लÇबा है, लेिकन इस अमृत काल 
मȂ जो िबल पािरत होगा, वह आने वाले समय मȂ उस Ëयिƪत्व को सुशोिभ
त करेगा, जो इस सदन 
मȂ आधी आबादी क े तौर पर उपिÎथत होगी। मिहलाओं मȂ बहुत धैय र् होता है और इस धैयर् क े साथ वे 
आगे बढ़ती हȅ। हमारे धैयर् की परीक्षा और हमारे धैयर् पर कई कहािनयां हȅ, जो सत्य हȅ, लेिकन यह 
संघषर् बहुत लÇबा हो गया है। आरक्षण िवधान सभाओं मȂ और लोक सभा मȂ िमले - इसका स
ंघषर् 
52
[RAJYA SABHA]

बहुत लÇबा हो चुका है। बहुत साफ मंशा मȂ इस िबल को लाकर जनगणना क े माध्यम से संिवधान 
ĢदǄ अिधकारȗ क े तहत हम इसे लागू करȂ और मुझे लगता है िक इस उत्सव मȂ पूरे देश क े लोग 
शािमल हȗ। यह मेरे िलए सौभाग्य का िवषय है िक आज मुझे इस ऐितहािसक पल का साक्षी बनने 
का गौरव िम
ला है। इसी क े साथ मȅ अपनी बात समाÃत करती हूं, धन्यवाद।  
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI MAHU A MAJI): Now, Shrimati Rajani 
Ashokrao Patil.  You have ten minutes to speak. 
 
Ǜीमती रजनी अशोकराव पािटल (महाराÍटर्): महोदया, आपने मुझे इस िबल पर बोलने का 
अवसर Ģदान िकया, इसके  िलए मȅ आपको धन्यवाद देती हूं। महोदया, मȅ नारी शिƪ वंदन 
अिधिनयम, संिवधान (128 वां) स
ंशोधन िवधेयक क े िलए मेरी पाटीर् इंिडयन नेशनल कांगर्ेस की 
तरफ से समथर्न देने क े िलए यहां खड़ी हूं । आज मȅ खुद को गौरवािन्वत, क ृतज्ञ और भाव-िवभोर 
महसूस करती हूं। आज मुझे मेरे नेता और इस देश क े पूवर् Ģधान मंतर्ी राजीव गांधी जी की याद 
आती है, िजनकी द
ूरदृिÍट से और िजनके  िवज़न से मिहलाओं को आरक्षण का अिधकार िमलने का 
काम हुआ था। उनकी गहरी सोच की वजह से हमारे जैसी 15 लाख मिहलाएं देश मȂ अलग-अलग 
जगहȗ पर, पंचायतȗ एवं नगर पािलकाओं मȂ काम कर रही ह ȅ, इस देश की नींव का एक िहÎसा 
बनकर खड़ी हȅ। मुझे यह बताने मȂ आनन्द हो रहा है िक पहली बार वषर् 1992 मȂ, जब मिहला 
आरक्षण िवधेयक लागू हुआ, मȅ वषर् 1993 मȂ उसी क े तहत िजला पिरषद मȂ बीड स े पहली बार यहां 
चुनकर आई थी। मेरी िजला पिरषद से लेकर यहां तक की यातर्ा इसिलए possible हुई, क्यȗिक 
मेरी पाटीर् क े नेता बहुत ही सोच-िवचार कर यह िबल लाए थे। वषर् 1989 मȂ राजीव गांधी जी इस 
िबल को पहली बार लेकर आए थे। यह िबल लोक सभा मȂ तो पास हो गया, लेिकन भारतीय जनता 
पाटीर् क े जो लोग
 आज हमारा वंदन करना चाहते हȅ, उन लोगȗ ने उसको Ģभािवत कर िदया, 
उनके  कारण हमारा िबल Ģभािवत हो गया। वषर् 1992 मȂ 73वा ं और 74 वां अमȂडमȂट हुआ, उसके  
तहत एक-ितहाई मिहला अिधकार क
े  रूप  मȂ हमȂ हमारा पूरा अिधकार िमल गया। इसमȂ बहुत सारी 
मिहलाएं Ģितिनिध बनीं। उनमȂ कोई सरपंच बनी, कोई मेयर बनी, कोई पंच बनी, कोई िजला 
पिरषद की अध्यक्ष बनी और यह सब ठाकु रकी से, िजस ठाकु रकी की अभी बात हुई, उस 
ठाकु रकी से राज करने लगीं। तब भी हमारे ऊपर क ु छ लोगȗ ने इÊज़ाम लगाया। उन लोगȗ ने 
िमÎटर सरपंच शÅद यूज़ िकया िक हम काम नहीं करȂगे, हमारे पित काम करȂगे, लेिकन ऐसा नहीं 
हुआ। हमने धीरे-धीरे काम सीखना श
ुरू  िकया और बाद मȂ हम सब समझने लगे िक काम क ै से 
करते हȅ। मुझे लगता है िक मिहलाओं क े अिधकार जागर्त करने का काम इस िबल क े  तहत हुआ है। 
मȅ नĦतापूवर्क यह भी कहना चाहती हूं िक वषर् 1996 मȂ जब यह िबल पहली बार लोक सभा मȂ 
आया, तब भी मȅ लोक सभा मȂ सदÎय थी। जब भी मिहला आरक्षण िबल आता हȅ, हम उसके  
समथर्न मȂ रहते हȅ। एक-एक सीढ़ी चढ़कर हमारा 30-35 साल का पिरकर्मण ह
ुआ है। मुझे लगता 
है िक जब तक यह िबल पूरी तरह से लागू नहीं होता, तब तक, वषर् 2029 तक यहां रहना पड़ेगा।  
 महोदया, जब यह िबल वषर् 1996 मȂ आया, तब उस िबल का इतना िव
रोध िकया गया िक 
उस िबल को फाड़ कर उसके  ट ुकड़े कर िदए गए। गीता मुखजीर्, सेलेक्ट किमटी क े चेयरमैन को 
यह िबल सȚपा गया। गीता मुखजीर् क े नेतृत्व मȂ इस िबल का Ģवाह शुरू  हो गया। धीरे-धीरे वषर् 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
53

2010 आ गया। मेरी नेता सोिनया गांधी जी की मंशा थी िक राजीव गांधी जी का जो आधा सपना था 
- क्यȗिक आधा तो उन्हȗने पंचायतȗ मȂ पूरा कर िदया था, लेिकन जो आधा रह गया था िक लोक 
सभा मȂ और िवधान सभाओं मȂ भी हमारी बहनȂ आनी चािहए, वह सपना पूरा करने क े िलए हमारी 
सोिनया जी आगे आईं और मनमोहन िंसह जी क े नेतृत्व मȂ पहली बार वषर् 2010 मȂ यह िबल राज्य 
सभा मȂ पािरत हो गया। लेिकन लोक सभा म
Ȃ हमारा बहुमत न होने क े कारण यह पास नहीं हो 
पाया। वषर् 2014 मȂ जब गवनर्मȂट बदली
 और नरेन्दर् मोदी जी Ģधान मंतर्ी बन गए, तब उन्हȗने इतने 
बड़े-बड़े वायदे िकए िक हमȂ लगा िक अब यह िबल पास करȂगे, क्यȗिक ये लोग ही बोल रहे थे िक 
मोदी है तो मुमिकन है, इसिलए हमȂ लगा िक ये करȂगे। वषर् 2015 मȂ सोिनया जी ने मोदी जी को 
लैटर िलखा, िफर वषर् 2016 मȂ िलखा और िफर वषर् 2018 मȂ राहुल गांधी जी ने लैटर िलखा और 
कहा िक अगर आप यह िबल लाना चाहते हȅ तो we are ready to cooperate you. हम 
uncondition
al support करȂगे। आप इस िबल को लाइए और पािरत कीिजए, लेिकन यह नहीं 
हुआ। जब 9 साल पूरे हो गए और इन्हȂ िदखने लगा िक चुनाव करीब है, सब तरफ से मारे गए हȅ, 
सब तरफ लोग उनकी आलोचना कर रहे हȅ, तब इन्हȂ लगा िक अब हम मिहलाओं का काडर् Ãले 
कर सकते हȅ। इसिलए यह मिहला आरक्षण िबल आया ह
ै। हमारी वंदना मत कीिजए, हम कोई देवी 
नहीं बनना चाहते। न हम देवी बनना चाहते हȅ, न हम बहन बनना चाहते हȅ, हम िसफर् एक मानव 
बनना चाहते हȅ। We wan
t to be the human being. हमȂ मानव समिझए। िकसी बड़े pedestal 
पर मत रिखए, क्यȗिक ऐसा करके  इन लोगȗ ने  हमȂ बहुत साल नीचे िगराने की कोिशश की है। 
आज 9 साल क े बाद जब यह िबल आया ह
ै, तब मुझे तो उनकी नीयत मȂ कोई खोट लगता है। एक 
कारण यह भी है िक अगर उनके  मन मȂ मंशा थी, तो उन्हȂ पहले ही इस िबल को लाना चािहए था। 
अगर नोटबंदी का फ ैसला एक रात म
Ȃ ले सकते हȅ, जीएसटी का िबल एक रात मȂ ला सकते हȅ और 
तीन क ृिष कानून, जो काले कानून थे - अभी नƿा जी ने बोला िक हम पुख्ता तैयारी करते हȅ, अगर 
पुख्ता तैयारी की थी, तो तीन-तीन क
ृ िष कानून वापस लेने की नौबत क्यȗ आयी? क्या यह आपकी 
तैयारी है? इन सब जगहȗ पर उनका खेल उलटा हो गया है। कल जब मȅ एक सǄाधारी पाटीर् की 
मंतर्ी को सुन रही थी, तब उन्हȗने बोला िक एक ही पिरवार को पूरा Ǜेय देन
े की कांगर्ेस मȂ होड़ 
चल रही है। मुझे यह सुन कर बहुत बुरा लगा, क्यȗिक जब एक ही पिरवार क े दो-दो लोग इस देश 
क े िलए शहीद होने को तैयार होते हȅ, जब एक ही पिरवार की एक मिहला न
ेता खुद Ģाइम 
िमिनÎटर पद का त्याग करती हȅ, जब एक ही पिरवार का हमारा बच्चा राहुल गांधी बाहर 
िनकलता है तो इनके  नफरत क े बाज़ार मȂ मोहÅबत की दुकान खोलने क े िलए िनकलता ह
ै।  
जब वे भारत जोड़ो यातर्ा मȂ िनकले, मȅने अपनी आंखȗ से खुद देखा है, परसȗ वे लेह-
लǈाख भी आए थे, तब भी मȅ उनके  साथ थी। यह जो हुआ है, उसमȂ सभी लोगȗ ने, खास तौर पर 
हमारी मिहलाओं ने अपने मन की बात की। मैडम आप एक मिहला हȅ। अगर हमȂ िवÌवास नहीं आता 
है, तो हम िकसी आदमी का हाथ भी नहीं पकड़ सकते ह
ȅ, लेिकन वे मिहलाएं राहुल जी क े गले 
लग रही थीं, अपने दुख-ददर् बता रही थीं। मȅ यह दावे क े साथ पूछना चाहती हूं िक इस पिरवार  क े 
तरह-तरह क े नाम रखने मȂ आपको क्या सुख िमलता है? पंिडत जी से लेकर हर रोज, 60 सालȗ 
मȂ आपने क्या िकया? आप क ेवल यही कहते रहते हȅ। य
े लोग 30 साल से सǄा मȂ भी नहीं हȅ और 
बाहर रहकर काम कर रहे हȅ, लेिकन िफर भी आप उनको छोड़ते नहीं हȅ। मुझे लगता है िक यह 
अच्छी बात नहीं है।     
54
[RAJYA SABHA]

िवशेष सतर् शुरू  हो गया है। मȅ दो-तीन िदन से देख रही हूं िक यहां पर अच्छा माहौल हो 
गया है। पहले िदन सबकी फोटो खींची गई, ceremonial inception हुआ। लेिकन मȅ दो िदन से 
देख रही हूं िक हमारी बॉिलवुड की अिभनेितर्यां यहां पर िदख रही हȅ -  ऐसा पहले कभी नहीं हुआ 
था। उनका फोटो सेशन होता है। हम उनको बुलाने क े िलए मना नहीं कर रहे हȅ, लेिकन जब 
उनको लाते हȅ, तो उससे अपना फायदा मत कीिजए। हमारे सामने जो म ंतर्ी जी बैठे हȅ, मȅने उनका 
फोटो देखा िक वे अिभनेितर्यȗ को िमठाई िखला रहे हȅ। अगर आपको िमठाई िखलानी है, तो 
िजन्हȗने जÇमू-कÌमीर मȂ शहादत दी, उनके  घर जाइए। उनके  घर क े आंसू पȗछने की कोिशश 
कीिजए। मिणपुर मȂ जाइए; मिणपुर की मिहलाओं को नग्न िकया जाता ह
ै, उनका बलात्कार िकया 
जाता है, उनके  िलए आपके  मन मȂ कोई संवेदना नहीं हȅ। इतना ही नही, इस देश को ओलिÇपक 
मेडल िदलवाने वाली हमारी जो मिहल ा पहलवान हȅ, उन मिहला पहलवानȗ को राÎते से घसीट 
कर लेकर जाते हो, आपके  मन मȂ उनके  िलए हमददीर् नहीं है, लेिकन बॉिलवुड से आने वाली 
मिहलाओं क े िलए हमददीर् है।   
 
[उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती जया बƳन) पीठासीन हुईं।] 
 
वे अपनी िफÊम का Ģमोशन करने क
े  िलए आती हȅ। हमारा िवरोध इसिलए नहीं है िक वे 
आती हȅ, उनको आने दीिजए, लेिकन उनको यहां पर Ģमोशन नहीं करना चािहए। उनके  िलए 
फोटो सेशन होता है, पतर्कार आते हȅ। वह नहीं होना चािहए - ऐसा मुझ े लगता है।...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती जया बƳन):  मȅ चेयर की िरÎपेक्ट की वजह से आपको क ु छ नहीं कह रही 
हूं।   
  
Ǜीमती रजनी अशोकराव पािटल: जब आपने हमȂ कांÎटीǷूशन की कॉपी दी और हम 
कांÎटीǷूशन की कॉपी लेकर आ गए, तो मȅने कांÎटीǷूशन की कॉपी मȂ देखा िक पािर्लयामȂट 
क्या है? हम नई पािर्लयामȂट मȂ आएं, तो पहले पािर्लयामȂट को समझ लȂ। उसमȂ पहला वाक्य यह  है 
िक "There shall be a Parliament for the Unio n which shall consist of the Presi
dent and 
two Houses to be kn
own respectively as th e Council of States and the House of the 
People". हमारा जो पहला वाक्य है, उसके  िहसाब से हमारी राÍटर्पित जी कहां िदख रही हȅ। यह 
समारोह तीन िदन हुआ, मिहलाओं क े िलए Îपेशल सेशन रख रहे हȅ और आप हमारी ‘आिदवासी 
मिहला- आिदवासी मिहला’ कहते हȅ, तो क्या िसफर् उनको यूिटलाइज़ करते हȅ? यहां पर माननीय 
दर्ौपदी मुमूर् जी को बुलाना आवÌयक था और अगर वह हो जात
ा, तो हमारे िलए बहुत आनंद की 
बात होती, लेिकन ऐसा नहीं हुआ है। यह संघषर् का Ģवास, जो हमने शुरू  िकया, िजसके  बारे मȂ 
मȅने बताया िक यह 1989 से शुरू  हुआ, मȅ इसके  िलए 
चार लाइनȂ कहना चाहती हूं : 
 
"िकसी को िगराया, न खुद ही को उछाला, 
कटा िंजदगी का सफर धीरे-धीरे 
जहां आप पहुंचे छलांगे लगाकर 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
55

वहां मȅ भी आया, मगर धीरे-धीरे।" 
 
 मैडम, delimitation या Census हो , नहीं हो, लेिकन वे चीज़Ȃ िबल क े आड़े नहीं आनी 
चािहए।  मȅ लाÎट मȂ एक बात Hindu Marriage Act पर कहना चाहती हूं। ये बोलते हȅ िक हमने 
सब िकया, तो मुझे लगता है िक बीजेपी वालȗ को Alzheimer हुआ ह ै। उनको पहले का क ु छ याद 
नहीं आता है,  2014 क े बाद का ही सब याद आता है या वैिदक काल याद आता है। मुझे यह लगता 
है िक जब Hindu Marriage Act आया, Hindu Succession Act आया, Hindu Adoption and 
Maintenance Act आया, तो वह कांगर्ेस पाटीर् ने िकया। मिहलाओं की तरफ से बाबा साहेब 
अÇबेडकर, आज िजनका नाम लेना आवÌयक लगता है, यिद वे नहीं होते, कांगर्ेस पाटीर् नहीं 
होती, तो हमȂ कांÎटीǷूशन ǎारा
 वोिंटग का अिधकार िमलने क े िलए भी संघषर् करना पड़ता और 
ऐसे भाषण देने पड़ते। उन्हीं क े कारण हमȂ हमारा वोिंटग का अिधक
ार भी िमला है। कांगर्ेस पाटीर् ने 
इस देश को Ģथम मिहला Ģधान मंतर्ी, Ǜीमती इंिदरा गांधी दी हȅ, Ģथम मिहला राÍटर्पित, Ǜीमती 
Ģितभा देवीिंसह पािटल दी हȅ, Ģथम मिहला Îपीकर, Ǜीमती मीरा क ुमार को िदया है। बीजेपी को 
यह बताना चािहए िक उन्हȗने िकसको िदया है। क्या कभी कोई बीजेपी की मिहला अध्यक्ष हुई ह
ȅ, 
क्या कोई मिहला कभी आरएसएस की Ģमुख हुई हȅ? उनको इसके  बारे मȂ जरूर  बताना चािहए 
और यह बताए िबना अपना पÊला झाड़ नहीं लेना चािहए। म
ैडम ,मȅ क ेवल एक-दो िमनट मराठी मȂ 
बात करना चाहती हूं। यह मेरी मातृभाषा है। आज गणपित और महालÑमी हȅ। हमारे यहां आज ही 
गौरी का आगमन होता है। 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती जया बƳन): आप महालÑमी हȅ । 
 
Ǜीमती रजनी अशोकराव पािटल: *"आज हमारे यहां घर -घर मȂ गौरी आ रही हȅ। इस अवसर 
पर,  मै आपको हमारी महाराÍटर् की शैली मȂ शुभकामनाएं देना चाहती हूं। गणपित बÃपा मोिरया 
कहना चाहती हूं। कहने की बात िसफर् इतनी है िक मेरे महाराÍटर् मȂ जीजाबाई थीं। हमारी इसी भूिम 
मȂ चांदबीबी थीं , महात्मा फ ु ले सािवतर्ीबाई फ ु ले क े साथ लड़ रहे थे। रमाबाई अंबेडकर, बाबा 
साहेब अंबेडकर, तारा रानी,  अिहÊयाबाई - हमारे पास इतने सारे नाम हȅ ,िजनके  िलए हम बहुत 
सÇमान महसूस करते हȅ। इसिलए आज, जब हम नारी को सलाम करते हȅ, तो मȅ आपसे हाथ जोड़ 
कर एक ही बात कहना चाहती हूं िक आप सबसे पहले हमȂ इंसान क े रूप  मȂ जीने का अिधकार 
दीिजए। हमȂ देवता मत बनाओ, हमȂ देवी मत बनाओ, हमȂ लÑमी मत बनाओ। हमȂ देवत्व मत दȂ, 
क ेवल मनुÍय क े रूप  मȂ जीने का अिधकार दȂ और ओबीसी, एससी, एसटी सिहत 40 परस Ȃट 
मिहला आबादी क े साथ इस िबल को जÊद से जÊद पािरत करȂ। आपने मुझे समय िदया ,धन्यवाद। 
जय िहन्द।" 
 
SHRIMATI MAUSAM NOOR (West Bengal): Thank you, hon. Vice-Chairperson 
Madam. I come from a party called the All India Trinamool Congress whose founder 
                                                            
* Hindi translation of the original speech delivered in Marathi.  
 
56
[RAJYA SABHA]

gave 41 per cent of Lok Sabha tickets to women way back in 2014. I come from a 
party founded by Ms. Mamata Banerjee which already has 40 per cent of women MPs 
in the Lok Sabha. I come from a party th at already has 50 per cent women elected in 
the Panchayats and in the Municipalities. I come from a party founded 25 years ago 
which spoke in Parliament for the Women's Reservation Bill way back in 1998.  
Madam, our words were not empty word s, our words were put into action. 
Today, we are glad that the rest of India, including this Government which gave only 
12 per cent tickets to women has learnt littl e from India's only woman serving as the 
Chief Minister. The BJP has sixteen Chief Ministers, none of them are women. 
Madam, we have already implemented the Wo men's Reservation Bill in the past. This 
Government is trying to bring a Bill in th e present which it cannot implement in the 
near future. 
Mr. Prime Minister, Sir, listen carefully to what I am saying. I am Mausam Noor 
from Malda, West Bengal. I have been elected twice in the Lok Sabha and now 
serving my third term in Parliament, in the Rajya Sabha. If you are really serious about 
this Bill, please give 33 per cent tickets to women in the five upcoming State elections 
in November this year and in general elections, 2024, next year.  
Madam, of course, we support this Bill. It is  our Bill, it is our idea, it is what we 
have already implemented. Let me try to explain to you as to how this Bill is 
fundamentally flawed because this Bill is linked  to both delimitation exercise and the 
Census. It is like writing a cheque with no balance in your account  and the cheque is 
dated not September, 2023, but, maybe 2034. In other words, you cannot cash the 
cheque now. You can only keep it in your drawer. You will feel good about it, but, you 
would not have any money in your account. Th is is exactly what this Government is 
telling the women of India.  
Madam, going beyond the words of Parliament, we as a nation need to 
change our thinking. In the Election Commissi on of India, of thenine top posts, not 
even one is a woman. Out of 11,000 IAS o fficers, between 1951 and 2020, only one 
out of ten was a woman. Only one out of 10 IPS officers is a woman. Out of 688 
Judges, only 83 are women. Only 15 per cen t of women hold senior and managerial 
positions in India. It is heartening that in West Bengal, every district has a police 
station that is solely run by women. If a wo man has to be represented, it has to be a 
team effort. In conclusion, Madam, I urge the Prime Minister one thing. What is the 
name of the Lok Sabha MP of yours who shamed us, who harassed our champion 
w r e s t l e r s ?  O n  b e h a l f  o f  t h e  w o m e n  o f  I n d i a ,  I  w a n t  t o  k n o w  w h a t  h e  i s  s t i l l  d o i n g ,  
sitting here in this new building. Thank you, Madam.  
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
57

THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI JAYA BACHCHAN): Shri R. Girirajan.  
 
SHRI R. GIRIRAJAN (Tamil Nadu): Hon. Chairperson, first of all, I thank my beloved 
leader, Thalapathy M. K. Stalin, for provid ing me this opportunity to speak in this 
august House representing DMK. For 75 years, Dravida Munnetra Kazhagam has 
been fighting for women's rights; we we lcome the Women's Reservation Bill. The 
pertinent question is: Why hasn’t the Modi  Government shown even one per cent of 
the concern it showed in passing the co ntroversial Agrarian Acts, Citizenship 
Amendment Act, Kashmir Special Status Act, and 10 per cent reservation, for passing 
the Women's Reservation Bill? People have  apprehensions that the timing and the 
cunning manner in which the Bill is drafte d has a sinister design. People will 
understand that despite the strength of the majority, they have remained blind for the 
past nine years and are trying to do an electoral jumla as usual. Madam, even if the 
Bill is passed now, the implementation of th at will take many more years. As they 
have included a clause in Article 334A, the provisions of the Constitution relating to 
the reservation of seats for women in th e House of the People, the Legislative 
Assembly of the States, shall come into ef fect after an exercise  of delimitation is 
undertaken for this purpose after the releva nt figures of the fi rst census taken after 
commencement of the Constitution, (One Hundred and Twenty Eighth Amendment) 
Act, 2023, that it will be implemented afte r delimitation of constituencies is done. 
Delimitation of Lok Sabha constituencies in various States and Assembly 
constituencies will be drawn only after 2026. The next election after delimitation will be 
held in 2029. So, implementation of the said Act cannot be implemented before 2029. 
There is no guarantee when the census will be held, the census that never took place, 
the re-districting based on it, and strange ploy of passing the law now to supposedly 
come into effect in 2029, is all an electoral sham of failure.  
Madam, the delimitation of constituenci es has got its own problems and grave 
issues which need to be thrashed out thoroughly before arriving at the total number of 
Lok Sabha constituencies and Assembly seat s in States in the country. The ploy to 
reduce the representation of th e people of South India, esp ecially from Tamil Nadu in 
the Lok Sabha in the name of constituency re-delimitation must be nipped in the bud. 
The Government must now give an assuran ce that it will not deceive Tamil Nadu and 
other South India States. The BJP-led Govern ment should consider rationale behind 
the demand for reservation for women from backward and most backward 
communities.  There should an inner rese rvation for women from  OBC and BC while 
implementing 33 per cent reservation. The DMK President and the hon. Chief Minister 
of Tamil Nadu, Mr. M.K. Stalin in his stat ement, has reiterated this aspect. Madam, 
58
[RAJYA SABHA]

gender equality means empowering women in all ways and in all places. For that, they 
should first be given their proper pl aces. Dravida Munnetra Kazgagam has been 
insisting on this. Whenever the DMK Govern ment is formed, it is implemented. In 
1996, Chief Minister Kalaignar had provided 33 per cent reservation for women in local 
bodies. By the end of 1996, elections to local bodies such as Panchayat Unions, 
municipalities and corporations were held by the DMK. The Women's Reservation Bill 
has been pending for nearly 27 years. The Women's Reservation Bill was first 
introduced in 1996 by the Union Government  of the DMK.  In 2005 too, the DMK-led 
Union Government introduced the Bill. The BJ P, which initially said it would support 
it, then opposed it. Uma Bharti, who spok e on behalf of BJP, had vehemently 
opposed it. Among those who have opposed it  in the past, is the present U.P. Chief 
Minister, Yogi Adityanath also. Under the DMK led UPA-II Government, the Women's 
Reservation Bill was introduced in the Ra jya Sabha on March 8, 2010 on Women's 
Day and passed on the next day during the UPA Government. Before that, hon. Deve 
Gowda's Government brought this Bill. Our floor Leader, Shri Tiruchi Siva, also spoke 
on the Bill.  Unfortunately, it could not be passed in Lok Sabha due to opposition from 
some political parties. The BJP Government  which came to power after that shelved 
the Bill. In 2014 and 2019 elect ions, the BJP won a majority.  If they wanted to pass 
the Bill, they could have accomplished it imme diately. But they did not even bother to 
introduce the Bill for the reasons better known to them. In 2017, we took out a rally in 
Delhi on behalf of the DMK. Mrs. Kanimo zhi, the Women's Wing Secretary and then 
Rajya Sabha Member and now Lok Sabha Me mber led the rally which was held to 
press for the implementation 33 per cent reservation for women in Parliament and 
Assembly constituencies in States. Mada m, former Prime Minister, Rajiv Gandhi 
ensured reservation in local bodies. Former Prime Minister, Manmohan Singh 
introduced the Women's Reservation Bill in Parliament and State Assemblies in the 
Rajya Sabha.  The achievements of both of them deserve to be remembered now. On 
behalf of the Dravia Munnetr a Kazhagam, I welcome the B ill to provide 33 per cent 
reservation to women brought in by the Union Government. Even if it is done because 
of the passage of time, I urge the Union ru lers to consider its justification and not 
ignore the demand for representation for women of the backward and most backward 
communities. India is the only country that has not yet conducted a census that takes 
place once in a decade. So far, the BJP has not given assurances about when it will 
happen. The delimitation of constituencies based on population alone is a dagger 
hanging over the head of Tamil Nadu and South Indian States. The political 
conspiracy to increase the number of MPs from North Indian States like U.P. and 
Bihar and reducing the political representati on of South India must be defeated. The 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
59

unjust attempt to deceive a politically conscious State, Tamil Nadu, must be nipped in 
the bud. Even Chandrayaan softly landed on the South Pole of Moon, but BJP cannot 
land in South India. Mind it! Following the footsteps of doyens of social justice and 
Dravidian model, Thanthai Pe riyar, Perarignar Anna, Dr. Kalaignar several farsighted 
initiatives and schemes for women empowerment were being implemented by the 
DMK Government. Our hon. Chief Minister of  Tamil Nadu, Thiru M.K. Stalin has been 
continuing the legacy of th e Dravidian model of governan ce.  Today welfare schemes 
for women that are being implemented in Tam il Nadu over the last five decades are: 
equal right for women in family properties in 1989; increase in reservation for women in 
Government jobs to 40 per cent; Dr. Mut hulakshmi Maternity Benefit Scheme aimed 
at ensuring maternal nutrition; schemes for education, marriage assistance and 
remarriage; fare-free travel for women in Government-run city buses; the Moovalur 
Ramamirtham Ammaiyar Higher Educatio n Assurance Scheme provides Rs.1,000 
financial assistance to girls till they complete their recognized course. The 
Government of Tamil Nadu has launched the grand social welfare initiative for women 
- Kalaignar Magalir Urimai Thogai Thittam,  on September 15. Through this scheme, 
monthly financial assistance of Rs . 1,000 is provided to 1, 06,50,000 eligible women 
family heads in the State. 
Madam, Tamil Nadu has become the role model State in the country due to the 
continuous efforts of our great leaders Thanthai Periyar, Perarignar Anna, Dr. 
Kalaignar and Thalapathy M.K. Stalin. 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI JAYA BACHCHAN): I am sorry, I have been 
asked to tell you that your time is over. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI R. GIRIRAJAN: Madam, through ou r Dravidian Model Government, we have 
fulfilled all our poll promises. But, at the same time, we have the Union Government 
led by Shri Narendra Modi at the Centre for almost a decade. We have never seen any 
other Government which never bothered to  fulfil their poll promises. The Narendra 
Modi led BJP Government has several political and electoral promises never to be 
fulfilled. No other Government has promised so much electoral jumlas than this 
Government. We can publis h volumes of electoral jumlas of Narendra Modi and his 
Government. 
They promised that all the black money stashed in foreign countries by Indians 
will be brought back and Rs. 15 Lakh wo uld be deposited in bank account of each 
and every citizen. This remains as the greatest jumla of BJP. 
 
60
[RAJYA SABHA]

उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती जया बƳन): िगिरराजन जी, आपके  बाद मिहला का चांस है, आप अपना 
भाषण खत्म कर दीिजए। 
 
SHRI R. GIRIRAJAN: The BJP has promised that they will provide two crore new jobs 
every year to people of this country, especially the educated youth but the 
unemployment problem has reached the highest in the history of independent India. 
 Before I conclude, I would say that when Narendra Modi became the Prime 
Minister, he had promised the people of India linking of rivers, especially the 
peninsular rivers, but nothing happened so far. All these promises still remain as 
electoral jumlas. 
It is not a surprise that though the Women’s Reservation Bill is being passed 
and President's assent will be given, the im plementation of the Act will have to wait 
several years and pass through several ordeals. 
In the last ten years, th e people of this country ha ve seen and experienced 
enough jumlas and U-turns from this Government and I only wish that the people of 
India will teach them a lesson in the 2024 electoral battle for all the electoral jumlas. 
Thank you, Madam.                           
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI JAYA BACHCHAN): Thank you, Mr. Girirajan. 
You have taken extra time...(Interruptions)... Don’t keep the lady Member waiting to 
speak. Now, Shrimati Sulata Deo. 
 
SHRIMATI SULATA DEO (Odisha): Jai Jagannath! Madam Vice-Chairman, thank 
y o u  s o  m u c h  f o r  g i v i n g  m e  t h i s  o p p o r t u n i t y  t o  s p e a k  i n  m y  m o t h e r  t o n g u e  O d i y a .  
From my party, the Biju Janata Dal, I support the Bill.  
*"I, on behalf of my party BJD, 
support the Bill. I would begin with a quote: “Women empowerment is not a slogan 
but a non-negotiable code for us. ” Today we are discussing Nari Shakti Vandan 
Adhiniyam in this august House. It is hear tening to learn that the India Today Group 
yesterday reported that Odisha is the fr ontrunner when it comes to Nari Shakti 
Vandan and I feel proud of the accolades be stowed. Late Shri Bi ju Patnaik, who was 
also the Chief Minister of Odisha, once st ated that ‘Narrow-mindedness belittles a 
society’ and I hope, you all will appreciate the same. Odisha had the privilege of being 
the first state, which for the first time, ha d reserved 33% seats for women within the 
legal framework of Panchayati Raj in the year 1992 itself , and as a result, 33% of 
                                                            
* English translation of the original speech delivered in Odia. 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
61

women members got elected. His able son and my leader, Shri Naveen Patnaik 
followed into the footsteps of his father and he could also envision that a state 
prospers with the empowerment of women. If women are not empowered, a 
society, nation and state cannot flourish. Accordingly, he gave  50% reservation for 
women in the subsequent Panchayati Raj elections. In the year 2012, he came up with 
yet another piece of legislation by which 50% of seats were reserved in the urban 
local bodies to ensure maximum representati on for women. Because of that virtuous 
initiative, out of the three municipal corp orations, two are at present headed by 
women. This shows the level of commitment of BJD to the cause of women. Though 
we all have gathered here to champion the cause of women empowerment, I would 
like to add here that my leader, Shri Naveen Patnaik launched the Mission Shakti on 
the 8th of March, 2001 with an idea of em powering women. You will be pleased to 
learn that around 70 Lakh women, in some  way or the other, are linked to the Mission 
Shakti and moving ahead. It is a great achie vement. My Chief Minister is perhaps 
second to none in the whole country, in  the cause of women’s empowerment. His 
contribution is unparalleled. Mission Shakti has come up as a separate and dedicated 
department headed by a Minister. By th e endeavour of this Mission, a woman has 
even achieved the status of an  industrialist. It has been  a saga of success stories 
wherein some of the women have also been  able to attain the status of CEO and 
Managing Director of companies while they  had started their humble journey as SHG 
members. The days are not far when someday a woman fr om Odisha will prove her 
mettle and establish herself gloriously in both India and the world. The credit for this 
goes to the mass leader, Shri Naveen Patn aik ji. There is an adage in Odiya that  यह 
हर लȅग्वेज मȂ भी है। “behind every successful man, there is a contribution of a woman ” 
But in my case and for many other women lik e me, it has been the contribution of my 
party leader, Shri Naveen Patnaik wh o has empowered us politically and 
economically. Getting this passed has been a long-standing demand of our Hon. 
Chief Minister and this is goi ng to be fulfilled today. Sitt ing here, I pay my obeisance 
to him. Jai Jagannath! 
 
[THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR. KANIMOZHI NVN SOMU) in the Chair.] 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR. KANIMOZHI NVN SOMU): Now, Shri Subhas 
Chandra Bose Pilli.  
62
[RAJYA SABHA]

SHRI SUBHAS CHANDRA BOSE PILLI (Andhra Pradesh): * "Madam, Thank you for 
giving me this opportunity to speak on  the Women’s Reservation Bill in Telugu 
language, which is my mother tongue. Hon. Vice-Chairperson, introduction of this Bill 
is very much welcome and appreciated. I wh oleheartedly congratulate the hon. Prime 
Minister, Shri Narendra Modi Ji. As per the directions of the hon. Chief Minister of 
Andhra Pradesh, Shri Y. S. Jagan Mohan Reddy, we totally support this Bill. 
I am having some demands and desires on OBC reservations. I would like 
place before the Government, through you, Madam. Please permit me. Almost 50 per 
cent of the population of our country consists of women. In this 50 per cent, the 
women who talk about politics are less than one per cent and the women who are in 
politics are less than 0.5 per cent. 33 percen t reservation is being provided to women 
through this Bill. My wish here is, just as  proportionate reservation is being given to 
Schedule Castes and Schedu le Tribes, women should al so be given proportionate 
reservation of 50 per cent and include 27 per cent to OBCs. OBCs are socially 
backward people. OBCs are economically backward people. In our country, though 
some women are from wealthy families, th ey do not have financial independence. 
There are women who are backward in education. That is why while giving 50 percent 
reservation to women, I am also asking for 27% reservation for OBCs. It is said that 
this Bill will come into effect after the process of delimitation. This means that after the 
Bill is enacted into law, we will have to wait  for at least seven more years to reap the 
benefits of this Bill. It is like; a full course meal is served and is asked to be eaten after 
seven years. This Bill is as beautiful as this. This is ve ry unfortunate. This Bill will be 
useful if reservation is made ef fective immediately. It will be useful to their party also if 
the Bill is implemented immediately. Through you, I request the hon. Prime Minister to 
think in this way.  
Madam, what is the object of Indian re servation system? The object of Indian 
reservation system is to improve the social and educational opportunities for the 
underprivileged communities and thus uplift their lifestyle to have a place in the 
mainstream of Indian system. That is th e objective. Why don't you apply to the 
OBCs? Why don’t you apply the same principle to the (Other Backward Class) 
OBCs? Do you think that the OBCs are no t economically backward people? Do you 
think that the OBCs are not educationally backward people? Do you think that the 
OBCs are not socially backward people ? Then, why are you not applying that 
principle here? I am unable to understand why you are showing th is discrimination. I 
request the hon. Prime Minister to think about this.  
                                                            
* English translation of the original speech delivered in Telugu.  
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
63

I want to bring one incident to the notice of this august House. It is unfortunate 
that the hon. former Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh wrote a letter to the Union 
Minister of Law and Justice, that the OBCs are not eligible to be appointed as Judges 
in the High Courts. This is  very unfortunate Madam Chai rperson. Why this kind of 
oppression in these contemporary times?  
 Justice Hima Bindu, a young woman judg e, is principal special judge of ACB 
Court, Vijayawada. She delivered a landmark  judgment in a case relating to former 
Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh, Shri  Chandrababu Naidu. Justice Sesuraiah, 
Retired Supreme Court Judge is from OBC Community. Justice (late) B.S.A. 
Swamy, who served as Judge in High Co urt is also from OBC Community. He 
belongs to my district." (Time bell rings.) 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR. KANIMOZHI NVN SOMU): Please conclude.  
 
SHRI SUBHAS CHANDRA BOSE PILLI: 
"Have they ever deliv ered any judgment 
which was unconstitutional? Then, why did the former Chief Minister of Andhra 
Pradesh write this letter? Why this despot ism? Why this oppression? Madam, I am 
feeling very sad to bring these things to th e notice of the people of this country and 
also to this august House. In these times, where such letters ar e written and people 
are oppressed, if OBCs are not given reserv ation, they will start questioning. People 
are educated now. If they are oppressed in these times, they do not have patience to 
wait and watch. Through you, I request th e Hon’ble Prime Minister to bring OBC Bill 
on urgent basis."  
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR. KANIMOZHI NVN SOMU): Your time is up. ( Time 
bell rings.) 
 
SHRI SUBHAS CHANDRA BOSE PILLI: 
"I once again thank you, madam for giving 
me the opportunity to speak."   
 
SHRI RAVICHANDRA VADDIRAJU (Tel angana): Thank you, Madam. यतर् नायर्Îतु 
पूज्यन्ते रमन्ते ततर् देवता:। 
"Hon. Madam, Vice-Chairperson,  I thank you for giving me 
the opportunity to speak on the Women’s Re servation Bill. I also thank the Hon’ble 
                                                            
English translation of the original speech made in Telugu. 
 
64
[RAJYA SABHA]

Chief Minister of Telangana, Shri K.  Chandrashekar Rao for giving me the 
opportunity. “Yatra Nariyastu Pujyanthe,  Ramante Tatra Devatha ", i.e., where 
women are honoured, divinity blossoms there and such a society advances. A society 
where women are disrespected cannot pr osper, says our culture.Women have 
always held a special place in Puranas and hi story. The first worship was done to the 
woman as Adiparashakti. Our Vedas say that nature is the form of a woman. Our 
Rishis always exhorted us to worship the Mother as Mathrudevobhava. Our 
Upanishads and Shastras describe woman as an empowered Shakti.  Matriarchal 
system continued during the era of kings. Women were respected. In course of time, 
with the establishment of family system, women's familial responsibilities increased 
and got confined to home. As a result, male dominance increased in the society.  Half 
the sky, half the chances. Men and women, bo th are equal in the institution of family. 
Movements started 30 years ago for equal rights and opportunities in legislatures. Due 
to the lack of sincerity of the ruling political parties at the Centre, the Bill was confined 
to remain on paper for years. The issu e of women's reserv ation was not taken 
forward as it was linked to the issue of OBCs’ reservation. Though, on several 
occasions, the Bill was brought forward in the Parliament yet it was like taking one 
step forward and two steps backward . From Telangana Sayudha Poratam 
(Telangana Rebellion) to Swarashtra Move ment, Telangana women have shown that 
they are not only capable of ruling the State but also po ssess defiant courage to rebel 
if needed. From Rani Rudrama Devi, who provided a welfare regime, to Sammakka, 
Saralamma, Chakali Ilamma’s Telangan a Rebellion and struggle for separate 
Telangana, Telangana soil has become a symbol of women power. The Telangana 
Government, which continues to govern the St ate with the spirit of the movement, is 
working tirelessly for women's empowerment and their welfare. 
To empower women and for their further welfare, Telangana Government has 
provided 50 per cent reservation for wo men in local bodies and 50 per cent 
reservation for women in GHMC. Telangana Government also provided 33 per cent 
reservation in market committees an d endowment committees, 33 per cent 
reservation for women in jobs, 10 per cent pl ots in new industrial parks for women, 33 
per cent reservation for women in civil po lice jobs and 10 per cent reservation in 
armed reserve police jobs from the year 2015;  also 33.33% of the initial appointments 
in the EWS category, 33 per cent reservatio n for women journalists in accreditations, 
Kalyan Lakshmi, Shadi Mubarak, Pension for single woman, support to beedi 
workers, door-to-door drinking water su pply through Mission Bhagiratha, Arogya 
Lakshmi, KCR kit, KCR Nutritionist Kit, 2 BHK houses in the name of women under 
Gruha Lakshmi Scheme, Land purchase scheme for SCs for woman, Industrial Park 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
65

'WE HUB' exclusively for women entrepreneurs in Telangana. All these Schemes were 
launched by Hon. Chief Minister, Shri K.  Chandrashekar Rao for catering to the 
welfare of the women in Telangana.  
Hon. Chief Minister, Shri K. Chandras hekar Rao is encouraging sportswomen 
like P.V. Sindhu (Badminton), Mary Kom (Boxing) and Meghana Sadula (Rifle 
Shooting) and also women from different ar ena. Within 12 days of the formation of 
Telangana in 2014 and assuming the charge  of the government, a resolution was 
passed on 14 th June, 2014 to provid e 33 per cent reservation for women in the 
Telangana Legislative Assembly and the same was sent to the Parliament.  
He also wrote a letter recently on 15 th September to the Hon. Prime Minister 
requesting for 33 per cent reservation for th e OBC Community. Even before this Bill 
was introduced, in the year 2014 itself, Shri K. Chandrashekar Rao recommended 
reservation for women and OBCs. Therefore, all the credit should go to him. Women 
are the new forces driving the country. They should be provided 33 per cent 
reservation of seats in Lok Sabha and State legislatures. BRS National President, Shri 
K. Chandrashekar Rao, directed Smt. K Kavitha, MLC even before Telangana 
Movement to strive for women empowerment and reservation for women in the 
Telangana Legislative Assembly. On 8th March, 2023, on the occasion of International 
Women’s Day, she staged a protest at  Jantar Mantar demanding Women’s 
Reservation Bill to be passed in Parliament. 18 political parties participated in the 
dharna and expressed solidarity. On 5 th September, 2023, she wrote letters to 47 
political parties for 33 per cent women's quota in Lok Sabha and state legislative 
assemblies. 
The Central Government should immediately implement 33 per cent reservation 
for women in the Lok Sabha and State Legislative Assemblies so as to make it worthy 
and beneficial for women in the upcoming el ections. I also request for reservation for 
OBCs. In this age of computers, we are proud that we successf ully landed on the 
Moon. We achieved this feat and have wo n laurels from the world community. Hon. 
Chief Minister, Shri K. Chandrashekar Ra o got the census conducted for the entire 
state of Telangana in a single day. If this  government wishes, the census of the entire 
country can be conducted in a single day.  The Women’s Reservation Bill and this 
Special Session will have re levance only when the Bill is implemented before the 
upcoming elections. Thank You, Madam.    
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR.  KANIMOZHI NVN SOMU): Smt. P.T. Usha. She is 
not present. Now, Shri Kanakamedala Ravindra Kumar. 
 
66
[RAJYA SABHA]

SHRI KANAKAMEDALA RAVINDRA KUMAR (Andhra Pradesh): I thank you Madam 
Vice-Chairperson for giving me this golden o pportunity to take part in the discussion 
on this historic legislation. Today, this House has taken up for its consideration and 
passing the Constitution (One Hundred and Twenty-eighth) Amendment Bill, 2023, 
which, after its passing, will pa ve the way for reserving 1/3 rd of seats in the Lok 
Sabha, State Assemblies and the Legislative Assembly of the National Capital 
Territory of Delhi. 
 The Statement of Objects and Reasons to  the Bill, inter alia, states, ‘However, 
true empowerment of women will require greater participation of women in the 
decision making process as they bring differe nt perspectives and enrich the quality of 
legislative debates and decision-making.’   
 Madam, whenever women empowermen t is debated and discussed, one 
cannot forget the significant contribution made by our Telugu Desam Party founder, 
Shri Nandamuri Taraka Rama Rao. Shri N.T.  Rama Rao garu is fondly called, known 
and remembered as NTR. Madam, way back in 1985 itself, through legislation, in 
Andhra Pradesh Assembly, he gave women equal share in the paternal property. That 
Bill gave daughters a share in the Hindu join t family property. It treated daughters as 
coparceners from the day of birth. This ground-breaking move set a precedent for the 
nation.   
Madam, NTR garu was a visionary leader  and many States followed his steps 
and enacted laws in their respective States and also by the Centre to give share in 
property to daughters. Apart from this , our leader, Chandrababu Naidu garu, has 
implemented reservation, without there be ing any amendment to legislation, for 
women in local body elections, both in ru ral and urban areas. Our leader and former 
Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh, Shri N. Chandrababu Naidu, had consistently 
demonstrated his commitment to women em powerment. Our leader had appointed 
Smt. Pratiba Bharati as Speak er of the Andhra Pradesh Le gislative Assembly in 1999 
itself.   
Madam, my learned colleague, Mr. Subhas Chandra Bose PIlli, while speaking 
on this Bill, made an allegation against Chandrababu Naidu garu that he wrote a letter 
to the Chief Justice that OBCs should no t be appointed as Judges. It is a false 
allegation and he misrepresented the House.  During his tenure of 14 years as Chief 
Minister of Andhra Pradesh, Shri Chandr ababu made several r ecommendations that 
BCs and women candidates be appointed as Judges. 
Madam, the Women's Reservation Bill was first brought by the Government led 
by Shri H.D. Devegowda in 1996.   
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
67

THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (DR. KANIMOZHI NVN SOMU): Please conclude. 
 
SHRI KANAKAMEDALA RAVINDRA KUMAR: After that, it was referred to the 
Committee headed by Mrs. Mukherjee. Then, Shri Atal Bihari Vajpayee also made 
sincere efforts and brought this Bill in 1998.  But, it could not be passed. The Bill, 
though brief in nature, brings new era in th e life of our country. It will create history by 
reserving a certain number of seats for women in Legislatures and the Lok Sabha.  It 
is a proud moment for this House. This Bill has a provision for women reservation 
through Article 330A and 332A in the form of  constitutional amendment. Under this, 
one-third seats are reserved for women by vertical reservation in all these three 
categories. (Time-bell rings.) 
 Madam, there are doubts in the mind s of some people regarding this Bill 
coming into effect.  Madam, it is my earnest appeal to the Government to make the 
Bill a reality at the earliest. 
 With these words, I extend my support to the Bill on beha lf of my Telugu 
Desam Party.  I urge the Government to brin g this Bill into force at the earliest. Thank 
you. 
 
 (MR. CHAIRMAN in the Chair.) 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri K.C. Venugopal. You have ten minutes. 
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL (Rajasthan): Thank you Mr. Chairman, Sir, for giving me 
this opportunity to participate in the discussion on this important legislation. It was a 
long journey. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: From your party, you are the only man, rest are women. 
...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: Sir, this journey started from 1931 onwards when Smt. 
Sarojini Naidu wrote a letter to the then Prime Minister for equal power between men 
and women. Then, certainly, Balwantraiji, Indi raji and, finally, Rajivji in 1989 brought a 
great legislation to empower women in lo cal bodies. Actually, Naddaji spoke very 
much about their claim on th is Bill.  What happened in 1989 when Rajivji introduced 
the Bill giving empowerment to women in lo cal bodies? Sir, the entire BJP opposed 
that Bill! Who are all those stalwarts of BJP who opposed that? Sir, I took out the 
record from the Rajya Sabha Secretariat to see who are all the people who voted 
68
[RAJYA SABHA]

against that Bill. It was Shri Lal Krishna Advani, Shri Atal Bi hari Vajpayee, Shri 
Jaswant Singh and Shri Ram Jethmalani. All of them opposed that Bill. Sir, this is the 
record of the Rajya Sabha.  Now, you claim you are the champion of this Bill. Sir, of 
course, in 2010, we had brought and pa ssed the Bill in the Rajya Sabha. But, 
unfortunately, we were not in  a position to pass the Bill in the Lok Sabha. But, you 
came to power in 2014. You have made a promise to the people of India, ‘We are 
going to bring Women's Reservation Bill.’ Who stopped you? From 2014 to 2023 – 9 
years – who stopped you to bring this Bill? I would like to know from the hon. Prime 
Minister whether he was waiting for this new building to introduce this Bill! Was there 
any Vaastu issue in that building? Wa s it there? Otherwise, is there good Muhurta  for 
introducing this Bill in 2023? You lost nine -and-a-half years!  Now, you are saying 
that you are going to implement it from 2029 after delimitation.  Then, where is the 
sincerity?   
 Sir, game-changing legislations and life transforming legislations have to come 
from the heart of rulers, not from the brain of rulers. We have  witnessed many life-
transforming legislations - MGNREGA, Right to Information, food security and, of 
course, land acquisition. We have witnessed such kind of life-transforming Bills. They 
all have come from the heart of rulers. Now, this Bill, at the end of the period of the 
Lok Sabha, is not coming from  the heart of the rulers. This  is coming from brain of 
rulers. It is because you have political calculation to bring this Bill.  Why did that 
political calculation come? It came after Karnataka elections. The Congress party 
strengthened the entire women folk of Ka rnataka through guarantees and we have 
implemented those guarantees. The entire women of Karnataka are with us. You ask 
people in Karnataka what they are ta lking about those gu arantees. They are 
empowered. Women can be empowere d through political or economic 
empowerment. Sir, which is the biggest ec onomic empowerment legislation of this 
country? It is MGNREGA. Fifty-eight per cent of women are working under NREGA.  
 
3.00 P.M. 
 
Your Prime Minister told, 'this is the memo ry of our corruption. 'Then he corrected 
that. During the entire Covid period, the only one scheme that benefitted the poor 
people of this country was the MNREGA. ...(Interruptions)... Then, Self-Help Group 
was brought in 2011. The UPA brought th at. Kerala started it earlier through 
'Kudumbashree'
. All these are economical empowerment of women. Now, at the time 
of the Lok Sabha elections, you have brought this Bill, and you are telling, 'We are the 
champions.' You opposed Rajivji's Bill.   
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
69

Now, Sir, there are a lot many Bhashans about this Bill. When is it going to be 
implemented? We need a clear-cut answer. Naddaji  told, '2029'. If it is going to 
happen in 2029, when will the Census take  place, when would the Delimitation 
p r o c e s s  s t a r t ,  w h e n  i s  i t  g o i n g  t o  b e  completed and when will the women get a 
representation as per this law? All this has to be answered by the hon. Prime Minister 
or the Government.   
 Sir, here, Naddaji talked about OBC Reservation which happened in that 
House. I also read some articles in today' s newspapers that 'our hon. Home Minister 
has spoken that the Prime Minister of Indi a has given his entire bank account to the 
employees.'  That is good. But you have to  remember about this also that the Iron 
Lady, Indira Gandhiji, the then Prime Minister of India, in 1962 War, when the country 
was in a difficult period, donated her entire jewellery to the National Defence Fund; 
Prime Minister, Indira Gandhi, did it. We ar e proud, Sir, that we had a leader like 
Indira Gandhiji. They are talking about wo men empowerment. Who is the first woman 
Prime Minister? Who has given the first woman Prime Minister? Who has given the 
first woman President of India?  Who has gi ven the first Lok Sabha Speaker of India? 
Who has given the first Governor of India? Who has given the first Party President of 
India? ...(Interruptions)... Everything is 'Congress', Sir. Then, they are trying to 
become the champions of these things. ...(Interruptions)... No, I am not yielding. 
...(Interruptions)... Sir, if you are going to do the Census ... ...(Interruptions)... 
Naddaji talked about OBC. OBC क े िलए बहुत ज्यादा बोल िदया। Then, why are you 
running away from Caste Census? ...(Interruptions)...  Why are you running away 
from Caste Census? If you have an OBC prem, do the Caste Census and show the 
country. Why are you running away from the Caste Census? You are just talking. 
...(Interruptions)... Yes, we are proudly saying, 'Out  of our four Chief Ministers, 
three are from OBC community.' You are talking about the 'Congress.'  
...(Interruptions)... Therefore, you have to understand it.   
 Then, Sir, these people are talking about women empowerment. All of my 
fellow Parliamentarians spoke about Unnao, Kathua, Manipur and Hathras. Sir, I was 
also pained when I saw the video of wome n paraded naked in Ma nipur. When I went 
there with Rahul Gandhji, the women-folk of Manipur were crying before us. Our 
Prime Minister did not even utter a single word in hundred days.  ...(Interruptions)...  
Then you are talking about women empowerment! ...(Interruptions)... What women 
empowerment is there! ...(Interruptions)...  Yes, there is no discrimination . 
...(Interruptions)... I am telling it very clearly. There is one thing. ...(Interruptions)... 
They are talking about women empowerment. Take 'Beti Bachao Beti Padhao'. The 
Government utilized only Rs. 156 crores out of a Budget of Rs. 8
48 crores. ...( Time 
70
[RAJYA SABHA]

bell rings.)... Shockingly, 80 per cent of the fund allocated was spent on publicity for 
'Beti Bachao Beti Padhao.'   In 2023, the Budget for Mission Shakti was declined by 
1.2 per cent which included your Pradhan Mantri Matru Vandana  Yojana, Women 
Helpline, Beti Bachao Beti Padhao, and other schemes. ...(Time bell rings.)...  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Thirty seconds.  
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: You speak about wo men safety. But why is thirty per cent 
Nirbhaya fund unutilized? When you are sp eaking about the women security, why is 
30 per cent Nirbhaya Fund unutilized? Give us an answer. Sir, there is price rise and 
the women are crying. The price of LPG gas is thousand rupees. Take tomato. There 
is price rise everywhere. ...(Time-bell rings.)...  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Mr. Venugopal, your time is over.  
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: Sir, I am concluding. One minute only. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Next, Shri Derek O'Brien.  
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: Sir, one minute. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Your time is over. ...(Interruptions)... Hon. Members, I have to go 
by the time available. I am so sorry. ...(Interruptions)...  Okay, from your Party, we 
will delete the rest. We will adjust. Okay! Go ahead.  
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: Sir, my point is th at women are in a very great difficult 
situation in this country due to price ri se. You are talking about empowerment of 
women. What is the LPG gas price? It is  Rs.1200. The petrol and diesel price is 
hiking. The tomato price is hiking. They ar e facing difficulties  everywhere. On the 
other hand, their security is totally compro mised. At the time of the election period, 
they are bringing such a legislation and they are telling that this is not going to happen 
this time.  
 Therefore, we need only two assuran ces from this Government. One is, this 
Bill has to be implemented quickly, imme diately. Then, there should be an OBC 
Reservation provision in this Bill. These two major things are there. We are supporting 
this Bill because this is ou r child. Therefore, basically, we are supporting it. Very 
strongly, we are supporting it. There is no doubt about it. But, if this Bill is going to be 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
71

implemented only in 2029, then, what is the purpose of calling the Special Session? 
...(Interruptions)... What is the use of Special Sessi on? We could have passed it in 
Winter Session. We could have eas ily passed it in Winter Session? 
...(Interruptions)...  
       There is one more thing which I have to say. You have to allow me. Sir, two 
major events happened in last one month. On e is the inauguration of this Parliament 
Building. We all expected that the hon. President and hon. Vice-President will be 
there. You are the custodian of this Rajya Sabha, Sir. It is an insult to us, the Rajya 
Sabha Members. Our Chairman was not there at that time. ...(Interruptions)... Our 
Chairman was not there at that time. The President of India was not there at that time. 
...(Interruptions)...   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Members, we can't trade on deficiencies. We can't trade 
ignorance of others. Let me make it ve ry clear. The Vice-Pres ident and the hon. 
President have been accorded  the highest respect in the country. Number one.  
...(Interruptions)... No.2; there has been no constitutional transgression. The 
position of the President and the Vice-President or the Chairman has to be kept at the 
level as expected and that was done, and th at is what you have seen in last three 
days also. I would appeal to you that as a Member of the leading Opposition party, 
you must do your homework. Find out. It doesn't send a good message when you 
bring in the hon. President also. Read the Co nstitution and you will find that the role 
has been defined categorically.  ...(Interruptions)... Leave it at that. 
...(Interruptions)... Let us not get into that area. ...(Interruptions)...  
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: Sir, I know that ...  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I can assure you, your Chairman will not allow anyone to denude his 
power.  
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: Thank you, Sir.  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Therefore, there has been  no denudation. There has been no 
decrease. ...(Interruptions)... Get over this perception. ...(Interruptions)...  W e  
believe in rule of law, in constitutionalism.  Point out a single article of Constitution 
which, according to you, has been transgressed.  ...(Interruptions)... We cannot 
lower the dignity of the hon. President.  ...(Interruptions)... The hon. President has 
to come here under the Constitution. ...(Interruptions)... And let me tell you, hon. 
72
[RAJYA SABHA]

Members. ...(Interruptions)... Please take your seat. In the first amendment of the 
Indian Constitution, please recall it, th ere was a provision by framers of the 
Constitution that the hon. President will address every Session of Parliament. That 
was the original prescription in the Co nstitution. And, the amendment was once a 
year. The hon. President has to actually act in accord with the Constitution. The 
Constitution stipulates... ...(Interruptions)... No. Don't reduce our position.  
...(Interruptions)... Don't reduce our position, please.  Understand and do it. 
 
SHRI SYED NASIR HUSSAIN (KARNATAKA):  Sir, he was talking about the 
inauguration of this building.  Rest of what was said... ...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Mr. Nasir Hussain, do you think Mr. K.C. Venugopal needs your 
support? Some of you rise to give support. ...(Interruptions)... Mr. Venugopal, 
please conclude now. 
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: Sir, I am winding up. 
Sir, I respect your position and dignity. Surely, I respect that, but the people of 
India expected the hon. President of Indi a's and your presence. That is what I 
mentioned. Sir, one more thing; they have brought this B ill now and they are trying to 
become champions of that. They want to divert attention from a lot many issues. That 
is why they talk about 'one nation one el ection' and all these things. We know that. 
Can I ask them a question? Mr. Nadda talked  about representation of women in their 
party.  Even our party has enough repres entation of women. But who is controlling 
their party?  It is the Rashtriya Swayamsevak Sangh. Isn't that so? Can they tell us 
how many women are there in the RSS? ...(Interruptions).... I would like to quote a 
statement. In 2010, when the Bill was pa ssed in Rajya Sabha and it couldn't be 
passed in the Lok Sabha, at that time, the then Member of Parliament of Lok Sabha 
and now the Chief Minister of Uttar Prades h said, "There is women's representation 
at present at local level. How does this a ffect their domestic responsibilities like child 
care? It should be assessed whether wome n quota does not affect these roles." 
Therefore, their attitude is that women are meant only for child care. 
...(Interruptions).... 
 
पयार्वरण, वन और जलवायु पिरवतर्न मंतर्ी; तथा Ǜम और रोजगार मंतर्ी (Ǜी भूपेन्दर् यादव): सर, 
मेरा एक Ãवाइंट ऑफ ऑडर्र है। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
73

MR. CHAIRMAN: Mr. Venugopal, he has a point of order. ...(Interruptions).... 
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: Sir, their attitude is that women are meant only for child 
care. ...(Interruptions).... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Mr. Venugopal, nothing will go on record. ...(Interruptions).... 
There is a point of order. ...(Interruptions).... Nothing will go on record. Mr. 
Venugopal, nothing will go on record. There is a point of order. Please sit down. 
...(Interruptions)....  Please sit down, all of you. इतने आराम से बात हो रही है, आपने 
अपनी बात कही, एक Ãवाइंट ऑफ ऑडर्र है, उसको Ģेम से, Îमाइल से, कÇपोज़र से सुिनए। 
...(Ëयवधान)... Yes, Mr. Yadav, what is your point of order and under which rule?   
 
Ǜी भूपेन्दर् यादव: सर, रूल  235।  
 सर, रूल  235(ii) मȂ है िक िकसी भी म
 ेÇबर को यह अिधकार नहीं है िक सदन मȂ बैठे हुए 
िकसी भी सदÎय क े ऊपर कोई आक्षेप लगाए। हम भारतीय जनता पाटीर् क े सदÎयȗ क े ऊपर 
वेणुगोपाल जी िबना तथ्यȗ क े आधार पर आरोप लगा रहे हȅ। वे हमȂ िजस संगठन क े साथ जोड़ रहे 
हȅ, हमȂ उस संगठन का होने पर गवर् है। आरएसएस क े साथ जो 'राÍटर्ीय सेिवका सिमित' है, उसमȂ 
100 Ģितशत मिहलाए
ँ हȅ, जो राÍटर्भिƪ का कायर् करती हȅ। ...(Ëयवधान)... सुबह भी हमारे राÍटर्ीय 
अध्यक्ष जी न
े कहा था और मȅ उन्हीं क े शÅदȗ को दोहराना चाहता हूँ। मȅ कहना चाहता हूँ िक काँगर्ेस 
वाले ठीक से Ƿूशन  लेकर बोला करȂ, िबना तरीके  और िबना तथ्यȗ क े न बोला करȂ, िबना बात क े 
न बोला करȂ। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Mr. Venugopal. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI TIRUCHI SIVA (Tamil Nadu): Sir, I have a point of order. ...(Interruptions).... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Under which rule? 
 
SHRI TIRUCHI SIVA: Sir, it is  on the same rule, Rule 235.  It was read wrongly. It 
says, "(ii) shall not interrupt any Member wh ile speaking by disorderly expression or 
noises or in any other disorderly manner. " The hon. Member was speaking. He was 
being interrupted from that side only. How 
can the point of order be pointed towards 
him? ...(Interruptions)... 
 
Ǜी भूपेन्दर् यादव: सर ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Please read Rule 240. 
74
[RAJYA SABHA]

Ǜी भूपेन्दर् यादव: सर, मȅ वैसे बताता हूँ। कोई भी सदÎय irrelevant rule को नहीं उठाएगा। ितरुची 
िशवा ने irrelevant rule को उठाया है। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी सभापित: ऐसा है ...(Ëयवधान)... इसको conclude करते हȅ। ...(Ëयवधान)... बड़ा अच्छा लगता 
है, क ु छ हँसी क े फËवारे भी होने चािहए। यह िम लीभगत का मामला तो नहीं है। Now, please 
conclude. 
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: I am concluding. Sir, I was talking about the attitude of BJP 
leaders. I am quoting from an old articl e in the Hindustan Ti mes where there was a 
statement by the current UP Chief Minister who was then a Member of Parliament. It 
reads, "There is women's reservation at pres ent at local level.  How does this affect 
their domestic responsibilities like child car e?  It should be assessed whether women 
quota does not affect these roles?"  That means, their attitude is that women are 
meant only for child care. ...(Interruptions).... 
Sir, my point is, we are going to support this Bill.  Such a life-transforming Bill 
has to come from the mind and heart.  Our Prime Minister says that he has a 56 
inches-chest.  If he has got a 56 inches -chest, what is stopping them from 
implementing this Bill in 2024?  Please correct yourself with a heart. 
 Thank you, Sir. Jai Hind!    
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Derek O'Brien; seven minutes. 
 
SHRI DEREK O'BRIEN (West Bengal): Sir, ten minutes. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Seven minutes. Mr. K.C. Venugopal has taken the time of other 
Members. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI DEREK O'BRIEN: Sir, 
* 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Is something wrong with you? Sit down! 
 
SHRI DEREK O'BRIEN: Sir, I have got ten minutes of my Party. Why are you doing 
this, Sir? 
 
                                                            
* Expunged as ordered by the Chair. 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
75

MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, look here. Just sit down and listen to me. It has virtually 
become your refrain. All India Trinamool Congress -- Ms. Dola Sen took ten minutes. 
Your party's total time is 24 minutes. You have 14 minutes left; seven minutes each. 
You can take all the 14 minutes. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI DEREK O'BRIEN: Sir, just hear me out, please. ...(Interruptions)... Sir, just 
hear me out and then, if I am saying something wrong... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Just talk about the time. How much time does your party have? 
 
SHRI DEREK O'BRIEN: Sir, I am talking only about time. My party has 24 minutes.  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: How much has been used? 
 
SHRI DEREK O'BRIEN: Fourteen minutes. Te n minutes were take n by Ms. Dola Sen 
and four by Shrimati Mausam Noor. 24 minus 14 is 10. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: So, how much time is left? 
 
SHRI DEREK O'BRIEN: Ten minutes. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Okay. Take ten minutes.  
 
SHRI DEREK O'BRIEN: Sir, I have not started and it is already 1.25 minutes. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Doesn't matter. Take ten minutes. Go ahead. 
 
SHRI DEREK O'BRIEN: Sir, I support the Women's Reservation Bill. But when will this 
Government learn that this is a parliamenta ry democracy and that this is not an army 
commando operation?  In an army comma ndo operation, you need secrecy, you 
need surprise and you need stealth. In a parliamentary democracy, you don't. You 
need cooperation, you need sharing. Why do you bring this special parliamentary 
session bulletin with no agenda, saying th e agenda will be added later? Second, why 
do you have an all-party meeting on Sunday and don't mention a word about this 
Bill? Why do you have a Cabinet meeting and this morning, we were given four hours' 
time to submit amendments? Honestly, I appeal to them, parliamentary democracy 
with such secrecy hurts a democracy. We know why it is being done. For the last 
76
[RAJYA SABHA]

three days, one man's story is being told. Fa ir enough. Today, I want to begin with a 
quote, which everyone can own today -- "Sir, we want the Women's Reservation Bill 
to be introduced. We want nothing short of the Women's Reservation Bill. We want a 
specific date.  We want an assurance that the Women's Reservation Bill is brought. It 
is a matter of shame that it hasn't been brought.  We want a specific time-frame."  
This is very nice today. This was said by somebody in the Lok Sabha on 14 th of 
July, 1998.  It was a woman MP. Today, sh e is the three-time Chief Minister of 
Bengal; she is the founder Chairperson of  Trinamool Congress and she has already 
got 40 per cent of our women MP s in the Lok Sabha. From 14 th of July, 1998, let this   
woman's story be told. In 2006, a 26-day hunger strike! No reservation! Struggling 
and fighting for her rights as a woman!  In 2014, setting a record, -- the Bill didn't get 
passed; and what she did! -- she gave 41 per cent of tickets in the Lok Sabha to 
women MPs. The BJP President, the first sp eaker, was saying, "This is the shortest 
way to bring women to Parliament." No, Sir, this is not the shortest way. You didn't 
need the Bill. Show us, and bring them to Parliament.   
Now, you come to the life of this woman.  In 2019, she sets a record. Not only 
that, she gave 40 per cent tickets to women, 39 per cent women Lok Sabha MPs are 
already sitting in the Lok Sabha. Why do I sa y this? It is one thing to give the women 
tickets, it is another thing to make sure you give them tickets which are winnable. We 
have heard one man story. One woman sto ry needs to be told today in this new 
Parliament Building. I will tell you more. In 2021, the Assembly elections in Bengal, a 
man came with money, with media, with muscle power with misogyny and mocked 
her, 'Didi, O Didi'. You even tried to smash and you broke her foot. You smashed it to 
injure her.  Yes, she gave you th e answer truly like a woman, softly. 
...(Interruptions)... When I talk about Mr. Modi and Mr. Shah, I get under the skin. I 
know it. ...(Interruptions)... The woman didn't answer; the people of Bengal in India 
provided the answer. After the elections, what happened? The Health Ministry of 
Bengal, the Finance Ministry of  Bengal, the Land Ministry, the Industry Ministry, the 
Commerce Ministry are all headed by women. You couldn't find one woman in your 16 
Chief Ministers to make a Chief Minister an d you are coming and telling us what to do 
for women. Take some of our advice. Now we will give you like how we gave you in 
1998, you are trying to implement in 2045 or  whatever. Listen to two pieces of advice 
from us and take it in good spirit because  women, at least, my Chairperson has a 
vision which I look up to. So, here is one su ggestion. If you are so keen, -- it is past 
2.00 p.m. already, so nobody can submit any amendments -- as we are all saying, 
the Congress Party, the Trinamool, the DMK, the AAP, all of us, we, INDIA, bring this 
in 2024. So, all you need to do is to bring this in 2024 and to remove 334A from your 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
77

existing Bill.  Bring it; we will start it in 2024. It is a suggestion. If you are finding it 
difficult to do, here is another solution. At least, you try it. In 2024, an open challenge 
from my Party, you bring one-third of wo men elected from your  party and show us. 
Bring them and show us. I guarantee you. You bring one-third of women with your 
Bill and without your Bill. Some people ha ve a sense of humour and I am sure we 
have not lost our sense of humour here because  the joke going around is that there is 
a typographical error in the Bill that actually  it is 2024 but actually they meant 2034. I 
don't know whether it is true or false, but I have got a second suggestion.  It is very 
nice, your idea this morning of having ladi es sit there for 15 minutes or 16 minutes 
throughout the day. So, here is an id ea which may not happen in 2024, but think 
about it, it is coming to you from my Part y as a suggestion. Get everybody on board, 
have proper discussion on the subject and then bring one-third women reservation in 
Rajya Sabha also. We will all support it. It  cannot be done in a hurry, but bring it. 
Today, you may think it is a crazy genie idea, bu t 'No', it is possible, if not in the next 
six years, in the next ten ye ars. The question is, for all the speeches we hear, is the 
BJP really serious about empowering women because all the struggles and 
oppressions faced by women are not because of women, it is because of men and 
their outlook to women? I don't want to wa ste my time on a former wrestling chief. 
Leave that. I am quoting from the Hind ustan Times. I quote, "People in air-
conditioned rooms in Delhi cannot decide pub lic policy. This Bill will drown the Indian 
political system if it goes through. If me n develop feminine traits, they become Gods. 
If women develop masculine traits, they become Rakshas. Western ideas of women's 
liberation should be properly analysed in the Indian context."  Who said it? I will tell 
you. You can build the new building, but I request all of you to first change your mind-
set. This was said by the current  Chief Minister of Uttar Pradesh . In conclusion, I am 
happy I am being allowed to conclude today;  in the old House, at least, I was not 
allowed, but I am happy. I wish to conclu de by remembering my  favourite woman of 
all time.  My Ma, my mother, who is no more. Ma would always tell me, "You know 
Derek, this world is divided into only two kinds of people, the talkers and the doers." 
So some people will talk like Rs.15 lakhs will come in your bank account, farmers' 
income will treble, after demonetisation, this will happen and so on. There is one 
difference between the talkers and the doer s. There is only on e difference because 
there are only two kinds of people. So, there is a talker and there is a doer. There is a 
male Prime Minister of India and there is a simple woman who is the Chief Minister of 
Bengal. Thank you so much.     
                     
78
[RAJYA SABHA]

MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Derek O'Brien is called upon to authenticate two statements 
made by him. One, 'Man came with money' . Second, the allegation he has levelled 
by quoting the present Chief Minister of Utta r Pradesh during the course of the day.  
...(Interruptions)... Now, Shri Manas Ranjan Mangaraj ...(Interruptions)... 
Authenticate it. Already Mr. Jairam Ramesh  and Mr. Chidambaram are yet to do it. 
...(Interruptions)... It has to be.  ...(Interruptions)...  
 
Ǜी मानस रं जन मंगराज (ओिडशा): सर, मȅ इस िबल का समथर्न करता हूँ। ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ मेरी 
मातृभाषा ओिड़या मȂ बोलना चाहता हूँ। ...(Ëयवधान)...   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: The direction is very clear. Sit down. ...(Interruptions)... Hon. 
Member, I had indicated very firmly that this is not a place to trade allegations. Every 
Member has a right to say anything. ...(Interruptions)... You will have to authenticate 
it during the course of the day. That's a directive. ...(Interruptions)...  
 
SHRI DEREK O'BRIEN:  
 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Manas Ranjan Mangaraj ...(Interruptions)... Take your seat, 
Mr. Derek O'Brien. ...(Interruptions)... No floor; nothing will go on record. 
...(Interruptions)...  Nothing will go on record.  Sit down. You have to sit down. 
Don't force my hands. ...(Interruptions)... Sit down. You will have to comply with the 
directive.  ...(Interruptions)...  You level an allegation that the Prime Minister of this 
country went to West Bengal with money, and you still want me to condone it . 
...(Interruptions)... Prove it. ...(Interruptions)... Shri Manas Ranjan Mangaraj 
...(Interruptions)...  Your time is three minutes.   
 
SHRI MANAS RANJAN MANGARAJ: Sir, I support this Bill. महोदय, मȅ अपनी मातृभाषा 
ओिड़या मȂ बोलना चाहता हूँ।  
 
†"Biju Janata Dal has been working ti relessly for the empowerment of women 
in all walks of life. In the year 1992, the th en Chief Minister, Shri Biju Patnaik made a 
historic decision to reserve 33% of seats fo r women in Panchayati Raj Institutions. In 
the year 2011, his son, Shri Naveen Patnaik, the Chief Minister of Odisha, and also the 
president of BJD, increased the reservation for women to 50%. In the year 2012, Shri 
                                                            
 Not recorded. 
† English translation of the original speech delivered in Odia. 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
79

Naveen Patnaik made the provision of pr oviding 50% reservation for women in the 
urban local bodies, municipalities and m unicipal corporations which shows the 
commitment of the BJD Party to the cause of women’s empowerment. Sir, Hon’ble 
Chief Minister, Shri Naveen Patnaik be lieves that without the empowerment of 
women, holistic development of society, stat e and nation is impossible. Keeping that 
in mind, under his leadership,  the Odisha Assembly unanim ously passed a resolution 
to provide 33% reservation to women in state assemblie s and Lok Sabha and Rajya 
Sabha. Sir, in December 2018, under the su pervision of senior party leaders, Chief 
Minister Shri Naveen Patnaik sent a 22- member delegation of the BJD Party to 
various national and regional parties seeking their support for the passage of the Bill in 
Parliament.  
 
[THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (MS. INDU BALA GOSWAMI) in the Chair.] 
 
Madam, for the 2019 General Elections, th e Hon’ble Chief Minister reserved 33% of 
Lok Sabha seats to women. Subsequently, 7 women candidates from the BJD Party 
contested the elections, out of whom 5 women candidates won and are presently 
representing the Aska, Bhadrak, Jajpur, Jagatsinghpur and Keonjhar constituencies 
of Odisha. Madam, Smt. Pramila Bisoyi, as well as Ms. Chandrani Murmu have had 
the opportunity to represent the state of Od isha, as the senior most and the youngest 
MPs of Lok Sabha respectively. Hon’ble Chief Minister has been fighting a long-
drawn battle to secure the passage of the Women’s Reservation Bill. There has been 
a repeated demand from the BJD MPs to  pass the Women’s Reservation Bill in 
Parliament. On many occasions, our hon. Ch ief Minister has been writing letters and 
on various platforms, through his repeated demands, he has been highlighting the 
importance of passing the Women’s Reserva tion Bill. The Cabinet’s approval for 
introducing and passing the B ill in Parliament is a grand victory for our hon. Chief 
Minister, Shri Naveen Patnaik, as he has been  relentlessly fighting for the cause. It is 
a victory for the women of Odisha and ou r country. Due to the fervent and tireless 
endeavour of our hon. Chief Minister, the women of our country and Odisha are going 
to reap the grand benefits in the realm of women empowerment."                                                       
 
SHRI RYAGA KRISHNAIAH (Andhra Pradesh): Thank you, Madam, for giving me this 
opportunity to participate in the di scussion on the Constitution (128
th Amendment) 
Bill.  This is welcome, long overdue and much awaited. I would like to take this 
moment to highlight the issue pertaining to the Bill at hand. In this country, there are 
 
80
[RAJYA SABHA]

two types of discrimination that we see. One is gender discrimination and the other 
one is caste discrimination. After passing of this Bill, gender discrimination will 
gradually come down.  But, caste discrimi nation will still remain there. To remove 
caste discrimination in this Bill relating to  women's reservation, I want to suggest to 
the Central Government to provide sub-qu ota to the OBC women also. If BC women 
are not represented in this Bill, this reserv ation Bill for women will not be meaningful. 
We supported the demand for reservation for women, as they have the least political 
representation. But, the BC women are still under-represented. Why is there no 
proposal for giving them sub-quota?  If  technically, providing sub-quota is not 
possible, the Government should introduce the Bill for providing reservation to the 
women belonging to the Backward Classes (B C). It is clear that all the political 
parties have a soft corner for the BCs.   
 Moreover, the general representation for the men belonging to the Backward 
Classes is also very low, that is, 15 per cent or below. Even after 75 years of 
independence, justice has not been done to the Backward Classes. It is a democratic 
country which should give share to all the ca stes and social groups according to their 
population. Then, there will be unity, integr ity and peace in this country. Therefore, it 
will be wrong if we do not give due share to  the Backward Classes. It is the time to 
give the Backward Classes their constitutional rights and share. Even after 75 years of 
democracy, 56 per cent of the population of  this country, which comprises of BCs, 
has only 15 per cent representation in the political sphere, 16 per cent in the 
employment sphere, 1 per cent in the indust rial sector and 5 per cent in the private 
sector jobs. This shows that there is ne ed for the BCs to be given the due share 
according to their population. We request that if the BCs are not given a share 
according to their population in all the sectors, there may be a rebellion in the 
country. It is just not enough to give a few schemes for the welf are of the Backward 
Classes and providing some reservation fo r the BCs in education and employment. 
The real development of the Backward Cla sses will come about only when they will 
get some political power. This is possible only when the seats are reserved for the 
BCs in the legislative bodies. The Indian Constitution has been amended 128 times, 
but it has not been amended even once to provide political power to the BCs.   
 The social set-up in our country is f undamentally built on caste system. Unless 
all the castes get their due share in politi cal power, the country cannot become a real 
democratic republic. Reservation in legisl ative bodies can provide gateway for power 
to the BCs. Political power will give th em respect, confidence,  acceptance and will 
remove social disparity. Power to the BC s will evolve them to bring forth their 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
81

difficulties, problems and miseries to the notice of the country at large and enable the 
rulers to take right steps for their development.   
 The present socio-economic and political set-up of our society has been 
designed against the interests of the Back ward Classes. To change the present set-
up, it is essential to give due share to the Other Backward Classes (OBCs) in the 
legislative bodies. Political power has beco me a right to property for those people 
who are ruling and inherit it to their own successive generations.  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( सुǛी इंदु बाला गोÎवामी): माननीय सदÎय, please conclude. आपका समय 
खत्म हो रहा है। 
 
SHRI RYAGA KRISHNAIAH: But, now in India, democracy is going for a social 
change process, which has already begun. The Backward Classes constitute the bulk 
of the productive workforce in India, whether it is the agriculture sector, the industrial 
sector or the service sector. Therefore, it is desirable to make their participation in the 
law-making bodies meaningful. I am fighting for the backward classes for the last fifty 
years. 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (सुǛी इंदु बाला गोÎवामी): माननीय सदÎय, आपका समय समाÃत हो गया है।  
 
SHRI RYAGA KRISHNAIAH: Please give me five minutes more. 
In any egalitarian society, the power sh ould be shared equally amongst all the 
sections of the society. When we talk  about power, it means economic power, 
political power and socio-cultural status. In our society, there is almost monopoly of 
the upper castes in all these three types of powers. 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( सुǛी इंदु बाला गोÎवामी): माननीय सदÎय, आपका समय समाÃत हो गया है। 
Please, co
nclude.  
 
SHRI RYAGA KRISHNAIAH: I am concluding in one minute, Madam. Even after 75 
years of Independence, India has no se parate ministry or department for the 
backward classes.  We have no reservation in the private sector.  
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (MS. INDU BALA GOSWAMI): Next speaker is Ms. Kavita 
Patidar. माननीय सदÎय, आपका समय पूरा हो गया है।  
 
82
[RAJYA SABHA]

SHRI RYAGA KRISHNAIAH: We have no reserv ation in the higher judiciary, in the 
Supreme Court or High Court. 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( सुǛी इंदु बाला गोÎवामी): माननीय सदÎय, Ãलीज़ बैठ जाइए। आपका समय हो 
गया है। ...(Ëयवधान)... सुǛी किवता पाटीदार। 
 
सुǛी किवता पाटीदार (मध्य Ģदेश): माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, आपने मुझे इस िबल पर 
बोलने का अवसर Ģदान िकया, आपका बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। आज मȅ " नारी शिƪ वंदन 
अिधिनयम" क े समथर्न म
Ȃ बात करने क े िलए खड़ी हुई हूं। सबसे पहले मȅ देश क े यशÎवी Ģधान 
मंतर्ी माननीय नरेन्दर् मोदी जी को ǭदय से कोिट-कोिट धन्यवाद Ģेिषत करती हूं, िजन्हȗने िंहदू 
संÎकृ ित क े इस पवर् गणेश आराधना क े समय मिहला आरक्षण िबल को इस सदन मȂ लाने का काम 
िकया है।  
महोदया, आज जब देश दुिनया की तीसरी बड़ी ताकत बनने की ओर अगर्सर है, तब ऐसे 
समय म
Ȃ सशƪ भारत क े िनमार्ण मȂ मिहलाओं की भागीदारी बहुत महत्वपूणर् हो जाती है। आज मȅ 
इितहास की तरफ देखूं तो रानी लÑमीबाई की बात कहूं, कÊपना चावला की बात कहूं या वतर्मान 
मȂ देश क े सवȘच्च पद पर आसीन हमारी महामिहम राÍटर्पित आदरणीय दर्ौपदी मुमूर् जी क े नेतृत्व 
का वणर्न करूं  - हम जानते हȅ िक हमारा देश मिहला क े सामथ्यर् और शिƪ का साक्षी रहा है।  
 
‘यह दुिनया अगर गुलशन है, तो नारी उसकी माली है, 
वह झुक जाए तो सीता ह
ै, अड़ जाए तो चंडी, काली है।’ 
 
 महोदया, देश की ऐसी सशƪ नारी की िंचता कर, देश क े िंचतन मȂ उनकी भागीदारी को 
सुिनिÌचत करने का काम माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी आदरणीय मोदी जी ने िकया है। हमने भगवान िशव 
क
े  अधर्नारीÌवर Îवरूप को भी देखा है, िजसके  माध्यम से संसार को नारी क े अिÎतत्व की 
आवÌयकता का संदेश िदया गया है। एक तरफ धमर् है, तो दूसरी तरफ संÎकार हȅ। ये हमारे 
संÎकार ही हȅ िक हम हमारे भारत देश को भी 'भारत माता' कह कर पुकारते हȅ। इसी मां भारती क े 
उज्ज्वल भिवÍय को सुिनिÌचत करने क े िलए, मिहलाओं क े सामथ्यर् का उपयोग करने क े िलए यह 
िबल माननीय मोदी जी क े ǎारा इस सदन मȂ लाया गया है।  
माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, िवगत 9 वषș से क Ȃ दर् की सरकार ने माननीय नरेन्दर् मोदी 
जी क े नेतृत्व मȂ न िसफर् मिहलाओं क े आगे अनेक अवसर उपलÅध कराए हȅ, अिपतु उनके  जीवन 
Îतर मȂ सुधार क े िलए िविभन्न योजनाओं क े माध्यम
 से Ģयास भी िकए हȅ। महोदया, मȅ 'उज्ज्वला 
योजना', 'मात ृ वंदना योजना', शौचालय िनमार्ण की बात करूं , ' बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ' की 
बात करूं , तो मिहला सशिƪकरण जैसी इन सभी योजनाओं क े माध्यम से मिहलाओं क े  अिधकारȗ 
मȂ वृिǉ क े संकÊप को पूरा िकया गया है। हम िसफर् राजनीित क े िलए या वोट क े िलए मिहलाओं 
का नाम नहीं लेते हȅ। मȅ पूणर् िवÌवास क े साथ इस बात को इस सदन मȂ कहती हूं िक िपछले 9 वषș 
मȂ हमारी सरका
र ने हमारी बहन, बेिटयȗ क े जीवन चकर् से जुड़ी हर समÎया पर ध्यान देकर 
उसके  समाधान का Ģयास िकया है। िपछले 9 वषș से भारत मȂ िजस Ģकार women 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
83

empowerment क े िलए काम िकया गया है, उसका पिरणाम आज नज़र आने लगा है। आज हम 
देख रहे हȅ िक भारत मȂ मिहलाओं की संख्या बढ़ी है। भारत मȂ आज साइंस, टेक् नोलॉजी, 
इंजीिनयिंरग, मैथ्स आिद मȂ लड़िकयȗ की भागीदारी 43 परसȂट है।  
 मȅ मध्य Ģदेश की बात करूं  तो मध्य Ģदेश मȂ आज बेिटयȗ का जन्म उत्सव मना है। 'लाडली 
लÑमी' जैसी योजना को पूरे देश ने सराहा है। वहीं एक करोड़, पच्चीस लाख - अब तो एक करोड़, 
तीस लाख बहने हȅ, जो 'लाडली लÑमी योजना' से मध्य Ģदेश मȂ सशƪ हो रही ह ȅ। आज वंदन की 
जो बात यहां बार-बार आ रही है, उस पर मȅ यह कहना चाहूंगी िक हम तो हर कायर्कर्म की 
शुरुआत  ही बेिटयȗ क े पूजन क े साथ, उनकी वंदना क े साथ करते हȅ।  
महोदया, कल इस सदन मȂ ओबीसी की बात कही गई थी। मȅ भी ओबीसी वगर् स
े ही आती 
हूं। मȅ उनसे एक ĢÌन पूछना चाहती हूं िक इतने सालȗ तक सǄा मȂ रह कर उनको ओबीसी की 
िंचता क्यȗ नहीं हुई, आज तक उन्हȗने कभी कदम क्यȗ नहीं उठाए? एक तरफ, जहां, वे ओबीसी 
का नाम ल
ेकर जनता को ĥिमत करने का काम करते हȅ, वहीं, दूसरी तरफ माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी 
आदरणीय मोदी जी ने िपछड़ा वगर् आयोग को संवैधािनक अिधकार  देकर मन से िपछड़ा वगर् क े 
कÊयाण की बात कही है।  
 माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, हम जानते हȅ िक पूवर् मȂ भी इस Ģकार का िबल राज्य सभा 
मȂ आया था और लोक सभा मȂ पािरत नहीं हो सका था। 4 साल तक उसको लिÇबत करने का काम 
िकया गया। हम यह जानते हȅ िक,  
“ईǚर का िदया कभी अÊप नहीं होता 
और जो बीच म
Ȃ छू ट जाए, वह संकÊप नहीं होता।” 
 
इस संकÊप को िसिǉ तक पहुंचाने का, दृढ़शिƪ क े साथ इस सदन मȂ लाने का काम यिद 
िकसी ने िकया है, तो वह माननीय मोदी जी न
े िकया है। मȅ उनको ǭदय से धन्यवाद देती हूं िक 
उन्हȗने वषș से लिÇबत इस िबल को इस सदन मȂ पेश िकया। जैसे ही यह िबल पािरत होता है, देश 
की लोक सभा और देश क े सभी राज्यȗ की िवधान सभाओं मȂ एक-ितहाई Îथान मातृ शिƪ क
े  िलए 
आरिक्षत हो जाएगा। इसके  साथ ही एस.सी./एस.टी. वगर् क े िलए िजतनी भी सीटȂ आरिक्षत थीं, 
उनमȂ से भी एक-ितहाई सीट्स मिहलाओं क
े  िलए आरिक्षत हो जाएंगी। इितहास को बदलने वाला 
यह िबल न िसफर् मिहलाओं को राजनीितक रूप  से सशƪ करेगा, अिपतु मिहलाओं क े सामािजक 
और आिर्थक सशिƪकरण क े मागर् को भी ĢशÎत करेगा। मȅ पूणर् िवÌवास क े साथ यह कहती हूं िक 
संवेदना और ममता की Ģितपूिर्त नारी क
े  नेतृत्व मȂ, िनणर्यȗ मȂ भी संवेदना का समावेश होगा। आज 
िजस तरह से हम एक युिƪ बोलते हȅ िक हर पुरुष की Ģगित क े पीछे नारी का हाथ होता है, उसी 
तरह से मुझे इस सदन मȂ यह बोलते हुए बहुत गवर् महसूस हो रहा है िक हम सब बहनȗ की Ģगित 
क े पीछे इस देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी माननीय मोदी जी की ताकत और उनका साथ है। जो पूरे देश की 
बहनȗ से यह कह रहा है िक:  
“नहीं वƪ सोने का अब है, जाग उठो भारत नारी। 
गया शांित का वƪ आज बन कर चलो आग
 की िंचगारी। 
बनकर सीता क े समान वध रावण का करवाना है, 
आज कटारी बांध कमर मȂ Îवयं युǉ मȂ जाना है। 
84
[RAJYA SABHA]

भाव-भीरूता का तजकर तुम करो शेर की सवारी, 
नहीं वƪ है सोने का, अब जाग उठो भारत नारी।।” 
 
 मȅ माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी को बहुत धन्यवाद देती हूं, िजन्हȗने एक िनणार्यक एजȂडा 
िनधार्िरत िकया और आज यह खोखले वादȗ क े िवपरीत एक ÎपÍट वाÎतिवकता बन गई है। मȅ 
Ģधान मंतर्ी जी को कोिट-कोिट धन्यवाद देते हुए इस िबल का समथर्न कर ते हुए अपनी बात को 
समाÃत करती हूं, बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद।  
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (MS. INDU BALA GOSWAMI): Now, Shrimati Mahua 
Maji.   
 
Ǜीमती महुआ माजी (झारखंड): उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, धन्यवाद। " नारी शिƪ वंदन अिधिनयम" 
पर बोलने से पहले मȅ राजा राममोहन राय और िवǏासागर को नमन करना चाहूंगी। आज जब हम 
लोग यहां खड़े हȅ, तो िनिÌचत रूप  से राजा राममोहन राय और िवǏासागर को नम न  करना 
ज़रूरी है, वरना हम भी शायद सती Ģथा और बाल िववाह क े िशकार हो जाते।  
महोदया, आज मȅ अपनी Îटेट झारखंड की उन वीर नेितर्यȗ को भी नमन करना चाहूंगी, 
जोहार करना चाहूंगी । िसनगी दई, कइली दई, फ ूलो-झानो का नाम इितहास मȂ पुरुषȗ क े नाम 
की तरह दजर् नहीं है, लेिकन उन्हȗने अपनी वीरता की िम
साल कायम की। आज बहुत सारी 
नािरयȗ को उनकी िहÇमत से बल िमलता है और मिहलाएं राजनीित मȂ आगे आती हȅ। हमारे 
संिवधान क े िनमार्ण मȂ भी पन्दर्ह िवदुषी मिहलाओं का हाथ था, मȅ उन्हȂ भी नमन करती हूँ। हमा रे 
झारखंड मȂ खेल क े क्षेतर् मȂ सुमराय टेटे, सािवतर्ी पूिर्त, असुंता लकड़ा, झानो हांसदा जैसी तमाम 
जुझारू  मिह लाएँ हȅ, िजन्हȗने पूरी दुिनया मȂ झारखंड और इस देश का नाम रोशन िकया, मȅ उन्हȂ 
भी आज नमन करती हूं। हमारे िदशम गुरु  शीबू सोरेन जी, जो हमारे देश क े सबसे बड़े आिदवासी 
नेता हȅ, उन्हȗने मिहलाओं क े अिधकार क े िलए लड़ा ई लड़ी। उन्हȗने वषर् 1971 मȂ नशाबंदी की। उन्हȂ 
पता था िक अगर पुरुष नशा नहीं छोड़Ȃगे, तो मिहलाओं पर ही सबसे ज् यादा अत्याचार होगा, वे 
अपने पिरवार को नहीं देखȂगे, इसिलए मȅ उन्हȂ भी नमन करती हूं। हमारे माननीय मुख्य मंतर्ी हेमंत 
सोरेन जी, िजन्हȗने िपछली सरकारȗ मȂ टर्ैिफिंकग का िशकार होने वाली मिहलाओं को बल िदया, 
आत्मसÇमान क े साथ अप
नी Îटेट मȂ रोज़गार देने क े िलए ढेर सारी योजनाएं लॉन्च कीं, चाहे वह 
पलाश Ĥांड हो, 'सािवतर्
ीबाई फ ु ले िकशोरी समृिǉ योजना' हो या 'फ ूलो झानो आशीवार्द योजना' 
हो, ' पोटो' हो, खेल योजना हो, उन्हȗने तरह-तरह की योजनाओं क े माध्यम से मिहलाओं क े 
कÊयाण क े काम िकए। आपको जानकर खुशी होगी िक हमारे झारखंड की िवध ान सभा मȂ 12.35 
Ģितशत मिहलाएं हȅ, जो िक दूसरे कई राज्यȗ से ज्यादा हȅ।  
 
[THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (MS. KAVITA PATIDAR) in the Chair.] 
 
जैसे हिरयाणा मȂ 10 Ģितशत मिहलाएं है, गुजरात मȂ 7.14 परसȂट मिहलाएं है, उसी तरह से मध्य 
Ģदेश मȂ 9.13 परसȂट मिहलाएं है। मȅ इस िबल का समथर्न करती हूं, क्यȗिक आज का िदन हमारे 
िलए   एक ऐितहािसक िदन  है। मȅ चा ह ूंगी िक एस.सी./एस.टी. और ओबीसी मिहलाओं क े िलए 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
85

भी उसमȂ आरक्षण हो। तत्काल 2024 मȂ आरक्षण हो, इस पर पुनिर्वचार िकया जाए, न िक 
जनगणना और पिरसीमन क े िलए हमȂ 2029 क े बाद तक का इंतजार करना पड़े।  िजस िदन 
माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने लोक सभा मȂ यह बात कही थी िक मिहला िरज़वȃशन िबल आने वाला 
है, तो यह सुनकर ख
ुशी की लहर दौड़ गई। ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ झारखंड मȂ िवमेन कमीशन की 
चेयरपसर्न थी। 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): माननीय सदÎय, आप कन्क्लूड कीिजए, आपका समय 
समाÃत होने वाला है।   
 
Ǜीमती महुआ माजी: मȅ अपनी पाटीर् झारखंड मुिƪ मोचार् की िवमेन िंवग की सȂटर्ल Ģेिज़डȂट रही 
हूं, तो मुझे पहाड़ȗ से, जंगलȗ से, दुगर्म इलाकȗ से मिहलाओं का फोन आने लगा िक मैडम, हम 
2024 क े चुनाव की तैयारी कर लȂ?...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): धन्यवाद, आपका समय समाÃत ह
ुआ। Ãलीज़ कन्क्लूड 
कीिजए।  
 
Ǜीमती महुआ माजी: जब पता चला िक यह 2029 क े बाद आएगा, तो मायूसी छा गई थी।  मȅ 
सरकार से अनुरोध करूं गी िक वह इस पर पुनिर्वचार करे।...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
 उपसभाध्यक्ष (सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): धन्यवाद, माननीय सदÎय। 
 
Ǜीमती महुआ माजी: इसमȂ एससी/
एसटी और ओबीसी क े िलए िरज़वȃशन करे और 2024 मȂ ही 
इसे लागू िकया जाए। 
      
Ǜीमती िĢयंका चतुवȃदी (महाराÍटर्): Thank you so much, Madam, Chairperson. 
उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, मȅ सबसे पहले देश क े पहले Ģधान मंतर्ी पंिडत जवाहर लाल नेहरू  जी की 
पंिƪयȗ से श
ुरू  करना चाहूंगी।  75 साल बीत गए, लेिकन उनकी आवाज़ अभी भी गूंजती है, उनके  
शÅद अभी  भी हमारे कानȗ मȂ गूंजते हȅ। "Long years ago, we made a tryst with destiny, 
and now the time comes when we shall red eem our pledge, not wholly or in full 
measure, but very substantially." हमारी मिहल
ाओं का जो इितहास है, जब हमारा संिवधान 
बन रहा था, तो संिवधान मȂ constituent assembly मȂ यह चचार् हुई थी िक क्या मिहलाओं को 
आरक्षण िमलना चािहए? वहां पर 15 मिहला सदÎय भी थीं, उन्हȗने उसको खािरज कर िदया था। 
उन्हȗने कहा था िक equality will be the basis of our Constitution. बाबा साहेब अÇबेडकर जी 
ने हमȂ एक ऐसा visionary Constitution िदया, िजससे मिहलाओं को equality और समानता की 
िंजदगी िमले। दुभार्ग्य इस बात का ह
ै िक 75 साल  मȂ मिहलाओं को जो जगह िमलनी चािहए थी, 
चाहे Îटेट असेÇलबीज़ हȗ या क ेन्दर् मȂ हो, वह हमȂ नहीं िमली। इस वजह से आज हम इस िरज़वȃशन 
की चचार् कर रहे हȅ। आज हम जो िरज़वȃशन की बात करते हȅ, यह लड़ाई जो शुरू  हुई ह
ै, हम इसे 
86
[RAJYA SABHA]

बहुत सालȗ से लड़ रहे हȅ, मȅ इसे एक ऐितहािसक पल मानती हूं िक मुझे इसमȂ शािमल होने का 
सौभाग्य ĢाÃत हुआ और इस िबल का समथर्न हमारी पाटीर् कर रही है। महोदय, हमारे साथ दो 
िदक्कतȂ हȅ, जो मȅ आपके  सामने साझा करना चाहती हूं। सबसे पहले  साढे़ नौ साल बाद 2014 क े 
मैिनफे Îटो मȂ और 2019 क े मैिनफे Îटो मȂ यह वादा िकया गया था िक मिहलाओं को आरक्षण 
िमलेगा, लेिकन उस आरक्षण को आते-आते साढ़े नौ साल लगे। ज
े.पी.नƿा जी ने बहुत सारी बातȂ 
कहीं। उन्हȗने कहा िक this is the only way we  can give reservation. मȅ कहूंगी, with due
 
respect to him that this is not the only way we can get representation and reservation. 
आप 2010 का िबल ले आइए। 2010 का िबल अगले लोक सभा इलेक्शन से लागू होता। आप 73rd 
और 74th Amendment देख लीिजए। वे Äयूचर डेट क े नहीं थे, वे immediately implementable 
थे। पूरी दुिनया मȂ कोई कानून ऐसा नहीं बना होगा, जो आने वाले सात साल बाद लागू होगा। 
मिहलाओं क े साथ यह जो हो रहा है, मȅ मानती हूं िक उनको एक झुनझुना िदखाया जा रहा है िक 
आरक्षण  तो दे रहे हȅ, पर आरक्षण क े साथ हम क ंिडशन भी रख रहे हȅ।  इसके  साथ मȂ यह कह रहे 
हȅ िक दरवाज़ा तो खोल रहे हȅ, लेिकन साढ़े सात साल तक उसमȂ आपको एंटर्ी नहीं दȂगे। मȅ पूछना 
चाहती हूं िक कांÎटीǷूशन का कौन-सा िहÎसा है, जो आपको immediate implementation से 
रोक रहा है। दुख इस बात का होता ह
ै िक हम लोग जब िरज़वȃशन की बात कर रहे हȅ - हम सब 
मिहलाओं मȂ िमठाई बांटते और हमȂ खुशी होती, लेिकन उससे हमȂ वंिचत िकया जा रहा ह
ै। 
 
 उपसभाध्यक्ष ( सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): माननीय सदÎय, आपका समय समाÃत हो गया है, Ãलीज़ 
कन्क्लूड कीिजए। 
 
Ǜीमती िĢयंका चतुवȃदी: मैडम, मȅ एक िमनट क े अंदर अपनी बात समाÃत करती ह ूं। मȅ आप लोगȗ 
से ज्यादा समय नहीं मांगूगी और न उÇमीद है। मȅ अंत मȂ एक चीज़ कहना चाहती हूं िक जो 2010 
का िबल था, उसमȂ Legislative Councils मȂ भी मिहलाओं क े िलए आरक्षण था। Legislative 
Councils और राज्य सभा मȂ आप भी सांसद ह
ȅ और मȅ भी सांसद हूं। ...(समय की घंटी)...  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): Ãलीज़ कन्क्लूड कीिजए। आपका समय समाÃत हो गया। 
 
Ǜीमती िĢयंका चतुवȃदी: िजतना लोक सभा मȂ मिहलाओं का रेĢेज़Ȃटेशन है, उतना राज्य सभा मȂ 
नहीं ह
ै, तो उधर भी लागू होना चािहए। इसी बात को कहते हुए मȅ इस िबल का वेलकम करती हूं, 
इसको सपोटर् करती हूं। हम एक ऐितहािसक िदन रचने जा रहे हȅ और िजन्हȗने इसका सपोटर् 
िकया है, उसके  िलए मȅ उनका आभार Ëयƪ करूं गी।  
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी (िबहार): उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, मȅ संिवधान क े 128व
Ȃ संशोधन िवधयेक 
क े समथर्न मȂ बोलने क े िलए खड़ा हुआ हूं। मȅ आदरणीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी को धन्यवाद देना चाहूंगा 
िक इसी संसद ने आज से क ु छ वषर् पूवर् economically weaker sections क े िलए 10 Ģितश
त क े 
आरक्षण संबंधी संिवधान संशोधन िवधेयक सवर्सÇमित से पािरत िकया था और आज मिहलाओं को 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
87

33 Ģितशत आरक्षण  लोक सभा मȂ और िवधान सभा मȂ लागू करने क े िलए 128 वां संिवधान 
संशोधन िवधेयक पेश िकया जा रहा है, िजस पर आज चचार् हो रही है।   
महोदय, जैसा मेरे पूवर् क े लोगȗ ने बताया िक इसके  पहले भी चार बार संिवधान मȂ संशोधन 
करने ह
ेतु Ģयास िकया जा चुका है और यह पांचवां Ģयास है। इसके  पहले दो बार Ǜी अटल िबहारी 
वाजपेयी जी की सरकार क े समय Ģयास हुआ, एक बार देवेगौड़ा जी क े समय मȂ Ģ यास हुआ और 
एक बार डा. मनमोहन िंसह जी की सरकार क े समय मȂ Ģयास हुआ। परंतु चारȗ Ģयास िवफल हो 
गए, लेिकन मुझे खुशी है िक आज Ǜी नरेन्दर् मोदी जी क े नेतृत्व मȂ जो सरकार चल रही है, उसके  
Ģयास स
े कल लोक सभा मȂ यह सवर्सÇमित से पािरत हो गया और आज राज्य सभा से पािरत होने 
जा रहा है।  इसके  पहले यह चार बार पािरत क्यȗ नहीं हो पाया? मȅ यहां बैठे लोगȗ को इितहास 
बताना चाहूंगा। 1998 मȂ जब अटल जी की सरकार क े दौरान यह िबल सदन मȂ प
ेश िकया गया, तो 
राÍटर्ीय जनता दल क े एक सांसद - जो अभी िबहार सरकार मȂ मंतर्ी हȅ Ǜी सुरेन्दर् यादव, उन्हȗने 
आडवाणी जी क े हाथ से िबल की कॉपी लेकर फाड़ दी और सदन मȂ इतना हंगामा हुआ िक सदन 
को Îथिगत करना पड़ा और वह िबल कभी पािरत नहीं हो पाया।  इतना ही नहीं, जब 6 मई, 2008 
को 108वां संिवधान संशोधन िबल पेश िकया जा रहा था, तो सदन का माहौल क्या था? उस समय 
Ǜी हंसराज भारǎाज लॉ िमिनÎटर थे। उन पर कोई हमला न करे,  इसिलए वे पहली पंिƪ
 मȂ नहीं 
बैठे, दूसरी पंिƪ मȂ बैठे, तो उनको बचाने क े िलए दो मिहला सांसदȗ, Ǜीमती अिÇबका सोनी और 
क ुमारी शैलजा को उनकी बगल म
Ȃ िबठाया गया  और जो बीच का राÎता है, जो aisle है, aisle 
was guarded by Shrimati Renuka Chowdhury, Shrimati Jayanti Natrajan and Shrimati 
Alka Balram Kshatriya और जैसे ही हंसराज भारǎाज जी इसे पेश करने क े िलए खड़े हुए, 
समाजवादी पाटीर् क े एमपी अबू असीम आज़मी थे, वे इसे छीनने क े िलए दौड़ पड़े और रेणुका 
चौधरी जी क ू द पड़ीं, इसी कन्फयूज़न म
Ȃ जÊदबाजी मȂ हंसराज भारǎाज जी ने िबल introduce 
कर िदया और P.J. Kurien, जो उस समय Presiding Officer  थे, उन्हȗने तुरंत िबल को Îटैिंडग 
कमेटी को रेफर िकया। यह हाल था। इतना ही नहीं, जब Îटैिंडग कमेटी से िबल Îवीकृ त होकर 
आया और सदन क े अंदर 8 माचर्, 2010 को पेश िकया गया, तो समाजवादी पाटीर् क े नंदिकशोर 
यादव और कमाल अख्तर सभापित अंसारी
 जी क े मेज पर चढ़ गए।  नंदिकशोर ने माइक को 
उखाड़ कर फ Ȃ क िदया,  आरजेडी क े राजनीित Ģसाद ने िवधेयक की Ģित फाड़ दी और सभापित 
की क ुसीर् पर फ Ȃ क
 दी।  समाजवादी पाटीर् क े वीरपाल यादव, एलजेपी क े सािबर अली, आरजेडी क े 
सुभाष यादव...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜीमती जया बƳन (उǄर Ģदेश): मैडम, माननीय सदÎय क्या बोल रहे हȅ? ये िबल पर बोलȂ। 
...(Ëयवध
ान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): Ãलीज़, माननीय सदÎय, आप उन्हȂ बोलने दीिजए। 
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी : एजाज़ अली - सात लोगȗ को िनलंिबत कर िदया गया।  मȅ क ेवल यह 
बताना चाह रहा हूं िक चार बार िबल पािरत करने का जो Ģय
ास हुआ।...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
88
[RAJYA SABHA]

एक माननीय सदÎय: मैडम,...(Ëयवधान)... मैडम,...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): Ãलीज़, माननीय सदÎय, आप बैठ जाएं।   
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: वह िबल पािरत क्यȗ नहीं हो पाया, यह सदन को जानना आवÌयक है। 
यह हंगामा Ģायोिजत था, sponsored था, क्यȗिक सरकार नहीं चाहती थी िक यह िबल पास हो। 
एक ओर योजनाबǉ तरीके  से िदखाया
 जा रहा है िक हम िबल क े समथर्न मȂ हȅ -  िलप सिर्वस, 
और दूसरी ओर सहयोगी दल क े सांसदȗ को उकसा कर वैल मȂ भेजकर हंगामा करवाया गया, 
तािक वह िबल पास न हो सके । महोदय, यह जो कहा जा रहा ह
ै, इस पर मȅ सदन को यह बताना 
चाहूंगा िक िनशाना ओबीसी आरक्षण नहीं था, िनशाना यह था िक इस िबल को पािरत मत होने दो। 
अगर यह िबल पािरत हो गया, तो बहुत सारे लोगȗ का अगली बार चुनाव लड़ने का अवसर खत्म 
हो जाएगा।   
 
4.00 P.M. 
 
इसिलए Ãलान्ड वे म
Ȃ, योजनाबǉ तरीके  से, Ģायोिजत तरीके  से इस िबल का िवरोध िकया गया। 
जो लोग कहते हȅ िक भारतीय जनता पाटीर् आरक्षण िवरोधी है, िपछड़ा िवरोधी है, म ȅ उनको 
इितहास बताना चाहूंगा िक जो पहला बैकवडर् क्लासेज़ कमीशन काका कालेलकर की अध्यक्षता मȂ 
बना, यह पंिडत नेहरू  क े समय मȂ बना था। काका कालेलकर कमेटी की िरपोटर् 1955 मȂ आई, 
लेिकन उस िरपोटर् को लागू नहीं िकया  गया। मȅ कांगर्ेस क े लोगȗ से जानना चाहता हूं िक जो फÎटर् 
बैकवडर् क्लासेज़ कमीशन क े संबंध मȂ काका कालेलकर की िरपोटर् आई, उसको ठंडे बÎते मȂ क्यȗ 
डाल िदया गया, उसको लागू क्यȗ नहीं िकया? इतना ही नहीं, काका कालेलकर कमीशन क े बाद 
10-15 साल तक कोई कमीशन गिठत नहीं िकया गया। सेक ं ड बैकवडर् क्लासेज़ कमीशन कब बना 
- जब जनता
 पाटीर् की सरकार बनी और मोरारजी देसाई Ģधान मंतर्ी थे। Ǜी अटल िबहारी 
वाजपेयी और Ǜी लालकृ Íण आडवाणी उस सरकार मȂ शािमल थे। 1979 मȂ सेक ं ड बैकवडर् क्लासेज़ 
कमीशन, जो मंडल कमीशन क े नाम से जाना जाता है, वह बना। 31 
िदसÇबर, 1980 को िरपोटर् 
सिÅमट हो गई।  उस समय िकसकी सरकार थी और Ģधान मंतर्ी कौन था - Ǜीमती इंिदरा गांधी 
देश की Ģधान मंतर्ी थीं। 1980 से  लेकर 1989 तक Ģधान मंतर्ी कौन थे - इंिदरा गांधी थीं, राजीव 
गांधी थे। मȅ कांगर्ेस क े लोगȗ स
े पूछना चाहता हूं िक 9 साल तक आपने मंडल कमीशन की िरपोटर् 
को लागू क्यȗ नहीं िकया, उसे ठंडे बÎते मȂ डालकर क्यȗ रख िदया? 1989 
मȂ जब वी. पी. िंसह जी 
की सरकार बनी, िजसको बीजेपी का समथर्न था, तब पहली बार इस देश क े अंदर मंडल कमीशन 
की िरपोटर् को लागू िकया गया।   
 उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, शेǹूÊड टर्ाइÅस, अनुसूिचत जनजाित क े िलए जो कमीशन बना, 
उसको संवैधािनक दजार् िकसने िदया
 - का ंगर्ेस ने नहीं िदया। अटल िबहारी वाजपेयी की सरकार 
ने 2003 मȂ एसटी कमीशन को कांÎटीǷूशनल Îटेट्स देने का काम िकया। इतना ही नहीं, यह जो 
बैकवडर् क्लासेज़ कमीशन ह
ै, इसको कांÎटीǷूशनल Îटेट्स िकसने िदया? मȅ सदन को बताना 
चाहूंगा Ǜी बी.क े. हांिडक कांगर्ेस क े िपछड़े वगर् क े एक बड़े नेता हुआ करते थे, वे कमेटी ऑन 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
89

वेलफे यर ऑफ ओबीसीज़ क े चेयरमैन थे, उन्हȗने 2012, 2013 और 2015 मȂ अपनी िरपोटर् दी। हर 
िरपोटर् मȂ Ǜी बी.क े. हांिडक ने यह िरकमȂड िकया िक िपछड़े वगș का आयोग बनना चािहए और 
उसको संवैधािनक दजार् िमलना चािहए, परंतु आपने नहीं िदया और गरीब क े बेटे Ǜी नरेन्दर् मोदी 
ने, जब वे देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी बने, ब
ैकवडर् क्लासेज़ कमीशन को कांÎटीǷूशनल Îटेट्स देने का 
काम िकया। एससी, एसटी कमीशन को जो अिधकार हȅ, वे सारे अिधकार ओबीसी कमीशन को 
िदए गए।  The Backward Classes Commission has all the power of civil court to 
summon and enforce the attendance, prod uction of documents, evidence on 
affidavit, etc. 
 उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, ईडÅÊयूएस को 10 Ģितशत आरक्षण पहली बार िकसने िदया? जब 
नरिसÇहा राव जी देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी थे, तो उन्हȗने एक चार लाइन का एग्जीक्यूिटव ऑडर्र 
िनकाला और कहा िक ऊ ंची जाित क े गरीब लोगȗ को हम 10 परस Ȃट का आरक्षण दे रहे हȅ। जब 
इंिदरा साहनी का क े स सुĢीम कोटर् मȂ गया, तो उस चार लाइन क े एग्जीक्यूिटव ऑडर्र को सुĢीम 
कोटर् ने खािरज कर िदया। मȅ सदन मȂ बैठे कांगर्ेस क े लोगȗ से जानना चाहता हूं िक ईडÅÊयूएस का 
जो आरक्षण था, उसे जब 25 िसतÇबर, 1991 को खािरज कर िदया, तो
 10 साल  तक आपने 
ईडÅÊयूएस को आरक्षण क्यȗ नहीं िदया? ईडÅÊयूएस को आरक्षण िकसने िदया - Ǜी नरेन्दर् 
दामोदरदास मोदी ने ऊ ंची जाित क े गरीब लोगȗ को आरक्षण देने का काम िकया। मȅ इसका िजकर् 
इसिलए भी कर रहा हूं िक क ु छ लोग कहते ह
ȅ िक जÊदी से जÊदी इसे लागू कर दो। मȅ लोक सभा 
मȂ कांगर्ेस क े नेताओं का भाषण सुन रहा था।  वे कह रहे थे िक 2024 मȂ लागू कर दो, तत्काल लागू 
कर दो।  ईडÅÊयूएस क े आरक्षण क
े  संबंध मȂ चार लाइन क े एग्जीक्यूिटव ऑडर्र को िजस तरह से 
सुĢीम कोटर् ने खािरज कर िदया, क्या आप चाहते हȅ िक मिहला आरक्षण िवधेयक को भी इसी 
Ģकार सुĢीम कोटर् खािरज कर दे?   
 उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, यह नरेन्दर् मोदी जी की सरकार है। उन्हȗने जब ईडÅÊयूएस 
आरक्षण क े िलए 103rd अमȂडमȂट िकया, तो आिर्टकल 15 और 16 मȂ एक नया सब-सेक्शन 6 जोड़ा 
गया।  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): माननीय सदÎय, आपका समय खत्म हो गया है। आप 
कन्क्लूड कीिजए।  
 
SHRI SUSHIL KUMAR MODI: Nothing in this  Article shall prevent the State from 
making any special provision for the advancement of any economically and weaker 
section of citizens. सु Ģीम कोटर् ने इसको अपहेÊड िकया। इसीिलए हम सोच-समझकर, 
डीिलिमटेशन कमीशन बनेगा, सȂसस क े िफगसर् आएंगे, तब 2029 मȂ इसे लागू करȂगे। अगर 
जÊदबाजी मȂ लागू कर िदया, तो कल पीआईएल मȂ चला जाएगा। यही लोग पीआईएल मȂ िकसी 
को खड़ा कर दȂगे और सुĢीम कोटर् इस मिहला आरक्षण िवधेयक को खािरज कर देगा। लेिकन 
िजस तरीके  से हमने ईडÅÊयूएस आरक्षण को खािरज नहीं होने िदया और सुĢीम कोटर् ने उसको 
अपहेÊड िकया, मुझे पूरा िवÌवास है ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
90
[RAJYA SABHA]

उपसभाध्यक्ष (सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): आप शांत रहȂ। माननीय सदÎय को बोलने दीिजए।   
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, इतना ही नहीं नवोदय िवǏालय, क Ȃदर्ीय 
िवǏालय, िमिलटर्ी Îकू Êस मȂ इन लोगȗ ने कभी ओबीसी को आरक्षण नहीं िदया। धमȄदर् Ģधान जी 
बैठे हȅ, मȅ उनको धन्यवाद देना चाहूंगा िक नरेन्दर् मोदी जी की सरकार ने 27 परसȂट का आरक्षण 
ओबीसी को िदया। आज इसका पिरणाम है िक ओबीसी क े अंतगर्त चार लाख से ज्यादा बच्चे 
क Ȃदर्ीय िवǏालय, नवोदय िवǏालय और िमिलटर्ी Îकू Êस मȂ दािखला ल
े पाए हȅ। इतना ही नहीं, 
अिसÎटȂट Ģोफे सर  ...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( स
ुǛी किवता पाटीदार): Ãलीज़, आप शांत रहȂ।  ...(Ëयवधान)... माननीय सदÎय, 
आप शांत रहȂ। ...(Ëयवधान)... वे सब जा रहे हȅ। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, अिसÎटȂट Ģोफे सर और Ģोफे सर की िनयुिƪ मȂ 
इलाहाबाद हाई कोटर् ने कहा िक हर िडपाटर्मȂट को यूिनट माना जाएगा।  ...(Ëयवधान)... हमने 
िवÌव
िवǏालय को यूिनट मानकर ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): माननीय सदÎय, वे जा चुक े हȅ।  ...(Ëयवधान)..
 . आप शांत 
रिहए। Ãलीज़, शांत रिहए। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: सेन्टर्ल हॉल मȂ बाबा साहेब अÇबेडकर का िचतर् िकन लोगȗ ने नहीं लगने 
िदया?...(Ëयवधान)... बाबा साहेब अÇबेडकर क े मरने क े िकतने वषș क े बाद स
 ेन्टर्ल हॉल मȂ बाबा 
साहेब अÇबेडकर का िचतर् लगा।  ...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): Ãलीज़, शांत रिहए। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: 34 साल क े बाद बाबा साहेब अÇबेडकर को भारत रत्न िकसके  कायर्काल 
मȂ िमला? उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, ये कांगर्ेस क े लोग ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( सुǛी किवता पाटीदार): क ृपया आप शांत रिहए और उन्हȂ अपनी बात समाÃत करने 
दीिजए। ...(Ëयवधान)... म
ȅ माननीय सदÎय से िरक्वेÎट कर रही हूं िक आप शांत रिहए। 
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी
 :  ये िकस तरह से ओबीसी आरक्षण क े िवरोधी हȅ, मȅ उÊलेख करना 
चाहूंगा। ...(Ëयवधान)...  राजीव गांधी जी, जो देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी रहे ...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (सुǛी किवता पाटीदार):  आप शांत रिहए। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
91

Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: बाद मȂ वे लीडर ऑफ अपोिज़शन थे। उन्हȗने मंडल कमीशन का िवरोध 
िकया।  6 िसतÇबर...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
SHRI DEREK O' BRIEN (West Bengal):  We are walking out. 
(At this stage, some hon. Members left the Chamber.) 
 
 (MR. CHAIRMAN in the Chair.) 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Members, please take your seat. ...(Interruptions)... Hon. 
Members, I request you to take your seat. ...(Interruptions)... Jaya ji, take your seat.  
...(Interruptions)...  Listen to my announcement.  ...(Interruptions)...   Pramod 
Tiwari ji, please. ...(Interruptions)... This is a matter which will be thoroughly 
investigated through the collective wisdom  of the House. I will leave no stone 
unturned for it and not only probe it... ...(Interruptions)... I realise the sensitive 
nature of it. I realise the reaction of very se asoned Members. It is  a matter neither of 
this side nor of that side. It is a matter for all of us. We canno t allow any intrusion 
except by the hon. Members.  ...(Interruptions)...  Hear me on this. I will discuss 
with the Members, the Leaders and have it thoroughly probed, objectively probed, so 
that we reach a level whereby we have some kind of SOP for it. This I can assure the 
House. Given the high intellect of the House, I am sure you will agree with me on this. 
We cannot react. We have to resolve it.  We have to be resolute. We have to find a 
way out. If something has gone wrong, we have to  put it in a correctional groove.        
           
And, therefore, I appeal to you. Pramodji, you are showing your back to me. 
You cannot show your back to the Chairm an. So, reactions that have come from 
Jayaji are very well-meaning that it is a matter to be probed. It is a matter... 
...(Interruptions)...  Please listen to Jayaji -- she raised  the issue first -- on this day, 
when Women's Reservation Bill is here. Madam, before that, give us light and give us 
enlightenment.  
 
Ǜीमती जया बƳन: सर, मȅ अभी जो इंिसडȂट हुआ है, उसके  बारे मȂ कहना चाहती हूं। 
...(Ëयवधान)...सर, मȅ इस बात को इस हाउस मȂ नहीं लाना चाहती थी, लेिकन कल बात ऐसी हुई 
िक वह अच्छी तरह से िनभ गई, जब आपने कहा िक गैलरी म Ȃ बिच्चयां बैठी हुई हȅ। उसके  बाद 
आपने मेरे किरयर क े बारे मȂ बात की, िनमर्ला जी ने भी बात की, लेिकन मȅने उस बात को आगे 
छेड़ा नहीं।  
 मȅ आपको बता रही हूं, मेरा पसर्नल एक्सपीिरएंस परसȗ का है और कल क े िदन का है। मȅ 
घर जाने क े िलए िजतनी बार बाहर गई, चाहे लंच Ĥेक हो या जो भी Ĥेक हो, groups of women 
92
[RAJYA SABHA]

were coming. उन सबने मुझसे कहा िक हम आपके  फ ै न हȅ, मगर हम बीजेपी सपोटर्र हȅ। I am 
sorry. I did not want to bring this into the House. But after what happened just now, I 
am forced to bring it to your notice. ...(Interruptions)...   देिखए, आपको िजतना 
िचÊलाना है, उतना िचÊला लीिजए। ...(Ëयवधान)... जो िरएिलटी है, आप उसको देिखए। 
...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Jayaji, I have taken note of it. Ǜी Ģमोद ितवारी।  
 
Ǜी Ģमोद ितवारी (राजÎथान): सर, यह पूरा पिरसर, जो राज्य सभा का है, आपके  अधीन ह
 ै। हम 
सुिनयोिजत ढंग से देख रहे हȅ, इसमȂ यह पता लगाया जाना चािहए िक िकसकी िरकमंडेशन पर, 
िकस सदÎय की िरकमंडेशन पर ये लोग आए थे।  ...(Ëयवधान)...  एक िमनट, मȅ अपनी बात पूरी 
कर दूं। उस सदÎय क े िखलाफ कठोरतम कारर्वाई हो।  
 सर, दूसरी बात यह है िक इस सदन मȂ, इसके  पिरसर मȂ लोग गर्ुप मȂ आते हȅ। हम बाहर 
जाते हȅ, देखते हȅ, वे कहते हȅ िक साहब, हम आपके  साथ नहीं हȅ, लेिकन हम इस वाडर् से आए हȅ, 
हम इस एिरया से आए हȅ। भाजपा सुिनयोिजत ढंग से राज्य सभा की मयार्दा का हनन कर रही है, 
इसिलए मȅ आपकी ËयवÎथा चाहता हूं। 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Shri Sushil Kumar Modi.  
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: सभापित महोदय, मȅ चचार् कर रहा था िक कांगर्
ेस पाटीर् िकस तरह से 
ओबीसी िवरोधी रही है। मȅ उसका उदाहरण देना चाहूंगा और डाक्यूमȂट्स क े साथ देना चाहूंगा िक 
6 िसतÇबर, 1990 को जब सदन क े अंदर रूल  193 मȂ Discussion on Mandal Commission पर 
लोक सभा मȂ चचार् हो रही थी, तो
 तत्कालीन कांगर्ेस क े िदग्गज नेता, जो Ǜी राजीव गांधी थे, मȅ 
उनको क्वोट कर रहा हूं। मंडल कमीशन पर Ǜी राजीव गांधी जी कह रहे थे,  “To me, it is 
breaking of my country. Breakup of my co untry may not be important to yo
u. You 
have taken the country to the age of caste war. It is Raja Saheb, means Mr. V.P. 
Singh, who is trying to divide our count ry on caste and religion. The Congress cannot 
stand by and watch this nation being divi ded for the political convenience of one 
individual. Why are you dividing the country?" सभापित महोदय, इतना ही नहीं, Ǜी राजीव 
गांधी ने मंडल कमीशन की िरपोटर् पर यह भी कहा, The country is not prepared for it. This 
will compromise the goal of casteless so ciety and promote casteism. Government 
seeks to benefit the privile ged among backward castes. They seek to exclude the 
backward Muslims, Christians and Sikh s from reservation benefits. Mandal 
Commission has many constraints. It is based on flawed understanding of the social 
system. The Mandal Commission Report  should not be implemented in toto.” यह 
राजीव गांधी कह रहे हȅ िक मंडल कमीशन की िरपोटर् को लागू नहीं िकया जाए। The Mandal 
Commission Report is not scientific nor t echnically sophisticated and is not even 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
93

academically sound. Caste cannot be definer of backwardness. जो लोग हम पर आरोप 
लगा रहे हȅ िक हम िपछड़ा िवरोधी हȅ, उनका चिरतर् क्या रहा है? सभापित महोदय, मȅ उनकी 
Îपीच को authenticate करने क े िलए तैयार हूं। अगर आप कहȂगे, तो मȅ उनकी Îपीच को सदन मȂ 
रखने क े िलए तैयार हूं। सभापित  महोदय, इतना ही नहीं, मȅ आपके  सामने एक पतर् पढ़ रहा हूं, 
अगर आप कहȂगे, तो मȅ उसको भी authenticate करने क े िलए तैयार हूं।  यह देश क े मुख्य 
मंितर्यȗ को एक Ģधान मंतर्ी ने पतर् िलखा था। मȅ उस पतर् की चार लाइनȂ पढ़ रहा हूं, “My dear 
Chief Ministers, SCs and STs deserve help  but, even so, I dislike any kind of 
reservation, more particularly in services. I react strongly against anything which leads 
to inefficien
cy and second-rate standards. I want my country to be first-class country 
in everything but if you go in for reservation on communal and caste basis, they 
swamp the bright and able people and remain second-rate or third-rate.”  सभापित 
महोदय, यह िलखने वाले कौन थे, मȅ उनकी एक लाइन और पढ़ना चाहूंगा, “It has amazed me 
to learn that even promotions are based sometimes on communal and caste 
considerations.” तत्कालीन Ģधान मंतर्ी पंिडत नेहरू  जी ने 27 जून , 1961 को देश क े मुख्य 
म
ंितर्यȗ को जो पतर् िलखा था, उनको मȅने आपके  सामने अभी पढ़ा है।  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Put it on the Table of the House.   
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: जी, मȅ टेबल पर रखने क े िलए तैयार हूं। सभापित महोदय, जो लोग यह 
कहते हȅ िक इसमȂ ओबीसी क े िलए िरज़वȃशन का Ģावधान क्यȗ नहीं है, मȅ उन लोगȗ से क ेवल यह 
पूछना चाहता हूं िक जब 2010 मȂ आपने संसद क े अंदर िबल पेश िकया था, तो क्या आपने उसके  
अंदर Ģावधान िकया था? आपने उस समय ओबीसी की मिहलाओं क े िलए आरक्षण का Ģावधान 
क्यȗ नहीं लागू िकया? जब  7
6वां और 77वां अमȂडमȂट िबल आया, पंचायत और नगर िनकाय क े 
अंदर  एस.सी./एस.टी. की Ǜेणी क े िरज़वȃशन क े िलए िबल आया, उसमȂ मिहलाओं क े िलए भी 
Ģावधान िकया गया, तब आपने उसमȂ ओबीसी क े आरक्षण का Ģावधान क्यȗ नहीं िकया? 
 सभापित
 महोदय, ओबीसी आरक्षण तो बहाना था, असली िनशाना तो मिहला िबल रोकना 
था।  हरेक को यह डर था िक हमारी सीट का क्या होगा? सभापित महोदय, कल अिमत शाह जी 
न
े लोक सभा मȂ बताया  िक संिवधान तीन Ǜेणी की ही इजाज़त देता है, शैǹूÊड काÎट्स, 
शैǹूÊड टर्ाइÅस और जनरल - इन्हीं तीन क े अंदर होिरज़ȗटल िरज़वȃशन मिहलाओं को देने का 
Ģावधान िकया गया है। हम यह िकसी नई Ǜेणी को नहीं द
े रहे हȅ। लोक सभा और राज्य िवधान 
सभाओं मȂ कभी भी ओबीसी आरक्षण नहीं रहा है। जब महात्मा गांधी आमरण अनशन पर बैठे थे, 
पूना पैक्ट मȂ भी अनुसूिचत जाित क े िलए आरक्षण का मुǈा था, िपछले करीब 90-100 साल मȂ, जब 
भी एस.सी. और एस.टी. Ǜेणी को लोक सभा और िवधान सभा मȂ आरक्षण िमला है, उसमȂ कभी 
भी ओबीसी Ǜेणी को लोक सभा और िवधान सभा म
Ȃ आरक्षण नहीं िदया गया।  
 सभापित महोदय, िबना आरक्षण क े भी आज बड़ी संख्या मȂ ओबीसी क
े  लोग चुनाव 
जीतकर आ रहे हȅ। मȅ अपने राज्य िबहार का उदाहरण देना चाहूंगा।  
 
94
[RAJYA SABHA]

MR. CHAIRMAN: Please conclude.  
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: िबहार क े 40 एम.पीज़ हȅ, उनमȂ से 19 एम.पीज़ ओबीसी समाज क े हȅ। ये 
तो िबना आरक्षण क े हȅ। वहां से 19 एम.पीज़ िबना आरक्षण क े जीत कर आते हȅ। सभापित महोदय, 
अगर कल आरक्षण लागू हो गया, तो िजन सीटȗ पर हम ओबीसी प
 ुरुष को िटकट देते हȅ, वहां पर 
मिहला को िटकट दȂगे। हम वहां पर पुरुष को िटकट नहीं दȂगे, ओबीसी मिहलाओं को िटकट दȂगे। 
...(समय की घंटी)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Please conclude.  
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: सर, मुझ
 े दो-तीन िमनट का समय और चािहए। मȅ आपसे यह आगर्ह 
करना चाहूंगा िक ... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Your other speakers will lose time.  
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: सर, झारखंड क े अंदर िबना ओबीसी को आरक्षण िदए पंचायत का चुनाव 
करा िदया गया। जहां पर कांगर्ेस क े चार MLA हȅ, आरजेडी का एक MLA है, मȅ उस संदभर् मȂ 
कांगर्ेस क े लोगȗ से जानना चाहता था िक क्या आपने कभी वहां क े मुख्य मंतर्ी से पूछा है िक आपने 
पंचायत का इलेक्शन िबना ओबीसी आरक्षण क े क ै से करा िदया? लोकल बॉडीज़ का इलेक्शन 
इसीिलए रुका  ह
ुआ है, क्यȗिक उन्हȗने आज तक डेिडके िटड कमीशन का गठन नहीं िकया है।  
 सभापित महोदय, मोदी जी की सरकार  मȂ 76 मंतर्ी हȅ, उनमȂ से 26 ओबीसी  क े हȅ, यह 
क ु ल 35 Ģितशत बनता है। यह एक िरकॉडर् है। जो लोग कहते हȅ िक हम  ओबीसी िवरोधी ह
ȅ, मȅ 
उनको इतना ही बताना चाहता हूं िक इसके  पहले दो Ģधान मंतर्ी ओबीसी समुदाय से बने थे। उनमȂ 
से एक Ǜी एच.डी. देवेगौड़ा हȅ और दूसरे चौधरी चरण िंसह थ
े। Ǜी एच.डी. देवेगौड़ा 11 महीन े 
Ģधान मंतर्ी रहे और चौधरी चरण िंसह तो संसद का मुंह भी नहीं देख पाए, क्यȗिक कांगर्ेस ने 
उनकी सरकार को िगराने का काम िकया । Ǜी एच.डी. देवेगौड़ा और चौधरी
 चरण िंसह क े बाद 
इस देश मȂ पहली बार 75 साल मȂ िपछड़े का कोई बेटा Ģधान मंतर्ी बना है और उनका नाम नरेन्दर् 
दामोदर दास मोदी है।                                                                               
महोदय, इन लोगȗ ने सीताराम क ेसरी, जो एक समय कांगर्ेस क े अध्यक्ष बने थे, उनके  
साथ क ैसा Ëयवहार िकया था!  उनको * कहा गया, उनको * कहा गया, उनको दौड़ा-दौड़ा कर 
बाथरूम  क े अंदर बंद कर िदया गया। ...(Ëयवधान)... सभापित महोदय, 2015 मȂ ...(Ëयवधान)... 
सभापित महोदय, 2015 मȂ ...(Ëयवधान)... 2015 मȂ जब राहुल गाँधी बाढ़ Ģभािवत क्षेतर्ȗ का सवȃक्षण 
करने गए, तो पूवर् क ेन्दर्ीय मंतर्ी ...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
                                                            
* Expunged as ordered by the Chair. 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
95

SHRI JAIRAM RAMESH: Authenticate it.  ....(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Member Sushil ji.  ....(Interruptions)... Sushil Kumar ji, 
please.  ....(Interruptions)... Hon. Member, I have alread y directed you to put that 
document on the Table of the House. No w, what you have stated, carrying facts 
which are being disputed, you will authenticate them. ....(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI SUSHIL KUMAR MODI: Yes, मȅ ऑथȂिटके ट करू ँगा, सभापित महोदय। 
 
M R .  C H A I R M A N :  A n d  d o  i t  d u r i n g  t h e  c o u r s e  o f  t h e  d a y .   ....(Interruptions)... 
During the course of the day.  ....(Interruptions)... 
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार मोदी: सभापित महोदय, जो लोग जातीय गणना की बात करते हȅ, काÎट सȂसस 
की बात करते हȅ, िचदÇबरम साहब अभी सदन मȂ नहीं हȅ, मȅ उनको क्वोट करना चाहूँगा। 7
th May, 
2010, when Chidambaram Saheb was the Home Minister of this country, तब उन्हȗने 
क्या कहा। सभापित महोदय, संसद मȂ जब काÎट सȂसस का मुǈा उठा, तो मȅ िचदÇबरम साहब को 
क्वोट कर रहा हूँ, "After Independence, as a matter of policy, the question relating to 
caste other than Scheduled Castes and Sc heduled Tribes was not included. Caste 
was not included in the last Census of 2001." िचदÇबरम साहब का यह बयान है िक 'as a 
policy'.  सभापित महोदय, यह डॉक्युमȂट है और उनकी Îपीच का पाटर् है। उन्हȗने कहा िक 
आजादी क े बाद नीितगत तौर पर एससी/
एसटी क े अितिरƪ िकसी अन्य जाित की गणना को 
जनगणना मȂ शािमल नहीं िकया गया है। आपने क्यȗ नहीं 2010 मȂ काÎट सȂसस करा िलया? क्यȗ 
सोिशयो-इकोनॉिमक काÎट सवȃ कराना पड़ा? आपने क्यȗ नहीं सȂसस एक्ट क े तहत करवाया? 
िचदÇबरम साहब ने यह भी कहा िक आरजीआई का मत था िक जनगणना क े साथ जातीय गणना 
कराने मȂ अनेक लॉिजिÎटक और Ëयावहािरक किठनाइयाँ हȅ और इससे जनगणना की प
ूरी Ģिकर्या 
अÎत-ËयÎत हो जाएगी। यूपीए सरकार ने जनगणना 2011 क े साथ काÎट सȂसस की माँग को 
अÎवीकार कर िदया था। 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Please conclude.   
 
Ǜी सुशील क ुमार
 मोदी: सभापित महोदय, मुझे दो िमनट और दे दीिजए। 
 सभापित महोदय, 2011 मȂ जो सोिशयो-इकोनॉिमक काÎट सȂसस हुआ, िजसमȂ 5 हजार 
करोड़ खचर् हुए, उस संबंध मȂ क्या सदन को पता है िक िकतनी जाितयाँ दजर् हुईं? 46 लाख
! 
जबिक देश मȂ 1931 क े अनुसार there are only 4,147 castes . But 46 lakh castes were 
enumerated in socio-economic caste census. सभापित महोदय, इसिलए मȅ सदन को 
आÌवÎत करना चाहता हूँ िक ये नरेन्दर् मोदी हȅ, जो बोलते हȅ, वह करके  िदखलाते हȅ। उन्हȗने जो 
96
[RAJYA SABHA]

कहा, वह करके  िदखलाया।  कोई Ëयिƪ यह िहÇमत नहीं कर सकता था, जो उन्हȗने मिहलाओं 
को 33 परसȂट िरज़वȃशन देकर की है। ...(समय की घंटी)...  
 
Ǜी सभापित: Ǜीमती फ ूलो देवी नेतम। 
 
Ǜीमती फ ूलो देवी नेतम (छǄीसगढ़): सभापित महोदय, धन्यवाद। आज हम मिहला आरक्षण 
िबल पर चचार् करने क े िलए यहाँ उपिÎथत ह
ुए हȅ। मȅ अपनी पाटीर् की ओर से इस िबल का समथर्न 
करने क े िलए खड़ी हुई हूँ।   
 सभापित महोदय, यह िवधेयक, ' संिवधान (128 वाँ संशोधन) िवधेयक, 2023' है और 
Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने लोक सभा मȂ इस िबल का नाम 'नारी शिƪ वंदन अिधिन
यम' बताया है। महोदय, 
मिहला आरक्षण िबल, यह िवधेयक पूवर् Ģधान मंतर्ी, Ǜी राजीव गाँधी जी का सपना था। Îथानीय 
िनकायȗ मȂ मिहलाओं की भागीदारी तय करने वाला संिवध ान संशोधन िवधेयक हमारे राजीव गाँधी 
जी लेकर आए थे।  पूवर् Ģधान मंतर्ी, Ǜी पी.वी. नरिसÇहा राव जी क े नेतृत्व वाली कांगर्ेस की 
सरकार ने इस ĢÎताव को पािरत करवाया, िजसके  चलते आज देश  मȂ 15 लाख मिहलाएँ चुनी हुई 
मिहला नेतर्ी हȅ।  आदरणीय महोदय,  2010 मȂ डा. मनमोहन िंसह जी क े नेतृत्व वाली कांगर्ेस की 
सरकार ने मिहला आरक्षण िबल को राज्य सभा मȂ पािरत करवाया। उसके  बाद िवपक्ष मȂ रहते हुए 
सामने वाले लोग, जो आज बड़ी-बड़ी बातȂ कर रहे हȅ, उनके  चलते लोक सभा मȂ यह ĢÎतुत नहीं 
हो पाया। महोदय, आदरणीया सोिन
या गाँधी जी ने पतर् िलखा, आदरणीय राहुल गाँधी जी ने पतर् 
िलखा िक हम िवपक्ष मȂ हȅ, इस मिहला आरक्षण िबल को पािरत िकया जा ए, हम आपके  साथ हȅ। 
उन्हȗने हमेशा मिहलाओं की बात की, मिहलाओं को न्याय िदलाने की बात की, मिहलाओं को 
अिधकार िदलाने की बात की। 9 साल बाद सरकार ने मिहला आरक्षण िबल की सुध ली है। देर 
आए, दुरुÎत आए। अभी भी टाइम है, पूरा िवपक्ष आपके  साथ है। आज हम इस िबल को समथर्न 
देने क े िलए खड़े हुए हȅ। सोिनया गाँधी जी ने हमेशा मिहलाओं को आगे बढ़ाने का का
म िकया ह ै। 
सभापित महोदय, मȅ बÎतर से आती हूँ और घोर नक्सली क्षेतर् से आती हूँ। िनिÌचत रूप  से कहीं न 
कहीं मȅ पंचायती राज से जनपद अध्यक्ष क े रूप  मȂ, िजला पंचायत क े अध्यक्ष क े रूप  मȂ और 
िवधायक से लेकर आज राज्य सभा क े इस सफर क े दौर मȂ यहाँ पर आई हूँ। यह पंचायती राज की 
बदौलत हुआ। यह राजीव गाँधी जी की देन थी। यह हमारे पूवर्जȗ, हमारे नेताओं की देन है िक 
मिहलाएँ आगे आई हȅ। आज राजनीितक Îतर पर, सामािजक Îतर पर और िवकास क
े  दृिÍटकोण 
से हर जगह मिहलाएँ आगे आई हȅ। आज मȅ आपके  सामने मिहलाओं को हक िदलाने की बात कर 
रही हूँ।  हमारे देश मȂ संख्या क े आधार पर आधी आबादी मिहलाओं की है।  िनिÌचत तौर पर यह 
हमारे न
ेताओं की दूरदृिÍट का ही पिरणाम है। मȅ गवर् से कहती हूँ िक राज्य सभा मȂ परसȂट क े 
अनुसार मिहलाओं की संख्या 17 Ģितशत ह ै ...(समय की घंटी)... और मȅ उसी गवर् से कहूँगी िक पूरे 
देश मȂ छǄीसगढ़ िवधान सभा मȂ सबसे ज्यादा मिहला िवधायक हȅ। सभापित महोदय, मȅ अभी तो 
बोलने क े िलए खड़ी हुई हूँ और आप समय नहीं दे रहे हȅ। यह क्या बात हुई? 
 
Ǜी सभापित: मैडम, आप बहुत अच्छा बोल रही हȅ। क ेवल 11 िमनट समय बचा था, मȅ आपको उसी 
िहसाब से समय दे रहा हूँ। Thirty seconds more.  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
97

 
Ǜीमती फ ूलो देवी नेतम: सभापित महोदय, मȅ मिहला हूँ, थोड़ी सी दया कर लीिजए। 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Thirty seconds more.  
 
Ǜीमती फ ूलो देवी नेतम: थोड़ी सी दया कर लीिजए, मुझे दो िमनट का टाइम दीिजए। 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Thirty seconds. 
 
Ǜीमती फ ूलो देवी नेतम: सभापित महोदय, जब देश की बात आई, तो हमने देश का भी नेतृत्व 
िकया।  हमने पािकÎतान से लड़ाई की और उसके  दो ट ुकड़े िकए। अगर घर-पिरवार चलाने की 
बात आई, तो भी हमारे सामने कोई नहीं िटका। आज हम महँगाई और बेरोजगारी स
े भी लड़ रहे हȅ। 
हम इतनी महँगाई मȂ भी घर चला रहे हȅ, िसिंलडर को भरवा नहीं पा रहे हȅ। सामने वाले कह रहे थे 
िक हमने िसिंलडर िदए, लेिकन हम महँगाई क े कारण िसिंलडर को भरवा नहीं पा रहे हȅ। हम आज 
भी िफर से चूÊहा जला रहे हȅ, लकड़ी जला रहे हȅ, चूÊहे को फ ूँ क रहे हȅ, चूÊहे का धुआँ खा रहे हȅ, 
आँखȗ मȂ आँसू आ रहे हȅ।   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Thank you.   
 
Ǜीमती फ ूलो देवी नेतम: सभापित महोदय, यह महँगाई क े कारण हो रहा है।   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Thank you. ....(Interruptions)... Shri Sujeet Kumar, thre
e minutes.  
....(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI SUJEET KUMAR: Sir,......(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Carry on. ....(Interruptions)... Thank you, Madam.  
....(Interruptions)...  There will be no time for your last speaker.  
....(Interruptions)...  Okay, no time for last speaker.  ....(Interruptions)... So, she is 
the last speaker.  ....(Interruptions)...  Madam, conclude in one minute. 
 
Ǜीमती फ ूलो देवी नेतम: सभापित महोदय, मिणपुर मȂ इतना अत्याचार हो रहा है, िफर भी हम चुप 
हȅ।  जी20 मȂ हमने देश को शमर्सार नहीं िकया, क्यȗिक हम देशभƪ हȅ। सभापित महोदय, आप 
बार-बार बैठने क े िलए कह रहे हȅ, मȅ आपकी बात मान रही हूँ। मȅ यहाँ इस िबल का प
ुरजोर 
समथर्न करते हुए आपको धन्यवाद देती हूँ। 
 
98
[RAJYA SABHA]

MR. CHAIRMAN: Thank you. Now, Shri Sujeet Kumar. Hon. Member, you have three 
minutes.   
 
SHRI SUJEET KUMAR (Odisha): Thank you Ch airman, Sir. Ours is the land where 
mothers and motherland has been given a pedestal greater than heaven - " जननी 
जन्मभूिमÌच Îवगार्दिप गरीयसी।" Sir, today, the entire nati on is captured by this Bill 
which is being discussed in both the Hous es of Parliament. Virtually, everyone is 
discussing about it in passing or in detail. Last month, when Vikram landed on the 
South Pole of the Moon, the place was called ' Shiv Shakti' . Hopefully, this Bill will 
bring Nari Shaktri into our Parliament and hopefully lead to a better decision making 
and better policy making in our governance structure. Ever y time, I go to different 
places in Odisha for political work, I interact with women sarpanches, women block 
pramukhs and Zila Parishad members.  I aske d myself, has the representation of 
women, the reservation for women in th e PRI system led to better development 
outcomes at the grassroots? Has it led to better investment for women for issues 
concerning women? The answer I found is an  emphatic 'Yes'. I found that women in 
the PRI, the Panchayati Raj Systems and ur ban local bodies have been making very 
meaningful contributions and also the concern which has been raised in many 
quarters that men are acting as proxies for women in the urban local bodies and PRIs 
has been found to be baseless. When we ta lk of women-led development, I feel that 
the best case study today in the country is , probably, of the State of Odisha and 
Odisha Model of Development. I substantiate these with facts. My party, Biju Janata 
Dal and my Chief Minister, Shri Naveen Patn aik, has always believed that no society 
and no country can develop or can be called a Viswaguru unless women are given the 
pedestal they deserve. We have always believed in empowerment of women in public 
life and in all spheres of social and econo mic life. Please allow me to quote some 
statistics. Even before the 73
rd Amendment Act of 1993, wa y back in 1992, the then 
Chief Minister, late Shri Biju Patnaik, had given 33 per cent reservation for women in 
the Panchayati Raj and became the first State in the country to do so.  Subsequently, 
his son, the current Chief Minister, Shri Nav een Patnaik, in 2011 extended that to 50 
per cent in the PRIs and in 2012, 50 per cent in the urban local bodies.  In the month 
of November, 2018, the Government of Odisha passed a resolution in the State 
Assembly urging for 33 per cent reservation  in the Parliament and in the State 
Assemblies. Then, a month later, in December, 2018, hon. Chief Minister of my State 
sent 22 delegations to all the parties includ ing seven national parties. Senior leaders 
of our party went to these leaders tryi ng to build a consensus that Women's 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
99

Reservation Bill should be passed in the Pa rliament and women should get their due 
place under the Sun.  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Thank you. 
 
SHRI SUJEET KUMAR: Sir, I will just conclude in 30 seconds. 
 Sir, in the 2019 elections, out of 21 Lo k Sabha seats, we gave tickets to seven 
women from our party, out of which five wo n.  Sir, 42 per cent of our BJD MPs are 
women in our Lok Sabha.  We are talking of 33 per cent but we have already reached 
42 per cent in our party.  Not only in polit ical empowerment but we believe in social 
and economic empowerment.  I can give you two examples of it.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Thank you.  
 
SHRI SUJEET KUMAR: Sir, in 1991, the Go vernment of Odisha reserved 30 per cent 
of all Government jobs for women. We ha ve a health scheme and it is called the 
Biju Swasthya Kalyan Yojana where women get double the benefit of men. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Okay. 
 
SHRI SUJEET KUMAR: Sir, we introduced Mamata Yoja na way back in 2008 where 
pregnant women, lactating mothers got health  benefits and financial benefits. I could 
go on and on but at the end, I will say that th is is not reservation but this is rightful 
representation. As mother of democracy, we, India, that is Bharat, should give 
rightful representation to our women.  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Shrimati Jaya Bachchan. You have four minutes for your 
speech.  
 
Ǜीमती जया बƳन : थȅक यू, सर, आिखर मȂ बोलने क े बहुत नुकसान हȅ, क्यȗिक बोलने को क ु छ 
बचा ही नहीं है। 
 
Ǜी सभापित: मैडम,  
"इतने िहÎसȗ मȂ बंट गया मȅ, 
िक म
ेरे िहÎसे मȂ क ु छ बचा ही नहीं।" 
 
100
[RAJYA SABHA]

Ǜीमती जया बƳन: सर, ...( Ëयवधान)... अब आप तो समय मत िगनवाइए, ये तो िगनवाते ही रहते 
हȅ। सर, सबसे पहले मȅ चेयर को धन्यवाद दूंगी िक आज आपने मिहलाओं को इतना महत्व िदया, 
उनको क ुसीर् पर बैठने का मौका िदया। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
एक माननीय सदÎया: मुझे नहीं िदया।...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜीमती जया
 बƳन: अच्छा! Sir, I hope that this is not cosmetic. This parampara will be 
carried on and remain; नहीं तो आपको हाउस की सब मिहलाएं ÃलािÎटक सजर्न कहȂगी। 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I know their fire power. 
 
Ǜीमती जया बƳन: सर, आपकी क ुसीर् बहुत मज़ेदार है।...(Ëयवधान)... वहां बैठो, तो वह झूले की 
तरह आगे-पीछे होती रहती ह
 ै।  So, now, I know as to why you keep coming back and 
sitting here for so long! इस सेवन Îटार होटल मȂ अगर कोई अच्छी चीज़ है, तो आपकी यह 
चेयर है, जो बहुत बिढ़या है। सर, हम लोग कौन होते हȅ मिहलाओं को आरक्षण देने वाले? Who 
the hell are we? हमारे मȂ िहÇमत है, इसिलए हम तो आ गए। हमारे लीडसर् मȂ िहÇमत है िक वे 
हमको ले आए, अब िजनको लाना चािहए, वे क्या कर रहे हȅ, मुझे पता नहीं। 2029 मȂ सरकार 
आएगी या
 नहीं आएगी, इलेक्शन हो जाएगा, हम जीतȂगे, मिहलाओं को हरा दȂगे या िजताएंग े या 
िफर ऐसे ही िटकट्स दȂगे, जहां से वे हार जाएंगी, ये सब डर्ामे बंद होने चािहए। सर, Îपेिशयली 
इस हाउस मȂ जरूर  यह सब बंद होना चािहए।  
मुझे याद है, वह राज्य सभा का बहुत अच्छा घर था, िबल आया, सुषमा जी और व ृंदा 
करात जी ने उसके  ऊपर बहुत लÇबे-लÇबे भाषण िदए और वह िबल पास हो गया। इतना अच्छा 
लगा िक बीजेपी और सीपीआई (एम) गले िमले, हंसे और बहुत मज़े िकए, लेिकन उन्हȗने गाली 
एसपी को दे दी, तब भी हमने अपोज़ नहीं िकया।  We asked for the sa me thing. That is 
reservation
 within reservation. मगर, it suited everybody. माफ किरएगा, आप लोगȗ क े 
यहां बहुत िवǎान हȅ, मगर आप लोग सही वƪ पर चुप रहते हȅ। उस वƪ आप लोगȗ ने भी हमारा 
साथ नहीं िदया था और न ही देते हȅ।  ऐसा तो चलता रहता है। This is politics. अभी आप अगर 
बीच म
Ȃ बोलȂगे, तो, I will take great objection. I have been sitting quietly. Please do not 
make a comment. You have brought the Bill.  We are supporting the Bill. Let us say 
what we want to say. सर, हर चीज़ मȂ ये लोग कमȂट्स करते रहते हȅ। अगर हम कमȂट्स करȂ, 
तो िफर नाराज़ हो जाते हȅ। आप इस बात को मानते हȅ न, सर? आप मानते हȅ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी सभापित: मȅ तो बीच मȂ हूं।...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
Ǜीमती जया बƳन: तब तो दोनȗ तरफ वाले आपको परेशान करȂगे।  
सर, सबसे पहले मȅ कहना चाहूंगी, यहां अंदर और बाहर क े लोग भी मुझसे पूछते हȅ, कई 
एमपीज़ पूछते हȅ, कई जनर्िलÎट्स पूछते हȅ िक क्या आप लोग इस िबल क े अगȂÎट हȅ? मȅ उनको 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
101

बताना चाहूंगी िक हम इस िबल क े अगȂÎट नहीं हȅ। मȅ आपको बता सकती हूं िक इस हाउस क े 
हमारे पाटीर् क े लीडसर्, Ģो. राम गोपाल यादव जी यहां बैठे हुए हȅ, मेरे साथी जावेद अली जी भी 
यहां बैठे हुए हȅ, हम सब इस िबल को सपोटर् करते हȅ, मगर हमारी क ु छ क ंडीशंस हȅ। हमारी वही 
क ंडीशंस हȅ, जो बाकी लोगȗ ने भी बताई हȅ। सर, एक चीज़ जो है, and this is being bothering 
me for a while that if you ar e really serious about giving tickets to 33 per cent in the 
upcoming elections, especially, to the repr esentation of the minority community and 
about which you have shown grea
t empathy to these Muslim women by bringing in 
the triple talaq, आपने उस वƪ िटर्पल तलाक क े ऊपर बहुत बातȂ कीं, तो अब उनको भी िटकट 
दीिजए and if you are really serious, then, pass it. You have the strength, make the will 
and do not bring anything which you do not mean. िसफर् Ģचार क े िलए इसे मत किरए।  
आप लोगȗ की आदत ह
ै, आप Ģचार बहुत करते हȅ और Ģचार क े ऊपर खचार् भी बहुत करते हȅ। हर 
बात क े ऊपर Ģचार करते हȅ, इसके  ऊपर भी Ģचार, उसके  ऊपर भी Ģचार, हम इस Ģचार का 
वीिडयो देख-देख कर त
ंग आ गए हȅ। 
Sir, I request on behalf of my party fo r reservation within reservation and as 
everybody else has said, I also support it . 20 per cent seats and 15 per cent of seats 
shall be reserved for women belonging to Other Backward Classes, especially, the 
Muslim minority and women belonging to mi nority communities, respectively, out of 
the total number of seats reserved for women an d to be filled by direct election in the 
Legislative Assembly of the National Capital Territory of Delhi. I do not want to read 
the rest and waste my time. I would rather give this time to somebody else who has to 
speak after me. Thank you very much, Sir. Si r, I thank you very much for giving me 
the opportunity to sit there on the rocking chair.           
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Madam, on a point of info rmation, I started the practice of 50 per 
cent women being on the Panel of Vice-Chairmen in the earlier House. It is in practice 
and I will take it higher also . Now Shri Jayant Chaudhary. ...(Interruptions)... The 
Leader of the House.  
 
सभा क े न
ेता ( Ǜी पीयूष गोयल): सर, अगर इससे higher लेकर जाएँगे, तब आपके  पास men's 
reservation क े िलए आना पड़ेगा। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी सभापित: मȅ तो अपने घर मȂ वैसे भी माइनॉिरटी मȂ हूँ। ...(Ëयवधान)... Now, Shri Jayant 
Chaudhary.  You have four minutes.  
 
Ǜी जयंत चौधरी (उǄर Ģदेश): सभापित जी, आपका धन्यवाद। आज मȅ देश की नारी शिƪ क
 े  
सÇमान मȂ उनका सहयोग करने और उनके  पक्ष मȂ समथर्न देने क े िलए खड़ा हुआ हूँ। हमȂ अपने 
 
102
[RAJYA SABHA]

देश मȂ मिहलाएँ घर क े अन्दर और घर क े बाहर अलग-अलग रूपȗ मȂ िदखती हȅ। वे खेत मȂ मजदूरी 
भी करती हȅ, खेती भी करती हȅ; वे उǏमी भी हȅ, Ëयापारी भी हȅ; रोजगार ले भी रही हȅ, रोजगार दे 
भी रही हȅ; छातर् भी हȅ, व
ैज्ञािनक भी हȅ; astronaut भी हȅ, िखलाड़ी भी हȅ। राजनीितक ËयवÎथा की 
बुिनयाद से लेकर, गर्ाम पंचायत से Åलॉक तक, िजले तक, हर Îतर पर आपको उनकी संख्या 
बढ़ती िदख रही है, लेिकन यह कटु सत्य है िक िवधानपािलकाओ ं मȂ उनकी जो संख्या होनी 
चािहए थी, जो तादाद होनी चािहए थी, वह आज तक नहीं बन पाई और इसिलए आरक्षण जैसे 
affirmative action को लेकर, आज हम सब लोग िमलकर, पूरा ज़ोर लगाने क े िलए तैयार हȅ।   
आज क े िदन मȅ चौधरी चरण िंसह जी को याद करता हूँ। वे बड़ी-बड़ी राजनीितक सभाओं 
मȂ गर्ामीण क्षेतर्ȗ मȂ दुलर्भ शौच की ËयवÎथा पर भाषण िदया करते थे और Ģकाश डालते थे। आज 
जाितयȗ क े बीच सÇबन्धȗ मȂ इतनी कƺरता जो बढ़ती जा रही ह ै, उसको देखते हुए वे अंतजार्तीय 
िववाह क े पक्षधर बन कर लोगȗ को जोड़ने की बात करते थे, क्यȗिक वे चाहते थे िक समाज बदले। 
उनके  जमाने से लेकर आज तक बहुत चीज़Ȃ हो गयी हȅ, बहुत सी चीज़Ȃ बदल चुकी हȅ, लेिकन आगे 
का राÎता अभी भी बहुत लÇबा है।   
 
[उपसभाध्यक्ष (डा. कÊपना स
ैनी)पीठासीन हुईं।] 
 
महोदया, मȅने खुद देखा है िक गाँव मȂ सामािजक और राजनीितक परÇपराओं क े कारण लज्जा 
और शमर् को बहाना बनाकर अगर उन पर ज्यादा बोझ डाला जाता
 है, तो शहरȗ मȂ भी मध्यम वगर् 
मȂ बहुत बड़े-बड़े, सÇĥांत पिरवारȗ मȂ भी घर की मिहलाएँ ही खाना बना रही हȅ। वे पहले बाहर 
वालȗ को और घर वालȗ को खाना िखलाती हȅ, उसके  बाद सबसे आिख
र मȂ खाती हȅ, िफर चाहे वे 
गभर्वती भी हȗ।  आप समझ सकते हȅ िक अगर एक माँ आिखर मȂ अपने पोषण का ध्यान रखेगी, तो 
उसका Ģभाव आने वाली पीढ़ी पर पड़ेगा। इसिलए हम जब क ुपोषण की बात करते हȅ, तो गुजरात 
स
े भी ताज्जुब करने वाले आंकड़े आते हȅ, बहुत िनराश करने वाले आंकड़े आते हȅ। मिहलाओं क े 
िखलाफ अपराध नहीं रुक  रहे हȅ, लाख Ģयासȗ क े बावजूद भी नहीं रुक  पा रहे हȅ। यह हैवािनयत 
क्यȗ है?  चाहे वह उन्नाव हो, कठु आ हो, हाथरस हो या मिणपुर हो -  हमारी जो मि
हला िखलाड़ी 
थीं, उन्हȗने िकतना अत्याचार चुपचाप सहा।  अच्छा होता िक आज टर्ेज़री बȂचेज़ से जो आवाज़ 
िनकल रही है, उस समय भी आपको उनके  पक्ष मȂ बात रखनी चािहए
 थी।   
मȅ मानता हूँ िक इन चीज़ȗ का समाधान तब होगा, जब हम जैसे लोगȗ की संख्या ऐसे 
सदनȗ मȂ कम होगी और मिहलाओं को खुद एजȂसी िमलेगी तथा खुद अपने नेतृत्व को आगे बढ़ाने 
का मौका as a voter, as a suppo rter and as a leader िमलेगा। मȅ इसीिलए इस िबल का 
समथर्न करता हूँ। इस िबल क े सÇबन्ध म
Ȃ मेरे दो ही सवाल हȅ। नÇबर वन, अगर हम आपकी Ģिकर्या 
को ही फॉलो करते हȅ, तो 10 साल तो कहीं नहीं गए। जो चीज़ शायद 2034 तक आनी है, उसके  
िलए यह जÊदबाजी क्यȗ?  Îपेशल सेशन होगा, पहले बताया नहीं जाएगा िक कौन सा िबल ह
ै, 
उसके  बाद जÊदबाजी मȂ कहा जाएगा िक यह िबल लो और पास करो। ऐसी क्या मजबूरी ह ै? 
िंवटर सेशन मȂ भी इसे ला सकते थे।  कल गृह मंतर्ी अिमत शाह जी ने लोक सभा मȂ कहा िक हम 
यह जो पिरसीमन आयोग बना रहे हȅ, यह जन सुनवाई करेगा।  क्या मिहलाओं को आरक्षण देन े क े 
िलए हमȂ जनसंख्या तलाशनी पड़ेगी, िजले-िजले मȂ जन सुनवाई करनी पड़ेगी? क्या आज भी 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
103

मिहलाओं को आगे आकर गवाही देनी पड़ेगी िक हमȂ आरक्षण दो? क्या िफर दोबारा माँग उठानी 
पड़ेगी और िफर दोबारा िवरोध झेलना पड़ेगा?  इसिलए  पिरसीमन आयोग की कहीं कोई 
आवÌयकता नहीं है। मȅ सवाल पूछता हूँ िक देश क े माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी Îवगीर्य अटल िबहारी 
वाजपेयी क े समय जो कानून आया था, जो ĢÎताव आया था, उसकी जो Ģिकर्या थी, उस Ģिकर्या 
मȂ क्या किमयाँ थीं? बाकी आगे-पीछे जो ĢÎताव थे, उन्हȂ भ
ूल जाइए, लेिकन आप वाजपेयी जी को 
क्यȗ भूल गये? सीधी सी बात है िक लोग समझ गए हȅ िक यह रोड़ा तैयार िकया जा रहा है, ये 
अड़चनȂ तैयार की जा रही हȅ। नीित तो ठीक हो सकती है, लेिकन नीयत मȂ क ु छ खोट है।   
आपने ' धूम' िपक्चर देखी, उसके  बाद ' धूम-2' आई; ' मुन्ना भाई एमबीबीएस' आई और 
उसके  बाद 'लगे रहो मुन्ना भाई' आई। इसमȂ कई बार पाटर्-1 और पाटर्-2 होता है। उसी तरह से 
'अच्छे िदन
' आये थे, 'अच्छे िदन' आयȂगे। लोग समझ गये हȅ िक 'अच्छे िदन' आयȂगे पाटर्-2 है और 
क ु छ नहीं है।   
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (डा. कÊपना सैनी): अब आप कन्क्लूड करȂ। आपका समय पूरा हो रहा है।  
 
Ǜी जयंत चौधरी: महोदया, 2022 तक देश क े हर गरीब को छत िमल जानी थी, िकस
ान की आय 
दोगुनी होनी थी, 100 Îमाटर् शहर बनने थे। िफर कहा गया िक िंचता मत करो, 'अमृत काल' ह
ै, 
रुक  जाओ। आप आज, कल और परसȗ का िहसाब दीिजए। आज आप यह बताइए िक मिहलाएँ 
इंतजार क्यȗ करȂ?  अगले चुनाव मȂ आरक्षण क्यȗ नहीं िदया - आप यह बताइए? यह सवाल सबके  
मन मȂ है।  मȅ संत कबीर जी का एक दोहा दोहराता हूँ िक :  
 
"काल करे सो आज कर, आज करे सो अब, 
पल मȂ परलय होएगी, बहुिर करेगा कब।'' 
 धन्यवाद।                                                                                       
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (डा. कÊपना सैनी): माननीय Ǜी घनÌयाम ितवाड़ी जी।  
 
Ǜी घनÌयाम ितवाड़ी ( राजÎथान): माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, आज मुझे इस
 बात की 
Ģसन्नता है िक सÇपूणर् सदन मȂ एक बात पर तो सहमित है िक सभी मिहलाओं को आरक्षण िदया 
जाए।  थोड़ी-थोड़ी रौनक बनी रहे, इसिलए थोड़ी-थोड़ी बातȂ बीच मȂ आ जाती ह
ȅ, लेिकन िफर भी 
हमारे लोकतंतर् का यह सौभाग्य है िक आज हम सब लोग एक बात को मान कर चल रहे हȅ।  
 उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, एक ĢÌन यहाँ बार -बार उठाया गया िक यह Îपेशल सतर् क्यȗ 
बुलाया गया और यह िबल आज यहाँ क्यȗ रखा गया? मȅ जान
कारी क े िलए बताना चाहता हूँ िक 
सदन मȂ Ģवेश करने क े िलए 'गणेश चतुथीर्' से अच्छा कोई अवसर नहीं हो सकता था, इसिलए 
यह सतर् बुलाया गया। चतुथीर् का िदन िंहदू संवत्सर क े अनुसार सृिÍट क
े  उत्पन्न होने का िदन है 
और चतुथीर् सबसे बड़ी ितिथ भी मानी जाती है, इसिलए उस िदन इस सदन मȂ Ģवेश िकया गया, 
तािक भारत क े लोकतंतर् मȂ नई सृिÍट का Ģारंभ हो और 2047 तक हम इस सदन क े माध्यम से 
िवकिसत राÍटर् बनȂ।   यह इसिलए िकया गया है।  
104
[RAJYA SABHA]

महोदया, अब मȅ एक और दूसरा िनवेदन करना चाहता हूँ िक यह िबल इस समय क्यȗ 
लाया गया। यह िबल इसिलए लाया गया, क्यȗिक पंचमी की ितिथ जो है, वह 'ऋिष पंचमी' होती है 
और 'ऋिष पंचमी' क े िदन ऋिषयȗ की पूजा क े साथ-साथ एक संकÊप होता है, िजस संकÊप का 
नाम है - 'हेमादर्ी संकÊप', मतलब 'Îवणर् संकÊप'।  Ģधान मंतर्ी मोदी जी ने यह Îवणर् संकÊप िलया 
है िक इतनी बार यह िबल पास नहीं हुआ, रुक  गया, लेिकन 'ऋिष प
ंचमी' क े िदन हम संकÊप ले 
रहे हȅ िक अब यह आरक्षण िदला कर ही रहȂगे, इसिलए यह काम िकया गया।  मȅ पहली बात तो 
यह कहना चाहता हूँ िक य
े चतुथीर् और पंचमी क े जो िदन थे, ये दोनȗ महत्वपूणर् िदन थे, इसिलए 
सदन का यह िवशेष सतर् बुलाया गया।   
महोदया, मȅ दूसरी बात यह िनवेदन करना चाहता हूँ िक एक बात, जो बार-बार कही गई 
है िक इसको कल से लागू कर दीिजए या परसȗ स
े लागू कर दीिजए, तो ऐसा करने से िकसने 
रोका है - इसको आपने रोका। जब इस बार का डीिलिमटेशन ह
ुआ था, उस डीिलिमटेशन 
कमीशन मȂ राजÎथान क े जो पाँच लोग थे, उनमȂ मȅ भी मेÇबर था और क ुलदीप िंसह, जो सुĢीम 
कोटर् क े जज थे, वे उसके  चेयरमैन थे। इसी संसद ने यह ĢÎताव पास िकया था िक 2026 स
े पहले 
डीिलिमटेशन नहीं होगा और 2026 मȂ डीिलिमटेशन होगा। डीिलिमटेशन 2026 मȂ हो, इसिलए यह 
संिवधान संशोधन िबल इस सदन क े ǎारा पास िकया गया था। उसमȂ यह भी Ģावधान था िक 2021 
मȂ जनगणना Ģारंभ होगी और उसके  बाद यह काम होगा। अब अिम
त शाह जी गृह मंतर्ी हȅ। वे इस 
िबल क े पास होने क े बाद जÊदी जनगणना करा लȂगे और जनगणना कराने क े बाद जÊदी ही 
डीिलिमटेशन कमीशन बन जाएगा। इसके  बाद मिहलाओं को आरक्षण िमल जाएगा। 
 यहाँ पर दो बातȂ बार-बार कही गई हȅ। ...(
Ëयवधान)... आप कहते, तो मȅ पहले बोल देता। मȅ 
यह कहना चाहता हूँ िक यहाँ पर बार-बार कहा गया िक 'वंदन' क्यȗ ह ै? मȅ आप सब लोगȗ क े िलए 
एक Ìलोक सुना रहा हूँ, िजससे यह पता चल जाएगा िक 'वंदन' क्यȗ है। 
 
"जटाधारी कण्ठे भुजगपितहारी पशुपितः, 
कपाली भूतेशो भजित जगदीशैकपदवीं, 
भवािन तवत्पािणगर्हणपिरपाटीफलिमदç।" 
 
 उन्हȗने कहा िक जो जटाधारी हȅ, िज
नके  गले मȂ साँप पड़े हुए हȅ, जो भूतȗ क े देवता हȅ, 
उनको आपने जगदीश बना िदया। क्यȗ बनाया? शंकराचायर् जी ने कहा :  
 
'भवािन तवत्पािणगर्हणपिरपाटीफलिमदç।' 
 
 अथार्Þ, हे भवािन, तेरे से इनकी शादी हो गई, इसिलए ये जगदीश बन गए, नहीं तो नहीं 
बनते। अब आप लोग भी घरȗ पर जाकर प
ूछ लेना। यही कह देना िक मȅ एमपी क ै से बन गया, 
एमएलए क ै से बन गया, तेरे से शादी हो गई, इसिलए  बन गया और अगर मना कर िदया, तो ठीक 
नहीं होगा। हमने इस िबल मȂ वंदना इसिलए की है िक हम सब जो यहाँ बैठे हुए हȅ, उसका कारण 
यही है।  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
105

 मुझे जो तकलीफ हुई, वह यह है िक हमारे माननीय सदÎय क े. सी. वेणुगोपाल जी तो 
क ेरल क े हȅ, लेिकन उन्हȗने राहुल जी क े िलए अपनी सीट का त्याग कर िदया। उन्हȗने क ेरल से 
त्याग कर िदया और पाँच बरस की बजाए छः बरस का समय राजÎथान से ले िलया। अब वे 
राजÎथान से आ गए, लेिकन मिणपुर की बात कर रहे हȅ।...(समय की घंटी)... मȅ उनसे कहना 
चाहता हूँ िक राजÎथान म
Ȃ एक कहावत है :  
 
"चलते हुए पैरȗ मȂ लगी हुई आग िदखाई नहीं दे रही है, 
और पहाड़ पर लगी हुई आग िदखाई दे रही है।" 
 
 राजÎथान मȂ आिदवासी मिहला को िनवर्Îतर् करके  पूरे गाँव मȂ घुमाया गया। उनको वह 
िदखाई नहीं दे रहा है। ...(Ëयवधान)... राजÎथान मȂ गुजर्र की एक  लड़की को चार लोगȗ ने 
बलात्कार करके  भƺी मȂ जला िदया। उनको वह िदखाई नहीं दे रहा है। ...(Ëयवधान)... इसिलए ये 
सारे काम करने वाले यह सोचȂ िक मिहला आरक्षण िबल पर इन बातȗ को बोलने की आवÌयकता 
नहीं थी, लेिकन उन्हȗने बोला, इसिलए मȅन
े जवाब िदया। मȅ आज यह बात कहना चाहता हूँ िक 
यह जो िबल आया है, सदन का यह जो िवशेष सतर् है, ये सब िवशेष purpose क े िलए लाए हȅ। ये 
सारे क े सारे काम पूरे हȗगे। हम यह आंदोलन चला रहे हȅ। मिहला सशि
ƪकरण हमारा कोई 
राजनीितक मुǈा नहीं है।  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष  (डा. कÊपना सैनी): माननीय सदÎय, क ृपया आप समाÃत करने का Ģयास करȂ। 
 
Ǜी घनÌयाम ितवाड़ी: हम यह आंदोलन चला कर मिहलाओं का जो Îथान है, उनको वह Îथा न 
िदलाना चाहते हȅ और यह कहना चाहते हȅ :  
"यतर् नायर्Îतु पूज्यन्ते, रमन्ते ततर् देवताः।" 
 
 सारे देश मȂ देवताओं का वास हो, इसिलए नािरयȗ की पूजा करके  यह ' नारी वंदन 
िवधेयक' लाया गया है, बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। 
      
उपसभाध्यक्ष  (डा. कÊपना स
ैनी): माननीय सदÎया डा. अमी यािज्ञक। 
 
DR. AMEE YAJNIK (Gujarat): Madam, I stand here on behalf of my party to support 
the Bill. I have been hearing the speeches  on Women's Reservation Bill from none 
less than Ministers and leaders. But, I thin k they have been talking only about the 
social welfare schemes of the present Gove rnment and they have mixed up the issue 
that this is a matter of right to be given to the wo men.The social welfare schemes are 
there to strengthen the social standing in so ciety. The crux of this Bill is that women 
need to have political empowerment. She ha s to come, sit and participate in decision 
making. That is not happening and for that, I think we have to go back and see the 
106
[RAJYA SABHA]

journey which Rajiv Gandhi had started. And, Rajiv Ga ndhi started this journey 
because when he went travelling to the rural areas, he saw that here there is 
absolutely no governance. That is why the Panchayati Raj institutions were brought 
about, and with that, there was one-third reservation for women because there would 
be never an easy entry for women in the power corridors. He realised that and, that is 
why, he made a speech in the Parliament  that women are mothers, grandmothers, 
daughters and sisters, but, to bring them in to the political arena, we need to give 
them this right and that is how that law came. And, after 20 years, two-and-a-half 
decades of the 73rd and the 74 th Amendments, we see that  there are forty per cent 
women sarpanches, out of the total hundred per cent . And, that was the reply given 
by the Minister of Panchayati Raj in the Rajya Sabha. Today, that is the situation. 
Now, what is the spill over effect? When a women sarpanch sits, she brings to the 
table her experience, her sensitivity, her participation and whatever she has 
experienced as a woman, and that has a spill ov er effect in the society, and, that is 
where, there is a social progress in society. Madam, along with that, you have to see 
that journey. After Rajiv Gandhi's vision, Soniaji carried on that vision and she insisted 
that the Bill be passed for Legislative Assemblies and the Lok Sabha. She tried her 
best; the Bill was passed in the Rajya Sabh a in 2010. But, alongside, under UPA-I 
and UPA-II, we also had legal empowerment,  right based laws, which gave power to 
women within the domestic sphere. With the Domestic Violence Act, which was 
removed from the criminal jurisprudence to  a civil environment, she could knock the 
doors of the family courts. Came the law,  post-Nirbhaya, which was to see that 
women in public spaces get legal protection.  That also is empowerment. After that 
came the Sexual Harassment at Workplace. So, in workplace also all the three 
spaces, women were given protection by way of  right and this is the constitutional 
mandate that women and men are equal before  l a w .  T h i s  i s  w h a t  i s  t h e  c r u x  o f  
reservation. We don't want to hear policies, we don't want to hear about Ujjawala, we 
don't want to hear about all this, othe r policies of the Government; talk on 
reservation. You have brought a Bill with conditions, with caveats, that means your 
intention is not fair. You do  not want to give empowerment to women; you do not 
want women to sit in decision-making proced ures, you do not want her to be having 
a political empowerment alongside you.  Wh at is that which you are fearing and why 
have you put such programmes in it, deli mitation and Census? They are in your 
hands. What were you doing for nine-and-a-half years? What have you been doing 
for nine years? You have only done lip service, you want to make tall claims, you want 
to think that every space is a rally, every space has only political bhashans . You do 
not want to actually translate social justi ce embedded in the Constitution of India to 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
107

the women of this country. Women need political empowerment. She wants to sit and 
take decisions. During Corona time, we saw that women got all the infrastructure for 
online empowerment. Again, it was Rajiv Gand hi's vision to take the country in the 
21st Century, while he was in the 20th Ce ntury, that women and everyone should 
have these computer systems, and that is  why, today we are empowered socially. 
Women have mobile telephony. Women have all kind of online applications. You talk 
of digital India. You talk of mother of democracy. But, you do not want the mothers to 
sit with you. You do not want to give them rightful place in political empowerment. 
So, Madam, there was legal empowerment in UPA-I, UPA-II.  Women got all the 
rights. Women got all the infrastructure du ring that time, Right to Food, Right to 
Education, and, that is where, wome n are today graduating, going for post-
graduation and we have scientists. And, le t me give one example. One of the largest 
banks had a woman as Chairman and M.D ., who was manning the position. So, you 
mean to say that she was born in 2014, she finished her schooling in 2015, she 
graduated in 2016 and she be came the Chairperson, M.D. in 2018. The education 
system infrastructure was put in place post Independence 
 
5.00 P.M. 
 
I would like to bring to the notice of the House...  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (डा. कÊपना सैनी): माननीय सदÎय, आपका समय समाÃत हो रहा है। 
 
DR. AMEE YAJNIK: Just one minute, Madam. If you are talking of democracy, 
democracy needs development and development can happen only if freedom of right, 
freedom to exercise that right, which is in  the Constitution is given to the women of 
this country. The women have to be a part  of participatory democracy and decision-
making processes and that is where I think this Reservation Bill has to be 
implemented right away without caveats and without any conditions. Thank you, 
Madam. 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( डा. कÊपना सैनी): Ǜी मुजीबुÊला खान जी। माननीय सदÎय, आपके  पास एक 
िमनट का समय है।  
 
Ǜी मुजीबुƥा खान (ओिडशा): महोदया, नारी का सशƪ होना ही समृिǉ का मागर् है और सशƪ 
मिहला ही समाज को सशƪ बना सकती है। म
ैडम, मȅ Îवाधीनता सेनािनयȗ क े बारे मȂ बताना 
चाहता हूँ िक नारी समाज ने Îवतंतर्ता संगर्ाम मȂ क
ै से भाग िलया था। उसमȂ ओिडशा से रमा देवी 
108
[RAJYA SABHA]

जी, सरला देवी जी और मालती देवी जी थीं। जब रमा देवी जी ने सत्यागर्ह आंदोलन मȂ भाग िलया 
था, तब उनके  गभर् मȂ बच्चा पल रहा था और िĤिटश सरकार ने उन्हȂ मार-मारकर जेल मȂ डाल 
िदया था। इसके  क ु छ िदन बाद उन्हȗने जेल म Ȃ एक पुतर् संतान को जन्म िदया था। ओिडशा की 
नारी िकतनी मजबूत है, यह आप खुद ही सोच सकते हȅ। जब बीजू पटनायक जी 1960 मȂ पहली 
बार ओिडशा क े मुख्य मंतर्ी बने थे, तब वे एक ऐसी नारी को लाए थे, जो Îटू ड Ȃट किरयर मȂ अपनी 
धाक िदखा चुकी थी, जो आंदोलन से आई थी और उसे उन्हȗने राज्य सभा मȂ भेजा था। 1962 क े 
दस साल बाद, वे ओिडशा क े मुख्य मंतर्ी क े रूप  मȂ सामने आईं और वे थीं, Ǜीमती नंिदनी सत्पथी।  
मैडम, जब बीजू पटनायक जी न
े पंचायत राज िसÎटम मȂ 33 परस Ȃट िरजवȃशन लागू 
िकया, आप लोगȗ को जानकर हैरानी होगी िक पाँच टर्ाइबल िवमेन, जो मिहलाएं पढ़ना-िलखना 
नहीं जानती हȅ, अंगूठा लगाती हȅ, उन्हȂ बीजू पटनायक जी ने एडवाइज़र क े रूप  मȂ अपॉइंट िकया 
था। वे लोग
 बीजू पटनायक जैसे चीफ िमिनÎटर को एडवाइज़ देते थे और 90 क े दशक मȂ ओिडशा 
सरकार चलती थी। बीजू बाबू ने टर्ाइबल लोगȗ क े िलए िजतना काम िकया है, मिहलाओं क े िलए 
िजतना काम िकया है, उतना शायद ही िकसी नेता ने िकया होगा। मिहलाओं क े िलए सरकारी 
नौकरी मȂ भी 30 परस Ȃट िरजवȃशन बीजू बाबू ने िदया था। नौकरी क
े  िलए 35 साल  की उĦ थी, 
लेिकन इसमȂ भी पाँच साल एक्Îटर्ा बढ़ाए गए।     
   
उपसभाध्यक्ष (डा. कÊपना सैनी): माननीय सदÎय, आपके  पास क ेवल एक िमनट का समय है। 
  
Ǜी मुजीबुƥा खान: दूसरी बात, जब बीजू बाबू ने िरजवȃशन लाग
ू िकया, तब पंचायत, िजला 
पिरषद और प
ंचायत सिमित मȂ 28,000 मिहलाएं चुनकर आई थीं। माननीय मुख्य मंतर्ी, नवीन 
पटनायक जी क े आने क े बाद, वे बीजू बाबू का अधूरा काम पूरा करने क े िलए आगे बढ़े और जो 33 
परसȂट िरजवȃशन था, उसे नवीन पटनायक जी ने 50 परसȂट मȂ कन्वटर् िकया है। ...(समय की 
घंटी)... मैडम, िसफर् एक िमनट दे दीिजए। नवीन पटनायक जी ने 50 परसȂट िरजवȃशन िदया। जब 
2018 मȂ ओिडशा असेÇबली मȂ मिहला आरक्षण िबल सवर्सÇमित से पास हुआ था, उसके  बाद से 
आज तक नवीन बाबू न
े न जाने िकतनी मेहनत की है। हर राज्य क े मुख्य मंतर्ी क े पास डेिलगेशन 
भेजा है। सब पाटीर्ज़ से िरक्वेÎट की गई है िक आप मिहला िबल का समथर्न कीिजए। हमारा 
डेिलगेशन हाथ जोड़कर हर पाटीर्, हर म
ुख्य मंतर्ी क े पास गया था, िजसका नतीजा आज आ रहा 
है।  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (डा. कÊपना सैनी): माननीय सदÎय, अब आप समाÃत किरए।  
 
Ǜी मुजीबुƥा खान: इसके  िलए मȅ क Ȃ दर् सरकार को धन्यवाद देता
  हूँ। मȅ मेरे ओिडशा क े मुख्य मंतर्ी 
को भी धन्यवाद देता हूँ िक आज उनकी मेहनत रंग लाई है। मȅ यह उÇमीद करता हूँ िक माँ-बहनȗ 
को िरज़वȃशन िमलेगा।  
 इसके  साथ-साथ, मȅ एक छोटी सी बात भी कहना चाहता हूँ। आगे चलकर िरज़वȃशन का 
क्या होगा, यह मुझे नहीं पता है, लेिकन मȅ उÇमीद करता हूँ िक यह हो जाएगा। मȅ इसका समथर्न 
करता
 हूँ। मैडम, माइनॉिरटीज़ क े िलए भी क ु छ िकया जाए। यहाँ पर क Ȃ दर् सरकार क े माननीय मंतर्ी 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
109

जी बैठे हȅ। माइनॉिरटी की बहनȗ क े िलए भी क ु छ िकया जाए। उनका भी हक है, उनकी भी 
भागीदारी होनी चािहए। ...(समय की घंटी)... अगर संशोधन करना है, तो संशोधन कीिजए, कानून 
मȂ संशोधन कीिजए, संिवधान मȂ संशोधन कीिजए, लेिकन माइनॉिरटी बहनȗ को भी क ु छ Îकोप 
दीिजए, बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। नमÎकार, वन्दे उत्कल जननी। 
 
SHRIMATI VANDANA CHAVAN (Maharashtra): Madam
, on behalf of the Nationalist 
Congress Party, I stand to support the 128 th Constitution (Amendment) Bill. After 
consistent failures to pass the Bill on reservation for women in Parliament and in State 
Legislatures, it is, indeed, a happier occasion for me that the Bill is passing. 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (डा. कÊपना सैनी): माननीय सदÎय, आपके  पास दो िमनट का समय है। 
 
SHRIMATI VANDANA CHAVAN: Madam, give me, at least, three minutes. 
Though we have serious doubts in  its implementation. I come from 
Maharashtra where we have been very fortuna te to have leadership of Shri Sharad 
Pawar who has taken concrete decisions for women. I would like to touch upon a few 
of them. Maharashtra became the first State in India to have 33 per cent reservation at 
all local self Government level in 1991. This was much before the 73
rd and 74 th 
Amendments that were passed in 1993. I am a product of that decision.  
 
[THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI SULATA DEO) in the Chair.] 
 
Maharashtra became the first State to amend the Hindu Succession Act, 1956. 
This gave equal right to women; the girls,  the daughters in the ancestral property. 
This then became a Central Legislation in  2005. There was an immediate decision 
taken. As Defence Minister in the UPA regime, from June 1991 to March 1993, Pawar 
Saheb took a decision to induct women in the Armed Forces. This too was an 
immediate decision which was implemented.  Needless to remind this august House 
about the pride which filled us all to see Lieutenant Alka Khurana Sharma leading the 
contingent on Republic Day Parade in 1994!  
Madam, we in Maharashtra, under the leadership of Pawar Saheb and during 
the UPA times, got used to see well-studie d, well-researched B ills which were put 
out immediately for implementation and, ther efore, a Bill such as this, which has to 
wait for census, delimitation, etc., is difficult for us to fathom and digest.  
Madam, I would like to ask the Government: Did you not do the 
demonetisation overnight? Did you not d eclare a lockdown almost with immediate 
effect? Did you not bring in the Bill to abroga te Article 370 without any notice one fine 
110
[RAJYA SABHA]

morning? You are indeed a very capable Government, then, why are you taking so 
much time to pass the Women's Reservation Bill? Why can the Bill not be 
implemented in 2024? There are no excuses.  Why do we have to wait for a census? 
We have already delayed it. Why do we have to wait for delimitation? We know it is a 
difficult process because the Southern Stat es are going to stand up in arms, they 
have worked towards reduction of their population and the Northern States have not 
done it. So, delimitation is going to be a diffi cult process. Why do we not want to give 
reservation in Rajya Sabha and State Legislative Councils? According to me, Madam, 
this Bill appears to be intended... ...( Time-Bell rings)... I am just finishing. This Bill 
appears to be intended to appease the women and girls of this country. Let us face 
that this Government has not been sens itive to women when they needed their 
protection. We have not forgotten and will not forget the treatment meted out to our 
women wrestling champions, release of convicts in the Bilkis Bano case. 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI SU LATA DEO): Please conclude your 
speech; your time is over.  
 
SHRIMATI VANDANA CHAVAN: I am just fini shing; just two more lines. Amidst the 
Government's silence on Hathras, Unnao and Kathua, inaction on Manipur, in spite of 
several doubts about the implementation of this Bill, for which time will only stand 
witness, we support the Bill and make an a ppeal to reconsider the Bill and implement 
it in 2024. Thank you, Madam. 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI SULATA DEO): The next speaker is Shri 
Abdul Wahab; you have two minutes. 
 
SHRI ABDUL WAHAB (Kerala): Madam, first of all, I want to say that my party, Indian 
Union Muslim League supports this Bi ll but not wholeheartedly. We require 
reservation in reservation and quota in quot a. Yesterday, we tried in Lok Sabha also, 
but, we know what will happen to our demand, what will happen to our Amendments. 
But I can say one thing that caste is a realit y in our country, even in Kerala. In Kerala, 
our Devaswom Minister, Shri K. Radhakris hnan was not allowed to light a lamp in a 
ceremony of the temple. It is going on in th is way even in Kerala. What do you expect 
in other places? Mr. Tiwari was talking abou t Rajasthan. But, wh at has happened in 
Madhya Pradesh, what has happened in Mani pur? I agree, one incident happened in 
Rajasthan, but, immediately, the Chief Minist er of Rajasthan went there. But, so far, 
our Prime Minister is not looking at all at these places wh ere these incidents 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
111

happened. I want to say that our part y will not support the Bill wholeheartedly 
because of this reason. We support it, we wa nt this to be implemented. It has been 
implemented in our Panchayati Raj system because of Rajiv Gandhi. Muslim ladies are 
working in our District in Kerala as Distri ct Panchayat Presidents. But, you being in 
the Centre with power, I request you once again, do not consider Muslims as 
minorities only. We are having this much of percentage here; at least, consider us. 
After triple talaq, all the Muslim women are with you. I have seen ladies coming 
in buses here today. I don’t know who brou ght them but they ar e completely inside 
and outside New Delhi. That is good. It is Na ri Shakti. I give all the respect to Amit 
Shahji and the Prime Minister. If your niyat, your intention is correct, then do one 
thing; do it first if at all, because our Na ddaji was telling that legally it is not possible. 
Okay, if it is so, just see that 33 per cent of the BJP women candidates are competing 
from winnable seats. At the end of the day, we will come here again; we will be here 
in Rajya Sabha. (Time-bell rings.) Including everywhere! ...(Interruptions)... I want 
to see the BJP MPs, women coming here. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI SULATA DEO): Please conclude, your time is 
over. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI ABDUL WAHAB: In future, we hope everywhere it will be happening. Thank you 
very much and I support the Bill.  
 
सुǛी इंदु बाला गोÎवामी (िहमाचल Ģदेश): माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, मȅ नारी शिƪ वंदन 
अिधिनयम क े समथर्न मȂ बोलने क े िलए खड़ी हुई हूं। आपने मुझे बोलने का अवसर देकर 
अनुकिÇपत िकया है, आपका आभार! मȅ नारी शिƪ पर एक किवता क े माध्यम से अपनी बात 
रखना चाहती ह
ूं:- 
 
 "मुझको तो सारी धरती की जीवन गाथा िदखती है, 
 भारतीय संÎकार की शुǉ सुजाता िदखती है, 
 तुमको भारत की बेटी मȂ कमिसन किलयां िदखती हȅ, 
 म
ुझको भारत की बेटी मȂ भारत माता िदखती है।" 
 
महोदया, यह किवता सुनाने का मेरा तात्पयर् था िक देश मȂ नारी को दुगार् क े रूप  मȂ देखा 
जाता है।  िजस देश मȂ कन्या
 का पूजन दुगार् शिƪ क े रूप  मȂ िकया जाता है, िजस देश मȂ नारी को 
सृिÍट की जननी माना जाता है, उस देश मȂ जन-Ģितिनिधयȗ की संख्या आज़ादी क े 75 वषș क े 
बाद भी लोक सभा मȂ मातर् 14 Ģितशत, राज्य सभा मȂ 12 Ģितशत तथा देश
 की िवधान सभाओं मȂ 
यह संख्या नगण्य क े बराबर हो, तो आप सब क्या कहȂगे?  
112
[RAJYA SABHA]

(सभापित महोदयपीठासीन हुए।) 
 
यह भी हमारे देश क े यशÎवी नेतृत्व, आदरणीय Ǜी नरेन्दर् मोदी जी क े कारण संभव हुआ है। अगर 
नारी सृिÍट की जन्म-दातर्ी है, अगर उसके  िबना सृिÍट की कÊपना भी नहीं की जा सकती तो िफर 
भला नारी कमजो
र क ै से हुई? मȅ इस सभागार मȂ बैठे हुए लोगȗ से एक ĢÌन करना चाहती हूं िक 
अगर नारी सृिÍट की जन्म-दातर्ी है तो एक िमनट क े िलए सोिचए िक अगर आपकी मां की मां न 
होती तो क्या आप की मां होती? अगर आपकी मां न होती तो इस सभागार मȂ बैठे हुए, चाहे वे पुरुष  
हȗ या मिहला, क्या हम और आप होते? अगर उनकी मां न होतीं, तो क्या म
ंिदर मȂ िवरािजत 
घनÌयाम और Ǜीराम होते? िफर क्या कारण रहे िक आज़ादी क े 70 वषș से अिधक समय बीत 
जाने क
े  बाद भी भारतीय नारी को वह सÇमान नहीं िमला जो उसको िमलना चािहए था? वह 
सबला से अबला क ै से हो गई? मȅ यह ĢÌन आप सबके  सÇमुख रखती हूं, इस पर थोड़ा सोिचएगा। 
लेिकन नारी क े अदÇय साहस, क्षमता व ब
ुिǉमǄा को पहचान कर उसका समूचे राÍटर् को अगर 
िकसी ने एहसास करवाया, तो वह देश क े माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी Ǜी नरेन्दर् मोदी जी ने अपने 9 वषș 
क े कायर्काल मȂ करवाया। 
  भारतीय नारी क े िलए अमृत कालखंड का 19 
िसतंबर का िदन शुभ िदन था, जब हमने नए 
संसद भवन मȂ Ģवेश िकया, जो नये भारत मȂ भोर की नई िकरणȂ लेकर आया है। अमृत काल क े इस 
कालखंड मȂ एक ऐसे भारत का िनमार्ण
 हो रहा है, जहां समानता व सामािजक न्याय की बुिनयाद 
मजबूत हो रही है। 'सबका साथ, सबका िवकास, सबका िवÌवास और सबका Ģयास' क े मूल मंतर् 
पर चलते हुए देश की नारी शिƪ को मातर् आरक्षण देना ही द ेश क े यशÎवी Ģधान मंतर्ी जी का 
लÑय नहीं है, बिÊक नारी शिƪ को ससÇमान नेतृत्व व िनणर्य-Ģिकर्या मȂ पूणर्तया भागीदार बनाना 
भी देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी जी का ध्येय है। यह इस िवधेयक क े नाम मȂ ही रेखांिकत हो जाता है। 
मिहलाओं क े िलए सीटȂ आरिक्षत करने वाले इस िवधेयक का नाम पहले मिहला
 आरक्षण िवधेयक 
था, परंतु देश क े यशÎवी Ģधान मंतर्ी मातृ- शिƪ को क ेवल आरक्षण ही नहीं, बिÊक सÇमान भी 
देना चाहते थे, इसिलए इस िवधेयक का नाम 'नारी शि
ƪ वंदन अिधिनयम' रखना देश क े Ģधान 
मंतर्ी की देश की नारी-शिƪ क े Ģित क ृतज्ञता को दशार्ता है।  
नारी-उत्थान क े िलए बहुत सी योजनाएं चलाई गईं। आप सबने, जो मेरे पहले वƪा थे, 
हमारे राÍटर्ीय अध्यक्ष जी न
े इसके  बारे मȂ िवÎतार से बताया। मेरे पास तीन िमनट का टाइम है। उस 
तरफ से कहा गया िक 9 सालȗ मȂ अपने कायर्काल क े दौरान आपने क्या िक या? लेिकन आपने तो 
60 साल से अिधक इस देश पर शासन िकया, आपने मिहला िबल को लागू क्यȗ नहीं िकया, आपने 
मिहलाओं को वोट बȅक की राजनीित तक ही सीिमत क्यȗ रखा? मȅ इसका ताजा उदाहरण 
िहमाचल Ģदेश का देती हूँ। अभी िहमाचल Ģदेश
 मȂ कांगर्ेस सǄा मȂ आई है। इसने मिहलाओं से 
वायदा िकया िक 1,500 रुपय े आपको हर महीने िदए जाएंगे। आज 9 महीने हो गए, मिहलाएं 
अपना पसर् खोलकर देखती रहती हȅ और कांगर्ेस क े नेताओं से िदÊली से लेकर Ģदेश तक पूछती 
रहती हȅ िक 1,500 रुपए  कब आएंगे? 9 महीने बीतने क े बाद भी उनके  पास 1,500 रुपए  नहीं आए। 
कोरोना क े कारण जनगणना और पिरसीमन िवलंिबत ह
ुए हȅ तो ÎपÍट है िक Ģिकर्या मȂ िवलÇब 
होगा। िकन्तु यह क ु छ क्षणȗ की देर ह
ै, इतने बरसȗ का अंधेर नहीं है। यह अिधिनयम उस कमर्शील 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
113

नेतृत्व की िवचारधारा का Ģण है, िजसके  यहां तीन तलाक से बहनȗ को मुिƪ िमलने का Ģण है, 
िजसके  यहां मातृ-शिƪ को सÇमान, अिधमान और मान िमलता है।   
मान्यवर, परंपराओं क े जाल काटने क े िलए बहुत लगन, ध्येय और सहनश ीलता की 
आवÌयकता होती है, इसिलए कहा गया है:-  
 
"िरवाइतȗ की सफȂ सबसे कट नहीं सकतीं, 
कई बरस मȂ कोई एक जाल काटता है।" 
 
मिहला आरक्षण िवधेयक पर 27 वषș क े मौन का जाल, राजनीितक दलȗ क े गिलयारȗ मȂ 
इस िवधेयक पर पसरे अंधेरे का जाल िजस Ëयिƪ ने काटा, उन्हȂ क ेवल भारत ही नहीं, बिÊक 
समूचा
 िवÌव; भारत की नारी ही नहीं, बिÊक पूरी सृिÍट की मातृ-शिƪ आदरणीय नरेन्दर् मोदी जी 
क े नाम से जानती है और आने वाले समय मȂ जानेगी।  अब इस द ेश की मिहलाएं लोकतंतर् क े इस 
शीषर्Îथ मंिदर और िवधान सभाओं मȂ 33 Ģितशत मिहलाओं को देखȂगी। यह देश क े इितहास का 
सबसे िनणार्यक मोड़ है।  अब नेतृत्व करने का अवसर है और यह अवसर देकर इितहास िकसने 
बनाया
 - आदरणीय Ģधान मंतर्ी Ǜी नरेन्दर् मोदी जी ने यह इितहास बनाया है। आज यह मागर् 
ĢशÎत हुआ है, इसे जÊदी लागू करने की बात की जा रही है। इसमȂ जाितगत आरक्षण न होने क े 
कारण इसे अपूणर् बताया जा रहा है। लेिकन आप इंतजार की
िजए, िंचता करने की जरूरत  नहीं, 
यह Ģधान मंतर्ी जी का मातृ-शिƪ को 33 Ģितशत का वायदा है और देश की मातृ-शिƪ को पूरा 
िवÌवास है िक 'मोदी है तो मुमिकन है।'  मȅ इस देश की मातृ-शिƪ मां-बेिटयȗ क े चेहरȗ पर छाए 
उÊलास को पढ़ सकती
 हूं। मȅ उनकी उÇमीदȗ क े तेज को देख सकती हूं।  इस बड़ी पहल और बड़े 
साहस क े िलए मȅ पुनः माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी का आभार Ëयƪ कर ती हूं और इस िवधेयक का 
Îवागत करती हूं, समथर्न करती हूं, धन्यवाद। 
 
 
STATUTORY RESOLUTIONS 
 
Levying of Export Duty on exports of Onions and exports of Parboiled Rice 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Members, a notice for Statutory Resolutions has been 
received from the Government and I have admitted the same. In view of the urgency, I 
have also permitted the Minister concerne d  t o  m o v e  t h e  s a m e  n o w .  S h r i  B h a g w a t  
Karat to move the following Resolutions:- (i) “In pursuance of Section 8 of the 
Customs Tariff Act, 1975, this House here by approves of noti fication No. 47/2023- 
Customs, dated 19th August, 2023 [G.S.R. 616(E), dated 19th August, 2023], which 
seeks to amend the Second Schedule of th e Customs Tariff Act,  in order to levy 
Export duty on exports of Onions, falling under HS Code 0703 10. ” and, “ In 
pursuance of Section 8 of the Customs Tariff  Act, 1975, this House hereby approves 
114
[RAJYA SABHA]

of notification No. 49/2023- Customs, dated 25th August, 2023 [G.S.R. 628(E), 
dated 25th August, 2023], which seeks to  amend the Second Schedule of the 
Customs Tariff Act, in order to levy Export  duty on exports of Parboiled Rice, falling 
under HS Code 1006 30 10.” 
 
THE MINISTER OF STATE IN THE MINISTRY OF FINANCE (DR. BHAGWAT 
KARAD): Sir, I move the following Resolutions:-  
 
(i)     “In pursuance of Section 8 of the Customs Tariff Act, 1975, this 
House hereby approves of notification No . 47/2023- Customs, dated 19th August, 
2023 [G.S.R. 616(E), dated 19th August, 2023], which seeks to amend the Second 
Schedule of the Customs Tariff Act, in order to levy Export duty on exports of Onions, 
falling under HS Code 0703 10.” and,    
(ii)    “In pursuance of Section 8 of the Customs Tariff Act, 1975, this House 
hereby approves of notification No. 49 /2023- Customs, dated 25th August, 2023 
[G.S.R. 628(E), dated 25th August, 2023], which seeks to amend the Second 
Schedule of the Customs Tari f f  A c t ,  i n  o r d e r  t o  l e v y  E x p o r t  d u t y  o n  e x p o r t s  o f  
Parboiled Rice, falling under HS Code 1006 30 10.” 
 
The questions were put and the motions were adopted. 
 
 
GOVERNMENT BILL 
 
The Constitution (One Hundred and Twenty-Eighth Amendment) Bill, 2023 - Contd. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Shri Kartikeya Sharma. While I understand that it is the 
maiden speech of the hon. Member, but give n the time constraint, I am sure he will 
use his discretion.   
 
SHRI KARTIKEYA SHARMA (Haryana): Mr. Chairman, Sir, thank you so much and I 
seek your indulgence. I rise in favour of the Nari Shakti Vandana Bill, the 128
th 
Constitution (Amendment) B ill. I want to expr ess my speech with  two lines from 
Nawaz Deobandi, which says:  
 
सफ़र मȂ मुिÌकलȂ आएं तो जुरर्त और बढ़ती है, 
कोई जब राÎता रोके  तो िहÇमत और बढ़ती है। 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
115

Mr. Chairman, Sir, I stand before you as a strongest supporter of the Women’s 
Reservation Bill as I believe the time has co me and we can’t wait any longer. The first 
Prime Minister, in his letter to  the Chief Ministers wrote, “ The future of India will 
probably depend ultimately more upon the women than men.” These words of the first 
Prime Minister were prophetic. I am proud to  say that I am the pa rt of the Parliament 
under the leadership of hon. Prime Minister, Shri Narendra Modi, who has shown grit 
and determination and a unique foresight to turn it into a reality. Just before me, a 
couple of minutes ago, a senior Member of Parliament was ta lking about doers and 
talkers. I would like to highlight that the Pr ime Minister has shown by bringing this Bill 
that he is a doer and not a talker. I come from the State of Haryana which had, for the 
longest time, grappled with the issue of unequal sex ratio. The sex ratio in Haryana was 
879 females for 1,000 males in 2001, but has shown steady improvement since 2015 
when the Prime Minister, Shri Narendra Modi, launched the beti bachao beti padhao  
andolan from Haryana.  
 I would like to inform the House that in 2022, the ratio has improv ed to 917. It 
has increased by 85 points. This shows the initiatives backed by the State and the firm 
commitment by the Government . In the first general elect ions, there were 66 women 
who contested and 19 were elected to the House of People. Even though we have 
made rapid strides in women representation in Parliament and local bodies, down to 
the lowest level, much remains to be done and thus I back this Bill wholeheartedly. 
Lasting revolutions are not achieved overnight. They require a civ il society awakening. 
This Bill is taking us in that direction.  
 Sir, writing in Harijan on 21 st of April 1946, Gandhiji emphasized the need to 
"enroll women as voters, impart  or have imparted to them  practical education, teach 
them to think independently, release them from the chains of caste th at bind them so 
as to bring about a change in them... If they will do this, they will purify the present 
unclean atmosphere."  
 Sir, he prophetically said, "as long as the women of India do  not take part in 
public life, there can be no salvation for the country. " Adoption of our Constitution 
heralded a new era of equity and equality for women of India. It guarantees equal 
political rights including the right to vote to women. Not only does the Constitution 
guarantee equal political st atus to women, there is even a scope for positive 
discrimination in their favour as is evident in Article 15(3) of the Constitution. Article 14 
provides for equality before law. Article 39(a) states that the State shall direct its policy 
towards securing equally to  men and women the right to  an adequate means of 
livelihood, and 39(d) enjoins the State to direct its polic y towards securing equal pay 
for equal work for both men and women. Sir, Article 42 prov ides for securing just and 
116
[RAJYA SABHA]

humane conditions of work and for maternit y relief. Article 51(A)(e) refers to the 
fundamental duty of citizens to renounce practices derogatory to the dignity of women. 
In the words of Dr. B.R. Ambedkar, "I me asure the progress of a community by the 
degree of progress which women have achieved."  
In 1975, the Committee on  the Status of Women in India commented on 
declining political representation of women in  India. Though majority within the CWSI 
were against reservations in the legislat ive bodies, yet, all members agreed on 
reservation for women in local bodies. The National Perspective Plan of 1988-2000 also 
recommended 30 per cent rese rvation for women in all el ected bodies although the 
document was not clear whethe r the reservation was throug h nomination or election. 
The BJP Government had repeat edly reinstated th e Bill in Parliament in 1998, 1999, 
2002 and 2003. The Congress, when it cam e to power in 2004, prompted the UPA to 
integrate the Bill into its Common Minimum Programme and tried to introduce the Bill 
with little progress. It was opposed by it s own partners who we r e  a  p a r t  o f  t h e  
Government.  
Sir, a very senior Me mber of Parliament before me said that this decision is 
being taken by brain and not by heart. Thes e decisions are taken by brain, heart and 
soul all put together. You need a will of steel to implement these decisions. That is what 
is being done by the current Government.  
Sir, in the last decade of the twentieth century, the issue of political 
empowerment of women gained momentum throughout the world. In 1990, the United 
Nation's Economic and Social Council endo rsed a target of 30 per cent women in 
decision-making positions in the world by 1995. This target was far from being met by 
1995; only 10 per cent of the world's parliamentarians were women. 
Back home, in Rajya Sabha, we have  31 women MPs whereas in the Lok 
Sabha, we have 82 women MPs. Today , around 26 per cent of the world's 
parliamentarians are women. Among the State Legislatures, the average 
representation of Women MLAs is about only 7 per cent. Of a total of 8054 candidates 
in the 2019 General Elections, only 726 were women. An interesting statistics presents 
itself here. Sir, while almost  11 per cent of the women contestants were successfully 
elected as MPs, only 6 per cent of me n could be successful. When it comes to 
trusting their future, voters trust women candidates more than they trust men. Not 
only do women make for winning candidate s but as candidates they spur greater 
economic growth. An academic paper by the United Nations University World Institute 
for Development Economies Research (UNU-W IDER) in 2015 studied the impact of 
women politicians on economic performanc e in State Legislative Assemblies. The 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
117

researchers examined data for 4,265 State Assembly constituencies for the 1992-2012 
period using night luminosity as a measure of economic performance.  
The paper estimated  women legislator s raise luminosity growth in their 
constituencies by about 15 percentage po ints per annum more than that of male 
legislators. They were also found to be fa r more effective at completing road projects 
and hence creating infrastructure for growth.   
 Sir, I got to hear some speeches of  the hon. Members of the Lok Sabha 
yesterday wherein some questioned why the Government took so long to introduce 
the Bill, why it wasn't introduced earlier. It  is important to understand, in 2014 the 
challenges before this Government were many. Women had the right to vote, but no 
toilets, no gas connections, no access to  equal opportunities and very little 
representation. One of the most celebrate d campaigns of the hon. Prime Minister 
Modiji and this Government was the Swachh Bharat Mission. It was launched with the 
idea of building toilets. It was done with an effort to restore the dignity and privacy of 
women. Some people complained that toilets had been built, but there was irregular 
supply of water. I would like to say to them, 'Be patient.' Such mammoth campaigns 
are bound to come with some learnings and challenges. Today most of them have 
regular water supply. Sir, I am a positive person. I am an optimist, not a pessimist 
and I believe in the positivity and the power of change.  Soon after people 
complained, women in rural India were cook ing food with cow dung cakes or wood 
leading to health hazards.Today, almost all homes have gas connections.  It is 
important to understand that change has not happened overnight. It requires the 
assistance of society and a change in the mi ndset. In the words of Victor Hugo, "No 
one can stop an idea whose time has come. ” The idea of women's reservation has 
come and no one can stop it.  As the hon. Prime Minister said, 'The country can't 
wait any more.'   
 Research has shown that when women are empowered, the entire nation is 
empowered. Women legislators are more... (Time-bell rings.)  Sir, I will just seek 
your indulgence to complete my maiden speech.   
Sir, I thought I would mention some of  the top women leaders, scientists, 
engineers, businesswomen, social worker s at the end of my speech, but as I was 
writing their names, I got a feeling that bein g a successful female leader in their field 
cannot be their identity, for they have outgrown their gender. In a male dominated 
world, they are not successful because they  are women; they are successful despite 
of it. It is our narrow lens that we see them in gendered roles. It is our shortcoming 
that we see their gender first before we se e their capabilities and their talent. It is the 
men who need to change their view and start treating them as equal colleagues. 
118
[RAJYA SABHA]

 Sir, I would like to express my heartfel t gratitude to our hon. Prime Minister 
who has been able to reorganize, bring on track this Bill which had been derailed for 
the longest time and in a time where the whole world is going through difficult times, 
whether it is climate change, hostile nations, and income inequalities. Only the 
healing and caring touch of a mother can save humanity from falling further down.   
 
(MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN in the Chair.) 
 
Sir, discuss as much as we may, debate , fight and shout, do  whatever, but the 
bottom line is that such a provision cannot wait any longer. It is our need.   
 Sir, I would like to finish my speech with  a few lines from the famous poet, Shri 
Dushyant Kumar. 
"हो गई है पीर पवर्त-सी िपघलनी चािहए, 
    इस िहमालय से कोई गंगा िनकलनी चािहए। 
    िसफर् हंगामा खड़ा करना मेरा मकसद नहीं, 
    मेरी कोिशश है िक ये सूरत बदलनी चािहए।" 
 
 Sir, I only want to say that let us co me together and change the picture of t
 he 
Indian polity. Let us unanimously support this  Bill. Otherwise, when history is written, 
people who are standing on the other side will not be judged kindly. Thank you, Sir. 
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म (उǄर Ģदेश): उपसभापित महोदय, नारी शिƪ वंदन अिधिनयम, यानी 
मिहला आरक्षण िबल एक ऐितहािसक और कर्ांितकारी िबल है, जो हमारी सरकार, हमारे दूरदशीर् 
और यशÎवी Ģधान मंतर्ी जी Ǜी नरेन्दर् मोदी जी क े क ुशल नेतृत्व मȂ आज पास होना है। हमारे देश 
क े Ģधान मंतर्ी ने 2014 क े बाद मिहलाओं को जो सÇमान िदया है, उससे पहले उस तरह से 
मिहलाओं को सÇमान नहीं िमला है। जब से वे आए हȅ, तब से उन्हȗने बहुत सारी क
े न्दर् सरकार की 
योजनाओं मȂ उनको Îथान िदया है, सÇमान िदया है, हर जगह मिहलाओं को सÇमान िदया ह
ै -  
चाहे िवधान सभा हो, लोक सभा हो या राज्य सभा हो, सभी जगह सभी पािर्टयȗ से ज्यादा हमारी 
पाटीर् की भागीदारी है।  अभी सामने से बहुत सी जगहȗ का नाम िलया गया, मȅ यह िरपीट नहीं 
करूं गी, लेिकन मȅ इतना ही कहूंगी िक राजÎथान की िÎथित िकसी से िछपी नहीं ह
ै। जो राजÎथान 
क े हालात हȅ, वे सबको मालूम हȅ, िकसी से िछपे हुए नहीं हȅ। मेरा भी राजÎथान म Ȃ जाना हुआ। कई 
जगहȗ पर गंभीर िÎथित थी, मिहलाओं क े साथ िजस तरह का दुराचार िकया गया, िजस तरह से 
मिहलाओं को अपमािनत िकया गया, वह सबके  संज्ञान मȂ है। हमारे Ģधान मंतर्ी जी मिहलाओं को 
सशƪ बनाना चाहते ह
ȅ, न िक िनबर्ल। िजस Ģदेश मȂ हमारी सरकार नहीं है, उस Ģदेश मȂ 
मिहलाओं को जो भागीदारी या जो सÇमान िमलना चािहए, जो सुरक्षा िमलनी चािहए, वह उस 
तरह से नहीं िमल पा रही है। ...(Ëयवधान)… 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
119

Ǜी उपसभापित: Ãलीज़, बैठकर चचार् मत कीिजए।  Don't speak while sitting. 
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: अभी आप सुनना चाहते हȅ, तो सुिनए। राजÎथान मȂ रेिपÎट क े बचाव मȂ 
आंदोलन चल रहा है, क्या यह िकसी से िछपा है? यह आंदोलन चल रहा है।...(Ëयवधान)… िĢयंका 
जी एक तरफ कहती हȅ िक मȅ लड़की ह
ूं, मȅ लड़ सकती हूं, लेिकन राजÎथान मȂ लड़ने क्यȗ नहीं 
जातीं, क्यȗ नहीं बोलतीं।...(Ëयवधान)… वे एक बार भी गई हȅ!...(Ëयवधान)… बेटी हूं, लड़ सकती 
हूं...(Ëयवधान)… 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: Ãलीज़, अपनी चेयर पर बैठकर मत बोिलए। 
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: अगर आप राजÎथान की िÎथित जानȂगे, तो आप देखȂग
े िक जो दिलत हȅ, 
िपछड़े हȅ, उन पर िकतने अत्याचार हो रहे हȅ!...(Ëयवधान)… वह िकसी  से िछपा नहीं 
है।...(Ëयवधान)… 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: ऑनरेबल मेÇबसर्, मȅ आप सबसे यह कहना चाहता हूं िक आप एक-द
ूसरे से िजन 
बातȗ की अपेक्षा करते हȅ, आप भी उन बातȗ का पालन करȂ। 
 
 Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: एक मां की कोख उजाड़ दी गई। दो बच्चȗ की गाड़ी से क ुचल कर हत्या 
कर दी गई।...(Ëयवधान)… 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: कान्ता कदर्म जी की बात क े अलावा कोई और बात िरकॉडर् पर नहीं जा रही है।  
मैडम, आप बोलȂ। 
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: और तीसरे को िससकता हुआ छोड़ िदया गया। वह भी एक
 मिहला है, वह 
भी एक मां है,  उस मां की कोख उजाड़ी।...(Ëयवधान)… 
 
Ǜी जयराम रमेश: सर, ...(Ëयवधान)… 
सर, ...(Ëयवधान)… 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: Don't speak while sitting. मैडम आप बोिलए। 
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: एक बहन का भाई छीन िलया।...(Ëयवधान)…  वह एससी समाज से थी, वह 
दिलत समाज से थी। आप िपछड़ी जाित की बात करते हȅ, तो राजÎथान म
Ȃ देिखए िक िपछड़ी 
मिहला क े साथ आपकी सरकार ने क्या िकया है। यहां आपने देखा िक गȅगरेप क े बाद मिहला को 
जलाकर मार िदया गया। ...(Ëयवधान)… उसको भƺी मȂ डाल िदया गया, झȗक िदया 
गया...(Ëयवध
ान)… वह िकसी से िछपा नहीं है।...(Ëयवधान)…क ेवल एक ही मामला नहीं 
है।...(Ëयवधान)… 
 
120
[RAJYA SABHA]

Ǜी उपसभापित: सभी माननीय सदÎयȗ से आगर्ह है िक वे अपनी चेयर पर बैठकर बात न करȂ।  
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: हर िदन Ģदेश मȂ 17 मामल े रेप क े दजर् होते हȅ, हर दो घंटे मȂ नाबािलग 
बिच्चयȗ का अपहरण होता है। यह िकसी से िछपा नहीं है। आप देिखए, तलािशए - 1 लाख, 90 
हज़ार स
े अिधक मामले मिहलाओं क े अत्याचार क े दजर् हȅ। ...(समय की घंटी)... अब तक Ģदेश मȂ 
मिहलाओं और बिच्चयȗ क े 45 हजार से अिधक रेप क े मामले दजर् हȅ। ...(Ëयवधान)… 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: माननीय कान्ता जी, आपका समय समाÃत हो गया ह
ै। 
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: महोदय, ये िपछड़ȗ और दिलतȗ की बात करते हȅ, मȅ यह पूछना चाहती हूं 
िक इन्हȗने अपनी सरकार मȂ उनको िकतना सÇमान िदया है? जहां-जहां इनकी सरकार है, वहीं 
दिलतȗ और िपछडȗ पर ज्यादा अत्याचार हो रहे हȅ।  उन्हȂ संरक्षण िमलना चािहए।  
...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Please conclude. 
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: आपने देखा ह
ै िक बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ और बेिटयȗ को बढ़ाओ, यह 
िकसने कहा है - यह Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने कहा है।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Please conclude. 
 
Ǜीमती कान्त
ा कदर्म: वह सपना साकार करके  िदखा िदया।  आप देखȂगे िक हर क्षेतर् मȂ मिहलाएं 
आगे बढ़ रही हȅ। आप रक्षा क े क्षेतर्, िशक्षा क े क्षेतर् या िकसी भी अन्य क्षेतर् मȂ देखȂगे, तो बेटी बचाओ 
और बेटी पढ़ाओ ...(समय की घंटी)... ऐसे ही नहीं िकया ह
ै। आप देखȂगे िक बेटी और बेटे मȂ 
आज कोई फकर् नहीं है।   
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: माननीय कान्ता जी, अब मȅ दूसरे Îपीकर को बुलाऊं गा।   
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता
 कदर्म: सर, एक िमनट। मȅ कन्क्लूड करती हूं। 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: आपका समय खत्म हो चुका है।   
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: आप यह देिखए िक बाबा साहेब भीमराव अÇबेडकर जी का सपना था िक 
हर घर की मिहलाएं िशिक्ष
त बनȂ। ...(Ëयवधान)... महात्मा ज्योितबा फ ु ले का सपना था िक हर घर 
की मिहलाएं िशिक्षत बनȂ।   
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: आप अपनी पाटीर् क े दूसरे वƪा का समय ले रही हȅ। 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
121

 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: वे आज उनका सपना साकार और पूरा कर रहे हȅ। यह काम हमारे माननीय 
Ģधान मंतर्ी Ǜी नरेन्दर् मोदी जी कर रहे हȅ।  ...(समय की घंटी)... 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: माननीया कान्ता जी, अब मȅ दूसरे Îपीकर को बुला रहा हूं। 
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: यहां 'उज्ज्वला योजना' की बात हुई। 'उज्ज्वला योजना' मȂ िसलȂडर पर 
400 रुपय े कम िकए
 गए हȅ और सामान्य लोगȗ क े िलए 200 रुपय े कम िकए गए हȅ।   
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: माननीय रामदास अठावले।   
 
Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म: मुझे समय देने क े िलए बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। मȅ अपनी पाटीर् का बहुत-बहुत 
धन्यवाद और आभार Ëयƪ करती हूं
। 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: माननीय रामदास अठावले जी, आप बोलȂ। उनका समय समाÃत हो गया है, वे 
अपने समय से दो िमनट ज्यादा बोली हȅ। 
 
सामािजक न्याय और अिधकािरता मं
तर्ालय मȂ राज्य मंतर्ी ( Ǜी रामदास अठावले): उपसभापित 
महोदय,  
"मȅ बहुत बार जाकर आया हूं रूस , 
लेिकन मिहला िबल क े कारण मȅ आज बहुत ही हूं खुश  …(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: राजीव जी, Ãलीज़। 
 
Ǜी रामदास अठावले: उपसभापित महोदय,  
 
"अब मजबूत हो जाएगी न
ारी शिƪ, 
सभी मिहलाओं को िमल जाएगी मुिƪ। 
मिहलाओं की गाड़ी अब कहीं भी नहीं रुके गी, 
मिहलाएं अब िकसी क े सामने नहीं झुक Ȃगी। 
सशƪ हो गई है नारी, 
वह पड़ जाएगी हम सभी पर भारी। 
लोक सभा, िवधान सभा मȂ मिहलाएं अच्छी खेलȂगी पारी, 
और मोदी जी क े साथ अब आएंगी मिहलाएं सारी। 
बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ, 
लेिकन समाज को आपस मȂ मत लड़ाओ, 
मिहलाओं को उनके  काम मȂ मत अड़ाओ, 
122
[RAJYA SABHA]

मिहलाओं पर अन्याय करने वालȗ पर गाड़ी चढ़ाओ। 
मोदी है, तो मुमिकन है, 
मोदी नहीं, तो मुमिकन नहीं। 
मोदी है, तो िवकास है, 
मोदी नहीं, तो िवकास नहीं है। 
मोदी है इसिलए नया संसद भवन है, 
मोदी नहीं, तो नया संसद भवन नहीं। 
मोदी है, तो जी20 की अध्यक्षता है, 
लेिकन मोदी नहीं, तो अध्यक्षता नहीं है। ...(
Ëयवधान)... 
 
DR. V. SIVADASAN (KERALA): Sir, I am on a point of order.  
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: You are not allowed to speak. 
 
Ǜी रामदास अठावले: उपसभापित महोदय, 
 
मोदी है, तो सामािजक न्याय है, 
मोदी नहीं, तो सामािजक न्याय नहीं है।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
DR. V. SIVADASAN: Sir, I have a point of order. 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Please take your seat.  
 
Ǜी रामदास अठावले: उपसभापित महोदय,  
 
मिहला िबल क े समथर्न मȂ मȅ यहां खड़ा हूं, 
क्यȗिक मȅ कई साल मिहलाओं क
े  िलए लड़ा हूं। ...(समय की घंटी)... 
मोदी जी का यह िनणर्य बहुत ही बड़ा है, 
इसिलए मȅ आपके  सामने खड़ा हूं। 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: माननीय अठावले जी, आपका समय खत्म हो रहा है।  Ãलीज़ कन्क्लूड। 
 
Ǜी रामदास अठावले:
 सर, मुझे थोड़ा और बोलना है। 
 
मोदी जी लाए हȅ नारी शिƪ का वंदन िबल, 
पूरे भारत की मिहलाओं का खुश है िदल। 
सारे िवरोधी अब हो जाएंगे िकल,  ...(समय की घंटी).... 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
123

अच्छी सेहत क े िलए उन्हȂ लेनी पड़ेगी िपल। 
क्यȗिक देश की जनता घमंिडया गठबंधन को करेगी िनल। 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: माननीय अठावले जी, मȅ अब दूसरे Îपीकर को बुलाऊं गा।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी रामदास अठावले:  
मोदी जी बढ़ा रहे हȅ िवकास की Îपीड और िÎकल, 
और िवकिसत भारत बनने की आशा अब होगी फ ुलिफल। 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: माननीय अठावले जी, अब मȅ द
ूसरे Îपीकर को बुलाऊं गा। Ãलीज़ कन्क्लूड। 
आपका समय खत्म हो गया है,  अब मȅ दूसरे Îपीकर को बुला रहा हूं।   
 
Ǜी रामदास अठावले: सर, मुझे बोलने दीिजए। 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: No, no. I will not allow.   
 
Ǜी रामदास अठावले: मिहला आरक्षण िवधेयक को लाने मȂ डा. बाबा साहेब अÇबेडकर की भ
ूिमका 
और उनका योगदान भारत की जनता कभी नहीं भुला सकती है।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: I will examine it. 
 
Ǜी रामदास अठावले: मिहलाओं क े िवकास क े िलए डा. बाबा साहेब अÇबेडकर ही थे, िजन्हȗने 
िंहदू कोड िबल 11 अĢैल, 1947 को संिवधान सभा म
Ȃ पेश िकया था। डा. बी. आर. अÇबेडकर को 
1948 मȂ माननीय पंिडत जवाहरलाल नेहरू  ǎारा...(समय की घंटी)... िंहदू कोड िबल िवकिसत 
करने क े िलए गिठत उप सिमित क
े  अध्यक्ष क े रूप  मȂ चुना गया था और 9 अĢैल, 1948 को एक 
चयन सिमित ǎारा भेजा गया था। चार साल क े िवचार-िवमशर् क े बाद यह अिनणार्यक रहा। उनके  
अपने शÅदȗ मȂ, उन्हȗने बोला था िक मार डाला और अĢयुƪ एवं गुमनाम होकर मर गए।  Îवतंतर् 
भारत की संसद मȂ इस िवषय पर संभवत: यह सबसे लंबी बहस थी।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: थ
ȅक यू, अठावले जी। मȅ अब दूसरे Îपीकर को बुला रहा हूं।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी रामदास अठावले: कांगर्ेस िहन्दू कोड िबल को ÎपÍट करने क े िलए उत्सुक नहीं थी।  
...(Ëयवधान)... इस वजह से बाबा साहेब अÇबेडकर जी ने 27 िसतÇबर 1951 को... 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: अठावले जी, आपकी बात िरकॉडर् पर नहीं जाएगी। आपने समय स
े दो िमनट 
अिधक बोला है। Ǜीमती रिमलाबेन बेचारभाई बारा, आप बोलȂ। आपकी बात ही िरकॉडर् पर जाएगी।   
 
124
[RAJYA SABHA]

SHRIMATI RAMILABEN BECHA RBHAI BARA (Gujarat): *"Thank you, hon. Deputy 
Chairman, Sir. Today, we are discussing Nari Shakti Vandan Adhiniyam in this historic 
House. I support this Bill and I congratula te and thank Hon. Prime Minister, Shri 
Narendra Modi on behalf of women of the entire nation. Hon. Deputy Chairman, Sir, 
there have been many governments in  Bharat since independence but these 
governments were against women and therefor e, they did not bring this Bill in the 
past despite having majority. Today, the members sitting in opposition are asking as 
to why Modi ji did not bring this Bill in last 9 years. Hon. Deputy Chairman Sir, through 
you, I would like to say that the Bill was brought in 2010, they had majority in 
government, then why it was not passed unt il 2014. Hon. Deputy Chairman, Sir, our 
Prime Minister has always been a well-wi s h e r  o f  w o m e n .  H e  h a s  a l w a y s  t a k e n  
positive initiatives for women and he knows the sublime strength of women. 
Therefore, he is working hard for the upliftm ent of women. I belong to Gujarat. When 
Hon. Prime Minister was the Chief Minister of Gujarat, he had taken many initiatives to 
ensure safety of girl child and to provide education to girls. He launched ‘beti bachao, 
beti padhao’ campaign. He spread awareness in th e entire state for education of girls 
through Kanya Kelavni Rath Yatra. In order to make girls and women strong, he used 
to say only one thing that I have come to  you for begging. He was not begging for 
money, but he used to say to the people t h a t  i f  y o u  w a n t  t o  g i v e  m e  s o m e t h i n g ,  
please give education to your daughters. The Hon Prime Minster was begging for 
education of girls. 
Hon. Deputy Chairman, Sir, when our Prime Minister was the Chief Minister of 
Gujarat, literacy rate of girls was less than 33% and drop-out ratio was also high. But 
Modi ji made many efforts for providing educatio n to girls. He used to say that if a girl 
is educated, she can make her entire fami ly educated and this would benefit many 
generations to come and the society at large. With this motto in his mind and 
identifying the hidden strength of girls, he worked for providing education to girls.  
Hon. Deputy Chairman, Sir, I come fr om a tribal region. There are many 
problems in tribal areas but our Prime Mini ster has a dream to provide tap water in 
tribal and hilly regions through Jal Shakti Mission Yojana. Now, the women of tribal 
area also get tap water in every household.  Now they save their time and use it for 
their families. Hon. Deputy Chairman, Sir, I would like to speak about Ujjwala Yojana. 
Earlier, poor tribal women had to go to forest to get wood. They used to cook food on 
earthen chulha (stove)  and its smoke affected their lungs adversely. Their life was 
                                                            
* English translation of the original speech delivered in Gujarati. 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
125

very difficult. Many governments have changed in the independent Bharat, but 
nobody bothered for them. But Hon. Prime Mi nister resolved this problem of tribal 
women as he cared for them and knew their plight.  
Hon. Deputy Chairman, Sir, women perform many household duties. We never 
recognize the work done by women in our homes. We pay for all services we get from 
others. We have meters installed in our hous es to pay for the electricity we use. But a 
woman who works the whole day for all fam ily members is never valued or given 
importance by other family members. Women are full of strength and, therefore, our 
Hon. Prime Minister has brought this important Bill in this House to ensure 
participation of women in law-making. This B ill is in the interest of people as well as 
the country.  Women are very powerful and they should participate and therefore, this 
Bill has been brought. In the end, I would lik e to say that this Bill validates the saying 
‘naari tu narayani’  (woman, you are a Goddess) and therefore, we all should 
welcome this Bill and pass it unanimously.  
Jai Jai Garvi Gujarat." 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: धन्यवाद Ǜीमती रिमलाबेन बेचारभाई बारा। माननीय Ǜी किपल िसÅबल, आपके  
पास तीन िमनट का समय है। 
 
 SHRI KABIL SIBAL (Uttar Pradesh): Sir, th ank you for allowing me to intervene in 
this very historic piece of legislation.  We all know that the Bill is  going to be passed. 
There is no doubt about it, and we all kn ow why it was not introduced in 2014 and 
why it is being introduced today in 2023. We don't have to discuss that any more. But 
I really want to place on record my concern fo r the future of this Bill, and I will tell you 
why. There have been about three delimitations that have taken place in this country, 
namely, 1952, 1963, 1973, which was completed in 1976. And, as you know that there 
is a decadal Census that happens, which happened in 1951, 1 961, 1971; and from 
1973 to 1976, it took three years to do the delimitation. Then came 2002 when by a 
Constitution Amendment, we said that we will now do the next Delimitation in 2026.  
The Census of 2001 was done, the Census  of 2011 was done and there has never 
been a delay in the Census but the Census  of 2021 has not been done till date. The 
reason given was that during that period of time, 2019-20, there was Covid. So, the 
Census could not be completed. But th e Covid happened in 2021 and the United 
States, England, China completed their Census  even during the course of the Covid. 
There is a reason why there is a connection between the two. It is because when the 
Finance Commission sits, it allocates resource s on the basis of population; and if you 
don't do your Census, then the allocations  become skewed because the population 
126
[RAJYA SABHA]

has increased but you don't have a late st Census. The result is, the Finance 
Commission cannot allocate proper resources to regions, to th e States in this 
country. Now, it took three years for the 1973 Delimitation process. Now, the census 
has not happened between 2021 and now. So , we are going to wait till 2026 for the 
Census to happen. Now, if the Census ha ppens in 2026, the Census will reveal the 
new population figures; and the reason wh y Delimitation was frozen in 2002 was that 
the Health Ministry gave an opinion that by 2026, the entire population will not be 
growing any more. So, the result was that we will then see in 2026 how allocations are 
to be made and what delimitation is to be done. Now, as it happens, the population 
in the North has increased exponentially and that in the Southern States, it has not. 
So, there is going to be a big problem in dealing with the issue of delimitation after the 
Census is done. ...(Time bell rings.)...  I will just finish, Sir. I am not going to waste 
your time because I am not going to enter in to the politics. So, just give me a bit of 
time.   
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Please.  
 
SHRI KAPIL SIBAL: The problem will be, th is is now a time when there will be 
rotation, when the Delimitation process will be freshly done, and if it is not going to be 
completed by 2029, this is not going to happen.  
 So, now I want the Prime Minister and I want the Home Minister to make a 
statement in this House. We don't know who will come to power. But they must make 
a statement that if they don't complete th e process by 2029, they will resign as Prime 
Minister and Home Minister of this country.  Let them make that assurance to this 
House.  We will then know whether .... ...(Interruptions)... That's another matter. 
...(Time-bell rings)... That's another matter.  
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN:  Please, please.    
 
SHRI KAPIL SIBAL: But, at least, they should give that assurance to this House. We 
will know the genuineness of why they have moved it in 2023. So, that is one point I 
have finished with. There is one other point,  and that is the last one and then I am 
done.  
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Your time is already over.  
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
127

SHRI KAPIL SIBAL: Sir, give me just one minute. I am not going to waste time. I never 
waste time.  
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Thirty seconds, pl ease. I have time constraints. Please. 
...(Interruptions)... Please conclude. ...(Interruptions)... You sit down. 
...(Interruptions)... Please let him speak. Please conclude.  
 
SHRI KAPIL SIBAL: Can the Members of this House place their ha nd on their heart 
and say, when they go out of the House,  that women of this country have been 
socially empowered, educationally empowered and economically empowered? And if 
they ask that question, the answer is 'No.' ...(Time-bell rings.)...  Please ask all 
Members of this House to go out of this House and ask about the Scheduled Castes 
and Scheduled Tribes. Despite the reservation , have they been socially empowered, 
economically empowered and educationally em powered? The answer is 'No'. This is 
just a very small step, a delayed step. We  want a leap forward for the empowerment 
of women politically. Thank you very much.     
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Thank you. Dr. Sonal Mansingh. You have five minutes.   
 
DR. SONAL MANSINGH (Nominated): Thank you very much, Sir, for this opportunity 
to speak here in this majestic hall of th e new building of Parliament. I am here as 
Nominated Member also for art and culture and that is because of Prime Minister 
Modi's respect and love for the heritage of India, both for culture and art. He 
considers culture as a soul of the nation.  
 Sir, Bharat is known as 'Mother of Democracy.' The Janapadas, the State 
Republics, were autonomous bodies, beginning with Vaishali. The elected 
representatives were responsible for smooth functioning of governance according to 
law and well-debated policies. Amrapali, kn own as a great and superb dancer, was 
called 'Janapada Kalyani' and was also a part of this decision-making body. Today, 
in the largest democracy of the world, we are on the threshold of recreating those 
glorious Acts, one of which is the Women's Reservation Bill, a Bill which will become, 
in the words of late Shrimati Sushma Sw araj, a milestone. Such Bills change the 
lifestyle of a particular section of  society. She further said, 'the 73
rd, 74 th and 81 st 
Constitution Amendment Bills will come in the category of such Bills which have 
become milestones.' Such Bills bring revolu tionary change in the life of women which 
provide 33 per cent reservation for women in Municipal Corporations, Municipalities 
and Gram Panchayats.  Now, as a natural progression from there, after reservation 
128
[RAJYA SABHA]

was granted to women in the Panchayati Ra j institutions and urban local bodies, we 
are on the threshold and we are enthus ed and excited to welcome the Women's 
Reservation Bill, the Nari Shakti Vandan Adhiniyam, for which we thank Prime Minister 
Modi wholeheartedly. Reservation for wo men is reserving seats for women which 
flows from the Fundamental Rights guaranteed under Articles 14 and 15(3) of the 
Constitution of India. Moreover, reservat ion for women has been granted by various 
laws of Parliament and State Legislatures  for achieving the ideals of equality and 
social justice like reservations in jobs, edu cational institutions, elections to panchayati 
raj, etc.   
 
6.00 P.M. 
 
Reservation, as envisaged in the Bill, will ensure considerable political empowerment 
of women in the true sense. It will pave th e way for achievement of  political justice for 
women, as promised in the Preamble and Arti cle 38 of the Constitution of India. It will 
enable women to have greater participation in the decision and policy-making 
process.  It is a long awaited affirmative step  in that direction. I seek your indulgence 
to invoke names of Sita and Draupadi, naayikas/heroines of the great epics 
Ramayana and Mahabharata, who had decisive role in governance and policy-
making, women as rishis of the vedic times such as Lopamudra, Maitreyi, Ghosha, 
Gargi, women as satyavadinis such as Savitri and Chauba l of the Upanishads, saints 
and seers such as Lalleshwari, Meera, Mahadevi Akka, Baha nabai, Anandamayi 
Maa, Mata Amritanandmayi, who brought societal changes in the attitudes and 
morale of male-dominated society and who provided examples of the strength and 
power of women, the brave deeds of women as queens who ruled over large 
kingdoms and as Army Chiefs, as freedom fi ghters, educationists, social reformers, 
entrepreneurs, artists and artisans, law makers, medical practitioners and healers, as 
councilors, mothers and home makers, women who are everywhere, coalescing and 
contributing their best to build a society,  a  n a t i o n  o f  g r e a t  p o w e r ,  s t r e n g t h  a n d  
character. Nothing is too small; every detail  is important. She creates, she nurtures 
and disciplines. She is the binding force that keeps disparate elements in family 
together, families that build a society by which a nation is known.   
Today, we are working under the inspirin g leadership of our Prime Minister, 
Shri Narendra Modi, who walks the talk; िजनकी कथनी और करनी मȂ अंतर नहीं है; जो 
संकÊप से िसिǉ ĢाÃत कर लेते हȅ और जो 'एक भारत, ǛेÍठ भारत' क े सूतर् को जीवंत रखते हȅ; 
who believes in ' सबका साथ, सबका िवकास, सबका िवÌवास, सबका Ģयास'; who believes 
in beti bachao, beti padhao and now beti badhao , who has put faith in women-le
d 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
129

development results of which are there for everyone to s ee. In his speech on Budget, 
2023, he said, " नारी शिƪ की संकÊप शिƪ, इच्छा शिƪ, उनकी कÊपना शिƪ, िनधार्िरत 
लÑयȗ को ĢाÃत करने क े िलए उनकी तपÎया, उनके  पिरǛम की पराकाÍठा, ये हमारी मातृ शिƪ 
क े Ģितिंबब हȅ।" ...(समय की घंटी)... Sir, one minute, please. नारी शिƪ का यह सामथ्यर् 
भारत की अनमोल शिƪ है। We are witness to first ever tribal woman President of India, 
hon. Shrimati Draupadi Murmu. We are witness to entry and partici
pation of women in 
combat units everywhere. For the awe-inspiring success of Chandrayaan-3 also, 
credit has been given to almost 100 women scientists.   
Sir, at the end, I would like to say that  I am so honoured and privileged to be 
here to speak on this subject.  
 
"भारत कन्या देश धन्या भूिम जन्या भारती, 
गगन को, अगन को, वचन को है धारती, 
देश बाला, दीप माला, दीप बाती भारती।" 
Thank you, Sir. 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: धन्यवाद, डा. सोनल मानिंसह जी।  माननीय सदÎयगण, 70 से अिधक Îपीकसर् 
हȅ, इसिलए क ृपया limit yourself within time. Hon.  Member, Shri Binoy Viswam; you 
have three minutes. 
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM (Kerala): Sir, from the Communist Party of India, the party that 
Geeta Mukherjee led
, the great fighter who fought for women's representation 
throughout her life, I support the Bill. 
 Sir, while supporting the Bill, I request th e Government to make sure that it will 
be implemented in 2024 elections. Remove a ll the hurdles in the name of census or 
delimitation. Make sure that it would be ex tended to Rajya Sabha and to all the State 
Legislative Councils. Make sure that the rights of the OBCs and the minorities are 
taken care of and they  get their rightful share in th e present and future law-making 
bodies.  Having said this, let me state very  clearly that the BJP is most insincere in 
this attempt.  The Bill that they have brough t is only for electoral gains. Sir, everyone 
knows that the BJP is the political outfit of the RSS. All of us here know that there is 
no space for even a single woman in the RSS. Why? Why was the Rashtriya Sevika 
Samiti formed?  ...(Interruptions)... Answer me. Why was the Rashtriya Sevika 
Samiti formed?  ...(Interruptions)...  It was because you do n't believe that a woman 
can sit with a man in the RSS. That is the reason. That is ideological. It is because the 
BJP and the RSS believe that the nah stree swatantrayam arhati ; they follow the 
manu-smriti. The followers of manu-smriti cannot be sincere to a Bill for women 
130
[RAJYA SABHA]

empowerment. We are sure of that. They ar e concerned only about electoral victories 
and for that purpose, they have brought this  Bill. Sir, we all know one more thing, 
why the woman President of India, Shrimati Draupadi Murmu, was not seen when this 
House was inaugurated. Why was she not seen ? She is a woman, she is an adivasi, 
but she has no place for that great f unction. That is BJP. That is RSS. 
...(Interruptions)...  Please tell us why, in your rule, the women of Manipur were 
paraded naked on the streets. 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Your time is over. ...(Interruptions)... Your time is over.  
Please conclude. 
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM: Sir, give me one minute more. 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: No. You may conclude in 30 seconds. 
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM: Sir, as you insist that I conclude, I may tell you that they came 
with the Bill with so many hurdles, census and delimitation. I am reminded of a story 
where a fox invited a crane for a dinner wher e he is served soup on a large plate. 
Because of that, the crane could not sip a single drop of the soup. 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Mr. Binoy Viswam , you have already taken an extra 
minute.  Please conclude. 
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM: Sir, the same thing could happen in the future. This Bill is not 
meant for empowerment of women; it is only for BJP's electoral purpose. The country 
knows it and we will defeat you when the elections happen. Thank you, Sir. 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Shrimati Geeta alias Chandraprabha; five minutes. 
 
Ǜीमती गीता उफर् चन्दर्Ģभा (उǄर Ģदेश): महोदय, धन्यवाद िक इस ऐितहािसक पल मȂ साक्षी 
बनाने क े िलए आपने मुझे बोलने का अवसर Ģदान िकया। मȅ सुबह से उधर से सुन रही थी, 'वंदन' 
शÅद का िजस तरीके  स
े वे आरोप लगा रहे थे, िवरोध कर रहे थे, तो मȅ जानना चाहती हूँ िक 
मिहला सशिƪकरण क े िलए अगर ' वंदन' शÅद आया, तो उसमȂ आपिǄ िकस बात की है? 
'मिहला' वह शÅद है, जो कहने क े िलए तीन अक्षरȗ से बना है -- 'म', 'ह' और 'ल' -- और तीनȗ 
अक्षरȗ मȂ अलग-अलग अपने को पिरभािषत करता है। 
 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
131

[उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती सुिमतर्ा बाÊमीक) पीठासीन हुईं।]  
 
'म' का मतलब है 'ममता', 'ह' का मतलब है 'िहÇमत' और 'ल' का मतलब है 'लज्जा'।  मिहलाएँ 
इन तीनȗ को सँजो कर जब घर से बाहर िनकलती हȅ, राÍटर् िहत मȂ काम करने क े िलए िनकलती 
हȅ, तो िकस बात की आपिǄ? इसिलए इसी को सोच कर आदरणीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी न
े 'नारी शिƪ 
वंदन' शÅद का Ģयोग िकया है। यह शÅद Îवयं मȂ माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी क े नेतृत्व वाली हमारी 
सरकार मȂ देश की माताओं-बहनȗ क े Ģित आदशर् दशार्ता है। िपछले 9 वषș मȂ आदरणीय Ģधान 
मंतर्ी जी क े नेतृत्व मȂ सरकार लगातार िजस तरीके  से मिहला सशिƪकरण क े िलए, जन-कÊयाण 
क
े  िलए कायर् कर रही है, वह िकसी से छ ुपा नहीं है। अगर हम आँकड़ȗ क े अनुसार देखते हȅ, तो 
2019 क े लोक सभा चुनाव मȂ मिहलाओं ने प
ुरुषȗ की तुलना मȂ बराबर मतदान िकया है। आपने 
मिहला मतदाताओं की भागीदारी को लेकर देखा होगा िक 2019 क े चुनाव मȂ िटकट क े िलए जो 
उÇमीदवार थे, उसमȂ 8,049 उÇमीदवार थे, िजनमȂ मिहलाओं की भागीदारी क ेवल 9 परसȂट थी
। 
महोदय, वतर्मान मȂ देश की संसद मȂ भी मातर् 15 परसȂट मिहला सांसदȗ का Ģितिनिधत्व है, जो िक 
अब तक संसद मȂ मिहलाओं ǎारा सवार्िधक Ģितिनिधत्व है। पहली बार संसद मȂ उनका इतना 
Ģितिनिधत्व देखने को िमला। मȅ पूछना चाहती हूँ िक यह िÎथित क ै से बनी है, यह िÎथित क
ै से 
उत्पन्न हुई है, क्या कारण है िक आज Ģधान मंतर्ी जी को यह मिहला आरक्षण िवधेयक लाना पड़ा 
है? 
Îवतंतर्ता क े पÌचाÞ, लÇबे समय से लगातार द
ेश मȂ, जो उधर बैठे हुए हȅ, उस कांगर्ेस की 
सरकार रही है। मȅ बताना चाहती हूं िक Îवगीर्य अटल िबहारी वाजपेयी जी 1998 मȂ जब मिहला 
आरक्षण िवधेयक लाए थे, तो कांगर्ेस लगातार उसका िवरोध करती रही। उस समय राज्य सभा मȂ 
िकसी तरीके  स
े वह िवधेयक पािरत हो भी गया, लेिकन लोक सभा मȂ आपने उसे पािरत नहीं होने 
देने का काम िकया।  
 महोदया, मȅ बताना चाहती हूं िक 2004 मȂ कांगर्
ेस की सरकार बनने क े पÌचाÞ भारतीय 
जनता पाटीर् इस िवधेयक की मांग करती रही, लेिकन इन्हȗने लगातार उस िवधेयक का िवरोध 
करते हुए उसे पािरत नहीं होने िदया। उस समय कांगर्ेस क े ǎारा यह िवधेयक लोक सभा मȂ पािरत 
नहीं होने िदया गया। आज कांगर्ेस क े लोग ओबीसी मिहलाओं क े अिधकारȗ की बात करते हȅ, यह 
सुन कर मुझे हंसी आती है। मȅ सुबह से उनकी बातȂ सुन रही हूं। मȅ शाक्य, क ुशवाहा और मौयर् 
समाज से आती हूं, जो िक एक िपछड़ा समाज है। देश
 की आज़ादी क े बाद से लेकर अब तक, 
पहली बार इस समाज की कोई मिहला अगर राज्य सभा मȂ आई है, तो वह गीता शाक्य नाम की 
एक छोटे से िकसान की बेटी है, जो यहां अपने समाज का Ģितिनिधत्व करने क े िलए आई है। 
इसके  िलए मȅ आदरणीय Ģधान म
ंतर्ी जी और भारतीय जनता पाटीर् क े शीषर् नेतृत्व को बधाई द ेती 
हूं, उनका धन्यवाद करती हूं।  
 आप ओबीसी की बात करते हȅ, मȅ जानना चाहती हूं, आप बताइए िक आज तक कांगर्ेस ने 
ओबीसी क े िकतने Ģधान मंतर्ी बनाए हȅ? ओबीसी क े जो Ģधान मंतर्ी बने, आप लोग खुद उनके  बारे 
मȂ जानते हȅ िक कौन-से बने हȅ। मȅ जानती हूं िक जब ...(Ëयवधान)... आप सुिनए तो सही, सत्य तो
 
यही है। ...(Ëयवधान)... आप सुिनए तो सही, सत्य तो यही है। ...(Ëयवधान)... यह बात िकसी से 
िछपी नहीं है िक आदरणीय द
ेवेगौड़ा जी और चौधरी चरण िंसह जी जैसे ओबीसी समाज से आने 
132
[RAJYA SABHA]

वाले बड़े नेता जब देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी बने, तो सामने वालȗ ने उनकी सरकार को चलने नहीं िदया। 
यह बात आप सभी जानते हȅ।  
 महोदया, कांगर्ेस क े लोग पूछते हȅ िक क्यȗ नहीं यह अिधिनयम 2024 मȂ लागू िकया जाता 
है? इनकी पाटीर् म
Ȃ अनेक विरÍठ अिधवƪा बैठे हुए हȅ। सभी अिधवƪा इस बात को जानते हȅ और 
उन्हȂ Îवयं बहुत अच्छे से पता है िक िकसी भी िवधेयक को कानूनी रूप  देने तथा लागू करने क े 
िलए उसे िनयमȗ की िविभन्न Ģिकर्याओं से गुजरना पड़ता है। सब क ु छ पता होने क े बाद भी देश की 
जनता को गुमराह करने क े िलए इस Ģकार की बातȂ की जाती हȅ। ...(समय की घंटी)... म
ȅ िसफर् 
एक िमनट का समय और चाहती हूं, उससे ज्यादा नहीं चाहती।  
 आप ओबीसी की बात करते ह
ȅ, देश को आज़ाद हुए एक लÇबा समय हो गया है, तब 
आपको ओबीसी की िंचता नहीं हुई! इन्हȗने ओबीसी आयोग को संवैधािनक दजार् नहीं िदया, 
लेिकन मȅ आदरणीय नरेन्दर् मोदी जी को बधाई देती हूं, िजन्हȗने सरकार मȂ आने क े बाद ओबीसी 
आयोग को संवैधािनक दजार् देन
े का काम िकया। मȅ बहुत ज्यादा नहीं बोलूंगी, मुझे पता है।...(समय 
की घंटी)... म
ȅ अंत मȂ क ु छ पंिƪयȗ क े माध्यम से अपनी बात समाÃत करूं गी।  
एक माननीय सांसद यहां बैठे हुए हȅ, वे अभी उǄर Ģदेश क े मुख्य मंतर्ी जी क े ऊपर आरोप 
लगा रहे थे। मȅ उनको बताना चाहती हूं िक य े वही मुख्य मंतर्ी योगी आिदत्यनाथ जी हȅ, जो 2017 मȂ 
जब उǄर Ģदेश क े मुख्य मंतर्ी बने तो सबसे पहले उन्हȗने अपने Ģदेश की बेिटयȗ को सुरिक्षत 
रखने क े िलए एंटी रोिमयो Îक्वॉड बना कर यह स ंदेश िदया है िक वे बेिटयȗ क े िलए िकतने 
संवेदनशील हȅ।  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती सुिमतर्ा बाÊमीक): माननीय सदÎया, आप अपनी बात समाÃत करȂ।  
 
Ǜीमती गीता उफर् चन्दर्Ģभा: यही नहीं, मȅ एक बात और भी बता दूं, अभी य े िजनके  ऊपर आरोप 
लगा रहे थे, उन्हीं मुख्य मंतर्ी आदरणीय योगी आिदत्यनाथ जी ने Ģदेश की बेिटयȗ क े िलए मिहला 
बटािलयन की शुरुआत  की, िजससे वे मिहलाओं क े िवकास मȂ अपना योगदान दे सकȂ ।  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती सुिमतर्ा बाÊमीक): माननीय सदÎया, आप अपनी बात पूरी करȂ।  
 
Ǜीमती गीता उफर् चन्दर्
Ģभा: मȅ चंद पंिƪयȗ क े साथ अपनी बात समाÃत कर रही हूं। आज आपके  
ǎारा हमारा 27 वषर् पुराना सपना पूरा िकया जा रहा है। Ģधान मंतर्ी जी, देश की नारी शिƪ की 
ओर से आपका कोिट-कोिट आभार, बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद।  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती सुिमतर्ा बाÊमीक): माननीय Ǜी संदोष क ुमार पी, आपके  पास तीन िमनट 
का समय है।  
 
SHRI SANDOSH KUMAR P (Kerala): Madam, I rise to support this important piece of 
legislation. The CPI has always stood for the empowerment of women. Leaders like 
Geeta Mukherjee were instru
mental in bringing women reservation. Now, the 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
133

important question is: Is the Government seri ous in implementing this Bill? Why is the 
Government linking both Census and delimi tation with this Bill? The Government 
should answer it clearly. The Union Minister who brought this Bill was explaining many 
things, but he did not explain the connect ion of this Bill with the Census and 
delimitation. Now, they say that there is no time at all. What is the problem in 
implementing this in the coming elections? We have 542 Lok Sabha seats. So, 181 
can be given. What is the problem in giving  that? You please answer this question in 
a very simple manner. This is what the count ry wants to know. Many other issues are 
there. But I don't want to go into the deta ils. What prevents you from implementing 
this legislation and making it practical in the coming elections? You have to answer 
this. You speak on different issues. Now, one important point that I would like to bring 
to your notice is that there is a case pend ing in the Supreme Court of India which was 
initiated by one of the prominent women organisations in India, namely, NFIW, that is, 
National Federation of Indian Women. That  case is pending and all political parties 
have been made a party to it. The Government of India and almost all States are also 
part of that case. Last time the Supreme Court asked: What are the steps taken by 
the Union Government? The counsel repr esenting the Union Government was 
absolutely defenceless.  Now, this is a f ace-saving mission, in fact. India is a country 
which stands at 140
th rank in a world report on wome n's role in politics. The Report 
recently came out and India stands at 140 th position. We wholeheartedly support this 
Bill, but we sincerely doubt the intention of the Government.  They want to make it a 
political jumla only. Later on, they will say, 'Oh, we have given many, many offers.  
Who is going to make it practical?" While supporting this Bill, which is an important 
piece of legislation, we sincerely doubt the intention of this Government and they want 
to make it another piece of jumla only. With these words, I support the Bill, but I do 
share my apprehensions on this Bill.   
 
SHRIMATI P.T. USHA (Nominated): Madam, thank you for giving me this opportunity 
to speak on Nari Shakti Vandan Adhiniyam. First of all, my vandan to all the females of 
this country and the hon. Prime Minister wh o has brought this Bill. I request all my 
fellow colleagues to support this Bill with utmost capacity. Thank you so much, Sir, 
for taking us finally on this pl atform. This is called the real Amrit kaal for women -- 
Swabhiman which is given by the hon. Prime Mini ster -- from the President of Bharat 
to the women who are living in the remote villages in mud houses, that is called 
Antyodaya. All the schemes like Ujjwala Yojana, Pradhan Mantri Awas Yojana, Beti 
Bachao Beti Padao Yojana, Sukanya Samridhi Yojana , triple talaq and so on are not 
only strengthening women but it is also a ma tter of dignity for women. Now, I want to 
134
[RAJYA SABHA]

draw your attention to one thing. Yest erday, hon. Prime Minister said, "This pavitra 
karma is done by me."  Yes, you are right, Sir. You are doing sapavitra karma. I must 
say in the conclusion that today we must thank and offer our pranaams to one 
incredible woman, swargiya Shrimati Heeraben Modi, the mother who gave Bharat an 
illustrious son who would bring justice to th e entire women population of Bharat, who 
would usher an Amrit Kaal of equality and remove all barriers that prevented women 
from achieving their fullest constitutional, political potential and guide the nation to the 
glory to serve Bharat Mata with commitment.  
As we reach 2047, may we see Maa Bhar ati's daughters leading this nation 
and leading from front, like Rani Lakshmib ai, Rani Ahilyabai Holkar, Kittur Rani 
Chennamma, Queen Velu Nachiyar, and ever y other woman of modern time, like our 
respected Finance Minister, Shrimati Nirmala Sitharaman, with whom I am learning on 
everyday basis. I want to thank all the women who are building this nation, who are 
raising their children, who are working in the fields, who are Atmanirbhar and who are 
karmayoginis, under whose able hands, Bharat will be stronger and mightier.   
 I will end my words here because it is  not my speech; it is the feeling of 
gratitude.  It is called ' सशƪ भारत की सशƪ भारत माताएँ'. With these words, I support 
this Bill.  Thank you.                                      
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी (उǄर Ģदेश): माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, " नारी शिƪ वंदन 
अिधिनयम", संिवधान (एक सौ अƻाईसवां संशोधन) िवधेयक, 2023 जो आज राज्य सभा मȂ आया 
है, मȅ उसके  समथर्न मȂ खड़ी हूँ। मȅ यह कहना चाहती ह
ूँ और िवÌवास भी करती हूँ िक आज यह 
पूरा सदन सवर्सÇमित से इसको पास करके  इितहास मȂ Îवणार्क्षरȗ मȂ अपना नाम दजर् करेगा। 
महोदया, मȅ इन पंिƪयȗ से इस बात को कहना चाहती हूँ िक : 
 
"
मोदी जी क े नेतृत्व ने िजन्दगी सँवारी है, 
दुिनया मुƻी मȂ करने को अब बेिटयȗ की बारी है।" 
 
 महोदया, हमने पढ़ा था िक कई हजार साल पहले यूनानी दाशर्िनक अरÎतु जी ने कहा था 
िक अगर मुझे कोई 100 िशिक्षत माताएँ दे दे, तो मȅ उसको एक िशिक्षत राÍटर् Ģदान कर सकता ह
ूँ। 
ऐसा अरÎतु जी ने कहा था। महोदया, आज 70 करोड़ मिहलाओं को आज़ ादी िमली है। यह कहने 
की बात है िक 1947 मȂ हमȂ आज़ादी िमली। हमारे संिवधान मȂ तमाम संशोधन हुए। जहाँ हमȂ मूल 
अिधकार िमले, मौिलक अिधकार िमले,  
 
[उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म)पीठासीन हुईं।] 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
135

वहीं पर हमȂ समानता का भी अिधकार िमला, लेिकन मुझे यह कहने मȂ कोई संदेह नहीं है िक आज 
यहाँ पर हमारी 70 करोड़  बहनȗ को समानता का अिधकार देने का जो काम िकया गया है, ऐसा 
काम हमारे आदरणीय यशÎवी Ģधान मंतर्ी मोदी जी ने िकया है। हमारे Ģधान मंतर्ी जी कहते हȅ िक 
मिहलाएँ सब क ु छ करने मȂ सक्षम हȅ, बशतȃ समाज एवं सरकार उनको आगे बढ़ने मȂ सहयोग दे। 
भारत क े वतर्मान Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने मिहलाओं को जीवन क े हर पड़ाव पर मदद करके  दृढ़ संकÊप 
लेने का काम िकया ह
ै। अभी कांगर्ेस की हमारी एक बहन रजनी जी कह रही थीं िक हमारी 
आदरणीया सोिनया जी, आदरणीय राहुल जी बार-बार पतर् िलखते रहे, तो िफर आप पहले यह 
िबल क्यȗ नहीं लाये, जबिक 2014 क े बाद से आपकी सरकार है? मȅ आपको ध्यान िदलाना चाहती 
हूँ, आप याद किरए िक जब 10 वषș तक नेशनल एडवाइज़री कमेटी की च
ेयरपरसन आदरणीय 
सोिनया गांधी जी रहीं, तो वे इस िबल को इस सदन मȂ क्यȗ नहीं लाईं? मुझे अच्छी तरह याद है 
िक लोक सभा मȂ कई बार यह िबल आया, कई Ģधान मंितर्यȗ ने इस िबल को रखा। म
ȅ यह कहना 
चाहती हूँ िक बहुत कम कायर्काल मȂ, अÊप कायर्काल मȂ हमारे देश क े यशÎवी पूवर् Ģधान मंतर्ी 
Îवगीर्य अटल िबहारी वाजपेयी जी ने इस िबल को लाने का काम िकया था। म
ुझे अच्छी तरह याद 
है िक इसको पूरी दुिनया ने देखा था, जब उनके  सहयोगी दल क े लोगȗ ने - मȅ नाम नहीं लेना 
चाहती - उस ĢÎताव को छीन कर फाड़ने का भी काम िकया था। हमȂ याद है िक वषर् 2010 मȂ यह 
िवधेयक इसी राज्य सभा से सवर्सÇमि
त से पास हुआ था और हमारी पाटीर् क े लोगȗ ने उसको 
समथर्न िदया था। मȅ पूछना चाहती हूँ िक तब आप लोगȗ ने उसको लोक सभा मȂ पेश क्यȗ नहीं 
िकया, आपने उसको छ ुपा कर क्यȗ रखा? आपने उसको छ ुपाने का काम िकया है। 
 महोदया, मȅ आपके  सामने यह भी कहना चाहती हूँ िक Ģधान मंतर्ी मोदी जी ने मिहलाओं 
क े िलए समय-समय पर बहुत से उपयोगी काम िकये हȅ, बहुत से उत्साहवǉर्क काम िकये ह
ȅ।  मȅ 
यहाँ उनकी क ु छ योजनाओं का उǉरण करना चाहती हूँ। 'ģी िसलाई मशीन योजना', 'सुरिक्षत 
मातृत्व आÌवासन सुमन योजना', ' बेटी बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ योजना', 'Ģधानमंतर्ी उज्ज्वला 
योजना', सुकन्या समृिǉ योजना जैसे बहुत से उदाहरण हȅ, िजनके  आलोक मȂ हम यह कह सकते 
हȅ िक हमारे देश क
े  Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने मिहलाओं क े िलए बहुत से उपयोगी काम िकये हȅ।  
 महोदया, सरकार समगर् िवकास का Ģयास कर रही है। क ेन्दर् सरकार की तरफ से चलाये 
जाने वाले 'नारी शिƪ पुरÎकार' क े अन्तगर्त मिहला को आिर्थक सहायता Ģदान करते हुए Ģि
त 
वषर् 8 माचर् को राÍटर्पित जी क े ǎारा पुरÎकार िदया
 जाता है। हम बीते वषș मȂ सवȘच्च नागिरक 
पुरÎकारȗ मȂ भी मिहलाओं की बढ़ती भागीदारी देख सकते हȅ। मȅ इसका उदाहरण देना चाहती हूँ। 
2021 मȂ 119 मȂ से 29 पुरÎकार मिहलाओं को िदये गये, 2022 मȂ 128 मȂ से 34 पुरÎकार मिहलाओं 
को िमले, उनको पǍ पुरÎकारȗ से सÇमािनत िकया
 गया, जो िक आजादी क े बाद सबसे बड़ी 
संख्या मȂ काम िकया गया।  इसके  बजट मȂ भी 1.5 Ģितशत से अिधक की बढ़ोतरी की गयी। हमारी 
बहनȂ आज खेत से खेल तक और िशक्षा स
े रक्षा तक काम कर रही हȅ। ...(समय की घंटी)... 
महोदया, मुझे अपनी बात कहने क े िलए अभी पाँच िमनट का समय और दीिजए।    
 महोदया, आधी आबादी मȂ हमारा िहÎसा है। अंतिर क्ष यातर्ी क े रूप  मȂ हमारी पहली मिहला 
कÊपना चावला, पहली मिहला आईपीएस िकरण बेदी, पहली मिहला िशक्षक फाितमा शेख, 
हमारी ' उड़नपरी' आदरणीया पी.टी. ऊषा जी हमारे सामने बैठी हȅ और कलम कर्ांित क े क्षेतर् मȂ 
136
[RAJYA SABHA]

पहला Îथान अमृता Ģीतम जी का आता है, िजनको सािहत्य अकादमी पुरÎकार क े साथ पǍ 
पुरÎकार से भी भूिषत िकया गया है। ...(समय की घंटी)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): अब आप समाÃत कीिजए।  
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी: महोदया, जब राजनीित की बात आती है, तो सुषमा Îवराज जी को िव Îमृत 
नहीं िकया जा सकता।   
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): आपका समय समाÃत हो गया है।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी: महोदया, हम सुषमा Îवराज जी क े साथ-साथ सुचेता क ृपलानी जी को याद 
करते हȅ, सरोिजनी नायडू जी को याद करते हȅ, हम अपनी ऐसी बहुत सारी बहनȗ को याद करते 
हȅ, िजनका योगदान रहा है। हम लता मंगेशकर को नहीं भूल सकते, हम आशा भोसले को नहीं 
भूल सकते। हमारी मिहलाओं न
े क्या से क्या नहीं िकया। हम सुभदर्ा क ुमारी चौहान को नहीं भूल 
सकते, हम महादेवी वमार् को नहीं भूल सकते। महोदया, मȅ आपके  सामने एक बात कहना चाहती 
ह
ूँ। ...(समय की घंटी)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): अब आप समाÃत कीिजए।  
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी: महोदया, िपछले 27 
वषș मȂ मिहला आरक्षण िवधेयक लाने क े अनेक बार 
Ģयास िकये गये थे, जो सफल नहीं हो पाये। मȅ आपसे कहना चाहती हूँ िक Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने 
मिहला सशिƪकरण क े िलए बजट मȂ जो Ģावधान िकया है, वह Ģावधान तो िकया ही है, इसके  
साथ ही बािलका िवǏालयȗ को म
ंजूरी देने और हमारी मिहलाओं को राÍटर्-िनमार्ण क े िलए आगे 
बढ़ाने का काम माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने िकया है। हम उसको िवÎमृत नहीं कर सकते। अभी 
हमारे माननीय पाठक जी, जो पंजाब से यहाँ आते हȅ, आपने कहा िक ...(Ëयव
धान)... ...( समय की 
घंटी)... महोदया, मुझे बस पाँच िमनट बोलने दीिजए। हम आज नहीं बोलȂगे, तो कब बोलȂगे?  
...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): पाँच िमनट। ...(Ëयवधान)..
. 
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी: आज तो हमारा िदन है, आज तो हमȂ सीमा मȂ नहीं बाँिधए।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): अभी बहुत से नाम हȅ। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी: आज सीमा की 'सीमा' को तोड़ दीिजए। आज आप मुझे बोलने दीिजए।  
...(Ëयवधान)... महोदया, मȅ कहना चा
हती हूँ िक अभी हमारे पंजाब से माननीय सदÎय, पाठक जी 
कह रहे थे िक मिहला सुरक्षा क े िलए िदÊली मȂ सीसीटीवी क ैमरे लगाए गए हȅ। महोदया, मȅ कहना 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
137

चाहती हूँ िक मिहला सुरक्षा सीसीटीवी क ैमरȗ से नहीं हो सकती। मिहला की सुरक्षा अच्छे संÎकारȗ 
और अच्छी नीितयȗ से हो सकती है।  ...(समय की घंटी)...  मȅ कहना चाहती हूँ िक आज जब बेटा 
रात क े दो बजे घर पर लौट कर आए और कोई नहीं पूछे िक बेटा, तुम कहाँ थे ...(Ëयवधान)... वहीं 
अगर हमारी बेटी ...(Ëयवधान).
.. 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): सीमा जी, अब आप खत्म कीिजए। ...(Ëयवधान)... अब आप 
खत्म कीिजए। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी: बस आिखरी बात।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): अब म
ȅ दूसरा नाम बुला रही हूँ। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी: अगर बेटी 10 िमनट देर से आती है, तो हम पूछते हȅ िक बेटी, तुम कहाँ थी? 
तो मȅ कहना चाहती हूँ िक ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): आपके  7 िमनट हो गये हȅ।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी: मȅ आपसे दो बा
तȂ कह कर अपनी वाणी को िवराम देती हूँ। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): Ǜी रामजी। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी: महोदया, बस एक िमनट। ...(
Ëयवधान)... बस एक लाइन। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
महोदया, बस एक लाइन। ...(Ëयवधान)... माननीय ितवारी जी, िसफर् एक लाइन। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
एक िमनट। ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ आपके  सÇमान मȂ कहना चाहती हूँ।  ...(Ëयवधान)... ितवारी जी, आप 
बैठ जाइए।  मȅ आपके  सÇमान मȂ एक लाइन बोल रही हूँ। ...(Ëयवधान)... माननीय ितवारी जी, 
अपने सÇमान मȂ सुिनए। ...(Ëयवधान)... आज म
ȅ अपने भाइयȗ क े सÇमान मȂ एक बात कहना चाहती 
हूँ।  ...(Ëयवधान)... आज मȅ अपने भाइयȗ क े सÇमान मȂ एक बात कहना चाहती हूँ। ...(Ëयव धान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): जÊदी कीिजए।  
 
Ǜीमती सीमा िǎवेदी: वह बात यह है िक : 
"माना िक पुरुष बलशाली है, 
मगर जीतती हमेशा नारी है। 
सांविरया क े छÃपन भोग पर, 
िसफर् एक तुलसी ही भारी है।।" 
 
...(Ëयवधान)... 
138
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): सीमा जी, अब आप समाÃत कीिजए। ...(Ëयवधान)... Ǜी 
रामजी, आप बोिलए। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी रामजी (उǄर Ģदेश): माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, आपका धन्यवाद िक आपने मुझे 
संिवधान ( एक सौ अƻाईसवां संशोधन) िवधेयक, 2023 पर बोलने का अवसर Ģदान िकया है। 
...(Ëयवधान)...  इसके  साथ ही मȅ अपनी पाटीर् की म
ुिखया बहन क ुमारी मायावती जी का आभार 
Ëयƪ करता हूँ, िजन्हȗने मुझे इस िबल पर बोलने और देश की ऐितहािसक पािर्लयामȂट और नई 
पािर्लयामȂट मȂ समाज सेवा और देश सेवा करने का गौरव Ģदान िकया।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, मȅ इस िबल क े समथर्न मȂ खड़ा हूँ
।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): अभी आप बैिठए। ...(Ëयवधान)... इनके  बाद हम आपकी बात 
सुनȂगे। ...(Ëयवधान)... अभी इनको बोलने दीिजए।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी रामजी: महोदया, मȅ बाबा साहेब की क ु छ बातȗ को दोहराना चाहता हूँ
। बाबा साहेब डॉ. 
भीमराव अंबेडकर ने 20 जु लाई, 1942 को नागपुर मȂ ' अिखल भारतीय शोिषत वगर् मिहला 
सÇमेलन' क े आयोजन मȂ कहा था िक मȅ िकसी समाज की तरक्की इस बात से देखता हूँ िक वहाँ 
मिहलाओं ने िकतनी तर
क्की की है। यानी, िजस समाज की मिहलाएँ Ģगित नहीं करतीं, वह 
समाज कभी Ģगित नहीं कर सकता। बाबा साहेब डा. भीमराव अंबेडकर मिहलाओं को Ģगितशील 
बनाने क े िलए उनकी िशक्षा  मȂ भागीदारी, सामािजक और आिर्थक Îतर मȂ भागीदारी सुिनिÌचत 
करना चाहते थे। इसिलए बाबा साहेब डा. भीमराव अंबेडकर ने 'िहन्दू कोड िबल' मȂ मिहलाओं को 
तमाम तरह क े हक, िपता और पित की संपिǄ मȂ बराबरी का हक िदया, तािक उनका सामािजक 
Îतर बढ़ सके । उन्हȗने संिवधान मȂ मिहलाओं को िशक्षा और नौकरी का अिधकार देने का भी काम 
िकया। बाबा साहेब ने संिवधा
न क े Preamble मȂ justice और equality की बात कही। उन्हȗने 25 
नवंबर, 1949 को कहा िक मȅने आज इनको राजनीित मȂ बराबरी का हक िदया, 'एक  Ëयिƪ, एक 
वोट, एक मूÊय' का िसǉांत कायम िकया, लेिकन आने वाली सरकारȗ को सामािजक और 
आिर्थक असमानता को जÊद-से-जÊद दूर करना पड़ेगा।  
 महोदया, इितहास गवाह है िक मिहलाओं ने तमाम जुÊम और ज्यादितयȗ को सहा है। 
इनमȂ दहेज Ģथा, बाल िववाह, सती Ģथा और यहाँ तक िक िशक्षा पर लगा सामािजक Ģितबंध भी 
है। भारत की Ģथम िशिक्षका माता सािवतर्ीबाई फ ु ल
े ने 1 जनवरी , 1848 को पुणे मȂ लड़िकयȗ क े 
िलए Îकू ल खोल कर इस Ģितबंध को खत्म िकया। इन तमाम सामािजक क ुरीितयȗ क े बावजूद भी 
मिहलाओं ने देश की आज़ादी की जंग मȂ बढ़-चढ़ कर िहÎसा िलया, चाहे रानी लÑमीबाई हȗ, 
सरोिजनी नायडू हȗ, ब
ेगम हज़रत महल हȗ, झलकारी बाई हȗ, ऊदा देवी पासी हȗ, िबजली पासी 
हȗ, चाहे मुजÄफरनगर की महाबीरी देवी वाÊम
ीिक हȗ, यहाँ तक िक दुगार् देवी, िजनको दुगार् भाभी 
क े नाम से जाना गया, चाहे िसिक्कम की हेलेन लेपचा उफर् सािवतर्ी देवी हȗ, चाहे नागालȅड की 
रानी गाइि
दन्Êयू हȗ, चाहे गोरखा से पुतली माया देवी जी हȗ। इन सभी मिहलाओं ने देश की 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
139

आज़ादी की जंग मȂ अपने Ģाण न्योछावर िकए। ...(समय की घंटी).... महोदया, मȅ बस खत्म कर 
रहा हूँ।  
 उǄर Ģदेश मȂ जब बहन मायावती जी मुख्य मंतर्ी थीं, तो उन्हȗने उǄर Ģदेश मȂ तमाम 
मिहला कॉलेज खोलने का काम िकया। 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): क ृपया आप अपनी बात समाÃत कीिजए। 
 
Ǜी रामजी: महोदया, मȅ एक िमनट मȂ अपनी बात खत्म करता हूँ। माननीया बहन जी ने उǄर 
Ģदेश मȂ "सािवतर्ीबाई फ ु ले बािलका िशक्षा मदद योजना" भी शुरू  की थी, िजसमȂ 25 हजार रुपए  
और साइिकल देने का काम िकया गया था।  
 महोदया, मȅ आपके  माध्यम से क
े न्दर् सरकार से अपील करता हूँ िक अगर मिहला 
सशिƪकरण करना है, तो एससी/एसटी और ओबीसी की मिहलाओं को भी इसमȂ अलग से 
िरज़वȃशन देने का Ģावधान िकया जाए, क्यȗिक पूरे देश क े अंदर आज भी इन मिहलाओं क े साथ 
अत्याचार होता है। मȅ िफर से आपके  माध्यम से क ेन्दर् सरकार से अपील करता हूँ िक वह मिहलाओं 
क े िलए 33 परस Ȃट आरक्षण मȂ एससी/एसटी और ओबीसी की मिहलाओं का भी िरज़वȃशन 
सुिनिÌचत करने का काम करे।...(सम
य की घंटी)....  सरकार इसको गंभीरता से संज्ञान मȂ ले, 
धन्यवाद। 
 
SHRIMATI S. PHAGNON KONYAK (Nagalan d): Hon. Vice-Chairman, Madam, I 
stand here in support of this Bill because it  is a defining moment in the history of our 
country for women. I stand here today because my party chose to give me the 
ticket... ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI PRAMOD TIWARI: On a point of order.  ...(Interruptions)... 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती कान्ता कदर्म): आज तो मिहलाओं का सÇमान कीिजए। आज मिहलाओं का 
िदन है।...(Ëयवधान)... आप मिहलाओं का सÇमान कीिजए और आज मिहला
ओं को 
सुिनए।...(Ëयवधान)...     
 
SHRIMATI S. PHAGNON KONYAK: I am he re today as Member of Parliament 
because my party chose to give me ticket in spite of many capable male ticket 
seekers being there. Madam, BJP is a party, which practices 33 per cent reservation 
in the party set up. The enab ling environment created by hon. Prime Minister of the 
country has led to women empowerment tran sitioning to women-led development. 
Prime Minister's various initiatives like Beti-Bachao, Beti-Padhao, Ujjwala Yojana, 
Mudra Scheme, Ayushman Bharat Yojana, Sukanya Samriddhi Yojana have been 
proved to be beneficial. Now, the sex-ratio of women has increased and there are 
140
[RAJYA SABHA]

1020 females for every 1,000 males, and this  increase in sex-ratio has happened due 
to the various initiatives of our hon. Prim e Minister. We have a Prime Minister who 
speaks about menstrual hygiene from the ra mparts of the Red Fort and we have a 
Prime Minister who thinks for women.  
 
[THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI MAMATA MOHANTA) in the Chair.] 
  
There were many questions - what, why,  how, when but Madam, if we have 
the political will, then, we will find a way and this Bill will be passed. I thank hon. 
Prime Minister and all stakeholders for k eeping intact the provisions of law to 
safeguard the interests of Sc heduled Castes and Scheduled Tribes, especially of the 
North East. I also take this opportunity to thank hon. Prime Minister for being the 
champion of women empowerment initiatives and now, with the passage of this Bill, a 
dawn of women-led developm ent will begin. With these words, I support the Bill. 
Thank you. 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती ममता मोहंता): Ǜी अिजत क ुमार भुयान। आपके  पास तीन िमनट का समय 
है। 
 
SHRI AJIT KUMAR BHUYAN (Assam): Madam, I support the Bill since 50 per cent of 
the population will be benefited due to pa rticipation of formulation of policies and 
programmes. 
 With the reservation of women at the local  body level, which has been there for 
three decades, there is no doubt that women leadership emerged but majority of 
them are from families of influence. In th e present Bill, there is  no safety net for 
negating such trend. Since the Bill will be implemented by 2029, the first fifteen years, 
that is, three tenures of Lok Sabha and Vidhan Sabhas, women from politically 
influential families would get the chance to  be elected. Will women be empowered in 
this way?   
 Madam, I do not want to take any individual names but there are a few 
constituencies from where families of influential political clout always get elected, and, 
even, if such constituencies get reserved for women, no outsider will get chance to be 
elected. Several women stalwa rts have represented in pa rliamentary democracy in 
the past, and, many of them were not from politically influential families. Here, I would 
like to mention Bhagwati Devi who got elected  from Gaya in Bihar in the year 1996. 
This could happen due to the very honest inte nt of Shri Lalu Prasad Yadav, the then 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
141

Chief Minister of Bihar, and, I salute Shri Lalu Prasad Yadav for giving opportunity to 
her. 
 Madam, when democracy in our country is getting matured, representative 
political participants should be from all shades and sections of the society but my 
strong apprehension is that the present Women's Reservation Bill may not fulfill the 
desired expectations of wider political part icipation of women. The timeframe of the 
Bill has been designed in such a way that a woman like Bhagwati Devi will get chance 
only around 2050 to represent in  the Parliamentary democracy. ( Time bell rings. ) 
Madam, I am from North East and the only  opposition voice. Please give me one 
minute more. You have given everybody two, three minutes more. 
 Madam, the Prime Minister and many senior Cabinet Ministers intervened in 
the discussion on the Bill and claimed that the leadership of the previous 
Governments was not bold enough to get the Bill passed but the Government led by 
Modi made it possible.   
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती ममता मोहंता): आपके  तीन िमनट खत्म हो गए हȅ, इसिलए अब आप 
समाÃत कीिजए।    
 
SHRI AJIT KUMAR BHUYAN: I am concludi ng. Will any Member of the august House 
deny that the demand of 33 per cent re servation in Parliament and Assemblies 
originated only after the constitutional am endment of women reservation at the local 
level? 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI MAMATA MOHANTA): Please conclude.  
 
SHRI AJIT KUMAR BHUYAN: I am concluding . I have only two more points. From 
1996 onwards, all successive Governments at  the Centre piloted the Bill and tried to 
evolve consensus. Perhaps th is is the first Government which does not believe in 
consensus behaviour and dilute d the Bill as a result of which women will have to wait 
for years.  Consensus for immediate implem entation should have been made and it 
should have been done immediately as the Election Commission of India is capable of 
identifying the constituencies.   
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती ममता मोहंता): आपने एक िमनट क े िलए बोला था, वह भी खत्म हो गया, 
इसिलए अब आप अपनी बात समाÃत कीिजए। 
 
SHRI AJIT KUMAR BHUYAN: Finally, I conclude with a famous couplet: 
142
[RAJYA SABHA]

"इतना गुमान मȂ मत रहो िक सब क ु छ तुमने िकया 
क ु छ तो शमर् करो, क ु छ तो तुÇहारे पूवर्जȗ ने िकया होगा, 
जो आज तुम यहाँ हो।" 
 
Ǜीमती सुिमतर्ा बाÊमीक ( मध्य Ģदेश): माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, आज मुझे भारत क े 
ऐितहािसक िनणर्य मȂ शािमल होने का भाग्यशाली
 अवसर ĢाÃत हुआ है। मȅ " नारी शिƪ वंदन 
िवधेयक" पर 128वȂ संशोधन क े समथर्न मȂ आपके  सामने खड़ी हूँ।  
 महोदया, बीते नौ वषș मȂ देश मिहलाओं क े िवज़न को लेकर आगे बढ़ा है। भारत ने अपने 
बीते वषș क े अनुभव को द
ेखते हुए, िवमेन डेवलपमȂट से िवमेन लेड डेवलपमȂट क े Ģयासȗ को 
वैिÌवक मंच पर ले जाने का Ģयास भी िकया है। इस बार भारत की जी20 मȂ महत्वपूणर् अध्यक्षता 
रही। बैठकȗ मȂ भी यह िवषय Ģमुखता से छाया हुआ था। इस वषर् का बजट भी िवमेन लेड 
ड
ेवलपमȂट क े Ģयासȗ को नई गित Ģदान करेगा। इसमȂ आप सभी की बड़ी भूिमका है। 
 महोदया, हमारे यहाँ वषș स
े राजनीित क े िलए मिहलाओं का नाम बहुत बार िलया गया। 
मिहलाओं क े िलए यह िकया, वह िकया - ऐसे दावे बहुत हुए और अनेक बार हुए, लेिकन धरातल 
पर क ु छ भी नहीं ह
ुआ। मȅ आत्मिवÌवास क े साथ कह सकती हूँ िक िपछले नौ वषș मȂ माननीय Ģधान 
मंतर्ी, नरेन्दर् मोदी जी क े नेतृत्व मȂ एनडीए सरकार ने हमारी बहनȗ, बेिटयȗ और माताओं क े जीवन 
से जुड़ी हुई हर समÎया का िनदान करने का पूरा अवसर िदया है। यिद इसे राजनीितक पिरदृÌय 
मȂ देखा जाए, तो मȅ Îवयं आपके  सामने इस बात का उदाहरण हूँ। देश क े यशÎवी Ģधान मंतर्ी, 
माननीय नरेन्दर् मोदी जी न
े भारत क े ǛेÍठ सदन मȂ Îथान देकर अपने कायș को चिरताथर् िकया  है, 
वरना अभी तक तो यह वगर् िसफर् वोट बȅक क े िलए था। मिहलाओं की दीन-दशा सुधारने का कायर् 
माननीय मोदी जी की एनडीए सरकार ने िकया है। गभार्वÎथा क े दौरान िशशु को पौिÍटक खाना 
िमले, इसके  िलए माननीय मोदी जी ने 'Ģधानमंतर्ी मातृ व
ंदना योजना' चलाई, िजससे तीन करोड़ 
से अिधक मिहलाओं क े बȅक खातȗ मȂ सीधे रािश भेजने का कायर् हुआ। िशशु का जन्म अÎपताल मȂ 
हो, इसके  िलए भी बृहà अिभयान चलाए गए। ब
ेटी को कोख मȂ न मारा जाए, इसके  िलए ' बेटी 
बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ' जैसे जन आंदोलन हुए। मोदी जी ने जनता से आÏवान िकया िक आप मुझे 
बेटी भीख मȂ दे दीिजए, मȅ बेटी को संवारू ँगा और उसे आगे राÍटर् की संपिǄ मȂ शािमल करू ँगा। 
बेटी बड़ी होकर Îकू ल जाए और शौचालय न होने की वजह से Îकू ल न छोड़ना पड़े, इसके  िलए 
करोड़ȗ शौ
चालय बनाए गए। बेटी िशक्षा जारी रखे, इसके  िलए 'सुकन्या समृिǉ योजना' दी गई, 
बेिटयȗ एवं बहनȗ को ' Ģधानमंतर्ी मुदर्ा योजना' दी गई, सैिनक Îकू लȗ क े ǎार खोले गए। बेिटयाँ 
सेना मȂ ऑिफसर बनȂ, इसके  िलए तीनȗ सेनाओं म
Ȃ बेिटयȗ क े िलए राÎते खोल िदए गए। आज आप 
देखȂगी िक अिग्नवी
र मȂ बड़ी संख्या मȂ बेिटयाँ भतीर् हुई हȅ, जो एनडीए, पुणे मȂ पहले बैच की टर्ेिंनग 
ले रही हȅ।  
 महोदया, यही नहीं, गाँवȗ तक सेÊफ हेÊप गर्ुप की सहायता को दोगुना कर िदया है। रसोई 
गैस क े िलए 'उज्ज्वला योजना' क े अंतगर्त कनेक्शन देकर उनके  जीवन को सुलभ बनाने क े िलए 
कदम बढ़ाए गए। 'Ģधानमंतर्ी मातृ वंदना योजना' क े अंतगर्त तीन करोड़ से ज्यादा मिहलाओं को 
आिर्थक भ
ुगतान िकया जा चुका है।  
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
143

उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती ममता मोहंता): माननीय सदÎया, आपके  पास पाँच िमनट हȅ।      
 
Ǜीमती सुिमतर्ा बाÊमीक: 'हर घर जल योजना' क े अंतगर्त बेिटयȗ और बहनȗ क े िलए कायर् िकए 
गए। महोदया, बेिटयȗ को अंधेरे मȂ न रहना पड़े, इसके  िलए 'Ģधानमंतर्ी सौभाग्य योजना' चलाई 
गई। ...(समय की घं
टी)... बेटी बीमार न पड़े, इसके  िलए 'आयुÍमान भारत योजना' उनके  सामने 
एक ताकत बनकर आई। मȅ कहना चाहूँगी िक आज िजस तरीके  से भारत का भाग्य बहनȗ क े हाथȗ 
आगे बढ़ रहा है, उसके  िलए मȅ अपनी ओर से दो लाइनȂ समिर्पत करना चाहती हूँ : 
 
"सामन
े है मंिजल तो राÎतȗ मȂ आगे बढ़ना, 
अभी वƪ है, जो भी हो, मन मȂ वह इच्छा न छोड़ना। 
कदम-कदम पर िमलेगा साथ भाई मोदी का, 
बस राहȂ चुनने क े िलए जमीन मत छोड़ना।" 
 धन्यवाद, जय िहन्द। 
 
THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI MAMATA MOHANTA): Now, Dr. M. 
Thambidurai.  You have three minutes. 
 
DR. M. THAMBIDURAI (Tamil Nadu): Thank
 you very much, Mada m. On behalf o f 
the AIDMK party and on behalf of former  Tamil Nadu Chief Minister, Edappadi 
Karuppa Palaniswami, I stand to support this Bill. It is a great coincidence that I rise 
to speak and support the Bill and I introdu ced a similar Bill to reserve one-third of 
seats for women in 1998 as the Law Minist er under the leadership of Vajpayee ji. But 
at that time, it could not be passed. Now, it is the opportunity to pass it. I 
congratulate the Prime Minister, Modi ji, who has come forward and whatever was 
dreamt at that time is going to become a reality today.   
Madam, the AIADMK party played a hist orical role in empowering the women 
and make reservation for women in governance.   
 
[THE VICE-CHAIRPERSON (SHRIMATI GEETA ALIAS CHANDRAPRABHA) in the 
Chair.] 
 
Under the leadership of former Chief Minist er of Tamil Nadu, Puratchi Thalaivar MGR 
and Puratchi Thalaivi Amma Jayalalithaa, we  have given a lot of power to the women 
and implemented so many welfare schemes for them. You will be astonished to see 
that even though the Dravidian Party has said  many times that we have to give more 
power to the women, two Chief Ministers have been given to Tamil Nadu by the 
AIADMIK party, Madam Jayalalithaa and Amma  Janaki. But the other parties, like the 
144
[RAJYA SABHA]

Dravidian Party, which are claiming to give more power to the women, have not given 
such kind of power to the women. ...(Interruptions)...  This is a fact. Also, Madam, I 
would like to remind the House that under the leadership of Amma, Tamil Nadu had 
already enacted a law to rese rve 50 per cent of seats fo r women in Panchayati Raj 
institutions. Reservation to women had been  increased from one-third of the total 
number of seats to 50 per cent of the seat s in the wards, villages, Panchayat unions 
and district councils. Also, when we ar e talking about women empowerment, the 
AIADMK party, under the leadership of A mma, fought four elections in 1991, 2001, 
2011 and 2016, and won with thumping majority. She was the Chief Minister of Tamil 
Nadu consecutively for four times. It is a historical thing which has happened in Tamil 
Nadu which cannot be denied. Also, when  we are talking about empowerment of 
women, implementation of welfare schemes for women is very important. As our 
Prime Minister, Modi ji, has implemented ma ny welfare schemes, our Amma had also 
implemented many welfare schemes in Ta mil Nadu to empower the women and to 
give protection to the women. For example, we are now talking about Beti Bachao. 
That is a scheme which was implemented originally in Tamil Nadu under the 
leadership of Amma, by the na me of 'Cradle Baby Scheme', to save the girl child. At 
that time, many people used to kill the girl child. She saved a lot of girl child.  That 
was a scheme, which was applauded througho ut the world, for protecting the girl 
child. Also, if you take police forces, the role of women is very important. For that, all 
women police stations were established firs t in Tamil Nadu under the leadership of 
Puratchi Thalaivi Amma. A scheme for women commandoes in police service was 
also implemented in Tamil Nadu. Giving edu cation to women is also very important. 
For that, free bicycles and laptops to girl students were first given by the AIADMK 
party under the leadership of Amma.   
When MGR was alive, she made Shrimati  Sathiavani Muthu a Cabinet Minister 
in Shri Chaudhary Charan Singh's Government. She was the first Dravidian to occupy 
such a position in the Central Government  as the Cabinet Minister. That is the 
achievement of the AIADMK Party. This shows how we have given more power to 
women. This thing cannot be forgotten. We have dreamt to implement it. I feel sorry 
as I have been given short time. Our Party has four Members. Still I got it late. I can 
see what is happening in the House. Most of the Members from the northern States 
spoke. Southern States' Members are less. More empowerment is given in southern 
States. That is because of the Periyar Movement. That is its achievement. That is why 
southern States are well-off.  In most of  the northern States, more power has not 
been given. Now Modi ji has come forward to solve this problem and give more power 
to the women. That is why this Bill has been introduced. And it is successfully coming 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
145

up. He is aware of the seriousness of the si tuation. Many political parties asked why it 
could not be implemented 2014 onwards. I want to put this question to the 
Opposition, the UPA Government. They passed it in 2010 in the Rajya Sabha. I accept 
that. Why did they fail to introduce and pass  it in the Lok Sabha in the remaining four 
years? They could have done that. I could not understand why they did not do it then. 
But they are blaming this Government for the delay. This is the point. You just take 
the figures. 
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती गीता उफर् चन्दर्Ģभा): माननीय सदÎय, आपका समय समाÃत हो गया है। 
 
DR. M. THAMBIDURAI: I am finishing. This  Bill was introduced in 1998 during the 
period of Vajpayee ji. It was again introduced in 1999 during the period of Vajpayee ji. 
Then it was again introduced in 200 2 during the period of Vajpayee ji. It was then 
introduced in 2003 again during the period of Vajpayee ji. But they could not support 
the Bill. (Time-bell rings.)  It could have been passed. But it did not pass. At the 
same time, in 2010, they introduced it and passed it. Why did the UPA Government -- 
when the DMK was also part of the Govern ment -- fail to do it? This I could not 
understand.   
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती गीता उफर् चन्दर्Ģभा): माननीय सदÎय, आपका समय समाÃत हो गया है। 
 
DR. M. THAMBIDURAI: AIADMK is the cham pion of women's causes. It is giving 
empowerment to women.  ...(Interruptions)...   
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती गीता उफर् चन्दर्Ģभा): आपका समय समाÃत हो गया ह
ै। ...(समय की घंटी)... 
 
DR. M. THAMBIDURAI: They are only saying this kind of thing now. (Time-bell 
rings.)  I am proud that the AIADMK under Pura tchi Thalaivar MGR, Puratchi Thalaivi 
Amma, and Mr. Edappadi Palaniswami has given more power to the women.   
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती गीता उफर् चन्दर्Ģभा): आपका समय समाÃत हो गया है, अब आप बैिठए।   
 
DR. M. THAMBIDURAI: Neither the DMK Party nor the UPA Government did it.  
...(Interruptions)...  It is the NDA Government that is going to implement it.   
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती गीता उफर् चन्दर्Ģभा): Ãलीज़, अब आप कन्क्लूड कीिजए, अब मȅ दूसरे 
माननीय सदÎय को बुलाना चाहती हूँ। 
146
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
DR. M. THAMBIDURAI: That is why we are supporting the NDA Government.  
...(Interruptions)...  That is why we are a part of the Government. Thank you very 
much, Madam.   
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष (Ǜीमती गीता उफर् चन्दर्Ģभा): Ǜीमती दशर्ना िंसह जी, आपका समय पाँच िमनट है। 
 
Ǜीमती दशर्ना िंसह (उǄर Ģदेश): माननीय उपसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, मȅ आपको धन्यवाद देती हूं 
िक आपने मुझे इस ऐितहािसक िबल पर बोलने का अवसर Ģदान िकया। महोदया, म
 ȅ यह बताना 
चाहती हूं िक यह मेरी मेडन Îपीच है। " यही समय है, सही समय है, भारत का अनमोल समय 
है"- माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने अनेक अवसरȗ पर यह बोला है और इसको उन्हȗने धरातल पर भी 
लाने का काम िकया है। 
  महोदया, देश की आजादी क े 75 वषर् पूणर् होने क े उपलÑय मȂ देश 'अमृत काल' का उत्सव 
मना रहा है। माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी क े ǎारा मिहला आरक्षण िबल को नई संसद क े Ģथम िबल क े 
तौर पर पेश करना सभी मिहलाओं क े िलए गौरवािन्वत होने का क्षण है। यह िबल राजनैितक क्ष
ेतर् 
मȂ नारी सशिƪकरण को सुिनिÌचत करने का ऐितहािसक कदम होगा तथा भारत क े संिवधान की 
ĢÎतावना और अनुच्छेद 38 मȂ िकए गए वायदे क े अनुसार मिहलाओं क े िलए राजनैितक न्याय की 
उपलिÅध का मागर् ĢशÎत करेगा। यह िबल संिवधान की इस म
ूल भावना का सÇमान है। इससे पहले 
भी आदरणीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने इस देश की करोड़ȗ मिहलाओं को सÇमान देने का काम िकया है। 
जैसे, उन्हȗने 'उज्ज्वला योजना' क े माध्यम से उनको धुएं से मुिƪ िदलाई। मȅ इस संदभर् मȂ आपको 
बताना चाहूंगी िक उǄर Ģदेश मȂ 3 करोड़ 24 लाख से ज्यादा मिहलाएं ' Ģधानमंतर्ी उज्ज्वला 
योजना' का लाभ ले रही हȅ, जो िक पूरे देश मȂ सवार्िधक संख्या ह
ै।  
महोदया, 'Ģधानमंतर्ी आवास योजना' क े तहत िमलने वाले आवास का Îवािमत्व पिरवार 
की मिहला को िदया जाना, मुिÎलम मिहलाओं को िटर्पल तलाक से मुिƪ िदलाकर उन्हȂ नारकीय 
जीवन से मुिƪ िदलाने का काम करना - इस तरह क े साहिसक फ ैसले माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी 
की अगुवाई वाली सरकार ने िलए हȅ। मȅ बताना चाहती हूं िक द
ेश की परंपरा एवं जीवन मूÊयȗ की 
रक्षा मȂ मिहलाओं का अभूतपूव
र् योगदान रहा है। आज देश की बेिटयां फाइटर जेट भी उड़ा रही हȅ, 
देश की बेिटयां सीमा पर सुरक्षा भी कर रही हȅ, यहां तक िक अभी हाल ही मȂ चंदर्यान-3 िमशन भी 
मिहला वैज्ञािनक क े नेतृत्व मȂ सफलतापूवर्क पूणर् हुआ है, िजससे पूरे िवÌव मȂ भारत का नाम रौशन 
हुआ।   
महोदया, हमारा देश एकमातर् ऐसा देश
 है, जहां मिहलाओं को शुरू  से ही िवशेष दजार् 
िदया गया है।  इसी देश मȂ वषर् क े 365 िदनȗ मȂ से 18 िदन मातृ-शिƪ की, देवी की पूजा की जाती 
है।  अगर आप गणना करȂ तो देवȗ से ज्यादा देिवयȗ की संख्या िमल जाएगी।  हमारे यहां िवǏा, 
धन, शिƪ एवं शांित की अिधÍठातर्ी देिवयां ही ह
ȅ। इतना क ु छ होने क े साथ ही, माननीय Ģधान 
मंतर्ी जी क े नेतृत्व मȂ आज यह िबल बहनȗ को और मजबूत करेगा। क ु छ पािर्टयȗ क े िलए मिहला 
सशिƪकरण एक राजनैितक िवषय रहा है, ल ेिकन भारतीय जनता पाटीर् और आदरणीय Ģधान 
मंतर्ी जी क े िलए यह एक संवेदना का िवषय है।   
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
147

महोदया, भारतीय जनता पाटीर् की सरकार ने मिहला सशिƪकरण क े िलए अनेकȗ काम 
िकए हȅ। मȅ उǄर Ģदेश से हूं, मȅ आपको बताना चाहती हूं िक उǄर Ģदेश मȂ 2017 मȂ भारतीय 
जनता पाटीर् की सरकार बनने से पहले बड़ा ही अराजकता का माहौल था। हमारी बेिटयां और 
मिहलाएं असुरिक्षत थीं, अपरािधयȗ क े िखलाफ कोई बोलना नहीं चाहता था, लेिकन वषर् 2017 म
Ȃ 
उǄर Ģदेश मȂ भारतीय जनता पाटीर् की सरकार बनने क े बाद उǄर Ģदेश क े माननीय मुख्य मंतर्ी 
योगी आिदत्यनाथ जी ने मिहलाओं की सुरक्षा क े िलए कड़े कदम उठाए और उन्हȗने 'एंटी रोिमयो 
Îक्वाड'  का गठन िकया, िजसके  पिरणामÎवरूप
 उǄर Ģदेश मȂ मिहलाओं की सुरक्षा सुिनिÌचत 
हुई और आज उǄर Ģदेश मȂ बेिटयां और मिहलाएं अपने को सुरिक्षत महसूस कर रही हȅ। महोदया, 
मिहलाएं बहुत ही संवेदनशील होती हȅ, करुणामयी  होती हȅ। आदरणीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी का मानना 
ह
ै िक मिहलाओं क े िवकास क े साथ-साथ, अब समय आ गया है िक मिहलाओं क े नेतृत्व मȂ इस 
देश का िवकास हो, हमȂ इस िदशा मȂ काम करना है। 
 माननीय उ
पसभाध्यक्ष महोदया, मिहला आरक्षण िबल को इससे पहले चार बार भाजपा 
सरकारȗ ǎारा लाया गया, लेिकन िवपक्ष की नकारात्मक सोच एवं उनकी खराब नीयत क े 
पिरणामÎवरूप यह कभी पािरत नहीं हो सका। लेिकन, 19 िसतंबर 2023 को गणेश चतुथीर् क े शुभ 
अवसर पर माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी क े ǎारा मिहलाओं क े पक्ष मȂ नारी
 शिƪ वंदन िवधेयक लाने का 
साहिसक एवं महत्वपूणर् िनणर्य िलया गया। 
 
7.00 P.M. 
 
इसीिलए हमारे यहां कहा जाता है िक,  
"नारी अÎय समाजÎय क ुशलवाÎतुकारा अिÎत।" 
 
 अथार्Þ नारी समाज की आदशर् िशÊप
ी है। महोदया, यह मेरी मेडन Îपीच है, इसिलए मȅ 
थोड़ा सा अिधक समय लेना चाहूंगी। देश मȂ जब भी मिहला सशिƪकरण की बात होगी, तब इस 
देश की समÎत मातृ शिƪ माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी क े इस कदम की सदैव ऋणी रहेगी। महोदया, 
आज का भारत नया भारत ह
ै। आज का भारत युवा भारत है। आज का भारत ऊजार् से भरा भारत है। 
आज का भारत मिहला सशिƪकरण का भारत है। आज का भारत माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी क े  
नेतृत्व मȂ जी20 की अध्यक्षता कर िवÌव को वसुधैव क ु ट ुÇबकç का संदेश देने वाला भारत है। अंत मȂ 
मȅ सभी मिहलाओं की तरफ से आदरणीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी का कोिट-कोिट आभार Ģकट करती  हूं 
िक आपने हम सभी मिहलाओं को सÇमान से जीने का बारÇबार अवसर Ģदान िकया है। मȅ माननीय 
Ģधान मंतर्ी जी क े ǎारा मिहलाओं क े अिधकार क े समथर्न मȂ लाए गए इस महत्वपूणर् िबल का 
समथर्न करती हूं, बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद।  
 
उपसभाध्यक्ष ( Ǜीमती गीता उफर् चन्दर्Ģभा): Ǜी जी.क े. वास
न। माननीय सदÎय, आपके  पास क ु ल 
तीन िमनट का समय है।  
 
148
[RAJYA SABHA]

SHRI G.K. VASAN (Tamil Nadu): Madam, I stand here to support this important Bill 
on behalf of my Party, Tamil Maanila Congress (Moopanar). For the past four 
decades, many Governments have been tryi ng to pass the examination for bringing 
forward this Bill positively. Unfortunately, th ey have failed for va rious reasons. Today, 
the Bharatiya Janata Party, this Government, has passed the examination of winning 
and this Women's Reservation Bill is bein g passed in both the Houses. This is a 
dream come true for our women in the co untry. I thank and support the Government 
on this historic day.   
Madam, responsibility and empowerment ar e the need of the hour today after 
this Bill is passed which the forefathers of our nation wished. I am sure this will be 
achieved through the continuance of this Government after the next election, 
especially when this Bill is being passed in the 75
th year of Independence, the Amrit 
Kaal, which is very special. Today, our women in the country are achieving exemplary 
goals in various fields. They are in top po sitions in the Army, the Navy and the Air 
Force and doing wonders. We are examples for the world. Yesterday, we discussed 
about women's role in space and science. Wo men in India excel in all fields. We see 
women in various capacities. Today, the firs t person of the country, the President of 
India, Governors, Ministers, Party Presidents, etc. are women. Unfortunately, we are 
very low in legislation. That is why, we ha ve come forward to introduce this important 
Bill.  
Madam, to conclude, I wish to quote the famous and apt lines of poet Bharati, 
a popular immortal poet of Tamil Nadu.  
 

"We women have come to rule scholastically, 
And create the laws for this world. 
Clap and rejoice! For the women are no less to men, 
In reaching the heights of knowledge. " 
 
To put in English, the immortal poet Bh arati says that women have come to 
govern officers and enact laws. The world will prosper in wisdom if we respect women 
as equal to men.  The valour of men is to protect women's self-esteem. Then, there 
will be nobody else to degrade and now the time is ripe to fulfil our long-pending 
aspiration.   
 
(MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN in the Chair.) 
                                                            
 English translation of the original speech delivered in Tamil 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
149

 
As a representative and leader of Tamil Maanila Congress (Moopanar), I 
support this Bill wholeheartedly and thank th e Government and the Prime Minister for 
bringing forward this Bill at the right time. Thank you very much.  
 
Ǜीमती संगीता यादव (उǄर Ģदेश): माननीय सभापित महोदय, आपने मुझे नारी शिƪ वंदन 
अिधिनयम पर बोलने का अवसर िदया, इसके  िलए मȅ आपको आभार Ģकट करती हूं और आपके  
माध्यम से सदन को Ģणाम करती हूं। महोदय, यह मेरी मेडन Îपीच है, तो आपका संरक्षण भी 
चाहूंगी।  
 माननीय सभापित जी, मȅ देश क े यशÎवी Ģधान मंतर्ी जी को देश
 की आधी आबादी की 
तरफ से साधुवाद देती हूं िक लोकतंतर् क े इस नविनिर्मत मंिदर मȂ वे पहला अिधिनयम मिहलाओं क े 
राजनीितक अिधकार को िदलाने क
े  िलए लेकर आए हȅ। माननीय उपसभापित जी, कल हम लोक 
सभा मȂ माननीय गृह मंतर्ी जी को सुन रहे थे। उन्हȗने ÎपÍट िकया िक मिहलाओं को राजनीितक 
अिधकार देना या सशƪ करना कभी भी भारतीय जनता पाटीर् का राजनीितक एजȂडा नहीं रहा है। 
नारी शिƪ व
ंदन अिधिनयम तो मिहलाओं की मान्यता व उनके  िसǉांतȗ से जुड़ा हुआ है। यह मातृ 
शिƪ को सÇमान देने वाला अिधिनयम है और मिहलाओं क े लÇबे संघषर् को खत्म करने वाला 
अिधिनयम है।  
उपसभापित महोदय, मȅ गर्ामीण क्ष
ेतर् से वषर् 2017 से लेकर वषर् 2022 तक एम.एल.ए. रही। 
इन साढ़े नौ वषș मȂ गर्ामीण मिहलाओं क े जीवन Îतर मȂ क्या सुधार आया है और क ै से उनकी सोच 
बदली है, इसके  संबंध म
Ȃ मȅ क ु छ अपने examples देकर बताना चाहती हूं और यह भी आंकड़ȗ क े 
साथ बताऊं गी िक मिहलाओं को आगे बढ़ाना हमारा राजनीितक एजȂडा नहीं है। हम आगे तो बढ़ 
रहे हȅ, आधुिनकता का नारा भी लगा रहे हȅ, परंतु जब मिहला ओं से जुड़े हुए मुǈे आते हȅ, तो सǄा 
चुप हो जाती है। इसका बहुत बड़ा example Right to Hygiene से ले सकते हȅ। मिहलाओं क े 
ÎवाÎथ्य क े िलए Right to Hygiene बहुत ज़रूरी था। सैिनटरी प ैड क े िबना यह कभी संभव नहीं 
था। हमारे देश को मिहला Ģधान मंतर्ी भी िमली थीं, लेिकन कभी भी यह चचार् का िवषय नहीं रहा। 
माननीय उपसभापित महोदय, मȅ आपको बताना चाहूंगी िक माननीय मोदी जी ने वषर् 2020 मȂ 15 
अगÎत को लाल िकले से सैिनटरी नैपिकन का उÊलेख िकया, उसके  बाद से यह एक अिभयान 
बना और हज़ारȗ-लाखȗ मिहलाओं को न जाने िक
तनी ही बीमािरयȗ से हमने बचाया है।  
उपसभापित महोदय, मȅ इसी मȂ एक और उदाहरण जोड़ना चाहूंगी। मȅ जब िवधायक थी, 
तो गर्ामीण Îतर पर लोगȗ को बीमारी का इलाज कराने क े िलए हम लोग
 मुख्यमंतर्ी िववेकाधीन 
कोष से पैसे िदलाते थे। मȅ अपना एक अनुभव साझा करना चाहती हूं और उÇमीद करती हूं िक 
हमारे पुरुष भाई मेरी बात का बुरा नहीं मानȂगे। महोदय, जब पित को कोई बीमारी हो जाती थी, 
तब इलाज क े िलए पैसे लेने क े िलए पित्नयां आती थीं, तो बोलती थीं िक बहन, प
ैसे िमलने मȂ 
ज्यादा टाइम तो नहीं लगेगा। अगर ज्यादा समय लगेगा, तो बता देना, मȅ अपनी खेती-बाड़ी ब
ेच 
दूंगी, लेिकन इनका इलाज करा कर इनको ठीक कराऊं गी। लेिकन जब हमारी बहनȂ िकसी गÇभीर 
बीमारी से गर्िसत होती थीं और पुरुष भाई आिर्थक सहायता क े िलए आते थे, तो बोलते थे िक 
बहन, िकतना टाइम लगेगा, थोड़ी और मेहनत करो, पैसे िमलȂगे तो इलाज शुरू  करवा दȂगे। इस 
150
[RAJYA SABHA]

सोच मȂ अगर िकसी ने फकर् डाला है, तो वह 'आयुÍमान काडर् योजना' ने डाला है। महोदय, आज 
जब मȅ गर्ामीण क्षेतर् मȂ जाती हूं तो जगह-जगह मुझे मेरी बहनȂ िमलती हȅ और कहती हȅ िक 
आयुÍमान काडर् का लाभ अिधकांश मिहलाएं उठा रही हȅ।  
माननीय उपसभापित महोदय, अगर हम 'Îवच्छ भारत िमशन' क े बारे म
Ȃ बात करȂगे तो यह 
भी बहुत िंचताजनक बात थी िक देश की आज़ादी क े इतने वषर् बाद गर्ामीण इलाकȗ मȂ शौचालय 
की कमी थी। हमने 11 करोड़ पिरवारȗ क े  िलए शौचालय बनवाए हȅ। मȅ िवपक्ष को सुन रही थी, तो 
क ु छ लोग कह रहे थे िक बीजेपी वाले हȅ, छोटी बात करते हȅ - वाकई मȂ हम छोटी बात कर रहे हȅ, 
लेिकन अगर आप लोगȗ ने पहले यह छोटी बात की होती, तो हमȂ कहने की ज़रूरत नहीं पड़ती।  
मȅ उज्ज्वला योजना क े बारे मȂ भी आपको एक छोटा सा अनुभव बताऊं गी। जब कभी 
गर्ामीण क्षेतर् मȂ खाना बनने का समय न हो और हम लोग पहुं
च जाते थे, िकसी भी मिहला से कोई 
चाय बनाने क े िलए कह देता था, वे कहती तो क ु छ नहीं थीं, लेिकन मȅ उनके  घर मȂ जाती
 थी, तो 
उनके  चेहरे पर िझझक देखती थी, परेशानी देखती थी। आज जब हम वहां जाते हȅ, तो वे मिहलाएं 
कहती हȅ िक बहन आप बैिठए, हमारे पास मोदी जी का िदया हुआ िसलȂडर है। महोदय
, जीवन मȂ 
यह जो बदलाव आया है, यह मȅने अपने अनुभव से देखा है, सुना है और मȅ आपको बतान ा चाहती 
हूं िक क ै से हमने गैर-राजनीितक कायर् मिहलाओं को सशƪ करने क े िलए िकए हȅ। जब बेटी 
बचाओ, बेटी पढ़ाओ की बात आती है, जब माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी इसकी बात करते हȅ..।  तो मȅने 
देखा िक लोगȗ ने अपनी गािड़यȗ क े पीछे िलखा, अपने घर की दीवार पर िलखा, social media 
पर अपनी DP बनाई और उसी की देन ह
ै िक हमारे यहां घरेलू िंहसा कम हुई है, sex ratio बढ़ा है, 
मिहलाओं क े Ģित सोच बदली है और जब 'Selfie with daughter'
 शुरू  हुई, तो बिच्चयȗ का 
समाज मȂ सÇमान बढ़ा है। मȅ आपको एक और अनुभव बताती हूं।  2014 मȂ जब मोदी जी Ģधान मंतर्ी 
बने, तब 'Ģधान मंतर्ी जन-धन योजना' आई। उस समय मȅ िवधायक नहीं थी, पाटीर् की छोटी-सी 
कायर्कतार् थी। मȅने गांव-गांव जाकर camp लगाना श
ुरू  िकया। जब वहां मिहलाएं घूंघट मȂ आती 
थीं, तो वे यकीन नहीं कर पाती थीं िक एक form भरने से खाता खुल जाएगा। जब खाते खुल गए, 
तो
 वे मुझे कई बार धन्यवाद देने भी आईं और आज 52 करोड़ जन-धन खातȗ की अिधकांश 
लाभाथीर् हमारी मिहलाएं हȅ। जब ये खाते खुले, तो मखौल भी उड़ाया जा रहा था, लेिकन आज जब 
िबना leakage क े पैसे पहुंचते हȅ, तो इससे हमारे P.M. साहब की दूरदिर्शता िदखाई देती है। इसी 
की अगली कड़ी 'Ģधान मंतर्ी मुदर्ा योजना' है। हमारे Ģधान
 मंतर्ी मोदी जी ने सोचा िक मिहलाओं 
का bank मȂ आना-जाना शुरू  हो गया है, इसिलए अब अगली कड़ी यह है िक वे क ु छ loan लेकर 
Ëयापार भी शुरू  कर सकती हȅ।  आज 'Ģधान म
ंतर्ी मुदर्ा योजना' की  70 per cent लाभाथीर् हमारी 
मिहलाएं हȅ।   
माननीय उपसभापित जी, बेिटयȗ को आगे बढ़ाने क े िलए हम लोग लगातार Ģयास कर रहे 
हȅ।  मȅ इसमȂ क ु छ आंकड़Ȃ देना चाहती हूं िक क ै से हम गर्ामीण Îतर और राजनीितक Îतर, दोनȗ 
Îतरȗ पर चल रहे ह
ȅ। हमारी सरकार ने मिहला सशिƪकरण पर िवशेष बल िदया है। जहां हमारे 
यशÎवी Ģधान मंतर्ी ने Îव सहायता समूह क े माध्यम से गर्ामीण तबके  की मिहलाओं को आिर्थक 
और सामािजक रूप  से आत्मिनभर्र बनाने की िदशा मȂ कायर् िकया है, वहीं अपने मंितर्मंडल मȂ 
सबसे ज्यादा मिहला मंितर्यȗ का िरक
ॉडर् रखकर उनको राजनीितक रूप  से सशƪ भी िकया है। 
आठ मिहला राज्यपाल बनाने का िरकॉडर् भी हमारी सरकार क
े  पास है। देश क े सवȘच्च पद पर 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
151

आज माननीय राÍटर्पित दर्ौपदी मुमूर् जी हȅ। मȅ आज बताना चाहती हूं और यहां पर सबसे िनवेदन भी  
करना चाहूंगी िक हम एक इितहास रचȂ। हम यह िबल राजनीितक एजȂडे क े रूप  मȂ नहीं, बिÊक 
मिहलाओं क े सशिƪकरण क े िलए लेकर आए हȅ, इसिलए उसमȂ सभी का समथर्न िमले। मȅ अभी 
सुबह से सुन रही थी - क्यȗिक मेरा लाÎट मȂ नंबर आया है,  अच्छा है सुनने का मौका िमला,  यहां 
पर लोग कह रहे थे िक ऐसे िबल की क्या जरूरत
 है।  मȅ उसमȂ दो-चार बातȂ रखना चाहूंगी।  आज 
हमारे देश की Îवतंतर्ता क े 75 वष र् पूण
र् हो गए हȅ। हमारा संकÊप है िक देश को 2047 तक  पूणर् 
िवकिसत देश बनाना है।  इस उǈेÌय क े िलए माननीय मोदी जी ने 'सबका साथ, सबका िवक ास, 
सबका िवÌवास और सबका Ģयास' का मूल मंतर् िदया है, लेिकन इस उǈेÌय की ĢािÃत क े िलए 
आधी आबादी को राजनीितक भागीदारी देना बहुत जरूरी  है।  माननीय उपसभापित जी, लोक 
सभा क े 539 सं सद सदÎयȗ मȂ से मातर् 82 ही  मिहला सांसद ह
ȅ। मुझे बताते हुए हषर् हो रहा है िक 
2019 क े चुनाव मȂ मिहलाओं की अभी तक की सवार्िधक भागीदारी है। सर, यही हाल देश की 
िवधान सभाओं का भी है और लगभग पूरे देश मȂ िवधान सभाओं मȂ मिहला िवधायकȗ
 का औसत 
क ेवल आठ Ģितशत है। संसद मȂ यह 15 per cent से भी कम है। इन आंकड़ȗ से जािहर होता है िक 
आधी आबादी को उनका हक़ िदलाने की बातȂ तो बहुत जोर-शोर से की जाती रही हȅ, लेिकन 
बराबरी का दजार् कभी नहीं िदया गया है। हर क्षेतर् मȂ मिहलाएं आज परचम लहरा रही हȅ, वह चाहे 
sports हो या space हो।  अब यह सोचने का समय है िक Ģाचीन भारत की नारी की गौरवशाली 
यातर्ा कहां पीछे रह गई। हम तो धन क े िलए लÑमी जी की और िवǏा क े िलए सरÎवती जी की 
प
ूजा करते रहे हȅ। मȅ इसमȂ ज्यादा नहीं जाना चाहूंगी, क्यȗिक हमारी पाटीर् क े माननीय राÍटर्ीय 
अध्यक्ष जी ने सुबह बहुत िवÎतार से इस पर चचार् की है, इसिलए मȅ ज्यादा नहीं बोलूंगी, ल
ेिकन मȅ 
इतना जरूर  कहूंगी िक भारत मȂ अǉर्नारीÌवर क े रूप  मȂ सÇमान पाने वाली Îतर्ी, पुरुषȗ से क ै से 
पीछे रह गई, इसके  बारे मȂ सोचने का समय है और उसी पिरणित क े रूप  मȂ यह 'नारी शिƪ व ंदन 
अिधिनयम' हमारी पाटीर् लेकर आई है, हमारी सरकार लेकर आई है। आज भारत िवÌव गुरु  बनने 
की ओर अगर्सर है -  जैसा िक हमने  G20 की अध्यक्षता मȂ देखा। G20 की बैठक मȂ मिहला नेतृत्व 
की भागीदारी पर चचार् हुई। ऐसे म
Ȃ अित आवÌयक है िक देश की आधी आबादी की राजनीितक 
भागीदारी बढ़ाने का हर संभव कानून बनाया जाए। महोदय, यहां मेरी पाटीर् क े साथ-साथ अन्य 
पाटीर् क े नेतागण भी मौजूद हȅ।  आज जब हम िकसी भी राजनीितक पाटीर् मȂ देखते हȅ, तो 
मिहलाओं की सिकर्य भागीदारी पुरुषȗ क े बराबर ही
 िदखाई देती है, पाटीर् कायर्कतार् क े रूप  मȂ अब 
उनकी पुरुषȗ क े बराबर भागीदारी है। अब हर मिहला का कायर्कतार् क े रूप  से जन Ģितिनिध बनने 
का सफर एक सपना है, एक इच्छा है। मȅ यह चाहूंगी िक मिहलाओं की इच्छा प
ूरी करने मȂ पूरा 
सदन सरकार का सहयोग करे। मुझे हषर् है िक भारतीय जनता पाटीर् क े संगठन क े पदȗ पर मिहला 
आरक्षण पहले से ही लागू है। मȅ यह बताना चाहूंगी िक राÍटर्ीय और राज्य Îतर पर हमारी मिहला 
मतदाता बहनȗ की िहÎसेदारी लगातार बढ़ रही है। 1971 म
Ȃ यह महज 48 परसȂट थी, 2014 मȂ यह  
67 परसȂट से भी ज्यादा हो गई है। ...(समय की
 घंटी)... सर, मेरी मेडन Îपीच है, मȅ दो िमनट का 
समय लूंगी।  
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: आपको already maiden speech क े तहत दस िमनट का समय िमला। Please, 
आप 30 seconds लीिजए। क ु ल 70 वƪा
 हȅ और अभी बहुत से लोग बोलने क े िलए बाकी हȅ।   
152
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
Ǜीमती संगीता यादव: जागरूक  मतदाता क े रूप  मȂ हमारी बहनȂ मतदान क े माध्यम से राÍटर् 
िनमार्ण मȂ अपनी भूिमका िनभा रही हȅ। अब समय आ गया है िक आधी आबादी को राजनीितक 
सहभािगता का समान अवसर िमले। माननीय सर, मȅ अभी सुन रही थी ...(समय की घंटी)...इससे 
पहले कांगर्
ेस पाटीर् की अध्यक्षा मिहला थीं, लेिकन मिहला आरक्षण िबल नहीं आया। ...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Please.  ....(Interruptions)...  मȅ दूसरे speaker को बुला रहा 
हूं। 
  
Ǜीमती संगीता यादव: देश की Ģधान मंतर्ी भी मिहला थीं और राÍटर्पित भी मिहला रहीं,  लेिकन 
यह िबल नहीं आ सका। मȅ आज सभी से िनवेदन करती हूं िक इस िबल का समथर्न करȂ।  
...(Ëयवधान)...  
       
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Shri Hishey Lachungpa. ....(Interruptions)... You have 
three minutes. ....(Int
erruptions)... Nothing is going on record. ....(Interruptions)... 
You have three minutes only.   
 
SHRI HISHEY LACHUNGPA (Sikkim):  
"Hon. Deputy Chairman, Sir, today on 
behalf of the people of Sikkim, I rise to  support the One Hundred and Twenty-Eighth 
Constitution (Amendment) Bill, 2023, the Na ri Shakti Vandan Bill. I would like to 
congratulate the Govt. of India as well as the women of this country as this Bill is 
going to be passed today and will come into force soon. A lot of work has been done 
in Sikkim for the empowerment of women, pa rticularly during the SDF government. In 
Panchayats and urban local bodies, 50 per cent reservation for women was made 
possible by our government in 2011-12. We had also provided for 33% reservation to 
women in government jobs in 2014. On this historic day, I would also like to urge upon 
the Central Government to fulfil the long pe nding demand for reservation of seats for 
Limbu and Tamang community in the Sikki m Legislative Assemb ly since 2003, when 
they were recognised as Scheduled Tribes. The people of Sikkim will be grateful to 
the Government of India if this demand is accepted. Along with this Bill, my request to 
the government is to look after the intere st of all Sikkimese Community. With these 
words, on behalf of the people of Sikkim, once again I express my support to the Bill. 
Thank you. Jai Sikkim."  
     
डा. कÊपना सैनी (उǄराखंड): उपसभापित महोदय, मȅ आज लोकतंतर् क े नए घर मȂ, िजसमȂ 
आत्मा वही पुरानी है, नारी शिƪ वंदन िबल क े समथर्न क े िलए खड़ी हुई हूं। महोदय, मȅ ǭदय से 
                                                            
 English translation of the original speech delivered in Nepali 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
153

आपका आभार Ëयƪ करती हूं िक आपने मुझे इस महत्वपूणर् िबल पर, जो Îविर्णम इितहास का 
िहÎसा बनेगा, बोलने का अवसर िदया है, इसके  िलए आपका बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। मुझे नहीं 
लगता िक इस पर िकसी भी सदÎय का िवरोध होना चािहए। यह हो सकता है और हुआ भी है िक 
िविभन्न
 दलȗ ने इसमȂ अपना कर् ेिडट लेने का Ģयास िकया है। मȅ अपनी बात को, चूंिक मेरे पास 
सीिमत समय है, बहुत संक्षेप मȂ कहने का Ģयास करूं गी।  जब सǄा थी, तब अंितम छोर पर बैठी 
भारत की उस संघषर्शील नारी क े िलए द
ूरगामी नीितयां बनाकर Ģयास नहीं िकए गए और न ही 
भारत की इस आधी आबादी को संरक्षण देना चाहा। और तो और मेरे देश की गौरवशाली 
मिहलाओं क े इितहास की भी चचार् नहीं हुई। म
ȅ अपने लोकिĢय, यशÎवी Ģधान मंतर्ी आदरणीय 
मोदी जी को धन्यवाद देती हूं िजन्हȗने न िसफर् मिहलाओं क े िलए सोचा, बिÊक अपनी सरकार की 
दूरगामी नीितयȗ क े ǎारा उस मिहला क े जीवन मȂ आमूल-चूल पिरवतर्न भी िकया। मुझे याद है िक 
गुजरात क े मुख्य मंतर्ी रहते हुए, आदरणीय Ģधान मंतर्ी नरेन्दर् मोदी जी ने िकस तरह से घर-घर 
जाकर छोटी बिच्चयȗ क े Îकू ल मȂ दािखले का अिभयान चलाया।  इस तरह की हर छोटी शुरुआत  
से लेकर नारी क े जीवन को बदलते हुए आज वे इस िवधेयक तक आ पहुं
चे हȅ। मȅ उनका हािर्दक 
अिभनंदन करती हूं, उन्हȂ धन्यवाद देना चाहती हूं। हालांिक आज भी िवपक्ष ने ĥिमत करना चाहा, 
वे न्यायोिचत राÎते का िवरोध करते रहे, पर मȅ अपनी बात को संक्षेप म
Ȃ ही कहूंगी।  मȅने क ु छ 
पंिƪयां िलखी हȅ, उनमȂ अपनी बात को Ëयƪ करते हुए आपका समथर्न चाहती हूं:-   
 
"हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो, 
घर-घर शौचालय बनवाकर, 
मिहलाओं को अिभशािपत जीवन से 
मुिƪ िदलाने का माध्यम कौन बना - मोदी जी। 
 
हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो, 
बेटी बचाओ और बेटी पढ़ाओ क े ǎारा 
बेटी का जीवन संविर्धत, संरिक्षत करने का माध्यम कौन बना! 
 
हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो, 
उज्ज्वला योजना लाकर धुएं से घुटते जीवन से बचाने 
का माध्यम कौन बना! 
 
हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो, 
तीन तलाक क े िखलाफ कानून बनाकर 
बराबरी का Îतर िदलाने का माध्यम कौन बना! 
 
हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो, 
Ģधान मंतर्ी आवास योजना से घर की आिधकािरक Îवािमनी 
बनाने का माध्यम कौन बना! 
 
154
[RAJYA SABHA]

हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो, 
िकशोिरयȗ, गभर्वती मिहलाओं क े िलए िवशेष योजना चला 
ÎवाÎथ्य को सुिनिǙत करने का माध्यम कौन बना! 
 
हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो, 
कोसȗ पैदल चलकर भी Ãयासे जीवन से बचने का 
हर नल मȂ जल, जल जीवन िमशन ǎारा 
मजबूर होने से बचाने का माध्यम कौन बना! 
 
हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो, 
तुÇहारे गांव क े घर-घर मȂ िबजली व राशन पहुंचाकर 
जीवन को सुगम बनाने का माध्यम कौन बना! 
 
हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो, 
संघषर् भरे अनुसूिचत जनजाित जीव
न को 
महामिहम तक लाने का माध्यम कौन बना!...(समय की घंटी)... 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: मैडम, Ãलीज़ कन्क्लूड करȂ।  आपका समय खत्म हो गया है।   
 
डा. कÊपना सैनी: सर, एक िमनट का समय और दीिजए। 
 
हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो 
मȅ गांव गली की ओबीसी मिहला 
आज उƳ सदन की सबला बन बैठी हूं 
इस का माध्यम कौन बना!...(समय की घंटी)... 
 
Ǜी उपसभाप
ित:  मैडम, Ãलीज़ खत्म करȂ। मȅ दूसरे Îपीकर को बुलाऊं गा।   
 
डा. कÊपना सैनी:  हे संघषर्शील भारत की नारी मुझे बताओ तो 
आज मिहला आरक्षण िबल से राजनीितक अिधकार स
 ुरिक्षत हȗगे, 
इसका माध्यम कौन बना! 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: Ãलीज़, कन्क्लूड कीिजए। 
 
 डा. कÊपना सैनी: महोदय, मȅ इसके  साथ आपको धन्यवाद देते हुए, अपनी वाणी को िवराम देती 
हूं और इस िबल का समथर्न करती हूं।  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
155

MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Now, Shri Jose K. Mani. You have three minutes for your 
speech. 
 
SHRI JOSE K. MANI (Kerala) : Sir, about twelve years a go, during the year 2011, I 
had an opportunity to participate in th e Inter-Parliamentary Union meeting in 
Switzerland along with our Lok Sabha Spea ker. There, I was asked to speak on a 
Plenary Session and the topic was 'Women Empowerment'. I was given five minutes' 
time and I spoke about the greatness of India. I spoke about the then first citizen of 
India, the President, a woman, Shrimati Pr athibha Patil. I spoke about the then Lok 
Sabha Speaker, Ms. Meira Kumar. I spoke ab out the then Chief Minister of Delhi, 
Shrimati Sheila Dikshit. I spoke about Jaya lalitha, the then CM of Tamil Nadu and I 
spoke about Ms. Mayawati. I came to my small beautiful State of Kerala, which I said, 
'the God's own country, and the most literate State in India. We have a reservation for 
the local bodies of 50 per cent and we have the best governance in the local body in 
India.' Then, I came to the subject that we have introduced in the Rajya Sabha about 
the 33 per cent reservation. At that time, my five minutes' time had been elapsed, that 
was exhausted and my microphone was swit ched off and I came back to my chair 
and the next speaker was called on. But, the Chairman was a lady. She came to me, 
to my chair and asked as to what did you sa y last. 'Did you pass it in the Rajya Sabha 
and Lok Sabha?' I said, 'No, it is being introduced.' Then, she told me 'that you 
should pass it at the earliest and you should take the initiative.' I was just thinking why 
in another country, a lady wa s asking me to pass the legi slation. It was not of her 
concern. But, I later came to know that  being in the largest and the biggest 
democratic country in the world, when we pass a legislation like reservation for 
women, then, there will be a compulsion fo r the other democratic countries to pass 
the same Bill. Having said that, the whole world is watching, today in Rajya Sabha 
and yesterday in Lok Sabha, not only the Bill passing but whethe r they are going to 
implement it, how candid and how sincere the Government's approach in 
implementing it is. If the Indian citizens ar e watching this, my only request is that you 
need to implement it immediately during the 2024 election itself. What is the hassle? 
You said that you need to go for the census and for the delimitation. You have the list 
of all the electorates, the female and male voters of 2019 Lok Sabha elections. (Time-
bell rings.)  Two minutes, Sir. 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: No. 
 
SHRI JOSE K. MANI: Always when I speak, you are very strict.  
156
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: You have 30 seconds more to speak.  
 
SHRI JOSE K. MANI: I think, the men shou ld speak more for the ladies than the 
ladies. I will take last a few seconds.   
Sir, they have called for this Special Session. If it is a Special Session, then, 
you need to implement it in 2024. Otherwise,  you should have brought it in a normal 
Session, that is, in the Winter Session. Why did you call for it now? It is all..  (Time-
bell rings.)    
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Thank you. I am calling the other speaker now.   
 
SHRI JOSE K. MANI: I am just asking about the sincerity of it.  
  
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Nothing is going on record. Now, Shri Vivek Thakur.  
 
Ǜी िववेक ठाकु र (िबहार): उपसभापित महोदय, आपने मुझे इस महत्वपूणर् संिवधान संशोधन 
िवधेयक, नारी शिƪ वंदन अिधिनयम पर अपने िवचार रखने का अवसर Ģदान िकया, इसके  िलए 
आपका बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। "If  not us, then who?  If not now, then when?" ये शÅद मेरे 
नहीं हȅ, यह कथन अमेिरका क े राÍटर्पित
 रहे जॉन एफ. क े नेडी का है। यह उन्हȗने तब कहा था, 
जब अमेिरका मȂ िसिवल राइट्स मूवमȂट चल रहा था। आज हमारे समक्ष भी यही ĢÌन है, "If not 
us, then who? If not now,
 then when?" भारत की मिहलाओं को उनका हक िदलाने क े िलए 
आज़ादी क े इस अमृत काल मȂ आदरणीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने जो िकया है, उसकी िजतनी Ģशंसा 
की जाए, वह कम है।   
 आदरणीय उपसभापित महोदय, 26 वषर् हो गए हȅ, जब इस संकÊपना ने संशोधन का 
आकार िलया था, जब भारत अपनी आज़ादी क े 50 वषर् पूणर् कर चुका था।  आज आदरणीय Ģधान 
मंतर्ी जी की संकÊपबǉता का ही पिरणाम है िक यह संशोधन पास होकर मूतर् रूप  ले रहा है।   
आदरणीय उपसभापित महोदय, क्या क ेवल ऐसा बोलने से िक यह िबल हमारा है, आपकी 
िजÇमेदारी पूणर् हो जाती है? तेरा-मेरा करने से क्या भला होगा? मȅ उनके  िलए एक
 शेर पढ़ना 
चाहूंगा:- 
न मेरा एक होगा, न तेरा लाख होगा, 
तारीफ तेरी, न म
ेरा मजाक होगा, 
ग़ुरूर  न कर शाह-ए-शरीर का, 
यह शरीर भी एक िदन खाक होगा। 
 
                                                            
 Not Recorded  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
157

 आदरणीया सोिनया जी ने कल लोक सभा मȂ हुई बहस मȂ एक और बात कही, िजससे मȅ 
असहमित Ëयƪ करता हूं। कल लोक सभा मȂ उन्हȗने मिहलाओं क े संदभर् मȂ यह कहा िक धुएँ से 
भरी रसोई से लेकर Îटेिडयम की जगमगाती रोशनी तक Îतर्ी का सफर बहुत लंबा है। यह आपकी 
सरकारȗ मȂ हुआ करता था, जब िÎतर्यȗ की रसोई से ध
ुआँ उठता था, आज उनकी रसोई उज्ज्वला 
से उज्ज्वल है। यह हमारे िलए गवर् की बात है िक जहां अमेिरका जैसे राÍटर् को मिहलाओं को 
वोिंटग राइट देने मȂ 120 वषर् लग गए, वहां भारत की संिवधान सभा ने मिहलाओं को शुरुआत  से 
समान मत
ािधकार िदया। क्या इसके  बाद हमारी िजÇमेवारी पूरी हो जाती है? क्या हम आÌवÎत हो 
चुक े हȅ िक हमने मिहलाओं को उनके  अिधकार दे िदए हȅ - नहीं िदए ह
ै।  िसतारȗ से आगे जहाँ और 
भी हȅ।  
 उपसभापित महोदय, इस िबल का भी एक जीवन है। इसकी आयु 26 साल है और इस 
जीवन मȂ इस िबल का काफी उतार-चढ़ाव,  possible to impossible जै सा जीवन रहा है। 
...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
DR. V. SIVADASAN: Sir, the camera... ...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Please. ...(Interruptions)... Please take your seat. 
...(Interruptions)...  आप बोिलए। 
 
Ǜी िववेक ठाकु र: इस जीवन मȂ इस िबल का काफी उतार-चढ़ाव, 
* possible to impossible 
जैसा जीवन रहा है। ...(Ëयवधान)... िंकतु आज 26 साल  क े बाद इसके  फलीभूत होने का 
ऐितहािसक िदन आ गया है, लेिकन इसके  अनुभव और त्याग की चचार् न हो, तो चचार् अधूरी रह 
जाएगी।  
आदरणीय उपसभापित महोदय, यह संशोधन लाना क्यȗ जरूरी  था, मȅ इसकी चचार् करना 
चाहूंगा - मिहलाओं क े िलए अकसर ग्लास सीिंलग की चचार् होती ह
ै, ग्लास सीिंलग अथार्त वे 
बाधाएं जो िदखाई नहीं देती हȅ, राजनीित क े संदभर् मȂ इस ग्लास सीिंलग की मोटाई, लÇबाई, 
चौड़ाई क ु छ ज्यादा होती है - और उसकी बानगी मȂ पूवर् क े  Ģमुख नेताओं ǎारा िदए गए बयान 
सदन क े समक्ष रखना चाहूंगा। एक िहन्दी भाषी राज्य की पाटीर् क े संÎथापक ने मिहला आरक्षण का 
जब िवरोध िकया, तो कहा िक िसफर् अमीर और शहरी मिहलाओं को फायदा होगा, गांव की गरीब 
मिहलाओं को नहीं, क्यȗिक वे आकषर्क नहीं होतीं और जब मिहला आरक्षण िबल पास हुआ, तो 
पािर्लयामȂट म
Ȃ भी सीटी बजाने वाले लोग आएंगे - यह दुखद वाकया इसके  साथ  हो चुका है।  
जद(यू) क े पूवर् राÍटर्ीय अध्यक्ष ने मिहला आरक्षण का िवरोध करते हुए परकटी मिहला जैसे शÅदȗ 
का इÎ
तेमाल िकया था और लालू जी ने तो अपने सांसद से िबल की कापी को ही फड़वा िदया था।  
अब आप सोच सकते हȅ िक ग्लास सीिंलग क े क ै से उदाहरण हȅ! ये सब वाकये हो चुक े हȅ।  
                                                            
 Expunged as ordered by the Chair. 
 
158
[RAJYA SABHA]

 मȅ राजनीित मȂ ग्लास सीिंलग का एक और उदाहरण आपके  समक्ष रखना चाहूंगा। 
तिमलनाडु िवधान सभा मȂ अÇमा जी क े साथ क्या हुआ, यह हम सब जानते हȅ। अगर सदन मȂ 33 
Ģितशत मिहला िवधायक होतीं, तो तिमलनाडु क े सदन का यह दुखद वाकया भी नहीं होता।  
आदरणीय उपसभापित जी, यही ग्लास सीिंलग है, िजसको दूर करने का Ģयास यह िबल 
करता है।  ऐसा ही एक उदाहरण म
ुझे याद आता है, जो सीधे तौर पर इस िबल से जुड़ा हुआ है। 
जब Îवगीर्य गीता मुखजीर् ने इस िबल को ĢÎतुत िकया था - लेÄट क े हमारे साथी मौजूद हȅ, व े 
जानते हȅ िक उनको िकतना िवरोध झेलना पड़ा था, परंतु दलगत राजनीित से ऊपर उठकर 
मिहला सांसदȗ ने  उनका साथ िदया। ...(Ëयवधान)... उसमȂ सबसे Ģमुख नाम Îवगीर्य सुषमा 
Îवराज जी का था। ...(Ëयवधान)...उन्हȗने ऑन िरकॉडर् कहा िक यह बात ...(Ëयवधान)...अगर 
आप िबल को ल
ेकर संघषर् करȂगे, तो मȅ आपके  साथ हूं। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
DR. JOHN BRITTAS (KERALA): Sir,...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Please. ...(Interruptions)... Please, take your seat. 
...(Interruptions)... Mr. John Brittas, please take your seat. ...(Interruptions)... Mr. 
John Brittas, please. ...(Interruptions)...  आप बोिलए। ...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी िववेक ठाकु र: यह तब होता है जब सदन मȂ मिहलाओं का Ģितिनिधत्व बढ़ता है, तब उनकी 
सामूिहक क्षमता भी बढ़ती है। ...(Ëयवधान)... कल लोक सभा की चचार् मȂ भी और आज सदन मȂ भी 
चचार् क े दौरान यह बात िवपक्ष क े सािथयȗ ने रखी िक आप िबल को कब लाग
 ू करȂगे, तारीख 
बताइए, तारीख कब बताओगे? इसी से मुझे राम मंिदर आंदोलन का दौर याद आता है। महोदय, 
जब हमसे यह सवाल पूछा जाता था, हम पर तंज कसते हुए कहते थे, “राम लला हम आएंगे, 
मंिदर वहीं बनाएंगे, लेिकन तारीख नहीं बताएंगे।” आज िÎथित यह ह
ै िक वहां पर भËय राम मंिदर 
का िनमार्ण हो रहा है। मȅ अपने िमतर्ȗ को यही बताना चाहूंगा िक तारीख बताई नहीं जाती, तारीख 
बनाई जाती है। ...(
समय की घंटी)... 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: िववेक जी, आप खत्म किरए।  
 
Ǜी िववेक ठाकु र: सर, मुझे दस िमनट का समय बताया गया था।  
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: No, please conclude. ...(Interruptions)... आपका समय  
over हो गया, अब मȅ दूसरे  Îपीकर को बुलाऊं गा।  
 
Ǜी िववेक ठाकु र: सर, लोग  2010 मȂ राज्य सभा मȂ मिहला आरक्षण का कानून तो पािरत कर देते 
हȅ, परंतु लोक सभा मȂ एलायंस का बहुमत होने क े बावजूद भी व
े लोग उसे अटका देते हȅ।  
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: अब मȅ दूसरे Îपीकर को बुला रहा हूं। िववेक जी, Ãलीज़ कन्क्लूड कीिजए।   
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
159

Ǜी िववेक ठाकु र: सर, मȅ दो िमनट मȂ कन्क्लूड कर रहा हूं।  
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: No, please. Only thirty seconds.  
Ǜी िववेक ठाकु र: सर, इस मिहला सशिƪकरण की योजना क े 9 साल मȂ बेिमसाल aspiration 
बढ़ा, confidence बढ़ा और मिहलाओं की राÍटर् िनमार्ण मȂ अहम भूिमका सामने आई है। इसके  कई 
उदाहरण हȅ, िजनकी चचार् भी इस सदन मȂ हो चुकी है और यह Ģधान मंतर्ी जी की women 
development क े बजाय women-led development क े ÎपÍट vision का  सूचक है। ...( समय 
की घंटी)... मेरा
 यही कहना है िक तारीख मांगने वालȗ को संिवधान पढ़ना चािहए।
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Now, Dr. Anbuma ni Ramadoss. Please speak. Only your 
speech will go on record. Nothing else is going on record.  
DR. ANBUMANI RAMADOSS (Tamil Nadu): Thank you Deputy Chairman Sir. On 
behalf of my party, Pattali Makkal Katchi (PMK), I rise to support this Bill. In India, till 
about 100 years ago, women we re not allowed to go out of  the houses. Till about 75 
years
 ago, women were not allowed to vote. Till about 50 years ago, women were not 
allowed to go to colleges. Till about 25 year s ago, women were not allowed to go to 
work. Today, it is all changed. Women are being empowered, but at a very, very slow 
pace and in very few numbers. Down 25 years,  I would like to see a situation in India 
where women are so empowered that men will try to bring in a similar Bill in 
Parliament for themselves in this august House.  
Sir, after the 73 rd and the 74 th Constitution Amendments brought in 1992 and 
1993, we had the first local body elections in 1996. During the elections, many of the 
party cadres had made their wives, their daughters and their mothers as Panchayat 
Presidents or Samiti Presidents or Zila Parishads thinking that they could control them 
through proxy. But then I saw after two ye ars, the women acted independently. By 
the end of their tenure, they did wonderfully  well in the positions they held and some 
of them got re-elected again and went on to become MLAs, MPs and ministers. So if 
we give women an opportunity, they, definite ly, will excel in whatever they are doing. 
Sir, I have two requests to the Govern ment. One, to kindly bring in the OBC 
representation in this Bill. Either today or, at least, during the Winter Session, bring in 
an amendment so that OBC women are equa lly represented because they comprise 
60 per cent of Indian population and with out the empowerment of OBC women, India 
cannot develop. Second, we have three pilla rs of democracy, the Legislature, the 
Executive and the Judiciary. We have fulfilled the demand of the Legislature because 
we have reservation for women in the local bo dies and, today, we are bringing in for 
160
[RAJYA SABHA]

MLAs and MPs. I kindly request the Governme nt to bring in rese rvation for women in 
the Executive as well as the Judiciary also. After 75 years post Independence, we still 
have not had a woman Chief Justice of India and there are very few women judges in 
the High Court and the Supreme Court. We need more women officers in IAS, IPS, 
IFS and defence sector. So the Governme nt should bring in a Constitution 
Amendment so that women are empowered in the Executive as well as the Judiciary.   
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Please conclude. 
 
DR. ANBUMANI RAMADOSS: Sir, I would like to end by saying that if boys get 
education, he is only educated, but if girls get education, the entire family gets 
educated. I would urge upon the Governme nt to empower women, respect them and 
give them empowerment in all sections of society and that is when India will become a 
developed country. Thank you very much. With these words, I support the 
Constitution (One Hundred and Twenty-Eighth Amendment) Bill, 2023.  
        
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Thanks for confining yourself within time. Now, Shri Biplab 
Kumar Deb, तीन minute....(Interruptions)...  
 
DR. V. SIVADASAN: 
 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN: Nothing is going on record.  ...(Interruptions)... Please.  
Shri Biplab Kumar Deb,  three minutes. ...(Interruptions)... आप बोिलए, क ेवल आप की 
बात िरकाडर् मȂ जा रही है, और कोई बात िरकाडर् मȂ नहीं जा रही है।  ...(Ëयवधान).... 
      
Ǜी िबơब क ुमार देब (ितर्पुरा): माननीय उपसभापित महोदय, मȅ 'नारी शिƪ वंदन िवधेयक', 
"कॉिन्ÎटǷूशन (128 वाँ अमȂडमȂट) िबल, 2023" क े समथर्न मȂ खड़ा हुआ हूँ। ...(Ëयवध ान)... 
माननीय उपसभापित महोदय, आज जब मȅ घर से आ रहा था, तो मुझे मेरे दो-चार िमतर् िमले, 
Îवाभािवक है पुरुष  िमतर्। वे मुझसे बोल रहे थे िक सुना है िक आज आप बोलने वाले हȅ, तो बाद मȂ 
आप लोगȗ का क्या होगा? मȅ तब से सोच रहा हूँ िक मȅ अपने िमतर् को जाकर क्या बताऊँ ? म
ȅ तो 
यह सोच रहा हूँ िक अगर मेरी माँ ऐसा सोच लेती, तो िबÃलब देब यहाँ कहाँ पहुँचता! इसिलए मȅ 
माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी को बहुत-बहुत बधाई देता हूँ। मȅने इस सभागार मȂ सुबह से देखा है िक 
अपने-अपने दल क े नेता का नाम सब लोग लेते हȅ, हममȂ से िकसी ने िवरोध नहीं िकया, लेिकन 
 
  
                                                            
 Not recorded.  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
161

जैसे ही हम मोदी जी का नाम लेते हȅ, उनको जैसे साँप सूँघ जाता है। वे देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी हȅ!  
...(Ëयवधान)... वे देश क े Ģधान मंतर्ी हȅ! ...(Ëयवधान)...  
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: आप चेयर को एडर्ेस किरए, Ãलीज़। 
 
Ǜी िबơब क ुमार देब: सुबह से शाम तक, मȅ मना नहीं कर रहा हूँ, आप अपने Ģदेश क
े  नेताओं का 
नाम लीिजए,  
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: आप इधर देख कर बोिलए। 
 
Ǜी िबơब क ुमार देब: िकन्तु Ģधान मंतर्ी का नाम आते ही जैसे आसमान ट ू ट पड़ता है।  मȅ आज 
आपको बताता हूँ, आप सुनने की क्षमता रिखए। जब हम छोटे थे, तब से हमने सुना िक देश मȂ 
सामािजक और आिर्थक सुधार हो रहा है। असिलयत मȂ देश मȂ आिर्थक और ...(Ëयवधान)... 
आिर्थक और सामािजक सुधार अगर िकसी ने िक
या है, तो माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी, नरेन्दर् भाई मोदी 
ने िकया है। आप सुन लीिजए। सामािजक सुधार की बात बहुत से लोगȗ ने बोली है। सामािजक 
सुधार की बात नरेन्दर् भाई मोदी बोलते हȅ और करते हȅ। तीन तलाक उन्हȗने ही खत्म िकया।  
आिर्टकल 370, -- गृह मंतर्ी, अिम
त शाह जी बैठे हȅ -- माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी क े नेतृत्व मȂ ही यह 
सुधार हुआ है। राम मंिदर बन रहा है, यह सामािजक सुधार ह
ुआ है। आज मिहला आरक्षण िबल 
आया है, तो एक सामािजक सुधार हो रहा है। ...(समय की घंटी)... जब तक मातृ शिƪ नहीं 
बनेगी, तब तक भारत माता की जय क ै से होगी!   
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: िबÃलब जी, 30 सेक
ं ड Ãलीज़, हमारे पास टाइम क ंÎटर्Ȃट है। 
 
Ǜी िबơब क ुमार देब: उपसभापित महोदय, मȅ िवरोधी पक्ष क े अपने कांगर्ेस क े िमतर्ȗ को बताना 
चाहता हूँ िक हमने क ु छ नहीं बोला, मȅ बताऊँ गा ... 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: Ãलीज़, आप इधर चेयर
 को एडर्ेस किरए। 
 
Ǜी िबơब क ुमार देब: सुिनए, किपल िसÅबल जी आए थे, उन्हȗने यहाँ आकर तीन िमनट मȂ अपना 
वƪËय रखा। उन्हȗने कहा िक इस मिहला आरक्षण िबल मȂ कमी है, हम इसको 2029 तक भी लागू 
नहीं कर सकते हȅ...(Ëयवधान)... और अगर हम इसको 2029 तक लागू नहीं करȂगे, तो
 होम 
िमिनÎटर और Ģाइम िमिनÎटर रेिजग्नेशन दȂगे िक नहीं। इसका मतलब कांगर्ेस ने मान िलया िक 
2024 मȂ भारतीय जनता पाटीर् और एनडीए को ही रहना है।  ...(समय की घं टी)...  
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: धन्यवाद, िबÃलब जी। 
 
Ǜी िबơब क ुमार देब: यह हमने नहीं बोला, किपल िसÅबल जी बोल कर गए। ...(समय की घंटी)...  
162
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
Ǜी उपसभापित: िबÃलब जी, धन्यवाद।  अब मȅ दूसरे Îपीकर को बुला रहा हूँ। 
 
Ǜी िबơब क ुमार देब: इसिलए आप लोगȗ ने मान िलया िक मिहला आरक्षण हो या कोई भी बात हो, 
वह हम लोगȗ को ही करना है।   
 मȅ माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी जी को धन्यवाद देता हूँ और साथ ही साथ भारत की सभी 
मिहलाओं को, इस सभागार मȂ िजतनी भी मिहलाए
ँ हȅ, उन सबको नमन करता हूँ।  अगर आप लोग 
राज्य सभा मȂ मेरी जगह भी लेना चाहते हȅ, तो ले लीिजए, लेिकन तब भी मिहलाओं को आने 
दीिजए,  धन्यवाद।  
 
Ǜी उपसभापित:
 ऑनरेबल Ǜी रवंगवरा नारजारी। आपके  पास तीन िमनट हȅ। 
 
Ǜी रवंगवरा नारजारी ( असम): माननीय उपसभापित महोदय, संिवधान (128 वाँ संशोधन) 
िवधेयक, 2023 पर बोलने क े िलए आपकी अनुमित क े िलए मȅ आपका आभारी हूँ। महोदय
 , मȅ इस 
िवधेयक का समथर्न करने क े िलए खड़ा हुआ हूँ, जो राÍटर्ीय राजधानी क्षेतर्, िदÊली की राज्य 
िवधान सभा सिहत लोक सभा और राज्यȗ की िवधान सभाओं मȂ मिहलाओं क े िलए क ु ल सीटȗ मȂ से 
एक-ितहाई कोटा Ģदान करने का Ģावधान करता है। िवधेयक का इरादा ÎपÍट रूप  स
े मिहला 
सशिƪकरण क े माध्यम से नारी शिƪ को आगे लाकर ' सबका साथ, सबका िवकास, सबका 
िवÌवास, सबका Ģयास' की भावना से 2047 तक िवकिसत भारत हािसल करना है। हालाँिक 
मिहला आरक्षण का िवधेयक संसद म
Ȃ कई दशकȗ से लंिबत है और इसके  लंिबत होने का कारण 
क ेवल अपेिक्षत संख्या ĢाÃत न कर पाना था।  मुझे खुशी है िक इसे पािरत करने क े िलए मोदी जी 
ǎारा आज संसद मȂ इसे नए िसरे से लाया गया है। इस िवधेयक को मंजूरी िमलते ही मिहलाओं क े 
िलए राज्यȗ और राÍटर्ीय Îतर पर नीित िनमार्ण म
ंच पर जन-Ģितिनिध क े रूप  मȂ भाग लेने का ǎार 
खुलेगा। मȅ इसमȂ एससी/एसटी समुदाय क े िलए भी आरक्षण क े Ģावधान पर हषर् महसूस करता हूँ। 
इससे दिलत समुदाय क े मिहला सशिƪकरण का ǎार खुलेगा। मȅ यूनाइटेड पीपुÊस पाटीर् िलबरल 
(यूपीपीएल) की ओर से इसका हािर्दक Îवागत करता हूँ और इस िवधेयक का तहे-िदल से 
समथर्न करता
 हूँ। मȅ माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी, Ǜी नरेन्दर् मोदी जी को उनके  इस साहिसक कदम क े 
िलए धन्यवाद देता हूँ, िजससे मिहला शिƪ मजबूत होगी। मुझे उÇमीद है िक यह िवधेयक 
सवर्सÇमित से पािरत हो जाएगा। जैसा मोदी जी कह रहे हȅ, यही सही समय है।  समय मोदी जी का 
इंतजार कर रहा था और मोदी जी ने िकसी का इ
ंतजार न करते हुए यह कर िदखाया। यिद हर 
राजनीितक दल सचमुच मिहलाओं का सशिƪकरण चाहता है, तो मिहला आरक्षण िवधेयक का 
मुǈा एक
 बार सवर्सÇमित से हल िकया जाना चािहए और पािरत िकया जाना चािहए। मȅ भारतीय 
मिहलाओं का अिभनंदन करना चाहता हूँ िक आज उनको माननीय Ģधान मंतर्ी, नरेन्दर् मोदी जी क े 
न
ेतृत्व मȂ नई संसद से एक नया अिधकार िमलने जा रहा है।  धन्यवाद। 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: धन्यवाद।  डा. क े. लÑमण। आपके  पास तीन िमनट हȅ।   
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
163

DR. K. LAXMAN (UTTAR PRADESH): Mr. Deputy Chairman, Sir, it is indeed a 
privilege for me and I feel honoured to stand in support of this Women's Reservation 
Bill. It is supposed to be a historical Bill which can be written in golden letters of Indian 
annuls. At the outset, I would like to thank our beloved Prime Minister, Shri Narendra 
Modiji for bringing out such an impo rtant Bill for women reservation. नव भारत क े 
िनमार्ण क े िलए नए संसद भवन क े अंदर एक महत्वपूणर् और ऐितहािसक पहला िबल लाया गया, 
इसके  िलए मोदी जी को धन्यवाद। मोदी जी क े नेतृत्व मȂ यह काम संभव हुआ। कई लोगȗ ǎारा तो 
कई साल से Ģयास िकया जा रहा था, पर यह िकसी से मुमिकन नहीं हुआ। यह मोदी जी स
े 
मुमिकन हुआ, इसिलए मोदी जी हȅ, तो मुमिकन है। जब मोदी जी 'सबका साथ, सबका िवकास' 
का नारा देते हȅ, तो वे समाज क े िविभन्न वगș क े  िहत क े िलए काम करते हȅ। मȅ कल से सुन रहा 
था, खास तौर से हमारे कांगर्ेस क े भाई और हमारे बाकी क्षेतर्ीय दल ओबीसी समाज क े बारे मȂ 
इतने हमददर् बन रहे हȅ िक मुझे समझ मȂ नहीं आता। जब यह मिहला आरक्षण का मुǈा आया, तो 
इसमȂ ओबीसी समाज को क्यȗ जोड़ा जा रहा है, यह मेरी समझ मȂ नहीं आता है, क्यȗिक कांगर्ेस तो 
हमेशा ओबीसी िवरोधी रही है। नेहरू  जी क े जम
ाने से लेकर आज राहुल गाँधी तक अगर हम 
इितहास क े पन्नȗ म
Ȃ देखȂगे, तो पता चलेगा िक नेहरू  जी ने काका कालेलकर कमीशन गिठत 
िकया। तब से लेकर मंडल कमीशन तक जब-जब, समय-समय पर ओबीसी समाज क े आरक्षण 
का मुǈा आया, तब-तब कांगर्ेस ने हमेशा इसके  िखलाफ काम िकया।  काका कालेलकर कमीशन 
क े ऊपर दोनȗ सदनȗ मȂ कम से कम चचार् तक नहीं करते हुए कांगर्ेस ने िकस तरह उसको ठंडे 
बÎते मȂ डाल िदया। आज कांगर्
ेस मगरमच्छ क े आँसू बहा रही है। They are trying to shed 
crocodile tears towards OBCs.  इतना  ही नहीं, मंडल कमीशन की िसफािरश क े समय जब 
सदन मȂ चचार् हो रही थी, तो एक िवरोधी दल क े नेता क े नाते कांगर्ेस क े नेता, राजीव गाँधी जी ने 
िकस तरह ओबीसी समाज क े आरक्षण का िवरोध िकया। मंडल कमीशन म
Ȃ तो कम से कम 
सरकारी नौकिरयȗ मȂ, सरकारी िशक्षा मȂ आरक्षण Ģदान करने का मुǈा था, उसी क े िलए वह नहीं 
मानी थी। ...(समय की घंटी)... आज राजनीित मȂ अगर कांगर्
ेस आरक्षण क े ऊपर संसद मȂ चचार् कर 
रही है, तो यह ठीक नहीं है।  इसिलए मȅ बोलता हूँ िक कांगर्ेस ने हमेशा ओबीसी समाज को  िदया। 
नरेन्दर् मोदी जी जब से Ģधान मंतर्ी बने, तब से लेकर आज तक उन्हȗने ओबीसी समाज क े िहत क े 
िलए इतनी योजनाएँ बनाईं और इतने काम िकए।  ...(समय की घंटी)... सर, मुझे दो िमनट दे 
दीिजए। 
 
MR. DEPUTY CHAIRMAN:  Please conclude. 
 
डा. क े. लÑमण: मȅ यही बताना चाह रहा हूँ िक मोदी जी दो बार Ģधान मंतर्ी बने। जब तीसरी बार 
भी उनके  Ģधान म
ंतर्ी बनने का माहौल बन गया, तो ये सह नहीं पा रहे हȅ।...(समय की घंटी)... 
                                                            
 Expunged as ordered by the Chair. 
 
164
[RAJYA SABHA]

हमेशा मोदी जी की जाित क े ऊपर िटÃपणी करना या चाय बेचने वाला बोल कर िटÃपणी करना 
बहुत गलत है।  
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: डा. लÑमण, अब मȅ दूसरे Îपीकर का नाम बुलाऊँ गा, Ãलीज़।  
 
डा. क े. लÑमण: चाय बेचना कोई गुनाह नहीं है, उन्हȗने देश को तो नहीं बेचा है। चाय बेच कर 
पहले उन्हȗने गरीब पिरवार को चलाया
, िफर इस देश को चलाया और आज पूरा िवÌव मोदी जी 
की ओर देख रहा है। 
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: आप कन्क्लूड कीिजए, मȅ दूसरे Îपीकर का नाम बुला रहा ह ूं। 
 
डा. क े. लÑमण: महोदय, मȅ िजस तेलंगाना से आता हूं, वहां क े हमारे बीआरएस क े नेता...(समय 
की घंटी)... ओबीसी और मिहलाओं का हमददर् बता रहे हȅ।  
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: आप कन्क्लूड कीिजए Ãलीज़। मȅ दूसरे Îपीकर का नाम बुला रहा हूं। 
 
डा. क े लÑमण: त
ेलंगाना राज्य बनने क े बाद उन्हȗने एक भी मिहला को मंितर्मंडल मȂ शािमल नहीं 
िकया, लेिकन वे आज मिहलाओं क े बारे मȂ बात कर रहे हȅ और आँसू बहा रहे हȅ।  
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: माननीय Ģफु Êल पटेल जी। 
 
डा. क
े  लÑमण: इसी तरह बीआरएस ने ओबीसी समाज का िकस तरह अपमान िकया, आज सदन 
मȂ ...(Ëयवधान)...         
 
Ǜी उपसभापित: माननीय Ģफु Êल पटेल जी। Nothing is going on record. The next speaker 
is Shri Praful Patel; not present. The next speaker is Shri Mahesh Jethmalani. 
 
(MR. CHAIRMAN in the Chair.) 
 
S H
R I  M A H E S H  J E T H M A L A N I  ( N o m i n a t e d ) :  S i r ,  h o w  m u c h  t i m e  d o  I  h a v e  i f  I  m a y  
ask?  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: How much time do you need? 
 
SHRI MAHESH JETHMALANI: Sir, fifteen to twenty minutes.  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Alright! You get five minutes; go ahead. 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
165

 
SHRI MAHESH JETHMALANI: Sir, I should have pitched my case higher.  
 Hon. Chairman, Sir, with your kind  permission, I rise to wholeheartedly 
support this most significant and path-b reaking Constitution Amendment; the 128 th 
Amendment Bill, 2023, also known as the Nari Shakti Vandan Adhiniyam, 2023.  
Sir, our first experience with women's re presentation in a legislature was in the 
Constituent Assembly. Fifteen women Memb ers represented us in the Constituent 
Assembly and out of fifteen, ten spoke and all ten of them did not pitch for 
reservation. They did not pitch for reservat ion and they said that we want women's 
representation based on merit. Hansa Mehta's speech summarises the expectation of 
women Members. "We have never asked for pr ivileges of reserved seats, quotas or 
separate electorates. What we have asked fo r is social justice, economic justice and 
political justice". All Members who spoke reposed great faith that men who have 
fought and struggled for the country's freedom would guarantee the rights and 
liberties of women.  
Now, Sir, what is the experience up till 2014, when NDA Government first 
came to power? A quick look because qu estions have been asked why not 2014; 
questions have been asked why you are unf olding your social welfare programme 
over here. But a quick look at the objects only  to remind them of their promises in the 
Constituent Assembly, the hopes of the wome n in that Constituent Assembly and the 
faith they reposed in the men of the future that rule this country. I read paragraph 2 
o n l y  t o  r e m i n d  t h e m  o f  w h a t  i n  t h e i r  long tenure including the ten years of UPA 
Government they did not do. The Governme nt has taken a number of steps to bring 
Nari Shakti to the forefront throug h women's empowerment and women-led 
development resulting in substantial improvement in financial independence of women 
and availability of equal access to educat ion and health. The Government has also 
emphasised the ease of living especially  for women through various initiatives 
including Ujjwala Yojana, access to toilets under Swachh Bharat Mission, financial 
inclusion through MUDRA Yojana, etc. However, the empowerment of women will 
require greater participation of women in the decision-making process as they bring 
different perspective and en rich the quality of legislative debates and decision-
making. Sir, had they done their job in their tenure? The first five years were spent in 
empowering women through financial inclusion, social justice and dignity. It did not 
strike them at all. The shame of open defecation did not strike them at all. It is us who 
did it in the first tenure.  
The next question that is raised is, can this be implemented before 2024. Sir, it 
cannot be implemented in 2024, as it is given, unless certain things have to be 
166
[RAJYA SABHA]

ignored. Every time, when there is introduction of reservation, and we are now talking 
about, women's reservation, three procedures  have to be followed - (a) The latest 
Census figures; (b) - the readjustment of  boundaries by a Delimitation Commission 
and (c) - identification and notification of constituencies for the purpose of 
reservation, in this case women's reservation, by the Election Commission. Now, it is 
possible that even if we could omit the fi rst two steps by using the Census of 1971, 
that is the Census that prevails today, as per the Constitution, that we go for territorial 
boundaries of constituencies as per the Census of 1971. In 1971 , there were 55 crore 
people; today, there are 1.4 billion people. So, you will have to go by a Census which 
is dated. You have twice th e number of seats, if you do a fresh Census today. 
Secondly, the procedure of identifying rese rved constituencies for women cannot be 
completed by February, March 2024, because  there is a procedure involved. And, 
consider if you want to avoid this proced ure, the Election Commission has to follow a 
particular procedure.  First of all, it pub lishes its proposal. This will be done even if 
you want to give up. If you want to go by  the present Census, not wait for the next 
Census. If you want delimitation to be  dispensed with by the Delimitation 
Commission, you still have to go through an Election Commission identification 
process of reservation seats. Now, that re quires a procedure. The procedure is, first 
publish proposals for constituencies to be reserved for women in the Gazette of India 
and the official Gazette of the State conc erned. Secondly, speci fy a date on which 
such proposals will be further considered. An d, third, consider all objections which 
may have been received by it.  ...(Interruptions)...  I am not yielding, then, why are 
you talking? 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Carry on. 
 
SHRI MAHESH JETHMALANI: Consider all ob jections which may have been received 
by it, that is, the Election Commission , before the dates specified for its 
consideration, hold one or more public si ttings at such place or places in each State 
as it thinks fit. This is a mandatory procedure and it accords to transparency, it 
accords to justice, it accords to the views of all stakeholders. The Commission also 
sits as a court when it identi fies constituencies for reserva tion. It sits as a court and 
can take evidence on oath for determination of reserved constituencies. This 
procedure is meant to guarantee fairness, transparency and natural justice to all 
stakeholders. No Member of either House would want to do away with this procedure 
before constituencies reserv ed for women are identified. ...(Time-Bell rings.)... The 
alternative is to leave it to the arbitra ry diktat of the Election Commission with the 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
167

inevitable discontentment and heartburn which it will cause to you people. The 
Members, who insist on implementation of  it for the 2024 Lok Sabha Elections, have 
with respect, not understood the inbuilt safe guards of the reservation procedure and 
a demand for haste will only be at your own peril.  
 
8.00 P.M. 
 
Is it possible before 2029 or at the earlie st after 2024? Yes. On the other hand, the 
scheduled 2021 census was postponed due to COVID. It is supposed to commence in 
the beginning of 2024. There is now digi talization of the census procedure. The 
census can be completed expeditiously and possibly within 2024 itself. Thereafter, the 
next two steps of delimitation by the Delimitation Commission pursuant to the census 
and identification of reserved constituenci es of women can be completed by 2025. 
...(Interruptions)... Yes, by 2026. By 2026, reservation for women in State elections 
can be a reality and, consequently, even  so for the 2029 Lok Sabha elections. I am 
afraid you people do not know the procedure that is required fo r the identification. 
...(Interruptions)... Please don’t mix up ...(Interruptions)... Please don’t mix up 
OBC...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Please conclude now. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRI MAHESH JETHMALANI: I will conclude in short, Sir. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Conclude on a pleasant note.  
 
SHRI MAHESH JETHMALANI: One of my young friends, Kartikeya Sharma, an hon. 
Member of this House, said that this is a Bill whose time is due. I say that this is a Bill 
whose time is overdue.  I, wholeheartedly, support this Bill.       
 
THE MINISTER OF FINANCE
; AND THE MINISTER OF CORPORATE AFFAIRS 
(SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN): Sir, first let me request you that I talk from this 
seat. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I appreciate. 
 
SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN: Thank you, Sir. Mr. Chairman, Sir, thank you for 
giving me an opportunity to talk on this ve ry historic Bill, as the hon. Member, Shri 
168
[RAJYA SABHA]

Mahesh Jethmalani, mentioned, whose time is long overdue. Time has come, is not 
the word, but it is long overdue. I actually ...(Interruptions).. Thank you very much, 
Pramod Tiwariji. ...(Interruptions).. Thank you.  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: But it speaks of a high level of attention, 360 degree. 
 
SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN: That is righ t, Sir. I am very grateful that you 
reminded. ...(Interruptions).. Sir, I speak in favour of, and this is an intervention that 
you permitted me, the Nari Shakti Va ndan Adhiniyam. This proposed 128
th 
Amendment has actually been ve ry thoughtfully crafted cons idering that we are at a 
very critical stage of our development process. We have seen the success and I 
certainly want to credit Shri P. V. Narasi maha Raoji's Government for having brought 
in the 33 per cent reservation in the Panchaya ti Raj at that time. As a result, we have 
seen the groundswell at the Panchayat level, where 33 per cent reservation today by 
many States has been increased to 50 per cent as well. About 20 States have already 
brought in 50 per cent reservation and showin g, therefore, the contribution of women 
at the Panchayat level. Although it started with 33 per cent, now it has gone up to 50, 
there are no regrets and actually people ar e happy that there is actual participatory 
process which is seen on the ground. In th is context, I remember one of the earliest 
steps, that as Chief Minister, the hon. Prime Minister in Gujarat had taken up, was to 
encourage this 50 per cent. Also unanimous el ections he would incentivise so that it 
was non-partisan and that it was on a common call taken by the Panchayats. So, 
innovative ways of wanting people's partic ipation has been always attempted to. So, 
this one is long overdue because it partly  also answers a lot of Members who have 
been saying from the morning, as to why it took nine long years for us to bring the Bill 
now. I would like to respond and equally as I am going down talking about this Bill, it 
is important that we build consensus and also show that we are committed for the 
economic, social empowerment of women as  well. We have heard several Members 
today speaking about how since 2014, ther e have been very sincere ground level 
attempts to provide house, provide drinki ng water, provide smoke free kitchen, 
provide dignity which was the word used by Mahesh Jethmalaniji just before me, 
about providing toilets and so on. So, these are also the fundamental bricks which 
build on empowering women. So, social empowerment, economic empowerment, I 
will go into a bit of detail a little later. So, what this proposed Bill provides for is 
reservation of seats for women in the Hous e of People, in Lok Sabha. I have heard 
some Members saying that reservation sh ould also be brought in for the Upper 
House. With the indirect election process and the way in which preference is shown in 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
169

the voting, it is just not going to be possibl e to do any reservation. Let us keep that 
outside of this discussion, although it is well meant, I mean, that well meaning 
suggestions have come in, but that is not going to be workable if it is not a direct 
election. This Bill, actually, provides, theref ore, reservation of seats for women in the 
House of People, Lok Sabha and also in the Legislative Assemblies of every State and 
also in the National Capital Territory of Delhi. It proposes, Sir, and again people have 
picked up on this word, but I reiterate it, that as nearly as, maybe, one-third seats 
shall be reserved for women. So, these are th e first two salient feat ures of this Bill. 
What it would do is to brin g in a new Article 330A which is intended for reservation of 
seats for women in the Lok Sabha. Second, it  also brings in a new Article 332A which 
proposes reservation of seats for women in  the State Legislative Assemblies. Another 
article, which is an existing article, which is Article 239AA, is proposed to be amended 
for providing reservation for Legislative Assembly of National Capital Territory of Delhi. 
So, all these three are happening. It also th en intends that there shall be reservation 
for women belonging to Scheduled Castes, Sc heduled Tribes in respect of the seats 
reserved for Scheduled Castes and Scheduled Tribes. So, consequential 
amendments, over and above all this, will also be made to the relevant Acts for 
Puducherry and for J&K. Now we come to  the point on which again the previous 
speaker has gone into greater detail with his legal acumen to say how exactly this is 
going to be implemented, I will have a minut e on that. As far as implementation of the 
proposed reservation for women is concerne d, a new Article 334A shall be inserted 
into the Constitution. It intends that after the Bill is enacted and after the Bill comes 
into operation and thereafter whenever the first census takes place and the relevant 
figures for that census are published, a fresh delimitation exercise shall be undertaken 
for the purpose of delimitation of seats fo r providing reservation for women in Lok 
Sabha, in State Legislative Assemblies and also in the Legislative Assembly of Delhi.  
Now, this exercise of delimitation will be limited to identifying the number of 
seats and those seats which are to be reserved for women, and it shall not affect inter 
se distribution of seats of Lok Sabha and the State Legislative Assemblies. So, we 
just want to make this absolutely clear as to what this Constitutional Bill is proposing 
to do, and the provision that reservation of seats shall cease after a period of 15 years 
from the commencement of this proposed la w. So, this is where we are coming up 
with this Constitution Amendment. It also very clearly states that this reservation of 
seats shall not apply until the Lok Sabha or Legislative Assembly of a particular State 
or the Legislative Assembly of Delhi is dissolved. So, that is the main feature of this 
proposed Constitution Amendment. Is this the first time we are talking about this 
170
[RAJYA SABHA]

reservation of seats for women? Not at all.  There have been four genuinely serious 
attempts to get this Bill through.  
 The first ever attempt was in 1996 on 12 th September in the Eleventh Lok Sabha 
where Shri H.D. Devegowda was the Prime Minister. That Bill which was brought in 
was referred to a Joint Committee headed  by Shrimati Geeta Mukherjee, who 
immediately took up the work and within three months; on 9 th December, 1996 she 
gave her report and the Bill remained ther e for almost a year, but because of the 
dissolution of the Elev enth Lok Sabha on 4 th December, 1997 this Bill also lapsed. 
One particular feature I would like to highlight is that this Bill provided for rotation of 
seats. ...(Interruptions)... So it provides for rotation of seats. ...(Interruptions)...  
The second attempt was made on 14 th December, 1998 by Shri Atal Bihari 
Vajpayee Government in the Twelfth Lok Sabh a. In this, the Bill was almost identical 
to the one which was presented earlier but a 15 year period was brought in. This Bill 
also lapsed due to the dissolution of Twelfth Lok Sabha on 26th April, 1999.  
The third attempt was again made by Pr ime Minister Atal Bihari Vajpayee on 
23rd December, 1999; that was in the Thirte enth Lok Sabha and then the Bill had not 
been pursued at all because they could not develop any consensus. Again, this also 
lapsed on the dissolution of the Thirteenth Lok Sabha on 6.2.2004.  
The fourth attempt, which is the most recent attempt, happened on 6 th May, 
2008; in Rajya Sabha the Bill was intr oduced under Dr. Manmohan Singh’s 
Government, UPA-II. It was a very identical Bill to the one which was previously 
tabled, which could not be pursued in Lok Sabha. The Bill which was brought in Rajya 
Sabha was referred to the Department-rel ated Standing Committee on Personnel, 
Public Grievances, Law & Justice on 8
th May, 2008 for examination. It was taken up 
for consideration and got pa ssed in Rajya Sabha in Marc h, 2010 and then it was 
transmitted to Lok Sabha on 12th March, 2010. It was just tran smitted. But, till 2014, it 
could not be taken up for vari ous reasons. I am not going into the detail as to why it 
could not be cleared, but it did not get cleared. And it lapsed--it is important for us to 
know--on the dissolution of the Thirteenth Lok Sabha on 18th May, 2014. So, I may be 
pardoned if I am repeating something wh ich the hon. Members already know. There 
is no Bill which is pending that I have to br ing back here to say, ‘We will consider this 
one, it has been waiting since then!’ No Bi ll is waiting! With the dissolution of Lok 
Sabha, that Bill which was passed in Rajy a Sabha but which did not remain here, 
which naturally got transmitted to Lok Sabha, also lapsed. So, there is no Bill before 
us.  
  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
171

Sir, empowerment of women in India is not a new thing. I just would like to go 
back in history to identify a few names whic h stand out for a lot of proof that is so 
required to say that this civilization always held women high. Now, I am not going into 
saying, ‘Did we treat them as goddess? Gi ve us equality!’ I have heard a lot of 
Members say with a lot of concern. "We don’ t want to be treated like goddess, treat 
us equal." But it is a fact that we have  held women very highly and the women also 
had the courage to stand up and speak for themselves. So, it is not a new thing for 
us.  
I will just give you the example of Satyakama’s mother. An Upanishad has 
been given in his name! He was a bright st ar. But when he went in search of his 
Guru, the Guru asked him, ‘Okay, you want to become my student, but who is your 
father? Would you please tell me?’ He didn ’t know the name of his father. He goes 
back to his mother, Jabala, to ask her, ‘Mama, please tell me who my father is. I have 
to go, tell my Guru. Otherwise, he will not admit me!’ The mother had the courage to 
tell him, ‘I don’t know who your father is, go tell this to your Guru !’ The boy, in all his 
earnestness, goes back to the Guru and says , ‘Sorry, this is the reply given by my 
mother!’ The Guru understands the situation and readily admits him for his sincerity. 
That is the civilization we are talking about.  
It is not a civilization which treated wo men of one particular  group or another 
particular group differently. We have treated all women with fairness. There can be 
differences during the age as we are coming  down to today. But that is Satyakama 
and Jabala. Jabala, the mother, who could tell her boy to say with pride that you 
know your mother’s name but the mother doesn’t know the father, and the Guru had 
no objection!  
Sir, similarly, when Adi Shankara ha d an argument with Mandana Mishra. 
When there was a debate going on, who was the judge there? A woman, Ubhaya 
Bharati, Mandana Mishra’s wife. Could sh e have been admitted or accepted as a 
judge between the two people debating if  only there was some hesitation about 
dealing with women differently ? They readily accepted her. She had the scholarship; 
that is one thing. But to accept a woman to judge between the two of them as to who 
is going to be the victor also reflects that men in India, learned or otherwise, didn’t 
have a different idea of woman. Ubhaya Bharati’s example tells us that.  
There are of course 22 women who contri buted very richly to our Vedas and 
Upanishads. I am not taking their names--G argi and Lopamudra stand out. Similarly, 
I heard Members this morning also recall eminent fighters an d warriors from the 
South. I will also name Avvai, who gave  great, simple two-line aphorisms, which 
always enamours all of us. Karaikkal Amma iyar was a great Bhakti saint. She is 
172
[RAJYA SABHA]

treated as a Nayanar. So, in India, women have had a role in literature, a role in very 
many different situations. About wo men warriors, Rani Abbakka, Kittooru 
Chennamma, Velu Nachiar, Rani Gandilu, La kshmi Sehgal and, of course, Jhansi ki 
Rani, all of them are there. I just have a ra ndom list. So is their prowess in science. 
E.K. Janaki Ammal was one of the earliest scientists of India. Aseema Chatterjee, 
Anandiben Joshi, Anna Mani and Darshan Ranganathan were all women of eminence 
in science. So, we have had this culture of allowing women to do whatever their 
aspirations lead them to do and we have respected it.  
Of course, as they say in Hindi, िवकृ ितयाँ have come into the system. We will 
have to cleanse that, and efforts are being ma de. In this, I want to highlight that the 
party that I represent, the BJP, has been  consistent in its support for women's 
reservation. The BJP held its National Conven tion in 1994 in Vadodara and they very 
clearly stated that we stand for reservations  for women in the Parliament and also in 
the State Assemblies. If that was in 1994, in 1998, the BJP reiterated its commitment 
for women's reservation by introducing it in the Lok Sabha, which I just mentioned a 
while ago, under our Prime Mi nister, Shri Atal Bihari Va jpayee. In July 2003, the BJP 
held a National Executive meet at Raipur  in Chhattisgarh and there they passed a 
resolution seeking one-third of all Lok Sa bha constituencies to be converted for 
reserving for women. Progressi vely, that opinion has been refined now, that in 2007, 
in the National Executive meet, it a pproved 33 per cent reservation for all 
organizational positions within the pa rty and in 2008, the BJP amended its 
Constitution to provide 33 per cent reservat ion to women in its cadre posts as well 
and let me take this opportunity, Sir, in all humility, while thanking my Party, I am one 
of the beneficiaries of this reservation for women that I am here today and I thank my 
party for having given me that opportuni ty. So, the BJP has been consistently 
supportive of women's reservation. I remember, those days were early days for me as 
a Party spokesperson, but the now lapsed Bill which was passed in Rajya Sabha in 
2010, -- the late Shri Arun Jaitley supported it passionately in the Rajya Sabha and it 
was passed in the Rajya Sabha -- when it transmitted to Lok Sabha, it did not get 
through. So, the BJP has been absolute ly steady in its support for women's 
reservation and this morning I heard some  hon. Members referring to some very 
picturesque moments when late Shrimati Sushma Swaraj had waited outside the 
P a r l i a m e n t  H o u s e ,  r e c e i v e d  S h r i m a t i  B r i n d a  K a r a t ,  a n  h o n .  f o r m e r  M e m b e r  o f  t h e  
Rajya Sabha and they both hugged each other in joy that the Rajya Sabha passed the 
Bill and it is now the turn for Lok Sabha. So, across party lines, there was a sense of 
wanting to achieve this and today we remember late Shrimati Su shma Swaraj and of 
course, even today, the activists and also former Members of Parliament who have all 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
173

been pursuing this agenda.  To further th is point, in 2014, prior to the Lok Sabha 
election, BJP's manifesto, the संकÊप पतर् openly said that the BJP is in favour of 
bringing 33 per cent reservat ion in Parliament and also in the State Assemblies. So 
did 2019 संकÊप पतर्. So, just as Article 370 has always been in the BJP's manifesto, 
so is women's reservation, be it  in 2014 or now in 2019. Sir, संकÊप से िसिǉ principle, 
which hon. Prime Minister follows very earnestly, is also  proven by the fact that 
everything which is mentioned in the संकÊप पतर् is taken up to the level of achieving, 
that is, िसिǉ ĢाÃत करने तक, we follow it in earnestness. I also heard some Members 
this morning talk about 'you were paying attention to Article 370, you were paying 
attention to triple talaq, but you didn't do this women's reservation!' I would like to 
take this opportunity to say through you,  Sir, Article 370 has a very big women's 
component in it; inter alia, it didn't allow women to hold property in J&K. Is it not 
important for them to have that honour back ? They have, after all, been born there. 
Well, if they married somebody from anywhere else, how right is it under Article 370 to 
deny them ownership of property? Is th at not important? Therefore, when we 
restored normalcy and also removed Article 370, women, SCs, STs, Bakarwals, all of 
them get their rights. That is why Sankalp Se Siddhi  principle of the hon. Prime 
Minister makes complete sense and between  2014 and today these are the kind of 
achievements to empower women which have been happening.  Similarly, I heard our 
hon. National President, Shri Nadda speak about triple talaq  this morning. He said 
triple talaq  is not there in A country, B country,  C country, all of which are Muslim 
dominated countries, but in India it took us a whole process of going through the 
courts and again politically convincing our people and then bringing it in, but Prime 
Minister Modiji did not hesitate. He said if that is got to be done for giving rights to the 
Muslim women, we shall do it. So, triple talaq  also happened. Naddaji clearly 
explained this. We don't involve or indulge in appeasement politics, but it is important 
for us for restoring the rights of women be cause in women-related matter, Sir, and I 
can say with complete confidence, in wo men-related matters, we don't play any 
politics.  It is an article of faith for th e hon. Prime Minister and therefore, we do 
everything, -- that we have done, -- wh ether it is Article 370 or whether it is triple 
talaq or looking at now the Women's Reservation Bill. All of it is part of our manifesto 
anyway. I shall not spend too much of our 
time because yesterday all of us heard 
hon. Home Minister speak in the Lok Sabh a.  Between 2014 and 2019, he listed out 
the various measures which have been ta ken by Prime Minister, Modiji for social 
empowerment, for economic empowerment of women. I will just quickly flag off a few 
of them. Ujjwala,  for smoke free kitchen, 9.59 crores  of people have been given free 
connections and also Rs. 200 subsidy per cy linder. And newly, we are adding Rs. 75 
174
[RAJYA SABHA]

lakhs more connections. Swachhata Bharat  Abhiyan - providing a dignified life for 
women, providing toilets to them, 11.72 crore toilets have been built in this country. 
Beti Bachao Beti Padao  scheme has actually helped in restoring a fair balance 
between gender because gender asymmetry- prevailed all over the country. I have 
heard hon. Member, Dr. Thambidurai talk  about how there was a Cradle Scheme 
which was brought so that children as soon  as they are born, being girls, are not 
killed and that was a step sometime ago taken in Tamil Nadu. Many States have 
taken many such steps in order to restore that parity in the sex ratio. Sir, Prime 
Minister's Government is the one which gave  from 12 weeks of maternity leave to 26 
weeks of paid maternity leave for women. These are empo wering women. What were 
we doing between 2014 and 2019? These are the things which we were doing. So, we 
didn't forget for a moment empowerment of women. We have given water to the 
house for health reasons. Otherwise, they  were spending hours going miles to get 
drinking water. Sir, 9.82 crores of new connections under Har Ghar Nal Se Jal  have 
been provided.. So, I won't go further into that list of social empowerment and the 
economic empowerment, but I certainly w ill take a few more minutes, a bit of 
considerable time if you would permit me , Sir, on empowering women. There cannot 
be a more substantial measure than finding them in the Armed Forces. I will list out 
the kind of things Prime Minister Modi has taken to get wome n have that equal 
treatment. Many of our hon. Members are saying, 'Treat us equal. We don't want you 
to do pooja or treating us like Goddess.'   
No. Can there be a better place than th e three armed forces where we have 
brought women to be at par with men, and they stand out there clearly? I will give out 
the list, Sir. All wings of the Indian armed forces have women in combat roles now.  
Women are allowed in combat services and in  supervisory roles. I will start with the 
Central Paramilitary Forces. In 2016, Prime Minister Modi’s Government took a call, -- 
a historic move -- and he decided to re serve 33 per cent of the force, at the 
Constable level, for women in CRPF, CISF and, to begin with, 14-15 per cent force, 
at the Constable level, in the border guar ding forces, such as BSF, SSB and ITBP. 
This has been brought in a phased manner. That is equality. This is what treating men 
and women equally in uniform services. Similarl y, there is admission of girls in Sainik 
Schools. It is unimaginable, because ther e was so much resistance. They used to 
say, ‘No, no. You cannot do it.’ Sir, admission of girls in Sainik Schools, with effect 
from academic session 2021-22,  was allowed. Girl cadets have been admitted in all 
the existing 33 Sainik Schools. It was a cl ear decision taken by the Prime Minister 
Modi’s Government. Sir, the Indian Army has opened up entry for women candidates 
in the National Defence Academy. You know  how prestigious this Academy is. It is 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
175

one of the male domains which you could never breach. But, today, it has been 
opened for female cadets.  Nineteen cadet s, including 10 for the Indian Army, are 
joining this Academy once in every si x months. They are all women cadets. 
Permanent Commission is also being granted to women officers in the armed forces. 
You may think that it is only in the Arme d Forces Medical Core or the Armed Forces 
Dental Core or in the Armed Force Nurs ing Service.  No. Over and above that, 
women are now being given the Permanent Commission in the armed forces as 
women officers. Similarly, the Indian Army has opened up avenues for women officers 
to serve as pilots in the core of Army’s av iation. So, flying helicopters for the Army is 
done by women now. Women officers are also being considered for Colonel rank and 
are being given command appointment, so that they can lead commands. Also, there 
are other ranks getting into the core of M ilitary Police in the Indian Army which has 
been introduced since 2019 and so is the ca se with the Indian Navy. I don’t want to 
mention each one of those steps. But, today, whether it is Army or Navy or Air Force, 
women are being treated equally with men.  
 I now come to Agniveer Scheme. I was very happy to hear that hon. Member, 
Smt. Sumitra Balmik, mentioned about it . Women are getting recruited as women 
Agniveers. I was going to mention about it. But, I was glad to hear it from another 
Member of this House. From the first batch itself, we have women Agniveers.   
Now, without taking more time on talkin g about larger issues, I will respond to 
some of the Members who have raised some  issues and wish to explain the same. 
Sir, hon. Members, Shri Ram Nath Th akur, Shri K.C. Venugopal, Priyanka 
Chaturvediji, Phulo Devi Netamji all raised the issue, ‘You came to power in 2014. 
Why have you taken nine years to bring this Bill?’ I think, I have explained this that we 
have spent a lot of time and attentio n on delivering social empowerment and 
economic empowerment. In th e meanwhile, you have also seen how they have been 
empowered to get into the armed forces  and the Central Paramilitary Forces. 
Explanations and details with facts have been given by the hon. Home Minister 
yesterday in the Lok Sabha.  
Women have now become job-creators . Sir, 29 crore women have also 
benefited from MUDRA Scheme where 70 per cent of all beneficiaries are women. So, 
there are several schemes which have helped women to come  up to some level. That 
is what we have been doing since 2014.   
Then, there was a question raised by several Members saying, ‘Why a Special 
Session for this Bill?’ Sir, we have co me to a new complex, new building for 
Parliament for a 'new India'. We would like this Parliament to deal with one of the best 
Bills that it can deal with and all of us agreed on that . And, I am glad to say this. I 
176
[RAJYA SABHA]

thank, from the bottom of my heart, for consideration shown by all parties, 
irrespective of little reservations they have and questions they have in their mind, and 
extending support for this historic Bill. This new building handling this as the first Bill, I 
think, is a very good start and it is a building built for the next 100 years for the 
country. Sir, even if delimitation is going to come up with new Members, there is 
enough space to accommodate them. 
Sir, it was a bit disheartening to hear so me Members to say, ‘Oh! This Bill is a 
jumla.’ This is a very catchy word. A lot of pe ople love using this word. But, no.  
Whoever said it – I am not, particular ly, naming the Members – it is not a jumla. This 
Bill is not a jumla. I want you all please attend to the points that I am trying to make. 
 
AN HON. MEMBER: It was started by hon. Home Minister. 
 
SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN: The context in which hon. Home Minister said, I 
think, has been well understood. But, it is convenient for us to use jumla again! So, 
we forget the context in which hon. Home Minister said it.   
 
DR. AMEE YAJNIK: We are reminding you. 
 
SHRIMATI NIRAMLA SITHARAMAN: Thank yo u. That was misunderstood. Or, you 
are interpreting it differently. I don’t want to get into it. Now, I am talking about the 
Women’s Reservation Bill.  
 Sir, legal processes need to be adopted for enabling these provisions. This has 
been defined and described by a legal luminary. But, I will, certainly, repeat it for us to 
know. I am sure, many of our senior Me mbers here will appreciate that without 
amendments as regards to UTs and withou t delimitation happeni ng – delimitation 
process is a quasi judicial process – it is not possible. Sir, delimitation process is a 
quasi judicial process. It needs an appoin tment by law. It needs a retired Supreme 
Court Judge to head it. It needs Members from the Election Commission. It will also 
have representatives from every recognized party. So, it is not an exercise to push the 
decision further. But, once we pass this  and once the States also pass their 
respective law, and in the meanwhile Cens us taking place and figures notified, the 
ball sets rolling forward – a Delimitation Commission to come into play. Sir, I will go 
into the details why 2026 stands out for us . I will try to explain why 2026 and why 
cannot it be earlier? It is not something which we have done it. We are carrying a 
legacy where delimitation dates have been frozen, not once, but twice and for long 
periods of time. I will not go into that.  But, with these handicaps or with these 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
177

realities before us, it shall not be possible to implement it now in 2024. Our intention is 
clear. And, once the Census is over and de limitation sets rolling, you are going to 
have it the moment it is fini shed. So, whoever said it, no jumla, Madam. Truly it is 
going to set the course which was very clearly, from the legal side, explained.   
During the discussion this morning, a point has come, ‘Why did you have to 
bring it now? You are going for election. You are, probably, worried about election.’ 
No.  As I said earlier, it is an article of fait h, whether it is now or whether it is all four 
times when it was brought to this House. Every time BJP had supported the Bill. 
Even at that time when it was brough t into the Rajya Sabha by Dr. Manmohan 
Singh, the BJP stood out to support the Bill. So, why would there be any hesitation in 
our mind? Therefore, I just want  to be sure that the points  that have been raised by 
some of the Members are addressed.  
 Sir, before I get into talking about the Delimitation details, I want to pick up on 
Shri Binoy Viswam who seems to have forgo tten the Bill and said many other things 
like 'where are the women, why did you want  to form a separate organization aside 
from RSS, why do you need a Savika Samiti and so on.' I will say, they are hundred-
year old organizations. All of us know how they are involved in public service, 
particularly, when there is a disaster, a cyclone, a flood. These men and women are 
there first to do the cremation of unclaimed dead bodies, or, as per the law, whatever 
process is for the ultimate end rituals. They are completely dedicated for social 
service and keeping people together, and if that is worrying the hon. Member about 
why the women have not been taken in RSS ... ...(Interruptions)...  
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM:  Sir, ...  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Member, I have not given you the floor. ...(Interruptions)... 
Please sit down. ...(Interruptions)... Don't do it. ...(Interruptions)... Please. 
...(Interruptions)... Carry on. 
 
SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN : 'Why should there be a separate organization, 
why they cannot be part of RSS and so on', at least, there is an organization keeping 
all the women working together at par. If you don't mind me, Sir, and if you will allow 
me this little bit of indulgence and with the hon. Member not taking any offence, 
because he has spoken quite a lot, I will rather respond with just one fact.  Let me ask 
him: How long did it take for former Member, Brinda Karat, to get into the Communist 
Polit Bureau, to get into the Polit Bureau? How long did it take for Brinda Karat, 
nobody else? It was a public  debate to say, 'Communist  Party, you don't have one 
178
[RAJYA SABHA]

woman in the Polit Bureau, and it is not as  if you don't have women at all.' Poor 
Brinda Karat had to fight her way, and now you are talking about RSS and Savika 
Samiti! ...(Interruptions)... Please. ...(Interruptions)...  
 Sir, I heard the hon. Member, Shri Kabil Sibal, talked that the Finance 
Commission cannot allocate resource fairly ti ll the Census takes place and so on and 
that we are using an old Census. Now b ecause he referred to Finance Commission, I 
am also referring to that but the idea was th at the old Censuses are being used. I just 
want to tell you, Sir, it was Prime Minister Modi who, after forming the Government, 
said, '2011 Census data was first used for the 15
th Finance Commission whose period 
is now current, 2020-2025. Till before that , that is, prior to  that, since the 7 th Finance 
Commission till the 14th Finance Commission, which is before us, before 2014, that is, 
8th Finance Commission for the Finance Peri od, 1979-2020, have used the Census 
data of 1971. Sir, 1971 Census has been used till 2014 and the hon. Member, Shri 
Kabil Sibal, worries that we are using the 1971 Census. No, Sir. From the 15
th Finance 
Commission, which holds the currency,  which runs between 2022 and 2025, the 2011 
Census is already being used. So, I am sorry. I want to just correct that perception of 
the hon. Member.  All the earlier Finance Commissions have used 1971 Census 
figures. We have updated it.  
 Sir, I will just quickly go to talk on the readjustment of seats. It is not a problem 
th at w e h a ve cre ated .  I t i s  n o t  a  p ro b l em that we suddenly realized. I would like to 
trace back as to why readjustment of seat s has to go through a particular process, 
and it is not a new problem today. I am not saying, it is a problem, but it a situation 
which was created a long time ago. I will just tell you that. Article 82 provides for 
readjustment of seats after each Census. So, Sir, as per th is Article, the seats of Lok 
Sabha allotted to the States as well as division of each State into territorial 
constituencies will be readjust ed after each Census. It prov ides restriction that such 
readjustments shall not affect the representa tion in Lok Sabha until the dissolution of 
existing Lok Sabha, just the core facts before us. In 1976 -- and this is where I will 
draw the attention of th e hon. Members -- the 42
nd Amendment of the Constitution 
inserted two Provisos to  this Article. The 42 nd Amendment inserted two Provisos 
which are under Articles 82 and 173. Th e first Proviso provided as to when 
readjustment shall take effe ct and the second Proviso pr ovided that readjustment 
shall not be necessary until a new Census is  done and its figures are published after 
the year 2000. In 1976 till 2000, the Delimitation was kept frozen; thanks to the 42 nd 
Amendment. So, during the Emergency, the infamous thing which happened, the 
42nd Amendment became a basket case where you put everything, a dhobi's list, and 
passed it all. When the Emergency extended  period, the Lok Sabha, after completion 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
179

of five years, ran the sixth y ear, and did all this. So, the 42 nd Amendment froze it till 
2000.  Thereafter, this freeze, till th e year 2000, was amended in 2002, the 84 th 
Amendment, and the year '2000' was replaced by the year '2026.' So, the '2026' is 
not something coming out of our imagination.  The freeze in readjustment of seats has 
happened in 1976 up to 2000, an d, in 2002, it has happened as an extension till 2026.  
So, as first Census of 2026 will be undertake n in 2031, until that period, there will be 
no readjustment and the seats shall remain unchanged is the position. What we are 
trying to tell you here, therefore, is that after the Census now, which can start from 
early 2024, in all probability, it will go, and once the Census is completed, its 
announcements are over about the findings of the Census, the Report of the Census, 
then the Delimitation Commission can be set; and it will do its job not just for the Lok 
Sabha seats but also to the States. Then the reservation comes into implementation. 
So, Sir, I won't spend more time on that.   
There is one more response I want to give. Shri K.C. Venugopal had 
mentioned 'what happened in 1989!' I am not repeating or quoting his words. 
Broadly, he said, 'What happened in 1989 wh en Rajiv Gandhi introduced Reservation 
Bill for Women in local bodies?  The entire BJP gang -- if I am wrong with expression 
of words, you may correct me -- opposed it.  
Stalwarts like L.K. Advani, Atal Behari Vajpayee, Ram Jethmalani, etc., 
opposed it." Sir, I just want to go back to actually what happened then. In 1989, it 
didn't get passed. The opposition was there,  a lot of opposition happened. Then, of 
course, as I said even at th e very beginning, it moved to 1991-92, and in 1992, it got 
passed, under Shri P.V. Narasimha Rao. But what actually happened then? 'BJP 
gang!' No, I am sorry. There were others, and it is very intere sting to see. Sir, 
because the Centre-State relations at that  time -- I am purposely bringing this 
element here -- were such that it was felt that the Panc hayati Raj plan clearly aims at 
depriving the States of power to manage  their own local bodies. This was the 
narrative that went into the Opposition's minds.  Chief Ministers like Shri Karunanidhi, 
Shri Jyoti Basu, Shri Devi La l and Shri N.T. Rama Rao, a ll of them, made it clear to 
Shri Rajiv Gandhi that this was an issue wh ich required a national  consensus. So, it 
was not the 'BJP gang', Sir! All States were standing up to say, 'You are taking away 
our powers.'  And I am quoting here Shri N.T. Rama Rao, as reported in a 
newspaper. If you want, I can always leave this authenticated copy. 
...(Interruptions)... 'Let the Prime Minister seek a fresh mandate from the people on 
this issue and then amend the Constitution.' Shri N.T. Rama Rao said this about the 
Panchayati Raj Bill. ...(Interruptions)...  S i r ,  l e t  m e  a d d  t o  t h i s .   L e t  m e  q u o t e  
Ramakrishna Hegdeji and I am reading it exactly  as it is before me.  He said, "Rajiv 
180
[RAJYA SABHA]

now wants to run the villages from Delhi.  We won't allow encroachment on the rights 
of the States." That was Ramakrishna Hegd e, Sir. Then, Saroj Mukherjee from CPM 
-- it is not 'BJP gang'; I am telling you about CPM also -- said, "Any attempt to 
reduce the power of the State in the area of local self government would be resisted." 
...(Interruptions)... So, Sir, they don't have a reco rd to justify their Centre-State 
relations.  I also do remember the GST debates, saying 'you promise something to 
the States; you don't fulfill it and the States  don't have confidence in your word'. GST 
didn't happen during their period, whereas th at is the confidence Prime Minister Modi 
could give to the States and, therefore, GST was implemented by us. Centre-State 
relations is a topic on which somebody who used Article 356 to remove State 
Governments so many number of times, more than 19 times, should not speak at all. 
...(Interruptions)...  
 
SHRI V.C. VENUGOPAL: Sir, I wish to make a point of clarification. 
...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN: Sir, just  one last point. A lot of people... 
...(Interruptions)...  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: One minute, please. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN: Sir,  d o  y o u  w a n t  m e  t o  s i t  d o w n ?  
...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Yes, please. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN: Sorry, Sir, do you want me to sit down? 
...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN:  I request you...  ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN: Is this  because you want to give them... 
...(Interruptions)... I just want to say something to you, Sir, in case you want them 
to be accommodated for giving explanation or clarification, if it is not preposterous 
from my side. Permit me to just say, that is exactly what our respected Leader of the 
Opposition objected to yesterday when we were timely getting up and saying, 'No, 
you are factually wrong. We want to speak.' ...(Interruptions)...  S i r ,  l e t  m e  f i n i s h .  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
181

...(Interruptions)... I would want to cultivate the habi t for myself; I will keep quiet. I 
will hear every speaker and wh en there is an objectionable comment made, or when 
there is a factually incorrect statement ma de, after they finish, I will seek your 
permission to stand up and rebut it, provided  they are here to listen, not if they are 
walking out. ...(Interruptions)... So, Sir, it is a two-way street. Now that you are 
saying, I will sit down. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Finance Minister, please conclude. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN: Can I? 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Yes.  Please conclude. 
 
SHRIMATI NIRMALA SITHARAMAN: Sir, just the last two points. 
 Sir, a lot of questions have been asked as  to why it is that we won't be able to 
do the OBC reservation like the way we do the SC or ST reservation. There is no 
specific mention of electoral reservation in  the Constitution for OBCs as it is 
mentioned for the SCs and STs. That is why this Bill, which brings in the amendment 
to have 33 per cent reservation, deals with the General category, deals with the SC 
category and the ST category, which is provid ed for by the Constitution. So, there is 
no ambiguity in our mind.   
  Sir, the last point is something that is  a bit of a disappointment for me. It is a 
very worrying thing for me for which I seek your indulgence. Allow me to say it. It is 
really not what I want -- leave me, many of  us wouldn't want -- in the Upper House. 
This morning, I heard insinuations passed ag ainst the hon. Prime Minister and hon. 
Home Minister. Initially I didn't think it  was meant for them because it was very 
metaphorically said. They said, 'some me n came, they carried money bags, they 
were also with money, media, muscle power and misogyny.' ...(Interruptions)... Sir, 
I would want this to be finished and anyone who has an objection may please speak 
after that. So, when it was metaphorically  said that two Members came to Bengal, 
men came with money, media and muscle power, misogyny and mocked the Chief 
Minister, I was just plainly hearing it.   I didn't think I got perturbed. But I am happy 
that you have already sa id, 'substantiate it.' ...(Interruptions)...  Sir, I am glad, you 
said, 'substantiate it'. I thank you for it o n  t h e  a s s u m p t i o n  t h a t  i f  i t  i s  n o t  
substantiated, it will be expunged. But wh y am I worried about any reference to any 
two men? I shouldn't really be worried. Right! That is how I thought it was.  But when 
somebody from here objected to that  comment and finally, when it was not 
182
[RAJYA SABHA]

permitted, and the hon. Member was allowed to speak, he used the names. To recall 
the lines, he said, Sir, he looked at you and said with aggression 'Whenever I take the 
name of Prime Minister Modi and Amit Shahji, I get under their skin.'  That is what he 
said. ...(Interruptions)... Now, if the two-men reference was without any name, I will 
not be bothered. But when somebody protested it from here, the true thought was 
betrayed. ...(Interruptions)... The true thought was betrayed and the true thought 
was, 'whenever I take Prime Minister Modi's name and Amit Shah's name, I get under 
their skin.' This is what the hon. Member said. So, everything ties up. 
...(Interruptions)... I would humbly request you that the document provided here be 
corroborated and substantiated if the mone y, musclemen and the media have come, 
or else apologise and the remark be expunged. Thank you.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Take your seat. ...(Interruptions)... Hon. Members, please take 
your seat. ...(Interruptions)... Don't do it. ...(Interruptions)... You are not in a 
forest area.  You are in this House. ...(Interruptions)... I will look into it. 
...(Interruptions)... Sit down. ...(Interruptions)... Hon. Members, if I take my tenure 
of one year, after a long gap... ...(Interruptions)... Hon. Members, I express my 
deep sense of gratitude for a memorable and stimulating debate. ...(Interruptions)... 
What gives you the impression that I will no t give you the floor? Don't see a ghost in 
every dark corner. I am expressing somethin g that after a long time we have had a 
very involved debate. Every Member of th e House has contributed; every Member of 
the House has been insightful. It has been very stimulating, emotive and intellectual. 
There have been differences which are to be there in de mocracy. There has been a 
commendable contribution from everyone and I have listened to the inputs by 
everyone. There have been acerbic comments; there have been sarcasm also; there 
has been wit. But humour was lacking. Venugopal ji, humour was lacking. You need 
to make up for it. I should now call the hon. Minister, Arjun Ramji , but the Leader of 
the Opposition seeks to make an intervention.  Now, I had said a year back that when 
it comes to the Leader of the Opposition, th e Leader of the House, the Prime Minister 
or former Prime Ministers, I would show extr a consideration. I am, therefore, allowing 
the Leader of the Opposition to make an intervention.   
 
THE LEADER OF THE OPPOSITION (SHRI MALLIKARJUN KHARGE): K.C. 
Venugopalji wants to say something.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: It is a very  reasonable suggestion, पर थोड़ा हंस कर किहए। Before 
the Leader of the Opposition takes th e floor, Mr. K.C. Venugopal would say 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
183

something.  Venugopal ji, you will do it palatably and humorously. Am I right? If the 
hon. Finance Minister has reacted to yo ur statement, you should be happy and 
delighted. Take it as an accomplishment. You have two minutes.   
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL: Sir, I don't know what happened why the hon. Finance 
Minister said like this. What I say is very clear. When  in 1989, the 64
th Constitution 
Amendment was taken up by the Rajya Sabha,  after passing it in the Lok Sabha, the 
BJP Members, including the stalwarts like Atal Bihari Vajpayee ji, Lal Krishna Advaniji, 
Ram Jethmalaniji, Jaswant Singh ji, voted against it. This is what the proceeding is. 
The question is: "The Bill to amend the Constitution (64 th Amendment), as passed 
by Lok Sabha, be taken into consideration." The voting started. Shri Lal Krishna 
Advani voted 'No'; Shri Atal Bihari Vajpay ee voted 'No' and Shri Jaswant Singh voted 
'No'. Their stand is very clear. Then why is  the hon. Finance Minister putting the 
responsibility on other parties' shoulders?  I have asked about her Party's stand only. 
She has to clarify BJP's standing.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: So, it is happy ending. Ther e is one point of view and another point 
of view. It is at the suggestion of the ho n. Leader of the Opposition that I gave 
opportunity to Shri K.C. Venugopal. आप िदल िमला दोगे, आप सबके  िदल िमला देना। 
आपने देखा होगा िक मȅने लेÄट मȂ ज्यादा देखना शुरू  कर िदया है।   
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: आप अभी देख रहे हȅ, वैसे आप राइट मȂ ज्यादा देखते हȅ।   
 
Ǜी सभापित: नहीं-नहीं, मȅने लेÄट मȂ देखा है।   
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: माननीय सभापित जी, मȅ आपका आभारी हूं िक आपने मुझे "संिवधान 
(128वां संशोधन) िबल" पर अपनी बात रखने क े िलए इजाज़त दी। मȅ इसके  समथर्न मȂ ही खड़ा 
हुआ हूं और इस िबल को िदल से सÇपूणर् सपोटर् करता हूं। म
ेरी पाटीर् और इधर क े सभी लोग, 
इंिडया क े सभी लोग heartily इसका  सपोटर् करते हȅ। मुझे दो िदन पहले ही मालूम हुआ िक यह 
िबल आने वाला है। सर, 4 िसतÇबर, 2023 को आपने जयपुर मȂ कहा था, क्या कहा था - वह िदन 
द
ूर नहीं, जब संसद और िवधान सभाओं मȂ मिहलाओं को उनका उिचत Ģितिनिधत् व िमलेगा। यानी 
आपने यह तय िकया था, आपको मालूम भी हो गया था और आपने इसका Ģचार जयपुर मȂ कर 
िदया, तो अब इससे बड़ी बात और क्या हो सकती है? हमारे सभापित जी ने बोला, तो हमको भी 
लगा िक यह िबल आने वाला है। मȅ यह चाहता था िक इधर और उधर की सभी मिहला मेÇबसर्, 
चाहे वे िकसी भी पाटीर् की हȗ, उनको बोलने िदया जाए, इसीिलए मȅने इस पर बोलने क े िलए 
आपको ज्यादा Ģेशराइज़ नहीं िकया और मȅ थोड़े से शÅदȗ मȂ अपनी बात बोलूंगा। जब मȅने उǄर 
देखा - जब यहां पर फाइनȂस िमिनÎटर का लगभग 50 िमनट का िरÃलाई सुनने को िमला, तब मȅने 
184
[RAJYA SABHA]

आपकी Îपेशल परिमशन लेकर यह सोचा िक मुझे भी थोड़ा वƪ दीिजए, तािक मȅ क ु छ शÅद 
आपके  सामने रखूं।  सर, ...(Ëयवधान)...   
   
MR. CHAIRMAN: Please listen to the Leader  of the Opposition. The hon. Finance 
Minister was heard with rapt attention.  
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: सर, मȅ किवता से शुरू  करता हूं।   
 
Ǜी सभापित: सर, आपकी किवता बड़ी गंभीर होती है।  मेरे यहां आने से पहले आपने ऐसी किवता 
पढ़ दी िक पूरे देश क े लोग मुझे पूछने लग गए िक ऐसा मौसम आएगा, सदा सताएगा।   
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: सर, मȅ आपके  िलए नहीं बोलूंगा।  मȅ इस िबल पर ही बोलूंगा।   
 
Ǜी सभापित:  ठीक है।  
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: कोमल है तू कमजोर नहीं – यह किवता  मिहला क े िलए है:- 
 
 “कोमल है कमज़ोर नहीं तू 
  शिƪ का नाम ही नारी है, 
 जग को जीवन देने वाली 
 मौत भी तुझसे हारी है। 
सितयȗ क े नाम पे तुझे जलाया, 
 मीरा क े नाम पे जहर िपलाया। 
सीता जैसी अिग्न परीक्षा भी हुई 
 जग मȂ अब तक जारी है। 
जग मȂ अब तक ये सारी चीज़Ȃ जारी हȅ।  
बहुत हो चुका अब मत सहना 
तुझे इितहास बदलना है। 
नारी को कोई कह न पाये 
अबला है, बेचारी है, 
कोमल है कमज़ोर नहीं तू 
शिƪ का नाम ही नारी है।” 
 
इसीिलए हम इस शिƪ को और बढ़ावा दे रहे हȅ। इसको सभी लोग सपोटर् कर रहे हȅ और 
सभी ने इसके  सपोटर् मȂ बात कही है।  
 सर, मȅ बहुत से आंकड़े भी तैयार करके  लाया था, लेिकन समय की कमी की वजह से बोल 
नहीं सकता हूं। आपने अपनी अचीवमȂट्स  बताई हȅ िक क्या-क्या अचीवमȂट्स हो गई हȅ। लोक सभा 
मȂ होम िमिनÎटर ने बताया और यहां पर फाइनȂस िमिनÎटर ने बताया। हमने क्या िकया, वह भी मȅ 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
185

बताना चाहता था, लेिकन मȅ ऐसा नहीं करना चाहता हूं, क्यȗिक यह िबल Îपेशल है, यह 
मिहलाओं क े िलए है, Îतर्ी  शिƪ क े िलए है। इसीिलए मȅ इसमȂ कोई नया डेवलपमȂट लाकर इसको 
खराब नहीं करना चाहता था। यहां पर इधर-उधर की बात हो रही है, बात िबल क े ऊपर होनी 
चािहए। पहले िबÊस जÊदी पास होते थे, लेिकन आप कहते हȅ िक हमने यह िकया, वह िकया, गैस 
दी, रोड्स दीं, इसमȂ सब चीज़Ȃ आ गई हȅ।  
 अब ठीक है, उनको बोलना था, वे बोल सकते हȅ। सभापित जी, मुझे इसमȂ एक ऑÅजेक्शन 
है। इस िबल का क्लॉज़ फाइव कहता है िक आरक्षण तभी लागू होगा, जब डीिलिमटेशन की 
एक्सरसाइज़ पूरी हो जाएगी। डीिलिमटेशन भी जनगणना की Ģिकर्या पूरी होने क े बाद कराई 
जाएगी। इसका मतलब है िक मिहला आरक्षण से पहले दो अिनवायर् शतȄ रखी गई हȅ। एक 
जनगणना है और दूसरा डीिलिमटेशन है। यह कायर् पूरा होने तक तो यह इिÇÃलमȂट ही नहीं होगा। 
आप इस पर इतना कर् ेिडट लेने की कोिशश कर रहे हȅ, लेिकन यह तो आपने कर िदया िक इसे 
ऐसे ही चलने दो। मȅ ऐसा नहीं कहता, जैसा िक एक बार होम िमिनÎटर साहब ने बोला था - 15 
लाख रुपए  दȂगे, लोगȗ को दो करोड़ नौकिरयां दȂगे, यह सब क ु छ बोला था, लेिकन जब बाद मȂ 
उनसे पूछा गया िक हमारे िलए दो करोड़ नौकिरयां कहां हȅ, हमारे 15 लाख रुपए  कहां हȅ - उसके  
बाद मȅने पेपर मȂ पढ़ा और यह आप सबको भी मालूम है िक ये तो चुनावी जुमले हȅ - ऐसा उन्हȗने 
कहा, मȅने नहीं कहा। इस िबल क े बारे मȂ भी ऐसा नहीं होना चािहए। यह िबल इंटर्ोǹूस हो गया है 
और हम सब इसको सपोटर् कर रहे हȅ। यह िबल यहां पर पास होगा, लेिकन यह िफर से जुमला 
नहीं होना चािहए। मȅ चाहता हूं िक आप इसको जÊदी से इिÇÃलमȂट करȂ। इसको इिÇÃलमȂट करने क े 
िलए हम सभी unconditional support कर रहे हȅ।  
 दूसरी बात यह है िक मिहला आरक्षण को जनगणना और डीिलिमटेशन से जोड़ने की 
जरूरत नहीं है। आप इसको लागू कर सकते हȅ, क्यȗिक बहुत सी चीज़ȗ को हमने अपोज़ भी िकया, 
लेिकन िफर भी यहां पर िबल पास हो गए। आपको मालूम है िक सभी लेबर िबÊस पास हो गए, 
सभी िकसान िबÊस पास हो गए। मȅ आपको बताना चाहता हूं िक 750 लोग मर चुक े हȅ। वे िकसान 
बॉडर्र पर बैठे हुए थे। ...(Ëयवधान)... वे एक साल, दो साल तक कई जगहȗ पर बैठे 
थे।...(Ëयवधान)... 
 
Ǜी सभापित: आप सÅजेक्ट पर बोिलए।  
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे:  हमारे कहने क े बावजूद भी जब आपने तीन िकसान िबÊस पास कर िदए, 
तब इसको भी ऐसे ही पास करना चािहए था। आप हमसे पूछ रहे हȅ िक हमने पास क्यȗ नहीं िकया? 
िफर आपने दस साल से क्यȗ नहीं िकया? मȅ आपसे पूछना चाहता हूं िक जब आप दूसरे कानून 
एक साल मȂ पास कर सकते हȅ, नोटबंदी कर सकते हȅ, तो इसे क्यȗ नहीं कर सकते? आप रात
 क े 
8.00 बजे बोलते हȅ - भाइयो और बहनो, कल से 1,000 का नोट और 500 का  नोट नहीं चलेगा, 
लीगल ट
Ȃडर नहीं होगा - ऐसा आपने कहा। आप ऐसे बड़े-बड़े काम कर सकते हȅ, लेिकन आपने 
इस िबल को पास नहीं िकया, जबिक इस िबल को सभी मान रहे हȅ, िकसी ने इसको अपोज़ नहीं 
िकया। जब इसको सभी लोग मान रहे हȅ, तो आप इस िबल को पहले ला सकते थे, लेिकन आपने 
इस िबल को लाने की कोिशश नहीं की।  
186
[RAJYA SABHA]

 दूसरी चीज़ यह है िक अबर्न बॉडीज़ मȂ िरज़वȃशन है, िजला पंचायत मȂ िरज़वȃशन है, 
तालुका पंचायत मȂ िरज़वȃशन है, अभी िजतने existing मेÇबसर् हȅ, नÇबसर् हȅ, उन्हीं क े आधार पर 
इसे लागू कीिजए। जब सȂसस आएगा, तो यह बढ़ जाएगा, िफर मेÇबसर् भी बढ़Ȃगे, उसके  साथ-साथ 
मिहलाओं की संख्या भी बढ़ेगी। आप चाहȂगे, तो सब क ु छ कर सकते हȅ, क्यȗिक
 जब आप हमȂ पुराने 
पािर्लयामȂट हाउस से नये पािर्लयामȂट हाउस मȂ लाए और यहां लाने क े बाद हमारी फाइनȂस 
िमिनÎटर ने यह कहा िक इस नये हाउस मȂ, मिहलाओं क
े  िलए नया िबल लाएंगे - यह सब उन्हȗने 
बोला। 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Stick to the subject. 
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: मȅ कहना चाहता हूं िक आप इसे वहीं पर कर सकते थे, लेिकन यह हुआ 
नहीं। सर, इसमȂ बैकवडर् क्लासेज़ क े िलए िरज़वȃशन नहीं है। ये तो एस.सी./एस.टीज़. क े आंकड़े 
हȅ। अगर 100 सीट्स एस.सी./एस.टीज़. की हȅ, तो आप उसके  अनुसार 1/3rd आसानी से कर दȂगे 
या रोटेशन मȂ कर सकते हȅ या िकसी और तरीके  से कर सकते हȅ, लेिकन more than 60 per 
cent OBCs हȅ, उनकी मिहलाओं को आरक्षण क ै से िमलेगा, आप इसके  बारे मȂ बताइए। अगर 
OBC की मिहलाओं को आरक्षण देना है, तो संिवधान मȂ स ंशोधन करके  या इसमȂ अमȂडमȂट लाकर 
ही उनको आरक्षण का लाभ दे सकते हȅ। आपको उनके  िलए भी क ु छ करना चािहए, लेिकन आपने 
उनको छोड़ िदया है। अब मिहला िरज़वȃशन मȂ क्या होगा – मȅ इसको अपोज़ नहीं कर रहा हूं, मȅ 
इसको सपोटर् करूं गा, लेिकन मȅ पूछना चाहता हूं िक आप बैकवडर् क्लासेज़ की मिहलाओं को क्यȗ 
छोड़ रहे हȅ? क्या आप उनको पीछे धके लना चाहते हȅ, क्या उनको अपने साथ नहीं लेना चाहते 
हȅ? इसीिलए यह जरूरी  है और यही कारण है िक हमने आपसे ĢÌन पूछे हȅ तथा बात भी की है। 
हम जानना चाहते हȅ िक यह कब इिÇÃलमȂट होगा, क्या यह एक साल मȂ इिÇÃलमȂट होगा, दो साल 
मȂ इिÇÃलमȂट होगा, छह साल म
Ȃ इिÇÃलमȂट होगा या आठ साल मȂ इिÇÃलमȂट होगा?  सर, आप मुझे 
थोड़ा-सा तो क ं सेशन दीिजए। फाइनȂस िमिनÎटर काफी देर बोली हȅ। 
 
Ǜी सभापित: नहीं, आपने पांच िमनट बोलने क े िलए कहा था।  
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: सर,  मȅने पांच िमनट बोलकर िफर ज़ीरो बोला था।  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Take another t
hree minutes. 
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: सर, क्या आप इसको दो साल मȂ करȂगे, पांच साल मȂ करȂगे या दस साल मȂ 
इिÇÃलमȂट करȂगे? आप इसकी एक िलिमट बता दीिजए। आप इसे कब इिÇÃलमȂट करने वाले ह
 ȅ, 
इसके  बारे मȂ एक तारीख बताइए, साल बताइए। आपने बोला है िक आपका किमटमȂट है, तो हमȂ 
साल बताइए, महीना बताइए, कम से कम डेट तो बताइए िक हम इस समय तक करȂगे, इस 
महीने मȂ करȂगे?  अन्यथा क्या होगा, यह भी एक जुमला हो जाएगा। आपको इसके  बारे मȂ जरूर  
सोचना है। अगर राÍटर् िनमार्ण मȂ मिह
लाओं को आगे बढ़ाना है, तो आपको इसे जÊदी लागू करना 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
187

चािहए, वरना यह एस.सी./एस.टी. और ओबीसी क े 75 परस Ȃट लोगȗ को िडनाई करने जैसा 
होगा। 
अगर आप उधर ध्यान नहीं दȂगे, तो बड़ी मुिÌकल हो जाएगी। क ेवल इमोशनली बात करने 
से नहीं होता, आप Ģैिक्टकली किरए न! आप दूसरȗ को मत पूिछए िक आपने क्या िकया।  मȅने 
गलती की, िफर क्या आप भी गलती
 करȂगे? मȅने गलती की, छोिड़ए, मुझे िशक्षा िमली, लेिकन 
आप क्यȗ नहीं कर रहे हȅ? क्या िसफर् भाषण देना आपका काम है? कहीं गलती है, तो उसको 
सुधारना है। आप इसके  िलए बोल सकते हȅ।  मुझे यह कहना है। मȅ आपको खास कर बताना चाहता 
हूँ िक इस िबल मȂ जो किमयाँ हȅ, ज
ैसा हमारे एक सदÎय ने कहा, आज यह पास हो जाए, तो कम 
से कम िंवटर सेशन मȂ, नेक्Îट सेशन मȂ तो लाइए! इसको लाकर इस िबल को दुरुÎत किरए, हम 
सपोटर् करने क े िलए तैयार हȅ।  जैसे आज हमने हाथ उठाए हȅ, वैसे ही हम उस वƪ भी हाथ 
उठाएँग
े, लेिकन आप लाइए। हमारे यहाँ कन्नड़ मȂ बोलते हȅ, 'म
ूिगगे तुÃपा हƳोदु', यानी िसफर् 
नाक को घी लगाने जैसा है। यह नहीं होना चािहए। बताना एक और करना दूसरा, यह ठीक नहीं 
है। अगर अिमत शाह साहब चाहȂ, वे होम िमिनÎटर हȅ, तो वे कर सकते हȅ, लेिकन उन्हȗने कहा िक 
मȅ आज उधर जा रहा हूँ, हमको छोड़ दीिजए।  साहब, जो लोग
 िडसीजन लेने वाले हȅ, वे ये ही 
लोग हȅ। िकसी िमिनÎटर को िडसीजन लेने का हक नहीं है, पावर नहीं है।  ...(Ëयवधान)... मुझे 
मालूम
 है िक िकसके  पास क्या पावर है।    
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Please, let us keep calm. 
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: सर, मȅ आपसे एक और बात कहूँगा। बहुत सी चीजȗ पर हमारे ऊपर 
नुƪाचीनी हो गई। 9 मई, 2008; किमटी और फरवरी, 2010; ये सभी चीजȂ हुई
 ं। उसके  बाद आपने 
कहा िक हमारे पास यह जो िबल था, इसको क ै से हराया गया।  यह 9 माचर्, 2010 को 186 वोटȗ क े 
भारी बहुमत से पास हुआ था, लेिकन बाद मȂ लोक सभा मȂ इसकी हार हो गई। मȅ यही कहना 
चाहता हूँ िक अब यहाँ तो हारने का सवा
ल नहीं है, इसीिलए आप ओबीसी को इसमȂ लाइए।    
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Point is well taken. 
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: बीजेपी क े अध्यक्ष, जगत Ģकाश नƿा साहब हमारे ऊपर इतना टॉन्ट मार 
रहे थे िक बैकवडर् क्लास क े तीन लोग ही सेकर् ेटरीज़ हȅ। आप पीछे का आँकड़ा लेकर देिखए। अब 
वहाँ पर एससी/एसटी क े लोग स
ेकर् ेटरी भी नहीं बन सकते, िंĢिसपल सेकर् ेटरी भी नहीं बन सकते, 
तो वे िडसीजन क ै से लȂगे!  इवन वे ज्वाइंट सेकर् ेटरी की पोÎट पर भी नहीं हȅ। वहाँ सभी आरएसएस 
क
े  लोगȗ को लाकर भर िदया है। ...(Ëयवधान)... भरने क े बाद वहाँ पर जो फाइल आती है, वह 
फाइल Îकर्ूटनी करने क े बाद आगे जाती है। ...(Ëयवधान )... हर िमिनÎटर क े पास आरएसएस से 
जुड़ा हुआ एक आदमी बैठा रहता है। ...(Ëयवधान)... यह अच्छा नहीं है। इसीिलए मȅ आपसे िवनती 
करू ँगा िक सेकर् े टेिरएट मȂ एससी/एसटी क े लोग रहने चािहए, ओबीसी क े लोग रहने चािहए। 
इसमȂ ज्यादा से ज्यादा मि
हलाओं को िरिĢजȂटेशन देने क े िलए आपको ओबीसी क े िलए Ģावधान 
करना चािहए, मȅ यह कहूँगा।  सर, मȅ एक िमनट और लूँगा।   
188
[RAJYA SABHA]

 सर, सुषमा Îवराज जी ने इसकी तारीफ की थी।  कब? िजस िदन यह पहले का िबल 
आया था, बीजेपी की विरÍठ नेता, सुषमा Îवराज जी ने इसकी तारीफ मȂ कहा था, "मȅ खुश हूँ िक 
यह िबल पेश कर िदया गया है, इसिलए भी खुश  हूँ िक यह राज्य सभा मȂ पेश िकया गया है।  यह 
अब Ģभावहीन नहीं होगा।" यानी लैÃस नहीं होगा।  यानी आपकी नेता भी हमारी तारीफ करती हȅ, 
लेिकन आप सुबह से शाम तक कह रहे हȅ िक 70 साल मȂ क्या िकया, 50 साल मȂ क्या िकया। सर, 
हमने क्या िकया
, दुिनया को मालूम है। ...(Ëयवधान)... दुिनया को मालूम है।  इसीिलए मȅ आपसे 
...(Ëयवधान)...    
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Thank you. Now, Shri Arjun Ram Meghwal to reply to the 
discussion.  One second. अजुर्न जी, एक बार आप बैिठए। 
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: मȅ नƿा साहब से, होम िमिनÎ
 टर से और फाइनȂस िमिनÎटर से पूछता हूँ िक 
यह कब, कौन से महीने मȂ, कौन से साल मȂ इÇÃलीमȂट होगा, यह बता दीिजए और इसमȂ ओबीसी 
मिहलाओं का िरज़वȃशन होगा या नहीं, आज बताइए?   ...(Ëयवधान)...    
 
िविध और न्याय मं
तर्ालय क े राज्य मंतर्ी; संसदीय कायर् मंतर्ालय मȂ राज्य मंतर्ी; तथा संÎकृ ित 
मंतर्ालय मȂ राज्य मंतर्ी (Ǜी अजुर्न राम मेघवाल): मुझे इन्हȗने बुलाया है। 
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: मȅ आप ही की तारीफ कह रहा था, आप बैिठए। सर, मȅ मिहला क े िलए दो 
सȂटȂस कह कर खत्म कर रहा हूँ। 
 
"िदन की रोशनी ख्वाबȗ को बनाने मȂ गुजर गई," 
 
Ǜी सभापित: आजकल आप किवता बहुत पढ़ रहे हȅ। 
 
Ǜी मिƥकाजुर्न खरगे: नहीं, नहीं। 
 
"िदन की रोशनी ख्वाबȗ को बनाने मȂ गुजर गई, 
रात की नींद बƳȗ को सुलाने मȂ गुजर गई। 
िजस घर मȂ उसके  नाम
 की तख्ती भी नहीं, 
सारी उĦ उस घर को सजाने मȂ गुजर गई।" 
 
 इसिलए आप ओबीसी का िरज़वȃशन िफक्स किरए और तारीख िफक्स किरए। बस म
ȅ इतना 
कह कर आपको धन्यवाद देता हूँ िक कम से कम आप हँसे और हमको समय भी िदया। इसके  िलए 
I thank you very much. 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
189

MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Arjun Ram Megh wal to reply to the discussion.  
...(Interruptions)... Nothing will go on record. ...(Interruptions)... After the Leader 
of the Opposition, either the Leader of the House or the Prime Minister can speak and 
no one else. ...(Interruptions)... The Leader of the Opposition has concluded from 
this side. Nothing will go on record excep t what the hon. Minister, Shri Arjun Ram 
Meghwal, says. 
 
Ǜी अजुर्न राम मेघवाल: सभापित जी, The Constitution (One Hundred and Twenty-Eighth 
Amendment) Bill, 2023, ' नारी शिƪ वंदन' क े संबंध मȂ आपने आज जो चचार् ĢारÇभ करने की 
अनुमित दी, इसमȂ रंजीत रंजन जी से लेकर िनमर्ला सीतारमण जी और मिÊलकाजुर्न खरगे जी 
सिहत 72 सदÎयȗ ने भाग िलया है। मȅ सभी सदÎयȗ का धन्यवाद करता हूँ
।  मुझे लगता है िक 
करीब-करीब सबने इस िबल का समथर्न िकया है, इसिलए मȅ सबका आभार भी Ģकट करता हूँ। 
 सभापित जी, हमारे जे.पी. नƿा जी जब बोल रहे थे, तब उभय भारती का एक इÌयू आया, 
िनमर्ला जी ने भी कहा। मȅ उसके  आगे की एक कड़ी क े बारे मȂ बताना चाहता हूँ िक शंकराचायर् जी 
क ै स
े जीते और मंडन िमǛ क ै से हारे। उभय भारती को माकȃ ट जाना पड़ गया या बाह र कहीं जाना 
पड़ गया।  दोनȗ बहस कर रहे थे, िडबेट कर रहे थे, जैसे अभी संसद मȂ िडबेट हो रही है।  
...(Ëयवधान)... हाँ, िवदुषी भारती। िवदुषी भारती ने कहा िक मुझे बाहर जाना है, ...(Ëयवधान)... 
मनोज जी, उन्हȗने कहा िक मुझे बाहर जान
ा है, आप िडबेट करते रहो। उन्हȗने कहा िक आप तो 
बाहर जाओगे, आप क ै से जज करोगे िक कौन जीता, कौन हारा? लेिकन िवदुषी भारती ने क्या 
िकया िक उसने दो नैचुरल फ ूलȗ की मालाएँ लीं, उसने एक
 माला अपने पित को पहनाई और एक 
माला शंकराचायर् जी को पहनाई। 
जब तीन-चार घंटे क े बाद वे वापस आईं, तो उन्हȗने अपने पित को हारा हुआ िडक्लेयर 
िकया और शंकराचायर् जी को जीता हुआ िडक्लेयर िकया। उनके  पित ने जब उनसे यह पूछा िक 
आपने ऐसा क ै से िकया क्यȗिक आप तो बाहर थीं, तो उन्हȗने कहा िक मȅ आप दोनȗ को ताजे फ ूलȗ 
की माला पहना कर गई थी, म
ȅने उनकी खुशबू देखी, च
ूंिक िडबेट क े दौरान आपको गुÎसा आ 
गया, िजसके  कारण आपकी माला सूख गई और शंकराचायर् जी को गुÎसा नहीं आया, इसिलए 
उनकी माला नहीं सूखी। इस तरह िवदुषी मिहलाओं क े िलए यह जो काम हो रहा ह ै, अगर ऐसी 
मिहलाएं सदन मȂ आएंगी, तो िनणर्य साित्वक ही हȗगे, जो हमȂ ज्ञान दȂगे और हम अच्छा िनणर्य कर 
पाने मȂ सक्षम हȗगे। मोदी जी क े नेतृत्व मȂ हम ऐसा िबल लेकर आए हȅ। आप सभी ने इस िबल क े 
िलए समथर्न जताया है, लेिकन अब माननीय खरगे जी को गुÎसा आ रहा है, Ǜी क े.सी. 
वेणुगोपाल जी को भी गुÎसा आ रहा है।  
मȅ अब अपना अगला िंबदु लूंगा, िजसके  बारे मȂ अिधकतर मȅन
े बता िदया है। 
 
Ǜी सभापित: माननीय मंतर्ी जी, आपका परम सौभाग्य है िक आपके  िबल का समथर्न पूरे सदन ने 
िकया है। ऐसी पिरिÎथित मȂ अब िकसी आकर्ोश की गुंजाइश ही नहीं है। 
 
190
[RAJYA SABHA]

Ǜी अजुर्न राम मेघवाल: सभापित जी, मȅ दो-चार चीज़Ȃ ही बताऊँ गा, चूंिक इसमȂ क ु छ नये िवषय 
भी हȅ, जैसे िवदुषी भारती वाला िवषय आया। इसी तरह की क ु छ और नई चीज़Ȃ भी इसमȂ आई हȅ।  
यहां गीता मुखजीर् किमटी का िजकर् भी आया, लेिकन उसमȂ कौन-कौन से सदÎय थे? उन 
सदÎयȗ का उÊलेख तो मुझे यहां करना ही चािहए और माननीय सदन को उनके  बारे मȂ जानना भी 
चािहए। उस किमटी क े सदÎयȗ मȂ ममता बनजीर् जी थीं, मीरा क ुमार जी थीं, Ǜीमती सुिमतर्ा 
महाजन थीं, Ǜी शरद पवार जी थे, Ǜीमती सुषमा Îवराज जी थीं, डा. िगिरज
ा Ëयास जी थीं, जो 
राजÎथान से आती थीं, वे भी इस किमटी की सदÎया थीं। Ģो. राम गोपाल यादव जी भी उस 
किमटी मȂ सदÎय थे। इन लोगȗ का उÊलेख तो मुझ े यहां करना ही पड़ेगा, क्यȗिक इन्हȗने बहुत 
बड़ा योगदान िदया है। उस िबल को रूप  देने मȂ इन लोगȗ ने योगदान िदया, हालांिक वह िबल पास 
नहीं हुआ, क्यȗिक 11वीं लोक सभा भंग हो गई थी। 11वीं, 12वीं और 13वीं लोक सभा समय से पहले 
भंग हुई, िजसका िजकर् Ǜीमती िनमर्ला जी न
े भी िकया। उस किमटी क े सदÎयȗ मȂ से दो तो लोक 
सभा की Îपीकर भी रही हȅ - सुिमतर्ा महाजन जी और मीरा क ुमार जी। सुषमा Î वराज जी नेता, 
Ģितपक्ष रही हȅ। आज मȅ मन से इन सभी सदÎयȗ का धन्यवाद करता हूं, िजन्हȗने इस िबल को इस 
रूप  मȂ लाने क े िलए Ģेरणा दी।  
अब एक बात यह कही जा रही है िक इसको आने मȂ 27 साल लग गए। उन्हȗने उस समय 
भी तो इसके  िलए Ģयास िकया था। खरगे जी अभी कह रहे थे िक यह कब आएगा और क
ै से 
आएगा? आप आशंका मत कीिजए - मोदी है तो मुमिकन है - सब क ु छ सÇभव है, आप िंचता मत 
कीिजए।  
सभापित जी, मȅ दो-तीन बातȂ और आपके  ध्यान मȂ लाना चाहता हूं और बताना भी चाहता 
हूं िक यह ओबीसी Ģेम ...(Ëयवधान)... िबल की काफी सारी चीज़Ȃ आ चुकी ह
ȅ। िबल को लेकर 
िडÎकशन मȂ कई चीज़Ȃ आई थीं, जैसे सȂसस, डीिलिमलेटशन, रोटेशन और ओबीसी क े िवषय थे। 
एलओपी ने क्लॉज़-5 का िजकर् िकया था, ये सभी चीज़Ȃ थीं, लेिकन अचानक आपको यह ओबीसी 
Ģेम
 क ै से याद आ गया, यह मेरी समझ मȂ नहीं आया! 
आप तो बाबा साहेब भीमराव अÇबेडकर जी को मानते हȅ। 1951 मȂ बाबा साहेब ने नेहरू  
मंितर्मंडल से इÎतीफा दे िदया
 था, िजसके  उन्हȗने चार-पांच कारण िगनवाए थे। उनमȂ से एक 
कारण उन्हȗने यह भी िगनवाया था िक नेहरू  जी, आपने वादा िकया था िक म ȅ ओबीसी समाज क े 
वेलफे यर क े िलए कमीशन बनाऊँ गा, लेिकन आपने वह कमीशन नहीं बनाया, इसिलए मȅ इÎतीफा 
दे रहा हूं। आप तो उस समय से ओबीसी क े िखलाफ थे, लेिकन अब आपका ओबीसी Ģेम क ै से जाग 
गया? उस समय से लेकर ओबीसी आयोग को संवैधािनक दजार् देने का जो मामला था, वह अब 
Ģधान मंतर्ी मोदी जी क े का
लखंड मȂ पूरा हुआ है। आपके  कालखंड मȂ तो  वह काम भी नहीं हुआ था। 
पता नहीं अब आपका Ģेम क ै से जाग गया! हो सकता है राजनैितक कारणȗ से जागा होगा।  
सभापित जी, आज योजनाओं का िजकर् आया, मȅ उनके  बारे मȂ एक चीज़ बताना चाहता हूं। 
ठीक है, सभी ने योजनाएं बनाई हȗगी, सभी बनाते ह
ȅ, लेिकन Ģधान मंतर्ी मोदी जी क े कालखंड मȂ 
योजनाओं की िÎथित इतनी बेहतर क ै से हुई, मȅ उसका एक उदाहरण देना चाहता हूं। आपकी भी 
पक्का मकान बनाने की योजना थी। हम सभी ने देखा था िक एक पंचायत म Ȃ िसफर् दो या तीन 
टारगेट आते थे।  2014 मȂ जब Ģधान मंतर्ी मोदी जी आए, उनके  आने क े बाद 'Ģधानमंतर्ी आवास 
योजना' आई और िफर एक गर्ाम पंचायत मȂ, जहां िसफर् तीन या चार टारगेट आते थे, वहीं 300-
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
191

400 टारगेट आने लग गए। पहले इसके  िलए 43,000 की  रािश होती थी, लेिकन मोदी जी क े 
समय मȂ बढ़ कर वह 1,50,000 हो गई। इसमȂ क ु छ राज्य सरकारȗ ने सहयोग भी िदया, तो िफर 
वह बढ़कर 2,50,000 हो गई। कहां तीन-चार टारगेट और कहां 300-400 टारगेट! कहां 43,000 
की रािश और कहां 2,50,000 की रािश! उसके  बाद इसका Îके ल भी बढ़ा और Îपीड भी बढ़ी और 
िफर geo tagging technology का  यूज़
 िकया गया। पहले यह होता था िक Utilization 
Certificate नहीं आया, तो बीडीओ से मंगवाओ, कलेक्टर से मंगवाओ, इन सारी Ģिकर्याओं मȂ 
उनको िकÌत िमलती ही नहीं थी। लेिकन अब इन सारी Ģिकर्याओं को समाÃत करके , geo 
tagging करके  सीधा डीबीटी मȂ पैसा डलवा िदया। हमने मिहलाओं को इस तरह से एÇपॉवर िकया 
है, इसीिलए यहां इन योजनाओं का िजकर् करना जरूरी
 था।  
यहां पर एक िवषय आया िक आप अलग-अलग सोचते हȅ, लेिकन म ȅ बताना चाहता हूं िक 
हमारे Ģधान मंतर्ी जी holistic approach से सोचते हȅ, इसीिलए Ģधान मंतर्ी जी ने नारा िदया - 
'सबका साथ, सबका िवकास, सबका Ģयास और सबका िवÌवास।' हमारी सरकार क े काम करने 
का यही मूल मंतर् है और हम holistic approach से सोचते हȅ। इसीिलए मȅ कहता हूं िक यह जो 
सेशन आया है और इस सेशन मȂ यह जो िबल आया है, उसके  िलए - ' यही समय है, सही समय 
है, भारत का अनमोल समय है' - यह Ģधान मंतर्ी जी का क्वोट ही नहीं है, यह उनकी जीवनशैली 
है। यह अमृत काल का समय है और नये संसद भवन मȂ यह पहला िवधेयक है, वह भी 'नारी शिƪ 
वंदन िवधेयक' है, इसमȂ सभी दलȗ का समथर्न भी है, िजसके  िलए म
ȅ सभी का पुन: आभार Ģकट 
करना चाहता हूं।  
अभी Ǜी जयंत चौधरी जी ने एक बात कही िक आपकी नीित ÎपÍट नहीं थी, नीयत नहीं 
थी, इसीिलए आप लेट हो गए। जयंत जी, मȅ आपको यह बताना चाहता हूँ िक यह िबल इसिलए 
नहीं लाया गया है िक हम इसको अटकाना चाहते हȅ। अटकाने और भटकाने वाला
 टाइम चला 
गया। िवपक्ष क े समय लोक सभा मȂ यह िबल इसिलए पास नहीं हो सका, क्यȗिक उनके  पास न तो 
नीित थी, न नीयत थी और न ही नेतृत्व था। आज हमारे पास नीित भी है, नीयत भी है और 
आदरणीय मोदी जी जैसा नेतृत्व भी है, इसीिलए यह िबल आया और सारी Ģिकयाओं को पार 
करते हुए सवर्सÇमित तक पहुँच गया।  
महोदय, एक िवषय जनगणना का आया िक इसके  िलए जनगणना की क्या जरूरत  ह
ै? 
आप जनगणना का अथर् समझते ही हȗगे, यहां सभी िवǎान लोग बैठे हȅ। भारत मȂ जनगणना संघ 
का िवषय है और यह अनुच्छेद 246 मȂ आता है। संिवधान की सातवीं अनुसूची क े कर्म स ंख्या 69 पर 
यह सूचीबǉ है। जनगणना संबंधी जो संवैधािनक Ģावधान हȅ, वे इस Ģकार हȅ - लोक सभा मȂ 
राज्यȗ को सीटȗ का आवंटन, Ģत्येक राज्य क े क्षेतर्ीय िनवार्चन क्षेतर् मȂ िवभाजन को भारत क े 
संिवधान क े अनुच्छेद 82 क े अनुसार जनगणना क े आँकड़ȗ क े आधार पर पुन: समायोिजत िकया 
जाता है। ये संवैधािनक Ģावधान ह
ȅ। आप कह रहे हȅ िक अभी 2024 मȂ इसे ले आइए। जनगणना मȂ 
पहले ये सभी आँकड़े इक
ƻे िकए जाते हȅ। इसमȂ िसफर् जनगणना नहीं होती है, िसफर् head count 
नहीं होता है, इसमȂ जानकारी ली जाती है िक आपकी आिर्थक गितिविध क्या है, साक्षरता की दर 
क्या है, िशक्षा का Îतर क्या है, आवास और घरेलू सुिवधाएँ क्या हȅ, उसके  बाद शहरीकरण, 
Ģजनन, मृत्यु दर, अनुस
ूिचत जाित, अनुसूिचत जनजाित, भाषा, धमर्, Ģवासन, िवकलांगता और 
कई अन्य सामािजक, सांÎकृ ितक तथा जनसांिख्यकी डेटा क े बारे मȂ जानकारी ली जाती है और 
192
[RAJYA SABHA]

यह उसका एक िवÌवसनीय ǣोत है। जनगणना कोई छोटा िवषय नहीं है। आपने तो ऐसे ही कह 
िदया िक जनगणना करवाने मȂ क्या है, जनगणना करवा लीिजए, ये तो ऐसे ही हो जाएगी। आपने 
आिर्टकल-82 क े बारे मȂ भी ऐसे ही बोल िदया।  
ये सब ऐसी Ģिकर्याएँ हȅ, िजनके  कारण हमने इनको क्लॉज़-5 मȂ जोड़ा है। पहले इसका 
िबल पास होगा, सȂसस होगा और चूँिक यह 2026 तक ģीज़ है और वह डीिलिमटेशन आयोग का 
िवषय है, इसिलए उसका डीिलिमटेशन होगा, डीिलिमटेशन आयोग ÎटेकहोÊडसर् से क ंसÊटेशन 
करके , इसके  िलए कौन सी सीट िरज़वर् होगी, यह तय करेगा। हम ऐसा नहीं कह रहे हȅ िक हम 
इसको करन
ा नहीं चाहते हȅ, हम तो करना चाहते हȅ, लेिकन ये क ु छ संवैधािनक चीज़Ȃ हȅ, िजनके  
बारे मȂ मुझे आपको बताना था।  
सभापित जी, अब मȅ थोड़ा िबल पर आता हूँ। ...(Ëयवधान)... थोड़ा सा, ज्यादा नहीं। 
...(Ëयवधान).
.. थोड़ा सा।  ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ थोड़ा सा िबल पर आता हूँ।  ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ यह कह 
रहा हूँ िक हम नारी शिƪ को, उसके  Îवािभमान को सÇमान देकर सच्चे अथș मȂ नारी शिƪ वंदन 
कर रहे हȅ। भारत की महान परंपरा मȂ नारी शिƪ का योगदान हमेशा से ही रहा है। वैिदक काल मȂ 
गागीर्, अपाला, घोषा, लोपामुदर्ा जैसी िवदुषी मिहलाओं का उÊलेख िमलता ह
ै, िजन्हȗने उस काल 
मȂ देश और समाज को नेतृत्व Ģदान िकया। रानी द
ुगार्वती, रानी चेन्नÇमा, रानी अिहÊयाबाई, रानी 
लÑमीबाई जैसी नारी शिƪयȗ ने समय आने पर अपने राज्य का नेतृत्व िकया।  ...(Ëयवधान)... 
इसक
ा उÊलेख हुआ है, इसिलए मȅ कह रहा हूँ। ...(Ëयवधान)... इन्हȗने अपने राज्य क े शतर्ुओं से भी 
अपने राज्य की जनता की रक्षा की और िवकास क े नए Ģितमान भी गढ़े। ...(Ëयवधान)... मȅ 
सािवतर्ीबाई फ ु ले, रमाबाई, रानी गाइिदन्Êयू, भिगनी िनवेिदता, एनी बेसȂट, उषा मेहता, सरोिजनी 
नायडू, अरुणा  आसफ़ अली, अमृता
 िबÌनोई, सुषमा Îवराज जैसी िवदुिषयȗ को भी इस मंच से 
याद करता हूँ। 
सभापित महोदय, जब मिहलाएँ नीित िनमार्ण और िनणर्य Ģिकर्या मȂ िहÎसा लȂगी, तब वे 
िनणर्य ज्यादा संव
ेदनशील, समाज क े िहत मȂ और राÍटर् क े िहत मȂ हȗगे, क्यȗिक ऐसा माना जाता है 
िक ममता, करुणा , त्याग, तप, दया, Ģेम, समपर्ण, ईमानदारी, साहस और रचनात्मक क े साथ-
साथ शिƪ मिहलाओं का Îवाभािवक गुण ह ै, िजसका Ģभाव हमȂ आगे नीित िनमार्ण Ģिकर्या मȂ 
दृिÍटगोचर होगा।  2047 मȂ भारत अपनी आजादी क े 100 वषर् पूणर् करेगा। जैसा िक Ģधान मंतर्ी जी 
ने इस कालखंड को 'अमृत काल' का नाम िदया है और 2047 तक िवकिसत भारत बनाने का लÑय 
रखा गया है, उस समय िवकास की इस Ģिकर्या मȂ नारी शिƪ की Ģभावी भूिमका हो, इसिलए हम 
यह िबल लेकर आए हȅ।   
इंटर पािर्लयामȂटरी यूिनयन क
े  नवीनतम डेटा, िजसका िजकर् आया, उसके  अनुसार िवÌव 
भर मȂ नेशनल लेिजÎलेिटव बॉडीज़ मȂ मिहलाओं का औसत Ģिति निधत्व 26.7 परसȂट है। यह हमȂ 
बढ़ाना चािहए या नहीं बढ़ाना चािहए -  सब ने इसका िजकर् िकया।  8 - 1 0  माननीय सांसदȗ ने 
इसका िजकर् िकया।  जैसे ही यह िबल पास हो जाएगा, कानून बन जाएगा, तब यह Ģितिनिधत्व 
one-third हो जाएगा, almost 33 per cent हो जाएगा। तब िवÌव म
Ȃ िजतने िवकिसत देश हȅ, 
उनसे भी हम इस मामले मȂ आगे चले जाएंगे, इसिलए हम यह िबल लेकर आपके  बीच मȂ आए हȅ। 
इसमȂ आशंका Ģकट करने की जरूरत  नहीं है। ...(Ëयवधा न)... 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
193

सभापित जी, अब मȅ करीब-करीब समािÃत की ओर ही हूँ।  एक िवषय और आया।  
...(Ëयवधान)... एक िवषय adult franchise का, मतािधकार का आया।  मतािधकार िकसने 
िदलाया था?  यह मतािधकार एक बेिसक Ãवाइंट था, िजसके  कारण 27 जनवरी 1919 को 
Southborough Committee आई।  उसके  बाद बाबा साहेब अंबेडकर लगातार लगे रहे िक adult 
franchise होना चािहए।   इसमȂ हमारे भी बहुत से लोग लगे रहे। मȅ बाबा साहेब अ
ंबेडकर का एक 
क्वोट याद करू ँगा।  ...(Ëयवधान)... सभापित जी, मȅ बाबा साहेब अंबेडकर का एक क्वोट याद 
करू ँगा। संिवधान सभा मȂ जब हम मतािधकार दे रहे थे, तब कई लोगȗ ने कहा - उनमȂ अिधकतर  
कांगर्ेस क े लोग थे -  उनमȂ से कई लोगȗ ने कहा िक मतािधकार मत दो, क्यȗिक बहुत से लोग 
अनपढ़ हȅ, लेिकन बाबा साहेब ने जो कहा, मȅ वह क्वोट करू ँगा। He said, "My feeling is that 
every man is intelligent enough to understand exactly what he wants. Literacy has not 
much bearing on this point; a man may be illiterate, nonetheless he may be
 
intelligent." यह बाबा साहेब की सोच थी, िजसके  कारण यह मतािधकार आया। मतािधकार क े 
बाद अब हम Ģितिनिधत्व देने जा रहे हȅ। 
सभापित जी, बहुत से िवषय आ गए हȅ। किवताओं का िवषय भी आया है। तो मȅ भी लाÎट मȂ 
एक किवता कहकर अपनी बात समाÃत करता हूँ :  
 
"अमृत काल की बेला आई, इच्छा शिƪ िदखाई है, 
नारी शिƪ वंदन से मिहला पहचान बढ़ाई
 है। 
नहीं रुके गी, नहीं थके गी, मिहलाएँ अब नहीं झुक Ȃगी, 
एक नया इितहास रचेगी, रोशन अपना नाम करेगी।" 
 
 "सारा भारत झ
ूम रहा है.." - आज सारा भारत झूम रहा है, आपने देखा होगा िक इतनी 
सारी मिहलाएं बैठी हȅ,   
 
"सारा भारत झूम रहा है, घर-घर मंगलगान बजा है, 
नारी को अिधकार िमला है, भारत माँ का मान बढ़ा है। 
 
"भारत िवकिसत राÍटर् बनेगा.." - जो Ģधान मंतर्ी जी का सपना है। 
 
"भारत िवकिसत राÍटर् बनेगा, दुिनया का िसरमौर बनेगा, 
अमृत काल मȂ सारा भारत देता आज बधाई ह
ै। 
Ģधानमंतर्ी जी को देता आज बधाई है। 
अमृत काल की बेला आई, इच्छा शिƪ िदखाई है, 
नारी शिƪ व
ंदन से मिहला पहचान बढ़ाई है।" 
 
194
[RAJYA SABHA]

Ģधानमंतर्ी मोदी जी को हम सभी बधाई और धन्यवाद भी देते हȅ िक आपने ऐसा नेतृत्व 
िदया, िजसके  चलते यह िबल आया। मȅ कहना चाहूँगा िक अब आप इस िबल को consideration 
क े िलए लȂ,  बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Hon. Prime Minister. 
 
Ģधान मंतर्ी ( Ǜी नरेन्दर् मोदी
 ): आदरणीय सभापित जी, इस अत्यन्त महत्वपूणर् िवधेयक पर 2 िदन 
से िवÎतार से चचार् हो रही है। दोनȗ सदनȗ मȂ िमलाकर, करीब 132 माननीय सदÎयȗ ने बहुत ही 
साथर्क चचार् की है और भिवÍय मȂ भी इस चचार् का एक-एक शÅद हमारी आने वाली यातर्ा मȂ हम 
सबके  काम आने वाला है। इसिलए हर बात का अपना एक महत्व है, मूÊय है। सभी माननीय 
सांसदȗ ने अपनी बात क े Ģारंभ मȂ पहले ही कहा है िक हम इसका समथर्न करते ह
ȅ, इसके  िलए मȅ 
सबका ǭदय स
े अिभनंदन करता हूँ, ǭदय से आभार Ëयƪ करता हूँ।   
यह जो िÎपिरट पैदा हुई है, यह िÎपिरट देश क े जन-जन मȂ एक नया आत्मिवÌवास पैदा 
करेगी। इसमȂ सभी माननीय सांसदȗ ने और सभी राजनीितक दलȗ ने एक  बहुत बड़ी अहम भूिमका 
िनभाई है। नारी शिƪ को एक िवशेष सÇमान िसफर् यह िवधेयक पािरत होने से िमल रहा है, ऐसा 
नहीं है। इस िवधेयक क े Ģित इस देश क े सभी राजनीितक दलȗ की सकारात्मक सोच होना - यह 
हमारे द
ेश की नारी शिƪ को एक नई ऊजार् देने वाली है। यह नए िवÌवास क े साथ राÍटर् िनमार्ण मȂ 
योगदान देने मȂ नेतृत्व क े साथ आगे आएगी, यह अपने आप मȂ भी हमारे उज्ज्वल भिवÍय की 
गारंटी बनने वाली है। 
आदरणीय सभापित जी, मȅ इस सदन का ज्यादा समय नहीं लूंगा। म
ȅ िसफर्, आपने जो 
भावना Ëयƪ की है, उसके  िलए आभार Ëयƪ करता हूँ। जब मतदान होगा, तो मेरा आप सबसे 
आगर्ह है िक यह उच्च सदन है, इसमȂ चचार् भी उǄम करने का Ģयास हुआ है, अब मतदान भी 
सवर्सÇमित से करके  हम देश को एक नया िवÌवास दȂ, इसी अपेक्षा क
े  साथ, मȅ िफर एक बार 
सबका ǭदय से बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद करता हूँ। 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the motion regarding consideration of the Bill to 
vote. The question is: 
"That the Bill further to amend the Cons titution of India, as passed by L
ok 
Sabha, be taken into consideration."     
 
Ǜी Ģमोद ितवारी: सर, मȅ यह ÎपÍट करना चाहता हूँ िक यह सवर्सÇमित से हुआ है। 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: The point is well noted. It is very heartening that the entire House, 
the Upper House, the House of Elders, is unanimously united on this point. Hon. 
Members, in spite of such unanimity, there is a consti tutional prescription. Under 
Article 360 of the Constitution, the motion w ill have to be adopted by a majority of 
total membership of the House and by a majo rity of not less than two-thirds of the 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
195

members of the House present and voting. ...(Interruptions)... I am coming to that. 
Just wait. I am going as per procedure.  Have patience. You can't put the cart before 
the horse.  
 
SHRI JAIRAM RAMESH: Sir, who asked for division? We have not asked for division. 
...(Interruptions)...    
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Would you please take your seat now? Hon. Members, it is a 
constitutional prerogative. I am very happy  that Mr. Chidambaram has given the right 
counsel and that is for a change.  
 
10.00 P.M. 
 
Hon. Members, I would like to inform you th at as we are doing voting electronically, 
hon. Members would have to be seated in their respective seats. Hon. Members from 
Lok Sabha may like to occupy the vacant seats so indicated on the multimedia 
device.  Alternatively, they may sit in the space between the two seats.   
The question is: 
"That the Bill further to amend the Cons titution of India, as passed by Lok 
Sabha, be taken into consideration."     
 
The House divided.
 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: 
Ayes:  215 
Noes: NIL 
Abstained: NIL 
 
Ayes- 215 
 
Abdul Wahab, Shri  
Abdulla, Shri M. Mohamed  
Agrawal, Dr. Anil  
Agrawal, Dr. Radha Mohan Das  
Ahmad, Dr. Faiyaz  
Ali, Shri Gulam  
Alla, Shri Ayodhya Rami Reddy  
196
[RAJYA SABHA]

Amin, Shri Narhari  
Arora, Shri Sanjeev  
Athawale, Shri Ramdas  
Bachchan, Shrimati Jaya  
Baishya, Shri Birendra Prasad  
Bajpai, Dr. Ashok  
Bajpayee, Dr. Laxmikant  
Bakshi, Shri Subrata  
Balmik, Shrimati Sumitra  
Baluni, Shri Anil  
Bansal, Shri Naresh  
Bara, Shrimati Ramilaben Becharbhai  
Baraik, Shri Prakash Chik  
Bhuyan, Shri Ajit Kumar  
Bishi, Shri Niranjan  
Biswas, Shri Abir Ranjan  
Bonde, Dr. Anil Sukhdeorao  
Brijlal, Shri  
Brittas, Dr. John  
Chandrasegharan, Shri N.  
Chandrasekhar, Shri Rajeev  
Chandrashekhar, Shri G.C.  
Chaturvedi, Shrimati Priyanka  
Chaudhary, Shri Jayant  
Chavan, Shrimati Vandana  
Chidambaram, Shri P.  
Dangi, Shri Neeraj  
Deb, Shri Biplab Kumar  
Deo, Shrimati Sulata  
Desai, Shri Anil  
Dharmar, Shri R.  
Divakonda, Shri Damodar Rao  
Dubey, Shri Satish Chandra  
Dwivedi, Shrimati Seema  
Elango, Shri N.R.  
Geeta alias Chandraprabha, Shrimati  
Gehlot, Shri Rajendra  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
197

Girirajan, Shri R.  
Gogoi, Shri Ranjan  
Gohil, Shri Shaktisinh  
Gokhale, Shri Saket  
Goswami, Ms. Indu Bala  
Goyal, Shri Piyush  
Gupta, Shri Prem Chand  
Gupta, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Hanumanthaiah, Dr. L.  
Haque, Shri Mohammed Nadimul  
Harivansh, Shri  
Hegde, Shri Aneel Prasad  
Heggade, Dr. Dharmasthala Veerendra  
Hooda, Shri Deepender Singh  
Hussain, Shri Syed Nasir  
Ilaiyaraaja, Shri  
Islam, Shri Samirul  
Jaggesh, Shri  
Jain, Dr. Anil  
Jangra, Shri Ram Chander  
Javadekar, Shri Prakash  
Jesangbhai, Shri Desai Babubhai  
Jethmalani, Shri Mahesh  
Jha, Prof. Manoj Kumar  
Jhala, Shri Kesridevsinh Digvijaysinh  
Joginipally Santosh Kumar, Shri  
Kadadi, Shri Iranna  
Kalita, Shri Bhubaneswar  
Kalyanasundaram, Shri S.  
Kanakamedala Ravindra Kumar, Shri  
Karad, Dr. Bhagwat  
Kardam, Shrimati Kanta  
Kareem, Shri Elamaram  
Karim, Shri Ahmad Ashfaque  
Ketkar, Shri Kumar  
Khan, Dr. Fauzia  
Khan, Shri Javed Ali  
198
[RAJYA SABHA]

Khan, Shri Muzibulla  
Kharge, Shri Mallikarjun  
Kharlukhi, Dr. Wanweiroy  
Konyak, Shrimati S. Phangnon  
Koragappa, Shri Narayana  
Krishnaiah, Shri Ryaga  
Kumar, Shri Mithlesh  
Kumar, Dr. Sikander  
Kumar, Shri Sujeet  
Lachungpa, Shri Hishey  
Laxman, Dr. K.  
Leishemba, Shri Maharaja Sanajaoba  
Mahadik, Shri Dhananjay Bhimrao  
Mahto, Shri Khiru  
Maji, Shrimati Mahua  
Mandaviya, Dr. Mansukh  
Mangaraj, Shri Manas Ranjan  
Mani, Shri Jose K.  
Mansingh, Dr. Sonal  
Margherita, Shri Pabitra  
Mather Hisham, Shrimati Jebi  
Meena, Dr. Kirodi Lal  
Mittal, Dr. Ashok Kumar  
Modi, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Mohanta, Shrimati Mamata  
Mokariya, Shri Rambhai Harjibhai  
Muraleedharan, Shri V.  
Murugan, Dr. L.  
Nadda, Shri Jagat Prakash  
Nagar, Shri Surendra Singh  
Nanda, Dr. Prashanta  
Narzary, Shri Rwngwra  
Nathwani, Shri Parimal  
Netam, Shrimati Phulo Devi  
Nirmala Sitharaman, Shrimati  
Nishad, Shri Baburam  
Noor, Shrimati Mausam  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
199

O' Brien, Shri Derek  
Oraon, Shri Samir  
P, Shri Sandosh Kumar  
Pandey, Ms. Saroj  
Panwar, Shri Krishan Lal   
Patel, Shri Praful  
Patel, Shri Rajmani  
Patel, Shri Shambhu Sharan  
Pathak, Shri Sandeep Kumar  
Patidar, Ms. Kavita  
Patil, Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao  
Patnaik, Dr. Amar  
Patra, Dr. Sasmit  
Pawar, Shri Sharad  
Pilli, Shri Subhas Chandra Bose  
Pradhan, Shri Dharmendra  
Prakash, Shri Deepak  
Prasad, Shri Aditya  
Pratapgarhi, Shri Imran  
Puri, Shri Hardeep Singh  
Rahim, Shri A. A.  
Rajbhar, Shri Sakaldeep  
Ram Shakal, Shri  
Ramadoss, Dr. Anbumani  
Ramesh, Dr. C.M.  
Ramesh, Shri Jairam  
Ramji, Shri  
Rane, Shri Narayan  
Ranjan, Shrimati Ranjeet  
Rao, Shri G.V.L. Narasimha  
Rao, Dr. K. Keshava  
Rathwa, Shri Naranbhai J.  
Raut, Shri Sanjay  
Ray, Shri Nagendra  
Rebia, Shri Nabam  
Reddy, Shri B. Parthasaradhi  
Reddy, Shri K.R. Suresh  
200
[RAJYA SABHA]

Reddy, Shri S Niranjan   
Reddy, Shri V. Vijayasai  
Rupala, Shri Parshottam  
Saini, Dr. Kalpana  
Scindia, Shri Jyotiraditya M.  
Selvaganabathy, Shri S.  
Sen, Ms. Dola  
Sen, Dr. Santanu  
Shanmugam, Shri C. Ve.  
Sharma Dr. Dinesh  
Sharma, Shri Kartikeya   
Shekhar, Shri Neeraj  
Shukla, Shri Rajeev  
Sibal, Shri Kapil  
Singh, Shri A. D.  
Singh, Shri Ajay Pratap  
Singh, Shri Akhilesh Prasad  
Singh, Shri Arun  
Singh, Shrimati Darshana  
Singh, Shri Digvijaya  
Singh, Shri Sant Balbir  
Singhvi, Dr. Abhishek Manu  
Sinha, Shri Rakesh  
Sircar, Shri Jawhar  
Siroya, Shri Lahar Singh  
Siva, Shri Tiruchi  
Sivadasan, Dr. V.  
Solanki, Dr. Sumer Singh  
Somu, Dr. Kanimozhi NVN  
Soni, Shri Kailash  
Sonowal, Shri Sarbananda  
Tanawde, Shri Sadanand Shet  
Tankha, Shri Vivek K.  
Tasa, Shri Kamakhya Prasad  
Thakur, Shri Ram Nath  
Thakur, Shri Vivek  
Thambidurai, Dr. M.  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
201

Tiwari, Shri Ghanshyam  
Tiwari, Shri Pramod  
Tomar, Shri Vijay Pal Singh  
Trivedi, Dr. Sudhanshu  
Tulsi, Shri K.T.S.  
Usha, Shrimati P. T.  
Vaddiraju, Shri Ravichandra  
Vaiko, Shri  
Vaishnaw, Shri Ashwini  
Vasan, Shri G.K.  
Vats (Retd.), Lt.Gen. (Dr.) D. P.  
Vemireddy, Shri Prabhakar Reddy  
Venugopal, Shri K.C.  
Verma, Shri B.L.  
Viswam, Shri Binoy  
Wasnik, Shri Mukul Balkrishna  
Wilson, Shri P.  
Yadav, Shri B. Lingaiah  
Yadav, Shri Bhupender  
Yadav, Shri Harnath Singh  
Yadav, Prof. Ram Gopal  
Yadav, Shrimati Sangeeta  
Yajnik, Dr. Amee  
 
The motion was carried by a majority of the total membership of the House and by a 
majority of not less than two-thirds of the Members present and voting. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: A historic achievement. Congra tulations! Hon. Members, it is only 
a coincidence. मन क ंचन है, यह संयोग ऐसा है। िहन्दू रीित-िविध क े अनुसार माननीय Ģधान 
मंतर्ी जी का आज जन्म िदन भी है। मȅ उनको कोिट-कोिट बधाई देता हूँ। 
We shall now take up Clause-by-Clause co nsideration of the Bill. In Clause 2, 
there are nine Amendments ; Amendment (No.2) by Shri Sandosh Kumar P; 
Amendment (No.19) by Dr. John Brittas; Amendment (No.36) by Shri Binoy 
Viswam; Amendments (Nos.48 to 52) by  Prof. Manoj Kumar Jha and Amendment 
(No.65) by Prof. Ram Gopal Yadav.  Shri  Sandosh Kumar P; are you moving the 
Amendment? ...(Interruptions)...  
 
202
[RAJYA SABHA]

Clause 2- Amendment of Article 239AA 
 
SHRI SANDOSH KUMAR P (Kerala): Sir, I move:   
(No.2)  That at page 1, Clause 2 be deleted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Dr. John Brittas; are you moving the Amendment? 
...(Interruptions)...  
 
DR. JOHN BRITTAS (Kerala):  Sir, I move:  
(No.19)   That at page 1, line 14, the wo rds "in such manner as Parliament may by 
law determine", be 
deleted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Binoy Viswam, are you moving the Amendment? 
...(Interruptions)... Are you moving your Amendment or not? 
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.36)  That at page 1, Clause 2 be 
deleted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Prof. Manoj Kumar Jha, are you moving the Amendments?  
...(Interruptions)... 
 
PROF. MANOJ KUMAR JHA (Bihar) : Sir, I move: 
(No.48) 
That at page 1, line 8, after the words, "Territory of Delhi", the words,  " , 
the Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of  Jammu and Kashmir and 
the Legislative Assembly  of the Union Territory of Puducherry" be 
inserted. 
(No.49) That at page 1, line 10, after the words, "Territory of Delhi", the words, ", 
the Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of  Jammu and Kashmir and 
the Legislative Assembly  of the Union Territory of Puducherry" be 
inserted. 
(No.50) That at page 1, line 12, after the words, "Territory of Delhi", the words, " , 
the Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of  Jammu and Kashmir and 
the Legislative Assembly  of the Union Territory of Puducherry" be 
inserted. 
(No.51) That at page 1, lines 12 and 13, the words, "(including the number of seats 
reserved for women belonging to the Scheduled Castes)" be deleted. 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
203

(No.52) Th a t  a t  p a g e  1 ,  l i n e  1 4 ,  after the word, "women", the words, ", within 
which, seven-and-a-half per cent of seats shall be reserved for women 
belonging to the Scheduled Tribes, fifteen per cent of seats shall be 
reserved for women belonging to the Scheduled Castes and twenty-seven 
per cent of seats shall be reserved for women belonging to the Other 
Backward Classes in proportion to their population until their population is 
ascertained in the census," be 
inserted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Prof. Ram Gopal Yada v, are you moving the Amendment? 
...(Interruptions)... 
 
PROF. RAM GOPAL YADAV (Uttar Pradesh): Sir, I move: 
(No.65) 
That at page 1, after line 14, the following be inserted, namely:— 
       "(bd) As nearly as may be, twenty-seven per cent of seats and 
fifteen per cent of seats to be filled by  direct election in the Legislative 
Assembly of the National Capital Territory of Delh i, shall be reserved for 
women belonging to Other Backward  Classes and women belonging to 
minorities, respectively in such manner as Parliament by law determine." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall first put Amendmen t (No.2) moved by Shri Sandosh Kumar 
P to vote. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
SOME HON. MEMBERS: Sir, our amendments! ...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Whose? ...(Interruptions)...  No; there is no listed amendment. 
...(Interruptions)...  Shri Jairam Ramesh, I have to  go by those Am endments which 
have been legally admitted.  Therefore, to  make an issue at such a solemn occasion 
is not appropriate. ...(Interruptions)...  Otherwise, we can continue making all kinds 
of interventions. ...(Interruptions)...   
I shall first put Amendment (No.2) moved by Shri Sandosh Kumar P to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendment (No.19) moved by Dr. John Brittas to 
vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
204
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendment (No.36) moved by Shri Binoy Viswam 
to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendments  (Nos.48 to 52) moved by Prof. Manoj 
Kumar Jha to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendmen t (No.65) moved by Prof. Ram Gopal 
Yadav to vote. 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Clause 2 to vote. The question is: 
   That Clause 2 stand part of the Bill. 
 
The House divided.
 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN:  
Ayes:  214 
Noes: NIL 
Abstentions: NIL 
 
Ayes-214 
 
Abdul Wahab, Shri  
Abdulla, Shri M. Mohamed  
Agrawal, Dr. Anil  
Agrawal, Dr. Radha Mohan Das  
Ahmad, Dr. Faiyaz  
Ali, Shri Gulam  
Alla, Shri Ayodhya Rami Reddy  
Amin, Shri Narhari  
Arora, Shri Sanjeev  
Athawale, Shri Ramdas  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
205

Bachchan, Shrimati Jaya  
Baishya, Shri Birendra Prasad  
Bajpai, Dr. 
Ashok  
Bajpayee, Dr. Laxmikant  
Bakshi, Shri Subrata  
Balmik, Shrimati Sumitra  
Baluni, Shri Anil  
Bansal, Shri Naresh  
Bara, Shrimati Ramilaben Becharbhai  
Baraik, Shri Prakash Chik  
Bhuyan, Shri Ajit Kumar  
Bishi, Shri Niranjan  
Biswas, Shri Abir Ranjan  
Bonde, Dr. Anil Sukhdeorao  
Brijlal, Shri  
Brittas, Dr. John  
Chandrasegharan, Shri N.  
Chandrasekhar, Shri Rajeev  
Chandrashekhar, Shri G.C.  
Chaturvedi, Shrimati Priyanka  
Chaudhary, Shri Jayant  
Chavan, Shrimati Vandana  
Chidambaram, Shri P.  
Dangi, Shri Neeraj  
Deb, Shri Biplab Kumar  
Deo, Shrimati Sulata  
Desai, Shri Anil  
Dharmar, Shri R.  
Divakonda, Shri Damodar Rao  
Dubey, Shri Satish Chandra  
Dwivedi, Shrimati Seema  
Elango, Shri N.R.  
Geeta alias Chandraprabha, Shrimati  
Gehlot, Shri Rajendra  
Girirajan, Shri R.  
Gogoi, Shri Ranjan  
Gohil, Shri Shaktisinh  
206
[RAJYA SABHA]

Gokhale, Shri Saket  
Goswami, Ms. Indu Bala  
Goyal, Shri Piyush  
Gupta, Shri Prem Chand  
Gupta, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Hanumanthaiah, Dr. L.  
Haque, Shri Mohammed Nadimul  
Harivansh, Shri  
Hegde, Shri Aneel Prasad  
Heggade, Dr. Dharmasthala Veerendra  
Hooda, Shri Deepender Singh  
Hussain, Shri Syed Nasir  
Ilaiyaraaja, Shri  
Islam, Shri Samirul  
Jaggesh, Shri  
Jangra, Shri Ram Chander  
Javadekar, Shri Prakash  
Jesangbhai, Shri Desai Babubhai  
Jethmalani, Shri Mahesh  
Jha, Prof. Manoj Kumar  
Jhala, Shri Kesridevsinh Digvijaysinh  
Joginipally Santosh Kumar, Shri  
Kadadi, Shri Iranna  
Kalita, Shri Bhubaneswar  
Kalyanasundaram, Shri S.  
Kanakamedala Ravindra Kumar, Shri  
Karad, Dr. Bhagwat  
Kardam, Shrimati Kanta  
Kareem, Shri Elamaram  
Karim, Shri Ahmad Ashfaque  
Ketkar, Shri Kumar  
Khan, Dr. Fauzia  
Khan, Shri Javed Ali  
Khan, Shri Muzibulla  
Kharge, Shri Mallikarjun  
Kharlukhi, Dr. Wanweiroy 
Konyak, Shrimati S. Phangnon  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
207

Koragappa, Shri Narayana  
Krishnaiah, Shri Ryaga  
Kumar, Shri Mithlesh  
Kumar, Dr. Sikander  
Kumar, Shri Sujeet  
Lachungpa, Shri Hishey  
Laxman, Dr. K.  
Leishemba, Shri Maharaja Sanajaoba  
Mahadik, Shri Dhananjay Bhimrao  
Mahto, Shri Khiru  
Maji, Shrimati Mahua  
Mandaviya, Dr. Mansukh  
Mangaraj, Shri Manas Ranjan  
Mani, Shri Jose K.  
Mansingh, Dr. Sonal  
Margherita, Shri Pabitra  
Mather Hisham, Shrimati Jebi  
Meena, Dr. Kirodi Lal  
Mittal, Dr. Ashok Kumar  
Modi, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Mohanta, Shrimati Mamata  
Mokariya, Shri Rambhai Harjibhai  
Muraleedharan, Shri V.  
Murugan, Dr. L.  
Nadda, Shri Jagat Prakash  
Nagar, Shri Surendra Singh  
Nanda, Dr. Prashanta  
Narzary, Shri Rwngwra  
Nathwani, Shri Parimal  
Netam, Shrimati Phulo Devi  
Nirmala Sitharaman, Shrimati  
Nishad, Shri Baburam  
Noor, Shrimati Mausam  
O' Brien, Shri Derek  
Oraon, Shri Samir  
P, Shri Sandosh Kumar  
Pandey, Ms. Saroj  
208
[RAJYA SABHA]

Panwar, Shri Krishan Lal   
Patel, Shri Praful  
Patel, Shri Rajmani  
Patel, Shri Shambhu Sharan  
Pathak, Shri Sandeep Kumar  
Patidar, Ms. Kavita  
Patil, Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao  
Patnaik, Dr. Amar  
Patra, Dr. Sasmit  
Pawar, Shri Sharad  
Pilli, Shri Subhas Chandra Bose  
Pradhan, Shri Dharmendra  
Prakash, Shri Deepak  
Prasad, Shri Aditya  
Pratapgarhi, Shri Imran  
Puri, Shri Hardeep Singh  
Rahim, Shri A. A.  
Rajbhar, Shri Sakaldeep  
Ram Shakal, Shri  
Ramadoss, Dr. Anbumani  
Ramesh, Dr. C.M.  
Ramesh, Shri Jairam  
Ramji, Shri  
Rane, Shri Narayan  
Ranjan, Shrimati Ranjeet  
Rao, Shri G.V.L. Narasimha  
Rao, Dr. K. Keshava  
Rathwa, Shri Naranbhai J.  
Raut, Shri Sanjay  
Ray, Shri Nagendra  
Rebia, Shri Nabam  
Reddy, Shri B. Parthasaradhi  
Reddy, Shri K.R. Suresh  
Reddy, Shri S Niranjan   
Reddy, Shri V. Vijayasai  
Rupala, Shri Parshottam  
Saini, Dr. Kalpana  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
209

Scindia, Shri Jyotiraditya M.  
Selvaganabathy, Shri S.  
Sen, Ms. Dola  
Sen, Dr. Santanu  
Shanmugam, Shri C. Ve.  
Sharma Dr. Dinesh  
Sharma, Shri Kartikeya   
Shekhar, Shri Neeraj  
Shukla, Shri Rajeev  
Sibal, Shri Kapil  
Singh, Shri A. D.  
Singh, Shri Ajay Pratap  
Singh, Shri Akhilesh Prasad  
Singh, Shri Arun  
Singh, Shrimati Darshana  
Singh, Shri Digvijaya  
Singh, Shri Sant Balbir  
Singhvi, Dr. Abhishek Manu  
Sinha, Shri Rakesh  
Sircar, Shri Jawhar  
Siroya, Shri Lahar Singh  
Siva, Shri Tiruchi  
Sivadasan, Dr. V.  
Solanki, Dr. Sumer Singh  
Somu, Dr. Kanimozhi NVN  
Soni, Shri Kailash  
Sonowal, Shri Sarbananda  
Tanawde, Shri Sadanand Shet  
Tankha, Shri Vivek K.  
Tasa, Shri Kamakhya Prasad  
Thakur, Shri Ram Nath  
Thakur, Shri Vivek  
Thambidurai, Dr. M.  
Tiwari, Shri Ghanshyam  
Tiwari, Shri Pramod  
Tomar, Shri Vijay Pal Singh  
Trivedi, Dr. Sudhanshu  
210
[RAJYA SABHA]

Tulsi, Shri K.T.S.  
Usha, Shrimati P. T.  
Vaddiraju, Shri Ravichandra  
Vaiko, Shri  
Vaishnaw, Shri Ashwini  
Vasan, Shri G.K.  
Vats (Retd.), Lt.Gen. (Dr.) D. P.  
Vemireddy, Shri Prabhakar Reddy  
Venugopal, Shri K.C.  
Verma, Shri B.L.  
Viswam, Shri Binoy  
Wasnik, Shri Mukul Balkrishna  
Wilson, Shri P.  
Yadav, Shri B. Lingaiah  
Yadav, Shri Bhupender  
Yadav, Shri Harnath Singh  
Yadav, Prof. Ram Gopal  
Yadav, Shrimati Sangeeta  
Yajnik, Dr. Amee  
 
The motion was carried by a majority of the total membership of the House and by a 
majority of not less than two-thirds of the Members present and voting. 
 
Clause 2 was added to the Bill. 
 
...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: That is why I said, 'subject to correction'. But for that missing vote, 
he may raise the hand if he likes.  
In Clause 3, there are 13  Amendments.  Amendment (No.3) by Shri Sandosh 
Kumar P; Amendment (No.12) by Shri Abdul Wahab; Am endment (No.13) by Shri 
Deepender Singh Hooda; Amendments (N os.20 to 24) by Dr. John Brittas; 
Amendment (No.32) by Shri K.C. Venugop al; Amendment (No.37) by Shri Binoy 
Viswam; Amendments (Nos.53 and 54) by  Prof. Manoj Kumar Jha; Amendment 
(No.66) by Prof. Ram Gopal Yadav. Shri Sandosh Kumar P, are you moving your 
Amendment? 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
211

Clause 3 - Insertion of new Article 330a- Reservation of seats for women in 
 the House of the People 
 
SHRI SANDOSH KUMAR P. (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.3)  That at page 2, line 3, for the words, "as nearly as may be one-third", 
the word, "half", be substituted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Amendment (No.12) by Shri Abdul Wahab. Are you moving 
your Amendment? 
 
SHRI ABDUL WAHAB (Kerala):  Sir, I move: 
(No.12)  That at page 2, 
after line 8, the following be inserted, namely:- 
"Provided that fifty per cent. of the tota l number of seats so reserved shall be 
reserved for women belonging to the Ot her Backward Classes and the Muslim 
community.". 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN:  Now, Amendment (No.13) by Shri Deepender Singh Hooda.  Are 
you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI DEEPENDER SINGH HOODA (Haryana):  Sir, I move: 
(No.13)  That at page 2, line 5, 
after the word, "Tribes", the word, "or the Other 
Backward Classes" be inserted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Amendments (Nos.20 to 24) by Dr. John Brittas. Are you 
moving your Amendments? 
 
DR. JOHN BRITTAS (Kerala):  Sir, I move: 
(No.20)  That at page 2, line 3, 
after the words "clause (2)", the words "and 
clause (3)", be inserted. 
(No.21)  That at page 2, lines 4 and 5, for the words "or the Scheduled Tribes", 
the words "and the Scheduled Tribes, as the case may be" be substituted. 
(No.22)  That at page 2, after line 5, the following be inserted,:- 
"Provided that where the seat reserv ed for the Scheduled Castes or the 
Scheduled Tribes, as the case may be, in the House of People in relation 
to a State or Union Territory is one, then, in every block comprising of three 
general elections to the House of the People, the seat in the first general 
elections shall be reserved for women belonging to the Scheduled Castes 
212
[RAJYA SABHA]

or the Scheduled Tribes and no seat shall be so reserved in the other two 
general elections." 
 
"Provided further that where the seat s reserved for the Scheduled Castes 
or the Scheduled Tribes, as the case may be, in relation to a State or 
Union Territory are two, then, in ever y block comprising of three general 
elections to the House of the People, -  
(a) one seat shall be reserved for women belonging to the Scheduled 
Castes or the Scheduled Tribes in the first two general elections in such a 
manner that the same constituency is  not reserved for women in both the 
aforesaid elections; and 
(b) no seat shall be reserved for women belonging to the Scheduled 
Castes or the Scheduled Tribes in the third general elections." 
(No.23)  That at page 2, line 8, after the words "House of the People", the 
words "in a State or Union Territory" be inserted. 
(No.24)  That at page 2, after line 8, the following be inserted, namely:- 
"Provided that where the seat, no t being a seat reserved for the 
Scheduled Castes or the Scheduled Tr ibes, in the House of People in 
relation to a State or Union Territory is one, then, in every block comprising 
of three general elections to the House of the People, the seat in the first 
general elections shall be reserved fo r women and no seat shall be so 
reserved for women in the other two general elections.". 
 
"Provided further that where the seats, not being seats reserved for the 
Scheduled Castes or the Scheduled Tribes, in relation to a State or Union 
Territory are two, then in every block comprising of three general elections 
to the House of the People, -  
(a) one seat shall be reserved for women in the first two general elections 
in such a manner that the same consti tuency is not reserved for women in 
both the aforesaid elections; and 
(b) no seat shall be reserved for women in the third general elections." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Amendment (No.32) b y  S h r i  K . C .  V e n u g o p a l .   A r e  y o u  
moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL (Rajasthan): Sir, I move: 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
213

(No.32)  That at page 2, line 5, after the word, "Tribes", the word, "or Other 
Backward Classes", be inserted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Amendment (No.37) by Shri Binoy Viswam.  Shri Binoy 
Viswam, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.37)  That at page 2, 
for lines 2 to 8,the following be substituted, namely:- 
 "330A.  (1) Half of the seats shall be reserved for women in the House of the People 
and Legislative Assemblies of Union Territories, where such a body exists. 
  (2)  A s  n e a r l y  a s  m a y  b e ,  h a l f  o f  t he total number of seats reserved under 
clause (2) of article 330 shall be reserv ed for women belonging to the Scheduled 
Castes or the Scheduled Tribes". 
  (3)  As nearly as may be, half (includi ng the number of seats reserved for 
women belonging to the Scheduled Castes or Scheduled Tribes) of the total number 
of seats to be filled by direct election to the House of the People shall be reserved for 
women". 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Amendments (Nos.53 and 54) by Prof. Manoj Kumar Jha.  
Are you moving your Amendments? 
 
PROF. MANOJ KUMAR JHA (Bihar): Sir, I move: 
(No.53)  That at page 2, lines 6 and 7, the words, "(incl uding the number of 
seats reserved for women belonging to the Scheduled Castes and the Scheduled 
Tribes)" be 
deleted. 
(No.54)  That at page 2, line 8, after the word, "women", the words, " within 
which, seven-and-a-half per cent of seats shall be reserved for women belonging to 
the Scheduled Tribes, fifteen per cent of seats shall be re served for women belonging 
to the Scheduled Castes and twenty-seven per cent of seats shall be reserved for 
women belonging to the Other Backward Cla sses in proportion to their population 
until their population is ascertained in the census" be 
inserted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Amendment (No.66) by Prof. Ram Gopal Yadav. Prof. Ram 
Gopal Yadav, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
PROF. RAM GOPAL YADAV (Uttar Pradesh): Sir, I move: 
214
[RAJYA SABHA]

(No.66)  That at page 2, after line 8, the following be inserted, namely:- "(4) As 
nearly as may be twenty-sev en per cent of seats and fifteen per cent of seats to be 
filled by direct election to the House of People, shall be reserved for women belonging 
to Other Backward Classes and women belonging to minorities, respectively.". 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amen dment (No.3) moved by Shri Sandosh 
Kumar P to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendment (No.12) moved by Shri Abdul 
Wahab to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendment (No.13) moved by Shri Deepender 
Singh Hooda to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendments (Nos.20 to 24) moved by Dr. John 
Brittas to vote.   
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendment (No.32) moved by Shri K.C. 
Venugopal to vote.   
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendment (No.37) moved by Shri Binoy 
Viswam to vote.   
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendm ents (Nos.53 and 54) moved by Prof. 
Manoj Kumar Jha to vote. 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
215

The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendment (No.66) moved by Prof. Ram 
Gopal Yadav to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Clause 3 to vote. 
 The question is: 
  Clause 3 stand part of the Bill. 
 
The House divided.
 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Lobbies are already cleared.  
Ayes:  213 
Noes: 1 
Abstentions: NIL 
 
                                                   Ayes-213 
 
Abdulla, Shri M. Mohamed  
Agrawal, Dr. Anil  
Agrawal, Dr. Radha Mohan Das  
Ahmad, Dr. Faiyaz  
Ali, Shri Gulam  
Alla, Shri Ayodhya Rami Reddy  
Amin, Shri Narhari  
Arora, Shri Sanjeev  
Athawale, Shri Ramdas  
Bachchan, Shrimati Jaya  
Baishya, Shri Birendra Prasad  
Bajpai, Dr. Ashok  
Bajpayee, Dr. Laxmikant  
Bakshi, Shri Subrata  
Balmik, Shrimati Sumitra  
Baluni, Shri Anil  
Bansal, Shri Naresh  
216
[RAJYA SABHA]

Bara, Shrimati Ramilaben Becharbhai  
Baraik, Shri Prakash Chik  
Bhuyan, Shri Ajit Kumar  
Bishi, Shri Niranjan  
Biswas, Shri Abir Ranjan  
Bonde, Dr. Anil Sukhdeorao  
Brijlal, Shri  
Brittas, Dr. John  
Chandrasegharan, Shri N.  
Chandrasekhar, Shri Rajeev  
Chandrashekhar, Shri G.C.  
Chaturvedi, Shrimati Priyanka  
Chaudhary, Shri Jayant  
Chavan, Shrimati Vandana  
Chidambaram, Shri P.  
Dangi, Shri Neeraj  
Deb, Shri Biplab Kumar  
Deo, Shrimati Sulata  
Desai, Shri Anil  
Dharmar, Shri R.  
Divakonda, Shri Damodar Rao  
Dubey, Shri Satish Chandra  
Dwivedi, Shrimati Seema  
Elango, Shri N.R.  
Geeta alias Chandraprabha, Shrimati  
Gehlot, Shri Rajendra  
Girirajan, Shri R.  
Gogoi, Shri Ranjan  
Gohil, Shri Shaktisinh  
Gokhale, Shri Saket  
Goswami, Ms. Indu Bala  
Goyal, Shri Piyush  
Gupta, Shri Prem Chand  
Gupta, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Hanumanthaiah, Dr. L.  
Haque, Shri Mohammed Nadimul  
Harivansh, Shri  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
217

Hegde, Shri Aneel Prasad  
Heggade, Dr. Dharmasthala Veerendra  
Hooda, Shri Deepender Singh  
Hussain, Shri Syed Nasir  
Ilaiyaraaja, Shri  
Islam, Shri Samirul  
Jaggesh, Shri  
Jangra, Shri Ram Chander  
Javadekar, Shri Prakash  
Jesangbhai, Shri Desai Babubhai  
Jethmalani, Shri Mahesh  
Jha, Prof. Manoj Kumar  
Jhala, Shri Kesridevsinh Digvijaysinh  
Joginipally Santosh Kumar, Shri  
Kadadi, Shri Iranna  
Kalita, Shri Bhubaneswar  
Kalyanasundaram, Shri S.  
Kanakamedala Ravindra Kumar, Shri  
Karad, Dr. Bhagwat  
Kardam, Shrimati Kanta  
Kareem, Shri Elamaram  
Karim, Shri Ahmad Ashfaque  
Ketkar, Shri Kumar  
Khan, Dr. Fauzia  
Khan, Shri Javed Ali  
Khan, Shri Muzibulla  
Kharge, Shri Mallikarjun  
Kharlukhi, Dr. Wanweiroy  
Konyak, Shrimati S. Phangnon  
Koragappa, Shri Narayana  
Krishnaiah, Shri Ryaga  
Kumar, Shri Mithlesh  
Kumar, Dr. Sikander  
Kumar, Shri Sujeet  
Lachungpa, Shri Hishey  
Laxman, Dr. K.  
Leishemba, Shri Maharaja Sanajaoba  
218
[RAJYA SABHA]

Mahadik, Shri Dhananjay Bhimrao  
Mahto, Shri Khiru  
Maji, Shrimati Mahua  
Mandaviya, Dr. Mansukh  
Mangaraj, Shri Manas Ranjan  
Mani, Shri Jose K.  
Mansingh, Dr. Sonal  
Margherita, Shri Pabitra  
Mather Hisham, Shrimati Jebi  
Meena, Dr. Kirodi Lal  
Mittal, Dr. Ashok Kumar  
Modi, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Mohanta, Shrimati Mamata  
Mokariya, Shri Rambhai Harjibhai  
Muraleedharan, Shri V.  
Murugan, Dr. L.  
Nadda, Shri Jagat Prakash  
Nagar, Shri Surendra Singh  
Nanda, Dr. Prashanta  
Narzary, Shri Rwngwra  
Nathwani, Shri Parimal  
Netam, Shrimati Phulo Devi  
Nirmala Sitharaman, Shrimati  
Nishad, Shri Baburam  
Noor, Shrimati Mausam  
O' Brien, Shri Derek  
Oraon, Shri Samir  
P, Shri Sandosh Kumar  
Pandey, Ms. Saroj  
Panwar, Shri Krishan Lal   
Patel, Shri Praful  
Patel, Shri Rajmani  
Patel, Shri Shambhu Sharan  
Pathak, Shri Sandeep Kumar  
Patidar, Ms. Kavita  
Patil, Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao  
Patnaik, Dr. Amar  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
219

Patra, Dr. Sasmit  
Pawar, Shri Sharad  
Pilli, Shri Subhas Chandra Bose  
Pradhan, Shri Dharmendra  
Prakash, Shri Deepak  
Prasad, Shri Aditya  
Pratapgarhi, Shri Imran  
Puri, Shri Hardeep Singh  
Rahim, Shri A. A.  
Rajbhar, Shri Sakaldeep  
Ram Shakal, Shri  
Ramadoss, Dr. Anbumani  
Ramesh, Dr. C.M.  
Ramesh, Shri Jairam  
Ramji, Shri  
Rane, Shri Narayan  
Ranjan, Shrimati Ranjeet  
Rao, Shri G.V.L. Narasimha  
Rao, Dr. K. Keshava  
Rathwa, Shri Naranbhai J.  
Raut, Shri Sanjay  
Ray, Shri Nagendra  
Rebia, Shri Nabam  
Reddy, Shri B. Parthasaradhi  
Reddy, Shri K.R. Suresh  
Reddy, Shri S Niran
jan   
Reddy, Shri V. Vijayasai  
Rupala, Shri Parshottam  
Saini, Dr. Kalpana  
Scindia, Shri Jyotiraditya M.  
Selvaganabathy, Shri S.  
Sen, Ms. Dola  
Sen, Dr. Santanu  
Shanmugam, Shri C. Ve.  
Sharma Dr. Dinesh  
Sharma, Shri Kartikeya   
Shekhar, Shri Neeraj  
220
[RAJYA SABHA]

Shukla, Shri Rajeev  
Sibal, Shri Kapil  
Singh, Shri A. D.  
Singh, Shri Ajay Pratap  
Singh, Shri Akhilesh Prasad  
Singh, Shri Arun  
Singh, Shrimati Darshana  
Singh, Shri Digvijaya  
Singh, Shri Sant Balbir  
Singhvi, Dr. Abhishek Manu  
Sinha, Shri Rakesh  
Sircar, Shri Jawhar  
Siroya, Shri Lahar Singh  
Siva, Shri Tiruchi  
Sivadasan, Dr. V.  
Solanki, Dr. Sumer Singh  
Somu, Dr. Kanimozhi NVN  
Soni, Shri Kailash  
Sonowal, Shri Sarbananda  
Tanawde, Shri Sadanand Shet  
Tankha, Shri Vivek K.  
Tasa, Shri Kamakhya Prasad  
Thakur, Shri Ram Nath  
Thakur, Shri Vivek  
Thambidurai, Dr. M.  
Tiwari, Shri Ghanshyam  
Tiwari, Shri Pramod  
Tomar, Shri Vijay Pal Singh  
Trivedi, Dr. Sudhanshu  
Tulsi, Shri K.T.S.  
Usha, Shrimati P. T.  
Vaddiraju, Shri Ravichandra  
Vaiko, Shri  
Vaishnaw, Shri Ashwini  
Vasan, Shri G.K.  
Vats (Retd.), Lt.Gen. (Dr.) D. P.  
Vemireddy, Shri Prabhakar Reddy  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
221

Venugopal, Shri K.C.  
Verma, Shri B.L.  
Viswam, Shri Binoy  
Wasnik, Shri Mukul Balkrishna  
Wilson, Shri P.  
Yadav, Shri B. Lingaiah  
Yadav, Shri Bhupender  
Yadav, Shri Harnath Singh  
Yadav, Prof. Ram Gopal  
Yadav, Shrimati Sangeeta  
Yajnik, Dr. Amee  
Noes: 1 
 
    Abdul Wahab, Shri  
 
The motion was carried by a majority of the total membership of the House and by a 
majority of not less than two-thirds of the Members present and voting. 
 
Clause 3 was added to the Bill. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: We shall now take up Clause 4. There are 12 Amendments; 
Amendment (No.4) by Shri Sandosh Ku mar P.; Amendment (No.14) by Shri 
Deepender Singh Hooda; Amendments (Nos.25 to 27) by Dr. John Brittas; 
Amendment (No.33) by Shri K.C. Venugopal; Amendments (Nos. 38 to 40) by Shri 
Binoy Viswam; Amendments (Nos. 55 to 56) by Prof. Manoj Kumar Jha;  and 
Amendment (No.67) by Prof. Ram Gopal Yadav. 
 Mr. Sandosh Kumar P, are yo u moving your Amendment? 
 
Clause 4 - Insertion of new Article 332a -Reservation of seats for women in the 
Legislative Assemblies of the States 
 
SHRI SANDOSH KUMAR P. (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.4) 
That at page 2, line 11, for the words, "as nearly as  may be one-third", the 
word, "half", be substituted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Mr. Deepender Singh Hooda, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
222
[RAJYA SABHA]

SHRI DEEPENDER SINGH HOODA (Haryana): Yes, Sir. I move: 
(No.14) That at page 2, line 13, after the word, "Scheduled Tribes", the word, "or 
the Other Backward Classes" be inserted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Mr. John Brittas, are you moving your Amendments? 
 
DR. JOHN BRITTAS (Kerala): Yes, Sir, I move:  
(No.25)  Th a t  a t  p a g e  2 ,  l i n e  1 2 ,  after the words "clause (3)", the words ", (3A), 
(3B) and (4)", be inserted. 
 
(No.26) 
That at page 2, after line 13, the following be inserted namely,– 
"Provided that where the seat reserv ed for the Scheduled Castes or the 
Scheduled Tribes, as the case may be, in relation to the Legislative Assembly 
of a State or the National Capital Territory of Delhi is one, then, in every block 
comprising of three general elections to the Legislative Assembly of that 
State, the seat in the first general elections shall be reserved for women 
belonging to the Scheduled Castes or the Scheduled Tribes, as the case may 
be. 
       Provided further that where the seats reserved for the Scheduled Castes 
or the Scheduled Tribes, as  the case may be, in relation to a State are two, 
then, in every block comprising of thre e general elections to the Legislative 
Assembly of that State,—  
(a) one seat shall be reserved for women belonging to the Scheduled Castes 
or the Scheduled Tribes in the first two general elections in such a manner 
that the same constituency is not reserved for women in both the aforesaid 
elections; and  
(b) no seat shall be reserved for wome n belonging to the Scheduled Castes 
or the Scheduled Tribes in the third general elections." 
(No.27) 
That at page 2, after line 17, the following be inserted namely,– 
"Provided that where the seat, not bein g a seat reserved for the Scheduled 
Castes or the Scheduled Tribes, in rela tion to the Legislative Assembly of a 
State or the National Capital Territory of Delhi is one, then, in every block 
comprising of three general elections to  such Legislative Assemblies, the seat 
in the first general elections shall be reserved for women and no seat shall be 
so reserved for women in the other two general elections.  
      Provided further that where th e seats, not being seats reserved for the 
Scheduled Castes or the Scheduled Tribes, in relation to a State or National 
Capital Territory of Delhi are two, then  in every block comprising of three 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
223

general elections to the Legislative Assemblies,— (a) one seat shall be 
reserved for women in the first two general elections in such a manner that the 
same constituency is not reserved for women in both the aforesaid elections; 
and (b) no seat shall be reserved for women in the third general elections." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Mr. Venugopal, are you moving your amendment? 
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL (Rajasthan): Yes, Sir, I move: 
(No.33)  
Th a t  a t  p a g e  2 ,  l i n e  1 3 ,  after the word "Tribes", the words "or Other 
Backward Classes", be inserted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Mr. Binoy Viswam, are you moving your Amendments? 
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM (Kerala): Yes, Sir, I move: 
(No.38) 
That at page 2, line 11, for the word "one-third", the word "half" be 
substituted. 
(No.39) That at page 2, line 14, for the word "one-third", the word "half" be 
substituted. 
(No.40) That at page 2, after line 17, the following be inserted, namely:— 
  "332B. (1) Seats shall be reserved for women in the Legislative Councils 
of States. 
             (2) As nearly as may be, half of the total number of seats in the 
Legislative Councils of States shall be reserved for women." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Prof. Manoj Kumar Jha, are you moving your Amendments? 
 
PROF. MANOJ KUMAR JHA (Bihar): Yes, Sir, I move: 
(No.55) 
That at page 2, lines 14 and 15, the words, "(including the number of 
seats reserved for women belonging to the Scheduled Castes and the 
Scheduled Tribes)" be 
deleted. 
(No.56) That at page 2, line 17, after the word, "women", the words, ", within 
which, seven-and-a-half per cent. of  seats shall be reserved for women 
belonging to the Schedule Tribes, fifteen per cent. of seats shall be 
reserved for women belonging to the Schedule Castes and twenty-seven 
per cent. of seats shall be reserved for women belonging to the Other 
Backward Classes in proportion to their population until their population is 
ascertained in the census" be 
inserted . 
224
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Prof. Ram Gopal Yadav, are you moving your amendment? 
 
PROF. RAM GOPAL YADAV (Uttar Pradesh): Yes, Sir, I move: 
(No.67) That at page 2, after line 17, the following be inserted, namely:— 
       "(4) As nearly as may be twenty-seven  per cent. of seats and fifteen 
per cent. of seats to be filled by direct  election in the Legislative Assembly 
of every State, shall be reserved fo r women belonging to Other Backward 
Classes and women belonging to minorities, respectively." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall first put Amendmen t (No.4) moved by Shri Sandosh Kumar 
P to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendment (No.14) moved by Shri Deepender 
Singh Hooda to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendments (Nos.25 to 27) moved by Dr. John 
Brittas to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendm ent (No.33) moved by Shri K.C. 
Venugopal to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendments  (Nos. 38 to 40) moved by Shri Binoy 
Viswam to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
225

MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendments (Nos. 55 to 56) moved by Prof. Manoj 
Kumar Jha to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendmen t (No.67) moved by Prof. Ram Gopal 
Yadav to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Clause 4 to vote.  
           The question is: 
   That Clause 4 stand part of the Bill. 
 
The House divided.
 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN:  
Ayes : 214 
Noes : 0 
Abstentions : 0 
 
Ayes-214 
 
Abdul Wahab, Shri  
Abdulla, Shri M. Mohamed  
Agrawal, Dr. Anil  
Agrawal, Dr. Radha Mohan Das  
Ahmad, Dr. Faiyaz  
Ali, Shri Gulam  
Alla, Shri Ayodhya Rami Reddy  
Amin, Shri Narhari  
Arora, Shri Sanjeev  
Athawale, Shri Ramdas  
Bachchan, Shrimati Jaya  
Baishya, Shri Birendra Prasad  
Bajpai, Dr. Ashok  
Bajpayee, Dr. Laxmikant  
226
[RAJYA SABHA]

Bakshi, Shri Subrata  
Balmik, Shrimati Sumitra  
Baluni, Shri Anil  
Bansal, Shri Naresh  
Bara, Shrimati Ramilaben Becharbhai  
Baraik, Shri Prakash Chik  
Bhuyan, Shri Ajit Kumar  
Bishi, Shri Niranjan  
Biswas, Shri Abir Ranjan  
Bonde, Dr. Anil Sukhdeorao  
Brijlal, Shri  
Brittas, Dr. John  
Chandrasegharan, Shri N.  
Chandrasekhar, Shri Rajeev  
Chandrashekhar, Shri G.C.  
Chaturvedi, Shrimati Priyanka  
Chaudhary, Shri Jayant  
Chavan, Shrimati Vandana  
Chidambaram, Shri P.  
Dangi, Shri Neeraj  
Deb, Shri Biplab Kumar  
Deo, Shrimati Sulata  
Desai, Shri Anil  
Dharmar, Shri R.  
Divakonda, Shri Damodar Rao  
Dubey, Shri Satish Chandra  
Dwivedi, Shrimati Seema  
Elango, Shri N.R.  
Geeta alias Chandraprabha, Shrimati  
Gehlot, Shri Rajendra  
Girirajan, Shri R.  
Gogoi, Shri Ranjan  
Gohil, Shri Shaktisinh  
Gokhale, Shri Saket  
Goswami, Ms. Indu Bala  
Goyal, Shri Piyush  
Gupta, Shri Prem Chand  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
227

Gupta, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Hanumanthaiah, Dr. L.  
Haque, Shri Mohammed Nadimul  
Harivansh, Shri  
Hegde, Shri Aneel Prasad  
Heggade, Dr. Dharmasthala Veerendra  
Hooda, Shri Deepender Singh  
Hussain, Shri Syed Nasir  
Ilaiyaraaja, Shri  
Islam, Shri Samirul  
Jaggesh, Shri  
Jangra, Shri Ram Chander  
Javadekar, Shri Prakash  
Jesangbhai, Shri Desai Babubhai  
Jethmalani, Shri Mahesh  
Jha, Prof. Manoj Kumar  
Jhala, Shri Kesridevsinh Digvijaysinh  
Joginipally Santosh Kumar, Shri  
Kadadi, Shri Iranna  
Kalita, Shri Bhubaneswar  
Kalyanasundaram, Shri S.  
Kanakamedala Ravindra Kumar, Shri  
Karad, Dr. Bhagwat  
Kardam, Shrimati Kanta  
Kareem, Shri Elamaram  
Karim, Shri Ahmad Ashfaque  
Ketkar, Shri Kumar  
Khan, Dr. Fauzia  
Khan, Shri Javed Ali  
Khan, Shri Muzibulla  
Kharge, Shri Mallikarjun  
Kharlukhi, Dr. Wanweiroy  
Konyak, Shrimati S. Phangnon  
Koragappa, Shri Narayana  
Krishnaiah, Shri Ryaga  
Kumar, Shri Mithlesh  
Kumar, Dr. Sikander  
228
[RAJYA SABHA]

Kumar, Shri Sujeet  
Lachungpa, Shri Hishey  
Laxman, Dr. K.  
Leishemba, Shri Maharaja Sanajaoba  
Mahadik, Shri Dhananjay Bhimrao  
Mahto, Shri Khiru  
Maji, Shrimati Mahua  
Mandaviya, Dr. Mansukh  
Mangaraj, Shri Manas Ranjan  
Mani, Shri Jose K.  
Mansingh, Dr. Sonal  
Margherita, Shri Pabitra  
Mather Hisham, Shrimati Jebi  
Meena, Dr. Kirodi Lal  
Mittal, Dr. Ashok Kumar  
Modi, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Mohanta, Shrimati Mamata  
Mokariya, Shri Rambhai Harjibhai  
Muraleedharan, Shri V.  
Murugan, Dr. L.  
Nadda, Shri Jagat Prakash  
Nagar, Shri Surendra Singh  
Nanda, Dr. Prashanta  
Narzary, Shri Rwngwra  
Nathwani, Shri Parimal  
Netam, Shrimati Phulo Devi  
Nirmala Sitharaman, Shrimati  
Nishad, Shri Baburam  
Noor, Shrimati Mausam  
O' Brien, Shri Derek  
Oraon, Shri Samir  
P, Shri Sandosh Kumar  
Pandey, Ms. Saroj  
Panwar, Shri Krishan Lal   
Patel, Shri Praful  
Patel, Shri Rajmani  
Patel, Shri Shambhu Sharan  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
229

Pathak, Shri Sandeep Kumar  
Patidar, Ms. Kavita  
Patil, Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao  
Patnaik, Dr. Amar  
Patra, Dr. Sasmit  
Pawar, Shri Sharad  
Pilli, Shri Subhas Chandra Bose  
Pradhan, Shri Dharmendra  
Prakash, Shri Deepak  
Prasad, Shri Aditya  
Pratapgarhi, Shri Imran  
Puri, Shri Hardeep Singh  
Rahim, Shri A. A.  
Rajbhar, Shri Sakaldeep  
Ram Shakal, Shri  
Ramadoss, Dr. Anbumani  
Ramesh, Dr. C.M.  
Ramesh, Shri Jairam  
Ramji, Shri  
Rane, Shri Narayan  
Ranjan, Shrimati Ranjeet  
Rao, Shri G.V.L. Narasimha  
Rao, Dr. K. Keshava  
Rathwa, Shri Naranbhai J.  
Raut, Shri Sanjay  
Ray, Shri Nagendra  
Rebia, Shri Nabam  
Reddy, Shri B. Parthasaradhi  
Reddy, Shri K.R. Suresh  
Reddy, Shri S Niranjan   
Reddy, Shri V. Vijayasai  
Rupala, Shri Parshottam  
Saini, Dr. Kalpana  
Scindia, Shri Jyotiraditya M.  
Selvaganabathy, Shri S.  
Sen, Ms. Dola  
Sen, Dr. Santanu  
230
[RAJYA SABHA]

Shanmugam, Shri C. Ve.  
Sharma Dr. Dinesh  
Sharma, Shri Kartikeya   
Shekhar, Shri Neeraj  
Shukla, Shri Rajeev  
Sibal, Shri Kapil  
Singh, Shri A. D.  
Singh, Shri Ajay Pratap  
Singh, Shri Akhilesh Prasad  
Singh, Shri Arun  
Singh, Shrimati Darshana  
Singh, Shri Digvijaya  
Singh, Shri Sant Balbir  
Singhvi, Dr. Abhishek Manu  
Sinha, Shri Rakesh  
Sircar, Shri Jawhar  
Siroya, Shri Lahar Singh  
Siva, Shri Tiruchi  
Sivadasan, Dr. V.  
Solanki, Dr. Sumer Singh  
Somu, Dr. Kanimozhi NVN  
Soni, Shri Kailash  
Sonowal, Shri Sarbananda  
Tanawde, Shri Sadanand Shet  
Tankha, Shri Vivek K.  
Tasa, Shri Kamakhya Prasad  
Thakur, Shri Ram Nath  
Thakur, Shri Vivek  
Thambidurai, Dr. M.  
Tiwari, Shri Ghanshyam  
Tiwari, Shri Pramod  
Tomar, Shri Vijay Pal Singh  
Trivedi, Dr. Sudhanshu  
Tulsi, Shri K.T.S.  
Usha, Shrimati P. T.  
Vaddiraju, Shri Ravichandra  
Vaiko, Shri  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
231

Vaishnaw, Shri Ashwini  
Vasan, Shri G.K.  
Vats (Retd.), Lt.Gen. (Dr.) D. P.  
Vemireddy, Shri Prabhakar Reddy  
Venugopal, Shri K.C.  
Verma, Shri B.L.  
Viswam, Shri Binoy  
Wasnik, Shri Mukul Balkrishna  
Wilson, Shri P.  
Yadav, Shri B. Lingaiah  
Yadav, Shri Bhupender  
Yadav, Shri Harnath Singh  
Yadav, Prof. Ram Gopal  
Yadav, Shrimati Sangeeta  
Yajnik, Dr. Amee  
 
The motion was adopted. 
 
The motion was carried by a majority of the total membership of the House and by a 
majority of not less than two-thirds of the Members present and voting. 
 
Clause 4 was added to the Bill. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: In Clause 5, there are 40 Amendments--Amendments (Nos. 5 to 
9) by Shri Sandosh Kumar P; Amendments (Nos. 15 & 16) by Shri Deepender Singh 
Hooda; Amendment (No.17) by Shrimati Pr iyanka Chaturvedi; Amendments (Nos.28 
to 31) by Dr. John Brittas; Amendm ent (No.34) by Shri K.C. Venugopal; 
Amendments (Nos. 41 to 44) by Shri Binoy Viswam; Amendment (No.46) by Shri 
Elamaram Kareem; Amendment (No.47) by Shri A.A. Rahim; Amendments (Nos. 57 
to 64) by Prof. Manoj Kumar Jha; Amen dment (No.68) by Dr. V. Sivadasan; 
Amendment (No.69) by Shri Syed Nasir Hu ssain; Amendment (No.70) by Shri Dhiraj 
Prasad Sahu; Amendment (No.71) by Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao Patil;  Amendment 
(No.72) by Dr. Amee Yajnik; Amendment (N o.73) by Shrimati Phulo Devi Netam; 
Amendment (No.74) by Shrimati Ranjeet  Ranjan; Amendment (No.75) by Shri 
Rajmani Patel; Amendment (No.76) by Sh rimati Jebi Mather Hisham; Amendment 
(No.77) by Shri Vivek K. Tankha; Amen dment (No.78) by Dr. L. Hanumanthaiah; 
232
[RAJYA SABHA]

Amendment (No.79) by Shri Neeraj Dang i; and Amendment (No.80) by Shrimati 
Mahua Maji.  
Shri Sandosh Kumar P, are you moving your Amendments? 
 
Clause 5 - Insertion of new Article 334A - Reservation of seats for women to take 
effect 
 
SHRI SANDOSH KUMAR P (Kerala): Sir, I move:  
(No.5) That at page 2, for lines 21 to 25, the following be substituted, namely:- 
     "of the People, the Legislative Assembly of a State and the Legislative 
Assembly of a Union Territory, where a Le gislative Assembly exists, shall come 
into effect after the comme ncement of the Act on the dissolution of the XVII th 
Lok Sabha and dissolutions of serving Le gislative Assemblies in the States and 
Union Territories." 
 
(No.6) That at page 2, line 28, for the words, "the National Capital Territory of Delhi", 
the words, "a Union Territory, where a Legislative Assembly exists," be 
substituted. 
(No.7) That at page 2, line 31, for the words, "the National Capital Territory of Delhi", 
the words, "a Union Territory, where a Legislative Assembly exists," be 
substituted. 
 
(No.8) That at page 2, line 35 and 36, for the words, "the National Capital Territory of 
Delhi", the words, "a Union Territory", be substituted. 
 
(No.9) That at page 2, line 37, for the words, "the National Capital Territory of Delhi", 
the words, "a Union Territory, where a Legislative Assembly exists, " be 
substituted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Deepender Singh Hooda, are you moving your Amendments? 
 
SHRI DEEPENDER SINGH HOODA (Haryana): Sir, I move: 
(No.15) That at page 2, for lines 22 to 25, the following be substituted, namely:— 
  "Capital Territory of Delhi shall co me into effect immediately after the 
commencement of the Constitution (One Hundred and Sixth Amendment) 
Act, 2023 has been published. " 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
233

(No.16) That at page 2, after line 25, the following be inserted, namely:— 
  "(1A) The Central Government shall, fo r carrying the purposes of this 
Act, conduct a caste base d Census covering the entire country so as to 
empower and include the marginalized sections of the society including 
the Other Backward Classes, in such manner as may be specified in the 
rules." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shrimati  Priyanka Chaturvedi, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRIMATI  PRIYANKA CHATURVEDI (Maharashtra): Sir, I move: 
(No.17) 
That at page 2, for lines 22 to 25, the following be substituted, namely:— 
  "Capital Territory of Delhi shall co me into effect immediately after the 
commencement of the Constitution (One Hundred and Sixth Amendment) 
Act, 2023 has been published." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Dr. John Brittas, are you moving your Amendments? 
 
DR. JOHN BRITTAS (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.28)  
That at page 2, lines 22 to 24, for the words "after an exercise of delimitation 
is undertaken for this purpose after th e relevant figures for the first census 
taken after commencement of the Cons titution (One Hundred and Sixth 
Amendment) Act, 2023 have been published", the words "from the date of 
commencement of this Act", be 
substituted. 
(No.29) That at page 2, lines 26 to 29, be deleted. 
(No.30) That at page 2, line 30, for the word "Rotation", the words "In the first 
instance, the identification", be substituted. 
(No.31) That at page 2, line 32, for the words "shall take effect after each subsequent 
exercise of delimitation", the words "shall be made by draw of lots and 
subsequent rotation of seats shall be ma de in such manner, save as provided 
in the foregoing provisions of this Act", be 
substituted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri K.C. Venugopal, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI K.C. VENUGOPAL (Rajasthan): Sir, I move: 
(No.34)  
That at page 2, lines 22 and 23, for the words "after an exercise of 
delimitation is undertaken for this purpose after the relevant figures for the first 
234
[RAJYA SABHA]

census taken", the word "immediately", be substituted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Binoy Viswam, are you moving your Amendments? 
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.41) That at page 2, for lines 21 to 25, the following be substituted, namely:- 
     "of the people, the Legislative Assembly of a State, Legislative Council 
of a State where such a Council exists and a Union Territory with 
Legislative Assembly shall come into  effect after th e commencement of 
the Act on the dissolution of the XVII
th Lok Sabha and dissolutions of 
serving Legislative Assemblies in the States and Union Territories." 
 
(No.42) That at page 2, for lines 27 and 28, the following be substituted, namely:-  
  "women in the House of the people, the Legislative Assembly of a State, 
the Legislative Council of a State where such a Council exists and a Union 
Territory with Legislative Assembly shall continue till such date as the". 
 
(No.43) That at page 2, for line 31, the following be substituted, namely:-  
  "Assembly of a State, the Legisl ative Council of a State where such a 
Council exists and a Union Territory with Legislative Assembly". 
 
(No.44) That at page 2, for lines 35 to 37, the following be substituted, namely:-  
  "Legislative Assembly of a Stat e, the Legislative Council of a State 
where such a Council exists or Legi slative Assembly of a Union Territory 
until the dissolution of the existing House of the People, the Legislative 
Assembly of a State or Legislative Assembly of a Union Territory." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Elamaram Kareem, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI ELAMARAM KAREEM (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.46)  
That at page 2, lines 19 to 25, be deleted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri A. A. Rahim, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI A. A. RAHIM (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.47) 
That at page 2, lines 19 to 25 be deleted. 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
235

MR. CHAIRMAN: Prof. Manoj Kumar Jha, are you moving your Amendments? 
 
PROF. MANOJ KUMAR JHA (Bihar): Sir, I move: 
(No.57)  That at page 2, line 22, after the word, "Delhi", the words, ", the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Jammu and Kashmir and the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Puducherry" be 
inserted. 
(No.58) That at page 2, lines 24 and 25, the wo rds, "and shall cease to have effect 
on the expiration of a period of fi teen years from such commencement" 
shall be deleted. 
(No.590 That at page 2, line 28, after the word, "Delhi", the words, ", the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Jammu and Kashmir and the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Puducherry" be 
inserted. 
(No.60) That at page 2, line 28, after the word, "Delhi", the words, ", the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Jammu and Kashmir and the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Puducherry" be inserted. 
(No.61) That at page 2, line 36, after the word, "Delhi", the words, ", the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Jammu and Kashmir and the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Puducherry" be inserted. 
(No.62) That at page 2, line 37, after the word, "Delhi , the words, ", the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Jammu and Kashmir and the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Puducherry" be inserted. 
(No.63) That at page 2, line 40, after the word, "Delhi", the words, ", the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Jammu and Kashmir and the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Puducherry" be inserted. 
(No.64) That at page 2, line 42, after the word, "Delhi", the words, ", the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Jammu and Kashmir and the 
Legislative Assembly of the Union Territory of Puducherry" be 
inserted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Dr. V. Sivadasan, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
DR. V. SIVADASAN (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.68)  That at page 2, lines 19 to 25, be deleted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Syed Nasir Hussain, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI SYED NASIR HUSSAIN (Karnataka): Sir, I move: 
236
[RAJYA SABHA]

(No.69)  That at page 2, after line 13, the following be inserted, namely–  
"(2A) As nearly as may be, one-tent h of total number of seats reserved 
under clause (3) of article 332 shall be reserved for woman belonging to 
Other Backward Castes." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Dhiraj Prasad Sahu, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI DHIRAJ PRASAD SAHU (Jharkhand): Sir, I move: 
(No.70)  
That at page 2, after line 13, the following be inserted, namely–  
"(2A) As nearly as may be, one-tent h of total number of seats reserved 
under clause (3) of article 332 shall be reserved for woman belonging to 
Other Backward Castes." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao Patil, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRIMATI  RAJANI ASHOKRAO PATIL (Maharashtra): Sir, I move: 
(No.71) 
That at page 2, for lines 22 to 25, the following be substituted namely,– 
 "Capital Territory of Delhi shall cease to  have effect on the expiration of a 
period of fifteen years from the co mmencement of the Constitution (One 
Hundred and Sixth Amendment) Act, 2023." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Dr. Amee Yajnik, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
DR. AMEE YAJNIK (Gujarat): Sir, I move: 
(No.72) That at page 2, for lines 22 to 25, the following be substituted namely,– 
 "Capital Territory of Delhi shall cease to  have effect on th e expiration of a 
period of fifteen years from the co mmencement of the Constitution (One 
Hundred and Sixth Amendment) Act, 2023." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shrimati Phulo Devi Netam, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRIMATI PHULO DEVI NETAM (Chhattisgarh): Sir, I move: 
(No.73)  
That at page 2, for lines 22 to 25, the following be substituted namely,– 
 "Capital Territory of Delhi shall cease to  have effect on th e expiration of a 
period of fifteen years from the co mmencement of the Constitution (One 
Hundred and Sixth Amendment) Act, 2023." 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
237

MR. CHAIRMAN: Shrimati Ranjeet Ranjan, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRIMATI RANJEET RANJAN (Chhattisgarh): Sir, I move:  
(No.74)  
That at page 2, for lines 22 to 25, the following be substituted namely,– 
 "Capital Territory of Delhi shall cease to  have effect on the expiration of a 
period of fifteen years from the co mmencement of the Constitution (One 
Hundred and Sixth Amendment) Act, 2023." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Rajmani Patel, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI RAJMANI PATEL (Madhya Pradesh): Sir, I move: 
(No.75)  That at page 2, after line 13, the following be inserted namely,– 
 "(2A) As nearly as may be, one-tent h of total number of seats reserved 
under clause (3) of article 332 shall be reserved for woman belonging to 
Other Backward Castes." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shrimati Jebi Mather Hisham, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRIMATI JEBI MATHER HISHAM (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.76) 
That at page 2, for lines 22 to 25, the following be substituted namely,– 
 "Capital Territory of Delhi shall cease to  have effect on th e expiration of a 
period of fifteen years from the co mmencement of the Constitution (One 
Hundred and Sixth Amendment) Act, 2023. " 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Vivek K. Tankha, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI VIVEK K. TANKHA (Madhya Pradesh): Sir, I move: 
(No.77)  
That at page 2, lines 22, after the words "Capital Territory of Delhi", the 
words "shall come into effect at once", be Inserted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Dr. L. Hanumanthaiah, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
DR. L. HANUMANTHAIAH (Karnataka): Sir, I move:  
(No.78) 
That at page 2, for lines 22 to 25, the following be substituted namely,– 
 "Capital Territory of Delhi shall cease to  have effect on th e expiration of a 
period of fifteen years from the co mmencement of the Constitution (One 
Hundred and Sixth Amendment) Act, 2023." 
238
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Neeraj Dangi, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI NEERAJ DANGI (Rajasthan): Sir, I move:  
(No.79) That at page 2, after line 13, the following be inserted namely,– 
 "(2A) As nearly as may be, one-tent h of total number of seats reserved 
under clause (3) of article 332 shall be reserved for woman belonging to 
Other Backward Castes." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shrimati Mahua Maji, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRIMATI  MAHUA MAJI (Jharkhand): Sir, I move:  
(No.80) 
That at page 2, after line 13, the following be inserted namely,– 
 "(2A) As nearly as may be, one-tent h of total number of seats reserved 
under clause (3) of article 332 shall be reserved for woman belonging to 
Other Backward Castes." 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Amendments moved. I sha ll now put Amendments (Nos. 5 to 9) 
moved by Shri Sandosh Kumar P to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendmen ts (Nos. 15 & 16) moved by Shri 
Deepender Singh Hooda to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
...(Interruptions)... 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Nothing else will go on record. ...(Interruptions)... 
 
I shall now put Amendment (No. 17) moved by Shrimati Priyanka Chaturvedi to 
vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
239

MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendmen ts (Nos. 28 to 31) moved by Dr. John 
Brittas to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendm ent (No. 34) moved by Shri K.C. 
Venugopal to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendments (Nos. 41 to 44) moved by Shri Binoy 
Viswam to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendmen t (No. 46) moved by Shri Elamaram 
Kareem to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendment (N o. 47) moved by Shri A.A. Rahim to 
vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendments (Nos. 57 to 64) moved by Prof.  
Manoj Kumar Jha to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendment (No. 68) moved by Dr. V. Sivadasan to 
vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendment (No. 69) moved by Shri Syed Nasir 
Hussain to vote. 
240
[RAJYA SABHA]

 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendment (No.70) moved by Shri Dhiraj Prasad 
Sahu to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendment (No. 71) moved by Shrimati Rajani 
Ashokrao Patil to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendment (No. 72) moved by Dr. Amee Yajnik to 
vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendment (No. 73) moved by Shrimati Phulo Devi 
Netam to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Amendmen t (No.74) moved by Shrimati Ranjeet 
Ranjan to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
11.00 P.M. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendment (No. 75) moved by Shri Rajmani 
Patel to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendm ent (No. 76) moved by Shrimati Jebi 
Mather Hisham to vote. 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
241

 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendment (No. 77) moved by Shri Vivek K. 
Tankha to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Am endment (No. 78) moved by Dr. L. 
Hanumanthaiah to vote.   
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendment (No. 79) moved by Shri Neeraj 
Dangi to vote.   
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendment (No. 80) moved by Shrimati Mahua 
Maji to vote.   
 
The motion was negatived. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Clause 5 to vote.  The question is: 
   That Clause 5 stand part of the Bill.  
 
SOME HON. MEMBERS: Sir, we want division. 
 
The House divided.
 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN:  
Ayes :  214 
Noes : NIL 
Abstentions : NIL 
 
Ayes- 214 
 
242
[RAJYA SABHA]

Abdul Wahab, Shri  
Abdulla, Shri M. Mohamed  
Agrawal, Dr. Anil  
Agrawal, Dr. Radha Mohan Das  
Ahmad, Dr. Faiyaz  
Ali, Shri Gulam  
Alla, Shri Ayodhya Rami Reddy  
Amin, Shri Narhari  
Arora, Shri Sanjeev  
Athawale, Shri Ramdas  
Bachchan, Shrimati Jaya  
Baishya, Shri Birendra Prasad  
Bajpai, Dr. Ashok  
Bajpayee, Dr. Laxmikant  
Bakshi, Shri Subrata  
Balmik, Shrimati Sumitra  
Baluni, Shri Anil  
Bansal, Shri Naresh  
Bara, Shrimati Ramilaben Becharbhai  
Baraik, Shri Prakash Chik  
Bhuyan, Shri Ajit Kumar  
Bishi, Shri Niranjan  
Biswas, Shri Abir Ranjan  
Bonde, Dr. Anil Sukhdeorao  
Brijlal, Shri  
Brittas, Dr. John  
Chandrasegharan, Shri N.  
Chandrasekhar, Shri Rajeev  
Chandrashekhar, Shri G.C.  
Chaturvedi, Shrimati Priyanka  
Chaudhary, Shri Jayant  
Chavan, Shrimati Vandana  
Chidambaram, Shri P.  
Dangi, Shri Neeraj  
Deb, Shri Biplab Kumar  
Deo, Shrimati Sulata  
Desai, Shri Anil  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
243

Dharmar, Shri R.  
Divakonda, Shri Damodar Rao  
Dubey, Shri Satish Chandra  
Dwivedi, Shrimati Seema  
Elango, Shri N.R.  
Geeta alias Chandraprabha, Shrimati  
Gehlot, Shri Rajendra  
Girirajan, Shri R.  
Gogoi, Shri Ranjan  
Gohil, Shri Shaktisinh  
Gokhale, Shri Saket  
Goswami, Ms. Indu Bala  
Goyal, Shri Piyush  
Gupta, Shri Prem Chand  
Gupta, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Hanumanthaiah, Dr. L.  
Haque, Shri Mohammed Nadimul  
Harivansh, Shri  
Hegde, Shri Aneel Prasad  
Heggade, Dr. Dharmasthala Veerendra  
Hooda, Shri Deepender Singh  
Hussain, Shri Syed Nasir  
Ilaiyaraaja, Shri  
Islam, Shri Samirul  
Jaggesh, Shri  
Jangra, Shri Ram Chander  
Javadekar, Shri Prakash  
Jesangbhai, Shri Desai Babubhai  
Jethmalani, Shri Mahesh  
Jha, Prof. Manoj Kumar  
Jhala, Shri Kesridevsinh Digvijaysinh  
Joginipally Santosh Kumar, Shri  
Kadadi, Shri Iranna  
Kalita, Shri Bhubaneswar  
Kalyanasundaram, Shri S.  
Kanakamedala Ravindra Kumar, Shri  
Karad, Dr. Bhagwat  
244
[RAJYA SABHA]

Kardam, Shrimati Kanta  
Kareem, Shri Elamaram  
Karim, Shri Ahmad Ashfaque  
Ketkar, Shri Kumar  
Khan, Dr. Fauzia  
Khan, Shri Javed Ali  
Khan, Shri Muzibulla  
Kharge, Shri Mallikarjun  
Kharlukhi, Dr. Wanweiroy  
Konyak, Shrimati S. Phangnon  
Koragappa, Shri Narayana  
Krishnaiah, Shri Ryaga  
Kumar, Shri Mithlesh  
Kumar, Dr. Sikander  
Kumar, Shri Sujeet  
Lachungpa, Shri Hishey  
Laxman, Dr. K.  
Leishemba, Shri Maharaja Sanajaoba  
Mahadik, Shri Dhananjay Bhimrao  
Mahto, Shri Khiru  
Maji, Shrimati Mahua  
Mandaviya, Dr. Mansukh  
Mangaraj, Shri Manas Ranjan  
Mani, Shri Jose K.  
Mansingh, Dr. Sonal  
Margherita, Shri Pabitra  
Mather Hisham, Shrimati Jebi  
Meena, Dr. Kirodi Lal  
Mittal, Dr. Ashok Kumar  
Modi, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Mohanta, Shrimati Mamata  
Mokariya, Shri Rambhai Harjibhai  
Muraleedharan, Shri V.  
Murugan, Dr. L.  
Nadda, Shri Jagat Prakash  
Nagar, Shri Surendra Singh  
Nanda, Dr. Prashanta  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
245

Narzary, Shri Rwngwra  
Nathwani, Shri Parimal  
Netam, Shrimati Phulo Devi  
Nirmala Sitharaman, Shrimati  
Nishad, Shri Baburam  
Noor, Shrimati Mausam  
O' Brien, Shri Derek  
Oraon, Shri Samir  
P, Shri Sandosh Kumar  
Pandey, Ms. Saroj  
Panwar, Shri Krishan Lal   
Patel, Shri Praful  
Patel, Shri Rajmani  
Patel, Shri Shambhu Sharan  
Pathak, Shri Sandeep Kumar  
Patidar, Ms. Kavita  
Patil, Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao  
Patnaik, Dr. Amar  
Patra, Dr. Sasmit  
Pawar, Shri Sharad  
Pilli, Shri Subhas Chandra Bose  
Pradhan, Shri Dharmendra  
Prakash, Shri Deepak  
Prasad, Shri Aditya  
Pratapgarhi, Shri Imran  
Puri, Shri Hardeep Singh  
Rahim, Shri A. A.  
Rajbhar, Shri Sakaldeep  
Ram Shakal, Shri  
Ramadoss, Dr. Anbumani  
Ramesh, Dr. C.M.  
Ramesh, Shri Jairam  
Ramji, Shri  
Rane, Shri Narayan  
Ranjan, Shrimati Ranjeet  
Rao, Shri G.V.L. Narasimha  
Rao, Dr. K. Keshava  
246
[RAJYA SABHA]

Rathwa, Shri Naranbhai J.  
Raut, Shri Sanjay  
Ray, Shri Nagendra  
Rebia, Shri Nabam  
Reddy, Shri B. Parthasaradhi  
Reddy, Shri K.R. Suresh  
Reddy, Shri S Niranjan   
Reddy, Shri V. Vijayasai  
Rupala, Shri Parshottam  
Saini, Dr. Kalpana  
Scindia, Shri Jyotiraditya M.  
Selvaganabathy, Shri S.  
Sen, Ms. Dola  
Sen, Dr. Santanu  
Shanmugam, Shri C. Ve.  
Sharma Dr. Dinesh 
Sharma, Shri Kartikeya   
Shekhar, Shri Neeraj  
Shukla, Shri Rajeev  
Sibal, Shri Kapil  
Singh, Shri A. D.  
Singh, Shri Ajay Pratap  
Singh, Shri Akhilesh Prasad  
Singh, Shri Arun  
Singh, Shrimati Darshana  
Singh, Shri Digvijaya  
Singh, Shri Sant Balbir  
Singhvi, Dr. Abhishek Manu  
Sinha, Shri Rakesh  
Sircar, Shri Jawhar  
Siroya, Shri Lahar Singh  
Siva, Shri Tiruchi  
Sivadasan, Dr. V.  
Solanki, Dr. Sumer Singh  
Somu, Dr. Kanimozhi NVN  
Soni, Shri Kailash  
Sonowal, Shri Sarbananda  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
247

Tanawde, Shri Sadanand Shet  
Tankha, Shri Vivek K.  
Tasa, Shri Kamakhya Prasad  
Thakur, Shri Ram Nath  
Thakur, Shri Vivek  
Thambidurai, Dr. M.  
Tiwari, Shri Ghanshyam  
Tiwari, Shri Pramod  
Tomar, Shri Vijay Pal Singh  
Trivedi, Dr. Sudhanshu  
Tulsi, Shri K.T.S.  
Usha, Shrimati P. T.  
Vaddiraju, Shri Ravichandra  
Vaiko, Shri  
Vaishnaw, Shri Ashwini  
Vasan, Shri G.K.  
Vats (Retd.), Lt.Gen. (Dr.) D. P.  
Vemireddy, Shri Prabhakar Reddy  
Venugopal, Shri K.C.  
Verma, Shri B.L.  
Viswam, Shri Binoy  
Wasnik, Shri Mukul Balkrishna  
Wilson, Shri P.  
Yadav, Shri B. Lingaiah  
Yadav, Shri Bhupender  
Yadav, Shri Harnath Singh  
Yadav, Prof. Ram Gopal  
Yadav, Shrimati Sangeeta  
Yajnik, Dr. Amee  
 
The motion was carried by a majority of the total membership of the House and by a 
majority of not less than two-thirds of the Members present and voting. 
 
Clause 5 was added to the Bill. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: We shall now take up Clause  6 of the Bill. In Clause 6, there are 
three Amendments, Amendments (Nos. 10 and 11) by Shri Sa ndosh Kumar P; and 
248
[RAJYA SABHA]

Amendment (No. 45) by Shri Binoy Viswam . Shri Sandosh Kumar P, are you moving 
your Amendments? 
 
Clause 6- Amendment not to affect reservation in the House of the People, The 
Legislative Assembly of a State or the Legislative Assembly of the 
 National Capital Territory of Delhi 
 
SHRI SANDOSH KUMAR P (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.10.) That at page 2, line 40 and 36, for the words, "the National Capital Territory 
of Delhi", the words, "a Union Terr itory, where a Legislative Assembly 
exists," be substituted. 
 
(No.11.) That at page 2, line 42, for the words, "the National Capital Territory of 
Delhi", the words, "the Union Territory", be substituted. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Binoy Viswam, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM (Kerala): Sir, I move: 
(No.45) 
That at page 2, for lines 40 to 42, the following be substituted, namely:-  
  "Assembly of a State, the Legisl ative Council of a State where such a 
Council exists or a Legislative Assembly of a Union Territory until the 
dissolution of House of the People, the Legislative Assembly of a State or the 
Legislative Assembly of a Union Territo ry, as the case may be, in existence 
at the". 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Amendments moved. I sha ll first put the Amendments (Nos. 10 & 
11) moved by Shri Sandosh Kumar P to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put the Amendment (No. 45) moved by Shri Binoy 
Viswam to vote. 
 
The motion was negatived.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now put Clause 6 to vote. The question is: 
   That Clause 6 stand part of the Bill.  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
249

  
The House divided. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: 
Ayes : 213 
Noes  : Nil 
Abstentions : Nil 
 
Ayes - 213 
 
Abdul Wahab, Shri  
Abdulla, Shri M. Mohamed  
Agrawal, Dr. Anil  
Agrawal, Dr. Radha Mohan Das  
Ahmad, Dr. Faiyaz  
Ali, Shri Gulam  
Alla, Shri Ayodhya Rami Reddy  
Amin, Shri Narhari  
Arora, Shri Sanjeev  
Athawale, Shri Ramdas  
Bachchan, Shrimati Jaya  
Baishya, Shri Birendra Prasad  
Bajpai, Dr. Ashok  
Bajpayee, Dr. Laxmikant  
Bakshi, Shri Subrata  
Balmik, Shrimati Sumitra  
Baluni, Shri Anil  
Bansal, Shri Naresh  
Bara, Shrimati Ramilaben Becharbhai  
Baraik, Shri Prakash Chik  
Bhuyan, Shri Ajit Kumar  
Bishi, Shri Niranjan  
Biswas, Shri Abir Ranjan  
Bonde, Dr. Anil Sukhdeorao  
Brijlal, Shri  
Brittas, Dr. John  
Chandrasegharan, Shri N.  
250
[RAJYA SABHA]

Chandrasekhar, Shri Rajeev  
Chandrashekhar, Shri G.C.  
Chaturvedi, Shrimati Priyanka  
Chaudhary, Shri Jayant  
Chavan, Shrimati Vandana  
Chidambaram, Shri P.  
Dangi, Shri Neeraj  
Deb, Shri Biplab Kumar  
Deo, Shrimati Sulata  
Desai, Shri Anil  
Dharmar, Shri R.  
Divakonda, Shri Damodar Rao  
Dubey, Shri Satish Chandra  
Dwivedi, Shrimati Seema  
Elango, Shri N.R.  
Geeta alias Chandraprabha, Shrimati  
Gehlot, Shri Rajendra  
Girirajan, Shri R.  
Gogoi, Shri Ranjan  
Gohil, Shri Shaktisinh  
Gokhale, Shri Saket  
Goswami, Ms. Indu Bala  
Goyal, Shri Piyush  
Gupta, Shri Prem Chand  
Gupta, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Hanumanthaiah, Dr. L.  
Haque, Shri Mohammed Nadimul  
Harivansh, Shri  
Hegde, Shri Aneel Prasad  
Heggade, Dr. Dharmasthala Veerendra  
Hooda, Shri Deepender Singh  
Hussain, Shri Syed Nasir  
Ilaiyaraaja, Shri  
Islam, Shri Samirul  
Jaggesh, Shri  
Jangra, Shri Ram Chander  
Javadekar, Shri Prakash  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
251

Jesangbhai, Shri Desai Babubhai  
Jethmalani, Shri Mahesh  
Jha, Prof. Manoj Kumar  
Jhala, Shri Kesridevsinh Digvijaysinh  
Joginipally Santosh Kumar, Shri  
Kadadi, Shri Iranna  
Kalita, Shri Bhubaneswar  
Kalyanasundaram, Shri S.  
Kanakamedala Ravindra Kumar, Shri       
Karad, Dr. Bhagwat  
Kardam, Shrimati Kanta  
Kareem, Shri Elamaram  
Karim, Shri Ahmad Ashfaque  
Ketkar, Shri Kumar  
Khan, Dr. Fauzia  
Khan, Shri Javed Ali  
Khan, Shri Muzibulla  
Kharge, Shri Mallikarjun  
Kharlukhi, Dr. Wanweiroy  
Konyak, Shrimati S. Phangnon  
Koragappa, Shri Narayana  
Krishnaiah, Shri Ryaga  
Kumar, Shri Mithlesh  
Kumar, Dr. Sikander  
Kumar, Shri Sujeet  
Lachungpa, Shri Hishey  
Laxman, Dr. K.  
Leishemba, Shri Maharaja Sanajaoba  
Mahadik, Shri Dhananjay Bhimrao  
Mahto, Shri Khiru  
Maji, Shrimati Mahua  
Mandaviya, Dr. Mansukh  
Mangaraj, Shri Manas Ranjan  
Mani, Shri Jose K.  
Mansingh, Dr. Sonal  
Margherita, Shri Pabitra  
Mather Hisham, Shrimati Jebi  
252
[RAJYA SABHA]

Meena, Dr. Kirodi Lal  
Mittal, Dr. Ashok Kumar  
Modi, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Mohanta, Shrimati Mamata  
Mokariya, Shri Rambhai Harjibhai  
Muraleedharan, Shri V.  
Murugan, Dr. L.  
Nadda, Shri Jagat Prakash  
Nagar, Shri Surendra Singh  
Nanda, Dr. Prashanta  
Narzary, Shri Rwngwra  
Nathwani, Shri Parimal  
Netam, Shrimati Phulo Devi  
Nirmala Sitharaman, Shrimati  
Nishad, Shri Baburam  
Noor, Shrimati Mausam  
O' Brien, Shri Derek  
Oraon, Shri Samir  
P, Shri Sandosh Kumar  
Pandey, Ms. Saroj  
Panwar, Shri Krishan Lal   
Patel, Shri Praful  
Patel, Shri Rajmani  
Patel, Shri Shambhu Sharan  
Pathak, Shri Sandeep Kumar  
Patidar, Ms. Kavita  
Patil, Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao  
Patnaik, Dr. Amar  
Patra, Dr. Sasmit  
Pawar, Shri Sharad  
Pilli, Shri Subhas Chandra Bose  
Pradhan, Shri Dharmendra  
Prakash, Shri Deepak  
Prasad, Shri Aditya  
Pratapgarhi, Shri Imran  
Puri, Shri Hardeep Singh  
Rahim, Shri A. A.  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
253

Rajbhar, Shri Sakaldeep  
Ram Shakal, Shri  
Ramadoss, Dr. Anbumani  
Ramesh, Dr. C.M.  
Ramesh, Shri Jairam  
Ramji, Shri  
Rane, Shri Narayan  
Ranjan, Shrimati Ranjeet  
Rao, Shri G.V.L. Narasimha  
Rao, Dr. K. Keshava  
Rathwa, Shri Naranbhai J.  
Raut, Shri Sanjay  
Ray, Shri Nagendra  
Rebia, Shri Nabam  
Reddy, Shri B. Parthasaradhi  
Reddy, Shri K.R. Suresh  
Reddy, Shri S Niranjan   
Reddy, Shri V. Vijayasai  
Rupala, Shri Parshottam  
Saini, Dr. Kalpana  
Scindia, Shri Jyotiraditya M.  
Selvaganabathy, Shri S.  
Sen, Ms. Dola  
Sen, Dr. Santanu  
Shanmugam, Shri C. Ve.  
Sharma Dr. Dinesh  
Sharma, Shri Kartikeya   
Shekhar, Shri Neeraj  
Shukla, Shri Rajeev  
Sibal, Shri Kapil  
Singh, Shri A. D.  
Singh, Shri Ajay Pratap  
Singh, Shri Akhilesh Prasad  
Singh, Shri Arun  
Singh, Shrimati Darshana  
Singh, Shri Digvijaya  
Singh, Shri Sant Balbir  
254
[RAJYA SABHA]

Singhvi, Dr. Abhishek Manu  
Sinha, Shri Rakesh  
Sircar, Shri Jawhar  
Siroya, Shri Lahar Singh  
Siva, Shri Tiruchi  
Sivadasan, Dr. V.  
Solanki, Dr. Sumer Singh  
Somu, Dr. Kanimozhi NVN  
Soni, Shri Kailash  
Sonowal, Shri Sarbananda  
Tanawde, Shri Sadanand Shet  
Tankha, Shri Vivek K.  
Tasa, Shri Kamakhya Prasad  
Thakur, Shri Vivek  
Thambidurai, Dr. M.  
Tiwari, Shri Ghanshyam  
Tiwari, Shri Pramod  
Tomar, Shri Vijay Pal Singh  
Trivedi, Dr. Sudhanshu  
Tulsi, Shri K.T.S.  
Usha, Shrimati P. T.  
Vaddiraju, Shri Ravichandra  
Vaiko, Shri  
Vaishnaw, Shri Ashwini  
Vasan, Shri G.K.  
Vats (Retd.), Lt.Gen. (Dr.) D. P.  
Vemireddy, Shri Prabhakar Reddy  
Venugopal, Shri K.C.  
Verma, Shri B.L.  
Viswam, Shri Binoy  
Wasnik, Shri Mukul Balkrishna  
Wilson, Shri P.  
Yadav, Shri B. Lingaiah  
Yadav, Shri Bhupender  
Yadav, Shri Harnath Singh  
Yadav, Prof. Ram Gopal  
Yadav, Shrimati Sangeeta  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
255

Yajnik, Dr. Amee  
 
The motion was carried by a majority of the total membership of the House and by a 
majority of not less than two-thirds of the Members present and voting. 
 
Clause 6 was added to the Bill. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: In Clause 1, there are th ree Amendments; Amen dment (No. 1) by 
Shri Sandosh Kumar P; Amendment (No.18 ) by Dr. John Brittas; and Amendment 
(No.35) by Shri Binoy Viswam.  Shri Sandosh Kumar P, are you moving your 
Amendment? 
 
SHRI SANDOSH KUMAR P: Sir, I am not moving my Amendment.   
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Dr. John Brittas, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
DR. JOHN BRITTAS: Sir, not moving it expecting that the Government will implement 
it in 2024 elections.  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Shri Binoy Viswam, are you moving your Amendment? 
 
SHRI BINOY VISWAM: Sir, I am not moving  it hoping that the Government will 
implement the Bill immediately. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: So, none of the Amendments  have been moved. I shall now take 
up Clause 1.  The question is: 
 That Clause 1 stand part of the Bill. 
The House divided.
 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN:  
Ayes :  214 
Noes  : Nil 
Abstentions : Nil 
 
Ayes-214 
 
Abdul Wahab, Shri 
256
[RAJYA SABHA]

Abdulla, Shri M. Mohamed 
Agrawal, Dr. Anil 
Agrawal, Dr. Radha Mohan Das 
Ahmad, Dr. Faiyaz 
Ali, Shri Gulam 
Alla, Shri Ayodhya Rami Reddy 
Amin, Shri Narhari 
Arora, Shri Sanjeev 
Athawale, Shri Ramdas 
Bachchan, Shrimati Jaya 
Baishya, Shri Birendra Prasad 
Bajpai, Dr. Ashok 
Bajpayee, Dr. Laxmikant 
Bakshi, Shri Subrata 
Balmik, Shrimati Sumitra 
Baluni, Shri Anil 
Bansal, Shri Naresh 
Bara, Shrimati Ramilaben Becharbhai 
Baraik, Shri Prakash Chik 
Bhuyan, Shri Ajit Kumar 
Bishi, Shri Niranjan 
Biswas, Shri Abir Ranjan 
Bonde, Dr. Anil Sukhdeorao 
Brijlal, Shri 
Brittas, Dr. John 
Chandrasegharan, Shri N. 
Chandrasekhar, Shri Rajeev 
Chandrashekhar, Shri G.C. 
Chaturvedi, Shrimati Priyanka 
Chaudhary, Shri Jayant 
Chavan, Shrimati Vandana 
Chidambaram, Shri P. 
Dangi, Shri Neeraj 
Deb, Shri Biplab Kumar 
Deo, Shrimati Sulata 
Desai, Shri Anil 
Dharmar, Shri R. 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
257

Divakonda, Shri Damodar Rao 
Dubey, Shri Satish Chandra 
Dwivedi, Shrimati Seema 
Elango, Shri N.R. 
Geeta alias Chandraprabha, Shrimati 
Gehlot, Shri Rajendra 
Girirajan, Shri R. 
Gogoi, Shri Ranjan 
Gohil, Shri Shaktisinh 
Gokhale, Shri Saket 
Goswami, Ms. Indu Bala 
Goyal, Shri Piyush 
Gupta, Shri Prem Chand 
Gupta, Shri Sushil Kumar 
Hanumanthaiah, Dr. L. 
Haque, Shri Mohammed Nadimul 
Harivansh, Shri 
Hegde, Shri Aneel Prasad 
Heggade, Dr. Dharmasthala Veerendra 
Hooda, Shri Deepender Singh 
Hussain, Shri Syed Nasir 
Ilaiyaraaja, Shri 
Islam, Shri Samirul 
Jaggesh, Shri 
Jangra, Shri Ram Chander 
Javadekar, Shri Prakash 
Jesangbhai, Shri Desai Babubhai 
Jethmalani, Shri Mahesh 
Jha, Prof. Manoj Kumar 
Jhala, Shri Kesridevsinh Digvijaysinh 
Joginipally Santosh Kumar, Shri 
Kadadi, Shri Iranna 
Kalita, Shri Bhubaneswar 
Kalyanasundaram, Shri S. 
Kanakamedala Ravindra Kumar, Shri 
Karad, Dr. Bhagwat 
Kardam, Shrimati Kanta 
258
[RAJYA SABHA]

Kareem, Shri Elamaram 
Karim, Shri Ahmad Ashfaque 
Ketkar, Shri Kumar 
Khan, Dr. Fauzia 
Khan, Shri Javed Ali 
Khan, Shri Muzibulla 
Kharge, Shri Mallikarjun 
Kharlukhi, Dr. Wanweiroy 
Konyak, Shrimati S. Phangnon 
Koragappa, Shri Narayana 
Krishnaiah, Shri Ryaga 
Kumar, Shri Mithlesh 
Kumar, Dr. Sikander 
Kumar, Shri Sujeet 
Lachungpa, Shri Hishey 
Laxman, Dr. K. 
Leishemba, Shri Maharaja Sanajaoba 
Mahadik, Shri Dhananjay Bhimrao 
Mahto, Shri Khiru 
Maji, Shrimati Mahua 
Mandaviya, Dr. Mansukh 
Mangaraj, Shri Manas Ranjan 
Mani, Shri Jose K. 
Mansingh, Dr. Sonal 
Margherita, Shri Pabitra 
Mather Hisham, Shrimati Jebi 
Meena, Dr. Kirodi Lal 
Mittal, Dr. Ashok Kumar 
Modi, Shri Sushil Kumar 
Mohanta, Shrimati Mamata 
Mokariya, Shri Rambhai Harjibhai 
Muraleedharan, Shri V. 
Murugan, Dr. L. 
Nadda, Shri Jagat Prakash 
Nagar, Shri Surendra Singh 
Nanda, Dr. Prashanta 
Narzary, Shri Rwngwra 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
259

Nathwani, Shri Parimal 
Netam, Shrimati Phulo Devi 
Nirmala Sitharaman, Shrimati 
Nishad, Shri Baburam 
Noor, Shrimati Mausam 
O' Brien, Shri Derek 
Oraon, Shri Samir 
P, Shri Sandosh Kumar 
Pandey, Ms. Saroj 
Panwar, Shri Krishan Lal 
Patel, Shri Praful 
Patel, Shri Rajmani 
Patel, Shri Shambhu Sharan 
Pathak, Shri Sandeep Kumar 
Patidar, Ms. Kavita 
Patil, Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao 
Patnaik, Dr. Amar 
Patra, Dr. Sasmit 
Pawar, Shri Sharad 
Pilli, Shri Subhas Chandra Bose 
Pradhan, Shri Dharmendra 
Prakash, Shri Deepak 
Prasad, Shri Aditya 
Pratapgarhi, Shri Imran 
Puri, Shri Hardeep Singh 
Rahim, Shri A. A. 
Rajbhar, Shri Sakaldeep 
Ram Shakal, Shri 
Ramadoss, Dr. Anbumani 
Ramesh, Dr. C.M. 
Ramesh, Shri Jairam 
Ramji, Shri 
Rane, Shri Narayan 
Ranjan, Shrimati Ranjeet 
Rao, Shri G.V.L. Narasimha 
Rao, Dr. K. Keshava 
Rathwa, Shri Naranbhai J. 
260
[RAJYA SABHA]

Raut, Shri Sanjay 
Ray, Shri Nagendra 
Rebia, Shri Nabam 
Reddy, Shri B. Parthasaradhi 
Reddy, Shri K.R. Suresh 
Reddy, Shri S Niranjan 
Reddy, Shri V. Vijayasai 
Rupala, Shri Parshottam 
Saini, Dr. Kalpana 
Scindia, Shri Jyotiraditya M. 
Selvaganabathy, Shri S. 
Sen, Ms. Dola 
Sen, Dr. Santanu 
Shanmugam, Shri C. Ve. 
Sharma Dr. Dinesh 
Sharma, Shri Kartikeya 
Shekhar, Shri Neeraj 
Shukla, Shri Rajeev 
Sibal, Shri Kapil 
Singh, Shri A. D. 
Singh, Shri Ajay Pratap 
Singh, Shri Akhilesh Prasad 
Singh, Shri Arun 
Singh, Shrimati Darshana 
Singh, Shri Digvijaya 
Singh, Shri Sant Balbir 
Singhvi, Dr. Abhishek Manu 
Sinha, Shri Rakesh 
Sircar, Shri Jawhar 
Siroya, Shri Lahar Singh 
Siva, Shri Tiruchi 
Sivadasan, Dr. V. 
Solanki, Dr. Sumer Singh 
Somu, Dr. Kanimozhi NVN 
Soni, Shri Kailash 
Sonowal, Shri Sarbananda 
Tanawde, Shri Sadanand Shet 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
261

Tankha, Shri Vivek K. 
Tasa, Shri Kamakhya Prasad 
Thakur, Shri Ram Nath 
Thakur, Shri Vivek 
Thambidurai, Dr. M. 
Tiwari, Shri Ghanshyam 
Tiwari, Shri Pramod 
Tomar, Shri Vijay Pal Singh 
Trivedi, Dr. Sudhanshu 
Tulsi, Shri K.T.S. 
Usha, Shrimati P. T. 
Vaddiraju, Shri Ravichandra 
Vaiko, Shri 
Vaishnaw, Shri Ashwini 
Vasan, Shri G.K. 
Vats (Retd.), Lt.Gen. (Dr.) D. P. 
Vemireddy, Shri Prabhakar Reddy 
Venugopal, Shri K.C. 
Verma, Shri B.L. 
Viswam, Shri Binoy 
Wasnik, Shri Mukul Balkrishna 
Wilson, Shri P. 
Yadav, Shri B. Lingaiah 
Yadav, Shri Bhupender 
Yadav, Shri Harnath Singh 
Yadav, Prof. Ram Gopal 
Yadav, Shrimati Sangeeta 
Yajnik, Dr. Amee 
 
The motion was carried by a majority of the total membership of the House and by a 
majority of not less than two-thirds of the Members present and voting. 
 
Clause 1 was added to the Bill. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: I shall now take up the En acting Formula and the Title of the Bill. 
The question is:  
That the Enacting Formula and the Title stand part of the Bill.  
262
[RAJYA SABHA]

The House divided. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN:  
Ayes :  214 
Noes : Nil 
Abstentions : Nil 
 
Ayes - 214 
 
Abdul Wahab, Shri  
Abdulla, Shri M. Mohamed  
Agrawal, Dr. Anil  
Agrawal, Dr. Radha Mohan Das  
Ahmad, Dr. Faiyaz  
Ali, Shri Gulam  
Alla, Shri Ayodhya Rami Reddy  
Amin, Shri Narhari  
Arora, Shri Sanjeev  
Athawale, Shri Ramdas  
Bachchan, Shrimati Jaya  
Baishya, Shri Birendra Prasad  
Bajpai, Dr. Ashok  
Bajpayee, Dr. Laxmikant  
Bakshi, Shri Subrata  
Balmik, Shrimati Sumitra  
Baluni, Shri Anil  
Bansal, Shri Naresh  
Bara, Shrimati Ramilaben Becharbhai  
Baraik, Shri Prakash Chik  
Bhuyan, Shri Ajit Kumar  
Bishi, Shri Niranjan  
Biswas, Shri Abir Ranjan  
Bonde, Dr. Anil Sukhdeorao  
Brijlal, Shri  
Brittas, Dr. John  
Chandrasegharan, Shri N.  
Chandrasekhar, Shri Rajeev  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
263

Chandrashekhar, Shri G.C.  
Chaturvedi, Shrimati Priyanka  
Chaudhary, Shri Jayant  
Chavan, Shrimati Vandana  
Chidambaram, Shri P.  
Dangi, Shri Neeraj  
Deb, Shri Biplab Kumar  
Deo, Shrimati Sulata  
Desai, Shri Anil  
Dharmar, Shri R.  
Divakonda, Shri Damodar Rao  
Dubey, Shri Satish Chandra  
Dwivedi, Shrimati Seema  
Elango, Shri N.R.  
Geeta alias Chandraprabha, Shrimati  
Gehlot, Shri Rajendra  
Girirajan, Shri R.  
Gogoi, Shri Ranjan  
Gohil, Shri Shaktisinh  
Gokhale, Shri Saket  
Goswami, Ms. Indu Bala  
Goyal, Shri Piyush  
Gupta, Shri Prem Chand  
Gupta, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Hanumanthaiah, Dr. L.  
Haque, Shri Mohammed Nadimul  
Harivansh, Shri  
Hegde, Shri Aneel Prasad  
Heggade, Dr. Dharmasthala Veerendra  
Hooda, Shri Deepender Singh  
Hussain, Shri Syed Nasir  
Ilaiyaraaja, Shri  
Islam, Shri Samirul  
Jaggesh, Shri  
Jangra, Shri Ram Chander  
Javadekar, Shri Prakash  
Jesangbhai, Shri Desai Babubhai  
264
[RAJYA SABHA]

Jethmalani, Shri Mahesh  
Jha, Prof. Manoj Kumar  
Jhala, Shri Kesridevsinh Digvijaysinh  
Joginipally Santosh Kumar, Shri  
Kadadi, Shri Iranna  
Kalita, Shri Bhubaneswar  
Kalyanasundaram, Shri S.  
Kanakamedala  Ravindra Kumar, Shri  
Karad, Dr. Bhagwat  
Kardam, Shrimati Kanta  
Kareem, Shri Elamaram  
Karim, Shri Ahmad Ashfaque  
Ketkar, Shri Kumar  
Khan, Dr. Fauzia  
Khan, Shri Javed Ali  
Khan, Shri Muzibulla  
Kharge, Shri Mallikarjun  
Kharlukhi, Dr. Wanweiroy  
Konyak, Shrimati S. Phangnon  
Koragappa, Shri Narayana  
Krishnaiah, Shri Ryaga  
Kumar, Shri Mithlesh  
Kumar, Dr. Sikander  
Kumar, Shri Sujeet  
Lachungpa, Shri Hishey  
Laxman, Dr. K.  
Leishemba, Shri Maharaja Sanajaoba  
Mahadik, Shri Dhananjay Bhimrao  
Mahto, Shri Khiru  
Maji, Shrimati Mahua  
Mandaviya, Dr. Mansukh  
Mangaraj, Shri Manas Ranjan  
Mani, Shri Jose K.  
Mansingh, Dr. Sonal  
Margherita, Shri Pabitra  
Mather Hisham, Shrimati Jebi  
Meena, Dr. Kirodi Lal  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
265

Mittal, Dr. Ashok Kumar  
Modi, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Mohanta, Shrimati Mamata  
Mokariya, Shri Rambhai Harjibhai  
Muraleedharan, Shri V.  
Murugan, Dr. L.  
Nadda, Shri Jagat Prakash  
Nagar, Shri Surendra Singh  
Nanda, Dr. Prashanta  
Narzary, Shri Rwngwra  
Nathwani, Shri Parimal  
Netam, Shrimati Phulo Devi  
Nirmala Sitharaman, Shrimati  
Nishad, Shri Baburam  
Noor, Shrimati Mausam  
O' Brien, Shri Derek  
Oraon, Shri Samir  
P, Shri Sandosh Kumar  
Pandey, Ms. Saroj  
Panwar, Shri Krishan Lal   
Patel, Shri Praful  
Patel, Shri Rajmani  
Patel, Shri Shambhu Sharan  
Pathak, Shri Sandeep Kumar  
Patidar, Ms. Kavita  
Patil, Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao  
Patnaik, Dr. Amar  
Patra, Dr. Sasmit  
Pawar, Shri Sharad  
Pilli, Shri Subhas Chandra Bose  
Pradhan, Shri Dharmendra  
Prakash, Shri Deepak  
Prasad, Shri Aditya  
Pratapgarhi, Shri Imran  
Puri, Shri Hardeep Singh  
Rahim, Shri A. A.  
Rajbhar, Shri Sakaldeep  
266
[RAJYA SABHA]

Ram Shakal, Shri  
Ramadoss, Dr. Anbumani  
Ramesh, Dr. C.M.  
Ramesh, Shri Jairam  
Ramji, Shri  
Rane, Shri Narayan  
Ranjan, Shrimati Ranjeet  
Rao, Shri G.V.L. Narasimha  
Rao, Dr. K. Keshava  
Rathwa, Shri Naranbhai J.  
Raut, Shri Sanjay  
Ray, Shri Nagendra  
Rebia, Shri Nabam  
Reddy, Shri B. Parthasaradhi  
Reddy, Shri K.R. Suresh  
Reddy, Shri S Niranjan   
Reddy, Shri V. Vijayasai  
Rupala, Shri Parshottam  
Saini, Dr. Kalpana  
Scindia, Shri Jyotiraditya M.  
Selvaganabathy, Shri S.  
Sen, Ms. Dola  
Sen, Dr. Santanu  
Shanmugam, Shri C. Ve.  
Sharma Dr. Dinesh  
Sharma, Shri Kartikeya   
Shekhar, Shri Neeraj  
Shukla, Shri Rajeev  
Sibal, Shri Kapil  
Singh, Shri A. D.  
Singh, Shri Ajay Pratap  
Singh, Shri Akhilesh Prasad  
Singh, Shri Arun  
Singh, Shrimati Darshana  
Singh, Shri Digvijaya  
Singh, Shri Sant Balbir  
Singhvi, Dr. Abhishek Manu  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
267

Sinha, Shri Rakesh  
Sircar, Shri Jawhar  
Siroya, Shri Lahar Singh  
Siva, Shri Tiruchi  
Sivadasan, Dr. V.  
Solanki, Dr. Sumer Singh  
Somu, Dr. Kanimozhi NVN  
Soni, Shri Kailash  
Sonowal, Shri Sarbananda  
Tanawde, Shri Sadanand Shet  
Tankha, Shri Vivek K.  
Tasa, Shri Kamakhya Prasad  
Thakur, Shri Ram Nath  
Thakur, Shri Vivek  
Thambidurai, Dr. M.  
Tiwari, Shri Ghanshyam  
Tiwari, Shri Pramod  
Tomar, Shri Vijay Pal Singh  
Trivedi, Dr. Sudhanshu  
Tulsi, Shri K.T.S.  
Usha, Shrimati P. T.  
Vaddiraju, Shri Ravichandra  
Vaiko, Shri  
Vaishnaw, Shri Ashwini  
Vasan, Shri G.K.  
Vats (Retd.), Lt.Gen. (Dr.) D. P.  
Vemireddy, Shri Prabhakar Reddy  
Venugopal, Shri K.C.  
Verma, Shri B.L.  
Viswam, Shri Binoy  
Wasnik, Shri Mukul Balkrishna  
Wilson, Shri P.  
Yadav, Shri B. Lingaiah  
Yadav, Shri Bhupender  
Yadav, Shri Harnath Singh  
Yadav, Prof. Ram Gopal  
Yadav, Shrimati Sangeeta  
268
[RAJYA SABHA]

Yajnik, Dr. Amee  
 
The motion was carried by a majority of the total membership of the House and by a 
majority of not less than two-thirds of the Members present and voting. 
 
The Enacting Formula and the Title were added to the Bill. 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: Now, Shri Arjun Ram Meghwal to move that the Bill be passed.  
 
SHRI ARJUN RAM MEGHWAL: Sir, I move:  
  That the Bill be passed.  
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: The question is: 
  That the Bill be passed. 
 
The House divided.
 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN:  
Ayes : 214 
Noes : Nil 
Abstentions : Nil 
 
Ayes - 214 
 
Abdul Wahab, Shri  
Abdulla, Shri M. Mohamed  
Agrawal, Dr. Anil  
Agrawal, Dr. Radha Mohan Das  
Ahmad, Dr. Faiyaz  
Ali, Shri Gulam  
Alla, Shri Ayodhya Rami Reddy  
Amin, Shri Narhari  
Arora, Shri Sanjeev  
Athawale, Shri Ramdas  
Bachchan, Shrimati Jaya  
Baishya, Shri Birendra Prasad  
Bajpai, Dr. Ashok  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
269

Bajpayee, Dr. Laxmikant  
Bakshi, Shri Subrata  
Balmik, Shrimati Sumitra  
Baluni, Shri Anil  
Bansal, Shri Naresh  
Bara, Shrimati Ramilaben Becharbhai  
Baraik, Shri Prakash Chik  
Bhuyan, Shri Ajit Kumar  
Bishi, Shri Niranjan  
Biswas, Shri Abir Ranjan  
Bonde, Dr. Anil Sukhdeorao  
Brijlal, Shri  
Brittas, Dr. John  
Chandrasegharan, Shri N.  
Chandrasekhar, Shri Rajeev  
Chandrashekhar, Shri G.C.  
Chaturvedi, Shrimati Priyanka  
Chaudhary, Shri Jayant  
Chavan, Shrimati Vandana  
Chidambaram, Shri P.  
Dangi, Shri Neeraj  
Deb, Shri Biplab Kumar  
Deo, Shrimati Sulata  
Desai, Shri Anil  
Dharmar, Shri R.  
Divakonda, Shri Damodar Rao  
Dubey, Shri Satish Chandra  
Dwivedi, Shrimati Seema  
Elango, Shri N.R.  
Geeta alias Chandraprabha, Shrimati  
Gehlot, Shri Rajendra  
Girirajan, Shri R.  
Gogoi, Shri Ranjan  
Gohil, Shri Shaktisinh  
Gokhale, Shri Saket  
Goswami, Ms. Indu Bala  
Goyal, Shri Piyush  
270
[RAJYA SABHA]

Gupta, Shri Prem Chand  
Gupta, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Hanumanthaiah, Dr. L.  
Haque, Shri Mohammed Nadimul  
Harivansh, Shri  
Hegde, Shri Aneel Prasad  
Heggade, Dr. Dharmasthala Veerendra  
Hooda, Shri Deepender Singh  
Hussain, Shri Syed Nasir  
Ilaiyaraaja, Shri  
Islam, Shri Samirul  
Jaggesh, Shri  
Jangra, Shri Ram Chander  
Javadekar, Shri Prakash  
Jesangbhai, Shri Desai Babubhai  
Jethmalani, Shri Mahesh  
Jha, Prof. Manoj Kumar  
Jhala, Shri Kesridevsinh Digvijaysinh  
Joginipally Santosh Kumar, Shri  
Kadadi, Shri Iranna  
Kalita, Shri Bhubaneswar  
Kalyanasundaram, Shri S.  
Kanakamedala Ravindra Kumar, Shri  
Karad, Dr. Bhagwat  
Kardam, Shrimati Kanta  
Kareem, Shri Elamaram  
Karim, Shri Ahmad Ashfaque  
Ketkar, Shri Kumar  
Khan, Dr. Fauzia  
Khan, Shri Javed Ali  
Khan, Shri Muzibulla  
Kharge, Shri Mallikarjun  
Kharlukhi, Dr. Wanweiroy  
Konyak, Shrimati S. Phangnon  
Koragappa, Shri Narayana  
Krishnaiah, Shri Ryaga  
Kumar, Shri Mithlesh  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
271

Kumar, Dr. Sikander  
Kumar, Shri Sujeet  
Lachungpa, Shri Hishey  
Laxman, Dr. K.  
Leishemba, Shri Maharaja Sanajaoba  
Mahadik, Shri Dhananjay Bhimrao  
Mahto, Shri Khiru  
Maji, Shrimati Mahua  
Mandaviya, Dr. Mansukh  
Mangaraj, Shri Manas Ranjan  
Mani, Shri Jose K.  
Mansingh, Dr. Sonal  
Margherita, Shri Pabitra  
Mather Hisham, Shrimati Jebi  
Meena, Dr. Kirodi Lal  
Mittal, Dr. Ashok Kumar  
Modi, Shri Sushil Kumar  
Mohanta, Shrimati Mamata  
Mokariya, Shri Rambhai Harjibhai  
Muraleedharan, Shri V.  
Murugan, Dr. L.  
Nadda, Shri Jagat Prakash  
Nagar, Shri Surendra Singh  
Nanda, Dr. Prashanta  
Narzary, Shri Rwngwra  
Nathwani, Shri Parimal  
Netam, Shrimati Phulo Devi  
Nirmala Sitharaman, Shrimati  
Nishad, Shri Baburam  
Noor, Shrimati Mausam  
O' Brien, Shri Derek  
Oraon, Shri Samir  
P, Shri Sandosh Kumar  
Pandey, Ms. Saroj  
Panwar, Shri Krishan Lal   
Patel, Shri Praful  
Patel, Shri Rajmani  
272
[RAJYA SABHA]

Patel, Shri Shambhu Sharan  
Pathak, Shri Sandeep Kumar  
Patidar, Ms. Kavita  
Patil, Shrimati Rajani Ashokrao  
Patnaik, Dr. Amar  
Patra, Dr. Sasmit  
Pawar, Shri Sharad  
Pilli, Shri Subhas Chandra Bose  
Pradhan, Shri Dharmendra  
Prakash, Shri Deepak  
Prasad, Shri Aditya  
Pratapgarhi, Shri Imran  
Puri, Shri Hardeep Singh  
Rahim, Shri A. A.  
Rajbhar, Shri Sakaldeep  
Ram Shakal, Shri  
Ramadoss, Dr. Anbumani  
Ramesh, Dr. C.M.  
Ramesh, Shri Jairam  
Ramji, Shri  
Rane, Shri Narayan  
Ranjan, Shrimati Ranjeet  
Rao, Shri G.V.L. Narasimha  
Rao, Dr. K. Keshava  
Rathwa, Shri Naranbhai J.  
Raut, Shri Sanjay  
Ray, Shri Nagendra  
Rebia, Shri Nabam  
Reddy, Shri B. Parthasaradhi  
Reddy, Shri K.R. Suresh  
Reddy, Shri S Niranjan   
Reddy, Shri 
V. Vijayasai  
Rupala, Shri Parshottam  
Saini, Dr. Kalpana  
Scindia, Shri Jyotiraditya M.  
Selvaganabathy, Shri S.  
Sen, Ms. Dola  
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
273

Sen, Dr. Santanu  
Shanmugam, Shri C. Ve.  
Sharma Dr. Dinesh  
Sharma, Shri Kartikeya   
Shekhar, Shri Neeraj  
Shukla, Shri Rajeev  
Sibal, Shri Kapil  
Singh, Shri A. D.  
Singh, Shri Ajay Pratap  
Singh, Shri Akhilesh Prasad  
Singh, Shri Arun  
Singh, Shrimati Darshana  
Singh, Shri Digvijaya  
Singh, Shri Sant Balbir  
Singhvi, Dr. Abhishek Manu  
Sinha, Shri Rakesh  
Sircar, Shri Jawhar  
Siroya, Shri Lahar Singh  
Siva, Shri Tiruchi  
Sivadasan, Dr. V.  
Solanki, Dr. Sumer Singh  
Somu, Dr. Kanimozhi NVN  
Soni, Shri Kailash  
Sonowal, Shri Sarbananda  
Tanawde, Shri Sadanand Shet  
Tankha, Shri Vivek K.  
Tasa, Shri Kamakhya Prasad  
Thakur, Shri Ram Nath  
Thakur, Shri Vivek  
Thambidurai, Dr. M.  
Tiwari, Shri Ghanshyam  
Tiwari, Shri Pramod  
Tomar, Shri Vijay Pal Singh  
Trivedi, Dr. Sudhanshu  
Tulsi, Shri K.T.S.  
Usha, Shrimati P. T.  
Vaddiraju, Shri Ravichandra  
274
[RAJYA SABHA]

Vaiko, Shri  
Vaishnaw, Shri Ashwini  
Vasan, Shri G.K.  
Vats (Retd.), Lt.Gen. (Dr.) D. P.  
Vemireddy, Shri Prabhakar Reddy  
Venugopal, Shri K.C.  
Verma, Shri B.L.  
Viswam, Shri Binoy  
Wasnik, Shri Mukul Balkrishna  
Wilson, Shri P.  
Yadav, Shri B. Lingaiah  
Yadav, Shri Bhupender  
Yadav, Shri Harnath Singh  
Yadav, Prof. Ram Gopal  
Yadav, Shrimati Sangeeta  
Yajnik, Dr. Amee  
 
The motion was carried by a majority of the total membership of the House and by a 
majority of not less than two-thirds of the Members present and voting. 
 
 
NATIONAL SONG 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: The Bill is passed by the constitutionally required majority. Let the 
lobbies be opened.  Hon. Members, kindly stand up for the National Song. 
 
(The National Song, 'Vande Mataram', was then played.) 
 
MR. CHAIRMAN: The House stands adjourned sine die. 
 
The House then adjourned sine die at thirty-one minutes past eleven of the clock. 
 
 
 
 
[ 21 September, 2023 ]
275

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
PUBLISHED UNDER RULE 260 OF RULES OF PROCEDURE AND CONDUCT OF 
BUSINESS IN THE COUNCIL OF STATES (RAJYA SABHA) 